
THE ARCADES PROJECT 



Translated by Howard Eiland and Kevin McLaughlin 

PREPARED ON THE BASIS OF THE GERMAN VOLUME EDITED BY ROLF TIEDEMANN 

THE BELKNAP PRESS OF HARVARD UNIVERSITY PRESS 
CAMBRIDGE, MASSACHUSETTS, AND LONDON, ENGLAND 



Copyright © 1999 by the President and Fellows of Harvard College 
All rights reserved 

Printed in the United States of America 

First Harvard University Press paperback edition, 2002 

This work is a translation of Walter Benjamin, Das Axsagen-WfrA, edited by Rolf Tiedemann, copyright 
© 1982 by Suhrkamp Verlag; volume 5 of WalterBenjamin, Gesanmitc Sdiriften, prepared with the co- 
operation of Theodor W. Adomo and Gershom Scholem, edited by Rolf Tiedemaim and Hermann 
Schweppenhauser, copyright © 1972, 1974, 1977, 1982, 1985, 1989 by Suhrkamp Verlag. "Dialectics at a 
Standstill," by Rolf Tiedemann, was fust published in English by MIT Press, copyright © 1988 by the 
Massachusetts Institute of Technology. 

Publication of this book has been supported by a grant from the National Endowment for the Humani- 
ties, an independent federal agency. 

Publication of this book has also been aided by a grant from Inter Nationes, Bonn. 

Cover photo: Walter Benjamin, ca. 1932. Photographer unknown. Courtesy of the Theodor W. Adorno 
Archiv, Frankfurt am Main. 

Frontispiece: Passage Jouffroy, 1845-1847. Photographer unknown. Courtesy Musee Carnavalet, Paris. 
Photo copyright © Phototheque des Musees de la Ville de Paris. 

Vignettes: pages i, 1, 825, 891, 1074, Institut Francais d Architecture; page 27, Hans Meyer-Veden; 
page 869, Robert Doisneau. 

Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data 

Benjamin, Walter, 1892-1940. 

[Passagen-Werk. English] 

The arcades project / Walter Benjamin; 
translated by Howard Eiland and Kevin McLaughlin; 
prepared on the basis of the German volume edited by Rolf Tedemann. 
p. cm. 

Includes index. 

ISBN 0-674-04326-X (cloth) 

ISBN 0-674-00802-2 (pbk.) 

I Tiedemann, Rolf. II. Title. 
PT2603.E455 P33513 1999 
944' .361081— dc21 99-27615 



Designed by Gwen Nefsky Frankfeldt 



CONTENTS 



Translators' Foreword ix 

Exposes 1 

"Paris, the Capital of the Nineteenth Century" (1935) 3 

"Paris, Capital of the Nineteenth Century" (1939) 14 

Convohites 27 

Overview 29 

First Sketches 827 
Early Drafts 

"Arcades" 871 

"The Arcades of Paris" 873 

"The Ring of Saturn" 885 

Addenda 

Expose of 1935, Early Version 893 

Materials for the Expose of 1 935 899 

Materials for "Arcades " 919 

"Dialectics at a Standstill," by Rolf Tiedemann 929 

"The Story of Old Benjamin," by Lisa Fittko 946 

Translators' Notes 955 

Guide to Names and lerms 1016 

Index 1055 



Illustrations 



Shops in the Passage Vero-Dodat 34 

Glass roof and iron girders. Passage Vivienne 35 

The Passage des Panoramas 36 

A branch of La Belle jardiniere in Marseilles 47 

The Passage de l'»pera. 1822-1823 49 

Street scene in front of the Passage des Panoramas 50 

Au Bon Marche department store in Paris 59 

Le Pmt des planetes, by Grandville 65 

Fashionable courtesans wearing crinolines, by Honore Daumier 67 

Tools used by Haussmann's workers 134 

Interior of the Crystal Palace. London 159 

La Casse-tete-omanie, ou La Fureur du jour 164 

The Paris Stock Exchange, mid-nineteenth century 165 

The Palais de l'Industrie at die world exhibition of 1855 166 

Le Triomphe du kaleidoscope, ou /.<? tombeau du jeu chinois 169 

Exterior of the Crystal Palace. London 185 

Charles Baudelaire, by Nadar 229 

The Pont-Neuf, by Charles Meryon 232 

Theophile Gautier, by Nadar 242 

The sewers of Paris, by Nadar 413 

A Paris omnibus, by Honore Daumier 433 
Deastdeadalus 



A page of Benjamin's manuscript from Convolute N 457 

A gallery of the Palais-Royal 491 

A panorama under construction 529 

A diorama on the Rue de Bondy 534 

Self-portrait by Nadar 680 

Nadar in his balloon, by Honore Daumier 682 

The Origin of Painting 683 

Rue Transnonain, le 15 avril 1834, by Honore Daumier 717 

Honore Daumier, by Nadar 742 

Victor Hugo, by Etienne Carjat 747 

L'Artiste et I'mmateur du dix-neuvieme siecle 750 

L'Homme de I 'art dans I'embarras de son metier 751 

Alexandre Dumas pere, by Nadar 752 

L'Etrangomanie blamee, ou D'Etre Frangau il n'y a pas d'tffront 783 

Actualite, a caricature of the painter Gustave Courbet 792 

A barricade of the Paris Commune 794 

The Fourierist missionary Jean Journet, by Nadar 813 

Walter Benjamin consulting the Grand Dictionnaire universel 888 

Walter Benjamin at the card catalogue of the Bibliotheque Nationale 889 

The Passage Choiseul 927 



Translators' Foreword 



f [/flhe materials assembled in Volume 5 of Walter Benjamin's Gesammelte 
H Schriften, under the title Das Passagen-Werk (first published in 1982), repre- 
I sent research that Benjamin carried out, over a period of thirteen years, on 
the subject of the Paris arcades — les passages — which he considered the most 
important architectural form of the nineteenth century, and which he linked with 
a number of phenomena characteristic of that century's major and minor preoc- 
cupations. A glance at the overview preceding the "Convolutes" at the center of 
the work reveals the range of these phenomena, which extend from the literary 
and philosophical to the political, economic, and technological, with all sorts of 
intermediate relations. Benjamin's intention from the first, it would seem, was to 
grasp such diverse material under the general category of Urgeschichte, signifying 
the "primal history" of the nineteenth century. This was something that could be 
realized only indirectly, through "cunning": it was not the great men and cele- 
brated events of traditional historiography but rather the "refuse" and "detritus" 
of history, the half-concealed, variegated traces of the daily life of "the collective," 
that was to be the object of study, and with the aid of methods more akin — above 
all, in their dependence on chance — to the methods of the nineteenth-century 
collector of antiquities and curiosities, or indeed to the methods of the nine- 
teenth-century ragpicker, than to those of the modern historian. Not conceptual 
analysis but something like dream interpretation was the model. The nineteenth 
century was the collective dream which we, its heirs, were obliged to reenter, as 
patiently and minutely as possible, in order to follow out its ramifications and, 
finally, awaken from it. This, at any rate, was how it looked at the outset of the 
project, which wore a good many faces over time. 

Begun in 1927 as a planned collaboration for a newspaper article on the 
arcades, the project had quickly burgeoned under the influence of Surrealism, a 
movement toward which Benjamin always maintained a pronounced ambiva- 
lence. Before long, it was an essay he had in mind, "Pariser Passagen: Eine 
dialektische Feerie" (Paris Arcades: A Dialectical Fairyland), and then, a few 
years later, a book, Paris, die Hauptstadt des XIX. Jahrhunderts (Paris, the Capital 
of the Nineteenth Century). For some two-and-a-half years, at the end of the 
Twenties, having expressed his sense of alienation from contemporary German 
writers and his affinity with the French cultural milieu, Benjamin worked inter- 
mittently on reams of notes and sketches, producing one short essay, "Der 



Satumring oder Etwas vom Eisenbau" (The Ring of Saturn, or Some Remarks 
on Iron Construction), which is included here in the section "Early Drafts." A 
hiatus of about four years ensued, until, in 1934, Benjamin resumed work on the 
arcades with an eye to "new and far-reaching sociological perspectives." The 
scope of the undertaking, the volume of materials collected, was assuming epic 
proportions, and no less epic was the manifest interminability of the task, which 
Benjamin pursued in his usual fearless way — step by step, risking engulfment — 
beneath the ornamented vaulting of the reading room of the Bibliotheque Na- 
tionale in Paris. Already in a letter of 1930, he refers to The Arcades Project as "the 
theater of all my struggles and all my ideas." 

In 1935, at the request of his colleagues at the Institute of Social Research in 
New 'fork, Benjamin drew up an expose, or documentary synopsis, of the main 
lines of The Arcades Project; another expose, based largely on the first but more 
exclusively theoretical, was written in French, in 1939, in an attempt to interest 
an American sponsor. Aside from these remarkably concentrated essays, and the 
brief text "The Ring of Saturn," the entire Arcades complex (without definitive 
title, to be sure) remained in the form of several hundred notes and reflections of 
varying length, which Benjamin revised and grouped in sheafs, or "convolutes," 
according to a host of topics. Additionally, from the late Twenties on, it would 
appear, citations were incorporated into these materials — passages drawn mainly 
from an array of nineteenth-century sources, but also from the works of key 
contemporaries (Marcel Proust, Paul Valery, Louis Aragon, Andre Breton, Georg 
Simmel, Ernst Bloch, Siegfried Kracauer, Theodor Adorno). These proliferating 
individual passages, extracted from their original context like collectibles, were 
eventually set up to communicate among themselves, often in a rather subterra- 
nean manner. The organized masses of historical objects — the particular items of 
Benjamin's display (drafts and excerpts) — together give rise to "a world of secret 
affinities," and each separate article in the collection, each entry, was to constitute 
a "magic encyclopedia" of the epoch from which it derived. An image of that 
epoch. In the background of this theory of the historical image, constituent of a 
historical "mirror world," stands the idea of the monad — an idea given its most 
comprehensive formulation in the pages on origin in the prologue to Benjamin's 
book on German tragic drama, Ursprung des deutschen Trauerspiels (Origin of the 
German Trauerspiel) — and back of this the doctrine of the reflective medium, in 
its significance for the object, as expounded in Benjamin's 1919 dissertation, 
"Der Begrif f der Kunstkritik in der deutschen Romantik" (The Concept of Criti- 
cism in German Romanticism) . At bottom, a canon of (nonsensuous) similitude 
rules die conception of the Arcades. 

Was this conception realized? In the text we have before us, is the world of 
secret affinities in any sense perceptible? Can one even speak of a "world" in the 
case of a literary fragment? For, since the publication of the Passagen-Werk, it has 
become customary to regard the text which Benjamin himself usually called the 
Passagenarbeit, or just the Passagen, as at best a "torso," a monumental fragment 
or ruin, and at worst a mere notebook, which the author supposedly intended to 
mine for more extended discursive applications (such as the carefully outlined 
and possibly half-completed book on Baudelaire, which he worked on from 1937 
to 1939). Certainly, the project as a whole is unfinished; Benjamin abandoned 



work on it in the spring of 1940, when he was forced to flee Paris before the 
advancing German army. Did he leave behind anything more than a large-scale 
plan or prospectus? No, it is argued, The Arcades Project is just that: the blueprint 
for an unimaginably massive and labyrinthine architecture — a dream city, in 
effect. This argument is predicated on the classic distinction between research 
and application, Forschung and Darstellung (see, for example, entry N4a,5 in the 
"Convolutes"), a distinction which Benjamin himself invokes at times, as in a 
letter to Gershom Scholem of March 3, 1934, where he wonders about ways in 
which his research on the arcades might be put to use, or in a letter of May 3, 
1936, where he tells Scholem that not a syllable of the actual text (eigentlichen 
lext) of the Passagenarbeit exists yet. In another of his letters to Scholem of this 
period, he speaks of the future construction of a literary form for this text. Similar 
statements appear in letters to Adomo and others. Where The Arcades Project is 
concerned, then, we may distinguish between various stages of research, more or 
less advanced, but there is no question of a realized work. So runs the lament. 

Nevertheless, questions remain, not least as a consequence of the radical status 
of "study" in Benjamin's thinking (see the Kafka essay of 1934, or Convolute m 
of the Arcades, "Idleness"). For one thing, as we have indicated, many of the 
passages of reflection in the "Convolutes" section represent revisions of earlier 
drafts, notes, or letters. Why revise for a notebook? The fact that Benjamin also 
transferred masses of quotations from actual notebooks to the manuscript of the 
convolutes, and the elaborate organization of these cited materials in that manu- 
script (including the use of numerous epigraphs), might likewise bespeak a com- 
positional principle at work in the project, and not just an advanced stage of 
research. In fact, the montage form — with its philosophic play of distances, tran- 
sitions, and intersections, its perpetually shifting contexts and ironic juxtaposi- 
tions — had become a favorite device in Benjamin's later investigations; among 
his major works, we have examples of this in Einbahnstrasse (One- Way Street), 
Berliner Kindheit urn Neumehnhundert (A Berlin Childhood around 1900), "Uber 
den Begiiff der Geschichte" (On the Concept of History) , and "Zentralpark" 
(Central Park). What is distinctive about The Arcades Project — in Benjamin's 
mind, it always dwelt apart — is the working of quotations into the framework of 
montage, so much so that they eventually far outnumber the commentaries. If 
we now were to regard this ostensible patchwork as, de facto, a determinate 
literary form, one that has effectively constructed itself (that is, fragmented it- 
self), like the Journaux intimes of Baudelaire, then surely there would be sig- 
nificant repercussions for the direction and tempo of its reading, to say the least. 
The transcendence of the conventional book form would go together, in this 
case, with the blasting apart of pragmatic historicism — grounded, as this always 
is, on the premise of a continuous and homogeneous temporality. Citation and 
commentary might then be perceived as intersecting at a thousand different 
angles, setting up vibrations across the epochs of recent history, so as to effect 
"the cracking open of natural teleology." And all this would unfold through the 
medium of hints or "blinks" — a discontinuous presentation deliberately opposed 
to traditional modes of argument. At any rate, it seems undeniable that despite 
the informal, epistolary announcements of a "book" in the works, an eigentlichen 
Buch, the research project had become an end in itself. 



Of course, many readers will concur with the German editor of the Passagen- 
Werk, Rolf Tiedemann, when he speaks, in his essay "Dialectics at a Standstill" 
(first published as the introduction to the German edition, and reproduced here 
in translation), of the "oppressive chunks of quotations" filling its pages. Part of 
Benjamin's purpose was to document as concretely as possible, and thus lend a 
"heightened graphicness" to, the scene of revolutionary change that was the 
nineteenth century. At issue was what he called the "commodifi cation of things." 
He was interested in the unsettling effects of incipient high capitalism on the most 
intimate areas of life and work — especially as reflected in the work of art (its 
composition, its dissemination, its reception). In this "projection of the historical 
into the intimate," it was a matter not of demonstrating any straightforward 
cultural "decline," but rather of bringing to light an uncanny sense of crisis and of 
security, of crisis in security. Particularly from the perspective of the nineteenth- 
century domestic interior, which Benjamin likens to the inside of a mollusk's 
shell, things were coming to seem more entirely material than ever and, at the 
same time, more spectral and estranged. In the society at large (and in Baude- 
laire's writing par excellence), an unflinching realism was cultivated alongside a 
rhapsodic idealism. This essentially ambiguous situation — one could call it, using 
the term favored by a number of the writers studied in llie Arcades Project, 
"phantasmagorical" — sets the tone for Benjamin's deployment of motifs, for his 
recurrent topographies, his mobile cast of characters, his gallery of types. For 
example, these nineteenth-century types (flaneur, collector, and gambler head the 
list) generally constitute figures in the middle — that is, figures residing within 
as well as outside the marketplace, between the worlds of money and magic — 
figures on the threshold. Here, furthermore, in the wakening to crisis (crisis 
masked by habitual complacency), was the link to present-day concerns. Not the 
least cunning aspect of this historical awakening — which is, at the same time, an 
awakening to myth — was the critical role assigned to humor, sometimes humor 
of an infernal kind. This was one way in which the documentary and the artistic, 
the sociological and the theological, were to meet head-on. 

To speak of awakening was to speak of the "afterlife of works," something 
brought to pass through the medium of the "dialectical image." The latter is 
Benjamin's central term, in 'Ine Arcades Project, for the historical object of inter- 
pretation: that which, under the divinatory gaze of the collector, is taken up into 
the collector's own particular time and place, thereby throwing a pointed light on 
what has been. Welcomed into a present moment that seems to be waiting just 
for it — "actualized," as Benjamin likes to say — the moment from the past comes 
alive as never before. In this way, the "now" is itself experienced as preformed in 
the "then," as its distillation — thus the leading motif of "precursors" in the text. 
The historical object is reborn as such into a present day capable of receiving it, 
of suddenly "recognizing" it. This is the famous "now of recognizability" (Jetzt 
der Erkennbarkeit) , which has the character of a lightning flash. In the dusty, 
cluttered corridors of the arcades, where street and interior are one, historical 
time is broken up into kaleidoscopic distractions and momentary come-ons, 
myriad displays of ephemera, thresholds for the passage of what Gerard de 
Nerval (in Amelia) calls "the ghosts of material things." Here, at a distance from 
what is normally meant by "progress," is the Mr-historical, collective redemption 
of lost time, of the times embedded in the spaces of things. 



The German edition of the Passagen- Werk contains — besides the two exposes we 
have mentioned, the long series of convolutes that follow, the "Erste Notizen" 
(here translated as "First Sketches") and "Friihe Entwiirfe" ("Early Drafts") at the 
end — a wealth of supplementary material relating to the genesis of Hie A rcades 
Project. From this textual-critical apparatus, drawn on for the Translators' Notes, 
we have extracted three additional sets of preliminary drafts and notations and 
translated them in the Addenda; we have also reproduced the introduction by the 
German editor, Rolf Tiedemann, as well as an account of Benjamin's last days 
written by Lisa Fittko and printed in the original English at the end of the 
German edition. Omitted from our volume are some 100 pages of excerpts from 
letters to and from Benjamin, documenting the growth of the project (the major- 
ity of these letters appear elsewhere in English) ; a partial bibliography, compiled 
by Tiedemann, of 850 works cited in the "Convolutes"; and, finally, precise 
descriptions of Benjamin's manuscripts and manuscript variants (see translators' 
initial note to the "Convolutes"). In an effort to respect the unique constitution of 
these manuscripts, we have adopted Tiedemann's practice of using angle brack- 
ets to indicate editorial insertions into the text. 

A salient feature of the German edition of Benjamin's "Convolutes" 
("Aufzeichnungen und Materialien") is the use of two different typefaces: a larger 
one for his reflections in German and a smaller one for his numerous citations in 
French and German. According to Tiedemann's introduction, the larger type was 
used for entries containing significant commentary by Benjamin. (In "First 
Sketches," the two different typefaces are used to demarcate canceled passages.) 
This typographic distinction, designed no doubt for the convenience of readers, 
although it is without textual basis in Benjamin's manuscript, has been main- 
tained in the English translation. We have chosen, however, to use typefaces 
differing in style rather than in size, so as to avoid the hierarchical implication of 
the German edition (the privileging of Benjamin's reflections over his citations, 
and, in general, of German over French). What Benjamin seems to have con- 
ceived was a dialectical relation — a formal and thematic interfusion of citation 
and commentary. It is an open, societary relation, as in the protocol to the 
imaginary world inn (itself an unacknowledged citation from Baudelaire's 
Paradis artificiels) mentioned in the "Convolutes" atJ75,2. 

As for the bilingual character of the text as a whole, this has been, if not 
entirely eliminated in the English-language edition, then necessarily reduced to 
merely the citation of the original titles of Benjamin's sources. (Previously pub- 
lished translations of these sources have been used, and duly noted, wherever 
possible; where two or more published translations of a passage are available, we 
have tried to choose the one best suited to Benjamin's context.) In most cases we 
have regularized the citation of year and place of book publication, as well as 
volume and issue number of periodicals; bits of information, such as first names, 
have occasionally been supplied in angle brackets. Otherwise, Benjamin's irregu- 
lar if relatively scrupulous editorial practices have been preserved. 

As a further aid to readers, the English-language edition of Hie Arcades Project 
includes an extensive if not exhaustive "Guide to Names and Terms"; translators' 
notes intended to help contextualize Benjamin's citations and reflections; and 
cross-references serving to link particular items in the "First Sketches" and "Early 
Drafts" to corresponding entries in the "Convolutes." 



Translation duties for this edition were divided as follows: Kevin McLaughlin 
translated the Expose of 1939 and the previously untranslated French passages 
in Convolutes A-C, F, H, K, M (second half), O, Qjl, and p-r. Howard Eiland 
translated Benjamin's German throughout and was responsible for previously 
untranslated material in Convolutes D, E, G, I ,J, L, M (first half), N, P, and m, as 
well as for the Translators' Foreword. 

In conclusion, a word about the translation oiKonvolut. As used for the grouping 
of the thirty-six alphabetized sections of the Passagen manuscript, this term, it 
would seem, derives not from Benjamin himself but from his friend Adorno (this 
according to a communication from Rolf Tiedemann, who studied with 
Adorno). It was Adomo who first sifted through the manuscript of the "Aufzeich- 
nungen und Materialien," as Tiedemann later called it, after it had been hidden 
away by Georges Bataille in the Bibliotheque Nationale de France during the 
Second World War and then retrieved and delivered to New York at the end of 
1947. In Germany, the term Konvolut has a common philological application: it 
refers to a larger or smaller assemblage — literally, a bundle — of manuscripts or 
printed materials that belong together. The noun "convolute" in English means 
"something of a convoluted form." We have chosen it as the translation of the 
German term over a number of other possibilities, the most prominent being 
"folder," "file," and "sheaf." The problem with these more common English 
terms is that each carries inappropriate connotations, whether of office supplies, 
computerese, agriculture, or archery. "Convolute" is strange, at least on first 
acquaintance, but so is Benjamin's project and its principle of sectioning. Aside 
from its desirable closeness to the German rubric, which, we have suggested, is 
both philologically and historically legitimated, it remains the most precise and 
most evocative term for designating the elaborately intertwined collections of 
"notes and materials" that make up the central division of this most various and 
colorful of Benjaminian texts. 

The translators are grateful to the National Endowment for the Humanities for a 
two-year grant in support of the translation, and to the Dean of the Graduate 
School of Brown University, Peder Estrup, for a generous publication subven- 
tion. Special thanks are due Michael W. Jennings for checking the entire manu- 
script of the translation and making many valuable suggestions. We are further 
indebted to Wmfried Menninghaus and Susan Bernstein for reading portions of 
the manuscript and offering excellent advice. Rolf Tiedemann kindly and 
promptly answered our inquiries concerning specific problems. The reviewers 
enlisted by Harvard University Press to evaluate the translation also provided 
much help with some of the more difficult passages. Other scholars who gener- 
ously provided bibliographic information are named in the relevant Translators' 
Notes. Our work has greatly benefited at the end from the resourceful, vigilant 
editing of Maria Ascher and at every stage from the foresight and discerning 
judgment of Lindsay Waters. 



Paris, the Capital of the Nineteenth Century 



< Expose of 1935 > 



The waters are blue, the plants pink; the evening is sweet to 
look on; 

One goes for a walk; the grandes dames go for a walk; behind 
them stroll the petites dames. 

— Nguyen Trong Hkp, Paris, capitate de la France: Recweil de vers 
(Hanoi, 1897), poem 25 



I. Fourier, or the Arcades 

The magic columns of these palaces 
Show to the amateur on all sides, 
In the objects their porticos display, 
That industry is the rival of the arts. 

— Nouveaux Tableaux de Paris (Paris, 1828), vol. 1, p. 27 

Most of the Paris arcades come into being in the decade and a half after 1822. 
The first condition for their emergence is the boom in the textile trade. Magasins 
de nouveautes, the first establishments to keep large stocks of merchandise on the 
premises, make their appearance. 1 They are the forerunners of department 
stores. This was the period of which Balzac wrote: "The great poem of display 
chants its stanzas of color from the Church of the Madeleine to the Porte Saint- 
Denis." 2 The arcades are a center of commerce in luxury items. In fitting them 
out, art enters the service of the merchant. Contemporaries never tire of admir- 
ing them, and for a long time they remain a drawing point for foreigners. An 
Illustrated Guide to Paris says: "These arcades, a recent invention of industrial 
luxury, are glass-roofed, marble-paneled corridors extending through whole 
blocks of buildings, whose owners have joined together for such enterprises. 
Lining both sides of these corridors, which get their light from above, are the 
most elegant shops, so that the passage is a city, a world in miniature." The 
arcades are the scene of the first gas lighting. 

The second condition for the emergence of the arcades is the beginning of iron 
construction. The Empire saw in this technology a contribution to the revival of 



architecture in the classical Greek sense The architectural theorist Boetticher 
expresses the general view of the matter when he says that, "with regard to the 
art forms of the new system, the formal principle of the Hellenic mode" must 
come to prevail. 3 Empire is the style of revolutionary terrorism, for which the 
state is an end in itself. Just as Napoleon failed to understand the functional 
nature of the state as an instrument of domination by the bourgeois class, so the 
architects of his time failed to understand the functional nature of iron, with 
which the constructive principle begins its domination of architecture. These 
architects design supports resembling Pompeian columns, and factories that imi- 
tate residential houses, just as later the first railroad stations will be modeled on 
chalets. "Construction plays the role of the subconscious." 1 Nevertheless, the 
concept of engineer, which dates from the revolutionary wars, starts to gain 
ground, and the rivalry begins between builder and decorator, Ecole Polytech- 
nique and Ecole des Beaux-Arts. 

For the first time in the history of architecture, an artificial building material 
appears: iron. It undergoes an evolution whose tempo will accelerate in the 
course of the century. This development enters a decisive new phase when it 
becomes clear that the locomotive — on which experiments had been conducted 
since the end of the 1820s — is compatible only with iron tracks. The rail be- 
comes the first prefabricated iron component, the precursor of the girder. Iron is 
avoided in home construction but used in arcades, exhibition halls, train sta- 
tions — buildings that serve transitory purposes. At the same time, the range of 
architectural applications for glass expands, although the social prerequisites for 
its widened application as building material will come to the fore only a hundred 
years later. In Scheerbart's Glusarchitektur (1914), it still appears in the context of 
Utopia/ 1 



Each epoch dreams the one to follow. 
— Michelct, "Avenir! Avenir!" 6 

Corresponding to the form of the new means of production, which in the begin- 
ning is still ruled by the form of the old (Marx), are images in the collective 
consciousness in which the new is permeated with the old. These images are wish 
images; in them the collective seeks both to overcome and to transfigure the 
immaturity of the social product and the inadequacies in the social organization 
of production. At the same time, what emerges in these wish images is the 
resolute effort to distance oneself from all that is antiquated — which includes, 
however, the recent past These tendencies deflect the imagination (which is 
given impetus by the new) back upon the primal past. In the dream in which each 
epoch entertains images of its successor, the latter appears wedded to elements of 
primal history <Urgeschichte> — that is, to elements of a classless society. And the 
experiences of such a society — as stored in the unconscious of the collective — 
engender, through interpenetration with what is new, the Utopia that has left its 



trace in a thousand configurations of life, from enduring edifices to passing 
fashions. 

These relations are discernible in the Utopia conceived by Fourier. Its secret cue 
is the advent of machines. But this fact is not directly expressed in the Fourierist 
literature, which takes as its point of departure the amorality of the business 
world and the false morality enlisted in its service. The phalanstery is designed to 
restore human beings to relationships in which morality becomes superfluous. 
The highly complicated organization of the phalanstery appears as machinery. 
The meshing of the passions, the intricate collaboration of passions mecanutes with 
the passion cabalute, is a primitive contrivance formed — on analogy with the 
machine — from materials of psychology. This mechanism made of men pro- 
duces the land of milk and honey, the primeval wish symbol that Fourier's Utopia 
has filled with new life. 

Fourier saw, in the arcades, the architectural canon of the phalanstery. Their 
reactionary metamorphosis with him is characteristic: whereas they originally 
serve commercial ends, they become, for him, places of habitation. The phalan- 
stery becomes a city of arcades. Fourier establishes, in the Empire's austere world 
of forms, the colorful idyll of Biedermeier. Its brilliance persists, however faded, 
up through Zola, who takes up Fourier's ideas in his book Iravail, just as he bids 
farewell to the arcades in his Therese Raquin. — Marx came to the defense of 
Fourier in his critique of Carl Griin, emphasizing the former's "colossal concep- 
tion of man." 7 He also directed attention to Fourier's humor. In fact, Jean Paul, in 
his Levana, is as closely allied to Fourier the pedagogue as Scheerbart, in his 
Glass Architecture, is to Fourier the Utopian. 8 



II. Daguerre, or the Panoramas 

Sun, look out for yourself! 

—A.J. Wiertz, Oeuvres litte'raires (Paris, 1870), p. 374 

Just as architecture, with the first appearance of iron construction, begins to 
outgrow art, so does painting, in its turn, with the first appearance of the pano- 
ramas. The high point in the diffusion of panoramas coincides with the introduc- 
tion of arcades. One sought tirelessly, through technical devices, to make 
panoramas the scenes of a perfect imitation of nature. An attempt was made to 
reproduce the changing daylight in the landscape, the rising of the moon, the 
rush of waterfalls. <Jacques-Louis> David counsels his pupils to draw from nature 
as it is shown in panoramas. In their attempt to produce deceptively lifelike 
changes in represented nature, the panoramas prepare the way not only for 
photography but for <silent> film and sound film. 

Contemporary with the panoramas is a panoramic literature. Le Livre des 
cent-et-un (The Book of a Hundred-and-One], Les Francais peints par eux-memes 
[The French Painted by Themselves], Le Diable a Paris [The Devil in Paris], and 
La Grande Jille [The Big City] belong to this. These books prepare die belletristic 



collaboration for which Girardin, in the 1830s, will create a home in the feuille- 
ton. They consist of individual sketches, whose anecdotal form corresponds to 
the panoramas' plastically arranged foreground, and whose informational base 
corresponds to their painted background. This literature is also socially pano- 
ramic. For the last time, the worker appears, isolated from his class, as part of the 
setting in an idyll. 

Announcing an upheaval in the relation of art to technology, panoramas are at 
the same time an expression of a new attitude toward life. The city dweller, 
whose political supremacy over the provinces is attested many times in the 
course of the century, attempts to bring the countryside into town. In panoramas, 
die city opens out, becoming landscape — as it will do later, in subder fashion, for 
the flaneurs. Daguerre is a student of the panorama painter Prevost, whose estab- 
lishment is located in the Passage des Panoramas. Description of the panoramas 
of Prevost and Daguerre. In 1839 Daguerre's panorama burns down. In the same 
year, he announces the invention of the daguerreotype. 

<Francois> Arago presents photography in a speech to die National Assembly. 
He assigns it a place in die history of technology and prophesies its scientific 
applications. On the other side, artists begin to debate its artistic value. Photogra- 
phy leads to the extinction of the great profession of portrait miniaturist. This 
happens not just for economic reasons. The early photograph was artistically 
superior to the miniature portrait. The technical grounds for this advantage lie in 
the long exposure time, which requires of a subject the highest concentration; the 
social grounds for it lie in the fact that the first photographers belonged to the 
avant-garde, from which most of their clientele came. Nadar's superiority to his 
colleagues is shown by his attempt to take photographs in the Paris sewer system: 
for die first time, die lens was deemed capable of making discoveries. Its importance 
becomes still greater as, in view of the new teclmological and social reality, the 
subjective strain in pictorial and graphic information is called into question. 

The world exhibition of 1855 offers for the first time a special display called 
"Photography." In the same year, Wiertz publishes his great article on photogra- 
phy, in which he defines its task as the philosophical enlightenment of painting. 9 
This "enlightenment" is understood, as his own paintings show, in a political 
sense. Wiertz can be characterized as the first to demand, if not actually foresee, 
the use of photographic montage for political agitation. With the increasing 
scope of communications and transport, the informational value of painting di- 
minishes. In reaction to photography, painting begins to stress the elements of 
color in the picture. By the time Impressionism yields to Cubism, painting has 
created for itself a broader domain into which, for the time being, photography 
cannot follow. For its part, photography gready extends the sphere of commodity 
exchange, from mid-century onward, by flooding the market widi coundess im- 
ages of figures, landscapes, and events which had previously been available 
either not at all or only as pictures for individual customers. To increase turnover, 
it renewed its subject matter through modish variations in camera technique — 
innovations diat will detennine the subsequent history of photography. 



III. Grandville, or the World Exhibitions 

Yes, when all the world from Paris to China 

Pays heed to your doctrine, O divine Saint-Simon, 

The glorious Golden Age will be reborn. 

Rivers will flow with chocolate and tea, 

Sheep roasted whole will frisk on the plain, 

And sauteed pike will swim in the Seine. 

Fricasseed spinach will grow on the ground, 

Garnished with crushed fried croutons; 

The trees will bring forth apple compotes, 

And farmers will harvest boots and coats. 

It will snow wine, it will rain chickens, 

And ducks cooked with turnips will fall from the sky. 

— Langle and \fonderburcb, Louii-Bronze et le Saint-Simonien 
(Theatre du Palais-Royal, February 27, 1832) 1 * 

World exhibitions are places of pilgrimage to the commodity fetish. "Europe is 
off to view the merchandise," says Taine in 1855. 11 The world exhibitions are 
preceded by national exhibitions of industry, the first of which takes place on the 
Champ de Mars in 1798. It arises from the wish "to entertain the working classes, 
and it becomes for them a festival of emancipation." 12 The worker occupies the 
foreground, as customer. The framework of the entertainment industry has not 
yet taken shape; the popular festival provides this. Chaptal's speech on industry 
opens the 1798 exhibition. — The Saint-Simonians, who envision the industriali- 
zation of the earth, take up the idea of world exhibitions. Chevalier, the 
first authority in the new field, is a student of Enfantin and editor of the Saint- 
Simonian newspaper Le Globe. The Saint-Simonians anticipated the development 
of the global economy, but not the class struggle. Next to their active participa- 
tion in industrial and commercial enterprises around the middle of the century 
stands their helplessness on all questions concerning the proletariat. 

World exhibitions glorify the exchange value of the commodity. They create a 
framework in which its use value recedes into the background. They open a 
phantasmagoria which a person enters in order to be distracted. The entertain- 
ment industry makes this easier by elevating the person to the level of the 
commodity. He surrenders to its manipulations while enjoying his alienation 
from himself and others. — The enthronement of the commodity, with its luster 
of distraction, is the secret theme of Grandville's art. This is consistent with the 
split between Utopian and cynical elements in his work. Its ingenuity in repre- 
senting inanimate objects corresponds to what Marx calls the "theological nice- 
ties" of the commodity. 23 They are manifest clearly in the specialite — a category of 
goods which appears at this time in the luxuries industry. Under Grandville's 
pencil, the whole of nature is transformed into specialties. He presents them in 
the same spirit in which the advertisement (the term reclame also originates at this 
point) begins to present its articles. He ends in madness. 



Fashion: "Madam Death! Madam Death!" 

— Leopardi, "Dialogue between Fashion and Death" 1 ' 1 

World exhibitions propagate the universe of commodities. Grandville's fantasies 
confer a commodity character on the universe. They modernize it. Saturn's ring 
becomes a cast-iron balcony on which the inhabitants of Saturn take the evening 
air. The literary counterpart to this graphic Utopia is found in the books of the 
Fourierist naturalist Toussenel. — Fashion prescribes the ritual according to which 
the commodity fetish demands to be worshipped. Grandville extends the author- 
ity of fashion to objects of everyday use, as well as to the cosmos. In taking it to 
an extreme, he reveals its nature. Fashion stands in opposition to the organic. It 
couples the living body to the inorganic world. To the living, it defends the rights 
of the corpse. The fetishism that succumbs to the sex appeal of the inorganic is its 
vital nerve. The cult of the commodity presses such fetishism into its service. 

For the Paris world exhibition of 1867, Victor Hugo issues a manifesto: 'To the 
Peoples of Europe." Earlier, and more unequivocally, their interests had been 
championed by delegations of French workers, of which the first had been sent to 
the London world exhibition of 1851 and the second, numbering 750 delegates, 
to that of 1862. The latter delegation was of indirect importance for Marx's 
founding of the International Workingmen's Association. — The phantasmagoria 
of capitalist culture attains its most radiant unfolding in the world exhibition of 
1867. The Second Empire is at the height of its power. Paris is acknowledged as 
the capital of luxury and fashion. Offenbach sets the rhythm of Parisian life. The 
operetta is the ironic Utopia of an enduring reign of capital. 



IV. Louis Philippe, or the Interior 

The head . . . 

On the night table, like a ranunculus, 
Rests. 

—Baudelaire, "Une Martyre" 15 

Under Louis Philippe, the private individual makes his entrance on the stage of 
history. The expansion of the democratic apparatus through a new electoral law 
coincides with the parliamentary corruption organized by Guizot. Under cover 
of this corruption, the ruling class makes history; that is, it pursues its affairs. It 
furthers railway construction in order to improve its stock holdings. It promotes 
the reign of Louis Philippe as that of the private individual managing his affairs. 
With the July Revolution, the bourgeoisie realized the goals of 1789 (Marx). 

For the private individual, the place of dwelling is for the first time opposed to 
the place of work. The former constitutes itself as the interior. Its complement is 
the office. The private individual, who in the office has to deal with reality, needs 
the domestic interior to sustain him in his illusions. This necessity is all the more 
pressing since he has no intention of allowing his commercial considerations to 



impinge on social ones. In the formation of his private environment, both are 
kept out. From this arise the phantasmagorias of the interior — which, for the 
private man, represents the universe. In the interior, he brings together the far 
away and the long ago. His living room is a box in the theater of the world. 

Excursus on Jugendstil. The shattering of the interior occurs via Jugendstil 
around the turn of the century. Of course, according to its own ideology, the 
Jugendstil movement seems to bring with it the consummation of the interior. 
The transfiguration of the solitary soul appears to be its goal. Individualism is its 
theory. With van de Velde, the house becomes an expression of the personality. 
Ornament is to this house what the signature is to a painting. But the real 
meaning of Jugendstil is not expressed in this ideology. It represents the last 
attempted sortie of an art besieged in its ivory tower by technology. This attempt 
mobilizes all the reserves of inwardness. They find their expression in the medi- 
umistic language of the line, in the flower as symbol of a naked vegetal nature 
confronted by the technologically armed world. The new elements of iron con- 
struction — girder forms — preoccupy Jugendstil. In ornament, it endeavors to win 
back these forms for art. Concrete presents it with new possibilities for plastic 
creation in architecture. Around this time, the real gravitational center of living 
space shifts to the office. The irreal center makes its place in the home. The 
consequences of Jugendstil are depicted in Ibsen's Master Builder: the attempt by 
the individual, on the strength of his inwardness, to vje with technology leads to 
his downfall. 



I believe ... in my soul: the Thing. 

— LeonDeubel, Oeuvres (Paris, 1929), p. 193 

The interior is the asylum of art. The collector is the true resident of the interior. 
He makes his concern the transfiguration of things. To him falls the Sisyphean 
task of divesting things of their commodity character by taking possession of 
them. But he bestows on them only connoisseur value, rather than use value. 
The collector dreams his way not only into a distant or bygone world but also 
into a better one — one in which, to be sure, human beings are no better provided 
with what they need than in the everyday world, but in which things are freed 
from the drudgery of being useful. 

The interior is not just the universe but also the etui of the private individual. 
To dwell means to leave traces. In the interior, these are accentuated. Coverlets 
and antimacassars, cases and containers are devised in abundance; in these, the 
traces of the most ordinary objects of use are imprinted. In just the same way, the 
traces of the inhabitant are imprinted in the interior. Enter the detective story, 
which pursues these traces. Poe, in his "Philosophy of Furniture" as well as in his 
detective fiction, shows himself to be the first physiognomist of the domestic 
interior. The criminals in early detective novels are neither gentlemen nor 
apaches, but private citizens of the middle class. 



V. Baudelaire, or the Streets of Paris 

Everything becomes an allegory for me. 
— Baudelaire, "Le Cygne" 1(i 

Baudelaire's genius, which is nourished on melancholy, is an allegorical genius. 
For the first time, with Baudelaire, Paris becomes the subject of lyric poetry. This 
poetry is no hymn to the homeland; rather, the gaze of the allegorist, as it falls on 
the city, is the gaze of the alienated man. It is the gaze of the flaneur, whose way 
of life still conceals behind a mitigating nimbus the coming desolation of the 
big-city dweller. The flaneur still stands on the threshold — of the metropolis as of 
the middle class. Neither has him in its power yet. In neither is he at home. He 
seeks refuge in the crowd. Early contributions to a physiognomies of the crowd 
are found in Engels and Poe. The crowd is the veil through which the familiar 
city beckons to the flaneur as phantasmagoria — now a landscape, now a room. 
Both become elements of the department store, which makes use of flanerie itself 
to sell goods. The department store is the last promenade for the flaneur. 

In the flaneur, the intelligentsia sets foot in the marketplace — ostensibly to look 
around, but in truth to find a buyer. In this intermediate stage, in which it still has 
patrons but is already beginning to familiarize itself with the market, it appears as 
the boheme. To the uncertainty of its economic position corresponds the uncer- 
tainty of its political function. The latter is manifest most clearly in the profes- 
sional conspirators, who all belong to the boheme. Their initial field of activity is 
the army; later it becomes the petty bourgeoisie, occasionally the proletariat. 
Nevertheless, this group views the true leaders of the proletariat as its adversary. 
The Communist Manifesto brings their political existence to an end. Baudelaire's 
poetry draws its strength from the rebellious pathos of this group. He sides with 
the asocial. He realizes his only sexual communion with a whore. 

Easy the way that leads into Avernus. 
— Virgil, The Aeneid 17 

It is the unique provision of Baudelaire's poetry that the image of woman and 
the image of death intermingle in a third: that of Paris. The Paris of his poems is 
a sunken city, and more submarine than subterranean. The chthonic elements of 
the city — its topographic formations, the old abandoned bed of the Seine — have 
evidently found in him a mold. Decisive for Baudelaire in the "death-fraught 
idyll" of the city, however, is a social, a modern substrate. The modern is a 
principal accent of his poetry. As spleen, it fractures the ideal ("Spleen et ideal"). 
But precisely modernity is always citing primal history. Here, this occurs 
through the ambiguity peculiar to the social relations and products of this 
epoch. Ambiguity is the appearance of dialectic in images, the law of dialectics at 
a standstill. This standstill is Utopia and the dialectical image, therefore, dream 
image. Such an image is afforded by the commodity per se: as fetish. Such an 
Linage is presented by the arcades, which are house no less than street. Such 
an image is the prostitute — seller and sold in one. 



I travel in order to get to know my geography. 

— Note of a madman, in Marcel Reja, L'Art chez les foiis (Paris, 1907), p. 131 

The last poem of Les Fleurs du mal; "Le Voyage." "Death, old admiral, up anchor 
now." The last journey of the flaneur: death. Its destination: the new. "Deep in 
the Unknown to find the new/"'* Newness is a quality independent of the use 
value of the commodity. It is the origin of the semblance that belongs 
inalienably to images produced by the collective unconscious. It is the quintes- 
sence of that false consciousness whose indefatigable agent is fashion. This sem- 
blance of the new is reflected, like one mirror in another, in the semblance of the 
ever recurrent. The product of this reflection is the phantasmagoria of "cultural 
history," in which the bourgeoisie enjoys its false consciousness to the full. The 
art that begins to doubt its task and ceases to be "inseparable from < . . . > utility" 
(Baudelaire) 13 must make novelty into its highest value. The arbiter novarum rerum 
for such an art becomes the snob. He is to art what the dandy is to fashion.— Just 
as in the seventeenth century it is allegory that becomes the canon of dialectical 
images, in the nineteenth century it is novelty. Newspapers flourish, along with 
magasins de nouveautes. The press organizes the market in spiritual values, in 
which at first there is a boom. Nonconformists rebel against consigning art to the 
marketplace. They rally round the banner of I 'art pour I 'art. From this watchword 
derives the conception of die "total work of art" — the Gesamtkunstwerk — which 
would seal art off from the developments of technology. The solemn rite with 
which it is celebrated is the pendant to the distraction that transfigures the com- 
modity. Both abstract from the social existence of human beings. Baudelaire 
succumbs to the rage for Wagner. 



VI. Haussmann, or the Barricades 

I venerate the Beautiful, the Good, and all things great; 
Beautiful nature, on which great art rests — 
How it enchants the ear and charms the eye! 
I love spring in blossom: women and roses. 

— Baron Haussmann, Confession i'un lion deventi vieux' M 

The flowery realm of decorations, 
The charm of landscape, of architecture, 
And all the effect of scenery rest 
Solely on the law of perspective. 

— Franz Bolile, Tfieater-Catechistmis (Munich), p. 74 

Haussmann's ideal in city planning consisted of long perspectives down broad 
straight thoroughfares. Such an ideal corresponds to the tendency — common in 
the nineteenth century — to ennoble technological necessities through artistic 
ends. The institutions of the bourgeoisie's worldly and spiritual dominance were 
to find their apotheosis within the framework of the boulevards. Before their 
completion, boulevards were draped across with canvas and unveiled like monu- 



ments. — Haussmann's activity is linked to Napoleonic imperialism. Louis 
Napoleon promotes investment capital, and Paris experiences a rash of specula- 
tion. Trading on the stock exchange displaces the forms of gambling handed 
down from feudal society. The phantasmagorias of space to which the flaneur 
devotes himself find a counterpart in the phantasmagorias of time to which the 
gambler is addicted. Gambling converts time into a narcotic. <Paul> Lafargue 
explains gambling as an imitation in miniature of the mysteries of economic 
fluctuation. 21 The expropriations carried out under Haussmann call forth a wave 
of fraudulent speculation. The rulings of the Court of Cassation, which are 
inspired by the bourgeois and Orleanist opposition, increase the financial risks of 
Haussmannization. 

Haussmann tries to shore up his dictatorship by placing Paris under an emer- 
gency regime. In 1864, in a speech before the National Assembly, he vents his 
hatred of the rootless urban population, which keeps increasing as a result of his 
projects. Rising rents drive the proletariat into the suburbs. The quartiers of Paris 
in this way lose their distinctive physiognomy. The "red belt" forms. Haussmann 
gave himself the title of "demolition artist," artiste demoluseur. He viewed his 
work as a calling, and emphasizes this in his memoirs. Meanwhile he estranges 
the Parisians from their city. They no longer feel at home there, and start to 
become conscious of the inhuman character of the metropolis. Maxime Du 
Camp's monumental work Paris owes its inception to this consciousness. 22 The 
Jere'miades d'un Haussmannise give it the form of a biblical lament. 23 

The true goal of Haussmann's projects was to secure the city against civil war. 
He wanted to make the erection of barricades in Paris impossible for all time. 
With the same end in mind, Louis Philippe had already introduced wooden 
paving. Nonetheless, barricades played a role in the February Revolution. Engels 
studies the tactics of barricade fighting. 21 Haussmann seeks to neutralize these 
tactics on two fronts. Widening the streets is designed to make the erection of 
barricades impossible, and new streets are to furnish the shortest route between 
the barracks and the workers' districts. Contemporaries christen the operation 
"strategic embellishment." 

Reveal to these depraved, 
O Republic, by foiling their plots, 
Your great Medusa face 
Ringed by red lightning. 

— Workers' song from about 1850, in Adolf Stalir, ^wei 
Monate in Pans (Oldenburg, 1851), vol. 2, p. 199 25 

The barricade is resurrected during the Commune. It is stronger and better 
secured than ever. It stretches across the great boulevards, often reaching a height 
of two stories, and shields the trenches behind it. Just as the Communist Manifesto 
ends the age of professional conspirators, so the Commune puts an end to the 
phantasmagoria holding sway over the early years of the proletariat. It dispels the 
illusion that the task of the proletarian revolution is to complete the work of 1789 



hand in hand with the bourgeoisie. This illusion dominates the period 1831- 
1 871, from the Lyons uprising to the Commune. The bourgeoisie never shared in 
this error. Its battle against the social rights of the proletariat dates back to the 
great Revolution, and converges with the philanthropic movement that gives it 
cover and that is in its heyday under Napoleon III. Under his reign, this move- 
ment's monumental work appears: Le Play's Ouwiers europeens [European Work- 
ers] . 36 Side by side with the concealed position of philanthropy, the bourgeoisie 
has always maintained openly the position of class warfare. 2 ' As early as 1831 , in 
the Journal des debats, it acknowledges that "every manufacturer lives in his 
factory like a plantation owner among his slaves." If it is the misfortune of the 
workers' rebellions of old that no theory of revolution directs their course, it is 
also this absence of theory that, from another perspective, makes possible their 
spontaneous energy and the enthusiasm with which they set about establishing a 
new society. This enthusiasm, which reaches its peak in the Commune, wins over 
to the working class at times the best elements of the bourgeoisie, but leads it in 
the end to succumb to their worst elements. Rimbaud and Courbet declare their 
support for the Commune. The burning of Paris is the worthy conclusion to 
Haussmarm's work of destruction. 

My good father had been in Paris. 

— Karl Gutzkow, Brief e mis Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, p. 58 

Balzac was the first to speak of the ruins of the bourgeoisie. 28 But it was Surreal- 
ism that fi rst opened our eyes to them. The development of the forces of produc- 
tion shattered the wish symbols of the previous century, even before the 
monuments representing them had collapsed. In the nineteenth century this 
development worked to emancipate the forms of construction from art, just as in 
the sixteenth century the sciences freed themselves from philosophy. A start is 
made with architecture as engineered construction. Then comes the reproduc- 
tion of nature as photography. The creation of fantasy prepares to become prac- 
tical as commercial art. Literature submits to montage in the feuilleton. All these 
products are on the point of entering the market as commodities. But they linger 
on the threshold. From this epoch derive the arcades and interieurs, the exhibition 
halls and panoramas. They are residues of a dream world. The realization of 
dream elements, in the course of waking up, is the paradigm of dialectical think- 
ing. Thus, dialectical thinking is the organ of historical awakening. Every epoch, 
in fact, not only dreams the one to follow but, in dreaming, precipitates its 
awakening. It bears its end within itself and unfolds it — as Hegel already no- 
ticed — by cunning. With the destabilizing of the market economy, we begin to 
recognize the monuments of the bourgeoisie as ruins even before they have 
crumbled. 



Paris, Capital of the Nineteenth Century 

Expose <of 1939> 



Introduction 

History is like Janus; it has two faces. Whether it looks at the past or at the present, it 
sees the same things. 

— Maxime Du Gamp, Paris, vol. 6, p. 315 

The subject of this book is an illusion expressed by Schopenhauer in the follow- 
ing formula: to seize the essence of bistory, it suffices to compare Herodotus and 
the morning newspaper. 1 What is expressed here is a feeling of vertigo charac- 
teristic of the nineteenth century's conception of history. It corresponds to a 
viewpoint according to which the course of the world is an endless series of facts 
congealed in the form of things. The characteristic residue of this conception is 
what has been called the "History of Civilization," which makes an inventory, 
point by point, of humanity's life forms and creations. The riches thus amassed 
in the aerarium of civilization henceforth appear as though identified for all time. 
This conception of history inimmizes the fact that such riches owe not only their 
existence but also their transmission to a constant effort of society — an effort, 
moreover, by which these riches are strangely altered. Our investigation proposes 
to show how, as a consequence of this reifying representation of civilization, the 
new forms of behavior and the new economically and technologically based 
creations that we owe to the nineteenth century enter the universe of a phantas- 
magoria. These creations undergo this "illumination" not only in a theoretical 
manner, by an ideological transposition, but also in the immediacy of their per- 
ceptible presence. They are manifest as phantasmagorias. Thus appear the ar- 
cades — first entry in the field of iron construction; thus appear the world 
exhibitions, whose link to the entertainment industry is significant. Also included 
in this order of phenomena is the experience of the flaneur, who abandons 
himself to the phantasmagorias of the marketplace. Corresponding to these 
phantasmagorias of the market, where people appear only as types, are the 
phantasmagorias of the interior, which are constituted by man's imperious need 
to leave the imprint of his private individual existence on the rooms he inhabits. 
As for the phantasmagoria of civilization itself, it found its champion in Hauss- 



mann and its manifest expression in his transformations of Paris. — Nevertheless, 
the pomp and the splendor with which commodity-producing society surrounds 
itself, as well as its illusory sense of security, are not immune to dangers; the 
collapse of the Second Empire and the Commune of Paris remind it of that. In 
the same period, the most dreaded adversary of this society, Blanqui, revealed to 
it, in his last piece of writing, the terrifying features of this phantasmagoria. 
Humanity figures there as damned. Everything new it could hope for turns out 
to be a reality that has always been present; and this newness will be as little 
capable of furnishing it with a liberating solution as a new fashion is capable of 
rejuvenating society. Blanqui's cosmic speculation conveys this lesson: that hu- 
manity will be prey to a mythic anguish so long as phantasmagoria occupies a 
place in it. 

A. Fourier, or the Arcades 
I 

The magic columns of these pcdais 
Show to enthusiasts from all parts, 
With the objects their porticos display, 
That industry is the rival of the arts. 

— Mwveaux Tableaux de Pairs (Paris, 1828), p. 27 

Most of the Paris arcades are built in the fifteen years following 1822. The first 
condition for their development is the boom in the textile trade. Magasins de 
nouveautes, the first establishments to keep large stocks of merchandise on the 
premises, make their appearance. They are the forerunners of department stores. 
This is the period of which Balzac writes : "The great poem of display chants its 
stanzas of color from the Church of the Madeleine to the Porte Saint-Denis." The 
arcades are centers of commerce in luxury items. In fitting them out, art enters 
the service of the merchant. Contemporaries never tire of admiring them. For a 
long time they remain an attraction for tourists. An Illustrated Guide to Paris says: 
"These arcades, a recent invention of industrial luxury, are glass-roofed, marble- 
paneled corridors extending through whole blocks of buildings, whose owners 
have joined together for such enterprises. Lining both sides of the arcade, which 
gets its light from above, are the most elegant shops, so that the passage is a city, 
a world in miniature." The arcades are the scene of the first attempts at gas 
lighting. 

The second condition for the emergence of the arcades is the beginning of iron 
construction. Under the Empire, this technology was seen as a contribution to 
the revival of architecture in the classical Greek sense. The architectural theorist 
Boetticher expresses the general view of the matter when he says that, "with 
regard to the art forms of the new system, the Hellenic mode" must come to 
prevail. The Empire style is the style of revolutionary terrorism, for which the 
state is an end in itself. Just as Napoleon failed to understand the functional 



nature of the state as an instrument of domination by the bourgeoisie, so the 
architects of his time failed to understand the functional nature of iron, with 
which the constructive principle begins its domination of architecture. These 
architects design supports resembling Pompeian columns, and factories that imi- 
tate residential houses, just as later the first railroad stations will assume the look 
of chalets. Construction plays the role of the subconscious. Nevertheless, the 
concept of engineer, which dates from the revolutionary wars, starts to gain 
ground, and the rivalry begins between builder and decorator, Ecole Polytech- 
nique and Ecole des Beaux-Arts. — For the first time since the Romans, a new 
artificial building material appears: iron. It will undergo an evolution whose pace 
will accelerate in the course of the century. This development enters a decisive 
new phase when it becomes clear that the locomotive — object of the most diverse 
experiments since the years 1828-1829 — usefully functions only on iron rails. 
The rail becomes the first prefabricated iron component, the precursor of the 
girder. Iron is avoided in home construction but used in arcades, exhibition halls, 
train stations — buildings that serve transitory purposes. 

II 

It is easy to understand that every mass-type "interest" which 
asserts itself historically goes far beyond its real limits in the 
"idea" or "imagination" when it first comes on the scene. 

— Marx and Engeis, Die heilige Familie 2 

The secret cue for the Fourierist Utopia is the advent of machines. The phalan- 
stery is designed to restore human beings to a system of relationships in which 
morality becomes superfluous. Nero, in such a context, would become a more 
useful member of society than Fenelon. Fourier does not dream of relying on 
virtue for this; rather, he relies on an efficient functioning of society, whose 
motive forces are the passions. In the gearing of the passions, in the complex 
meshing of the passions mecanutes with the passion cabalute, Fourier imagines the 
collective psychology as a clockwork mechanism. Fourierist harmony is the nec- 
essary product of this combinatory play. 

Fourier introduces into the Empire's world of austere forms an idyll colored by 
the style of the 1830s. He devises a system in which the products of his colorful 
vision and of his idiosyncratic treatment of numbers blend together. Fourier's 
"harmonies" are in no way akin to a mystique of numbers taken from any other 
tradition. They are in fact direct outcomes of his own pronouncements — lucubra- 
tions of his organizational imagination, which was very highly developed. Thus, 
he foresaw how significant meetings would become to the citizen. For the phalan- 
stery's inhabitants, the day is organized not around the home but in large halls 
similar to those of the Stock Exchange, where meetings are arranged by brokers. 

In the arcades, Fourier recognized the architectural canon of the phalanstery. 
This is what distinguishes the "empire" character of his Utopia, which Fourier 
himself naively acknowledges: "The societarian state will be all the more brilliant 
at its inception for having been so long deferred. Greece in the age of Solon and 



Pericles could already have undertaken it." 3 The arcades, which originally were 
designed to serve commercial ends, become dwelling places in Fourier. The 
phalanstery is a city composed of arcades. In this ville en passages, the engineer's 
construction takes on a phantasmagorical character. The "city of arcades" is a 
dream that will charm the fancy of Parisians well into the second half of the 
century. As late as 1869, Fourier's "street-galleries" provide the blueprint for 
Moilin's Paris en I an 2000* Here the city assumes a structure that makes it — with 
its shops and apartments — the ideal backdrop for the flaneur. 

Marx took a stand against Carl Griin in order to defend Fourier and to 
accentuate his "colossal conception of man." 5 He considered Fourier the only 
man besides Hegel to have revealed the essential mediocrity of the petty bour- 
geois. The systematic overcoming of this type in Hegel corresponds to its humor- 
ous annihilation in Fourier. One of the most remarkable features of die Fourierist 
Utopia is that it never advocated the exploitation of nature by man, an idea that 
became widespread in the following period. Instead, in Fourier, technology ap- 
pears as the spark that ignites the powder of nature. Perhaps this is the key to his 
strange representation of the phalanstery as propagating itself "by explosion." 
The later conception of man's exploitation of nature reflects the actual exploita- 
tion of man by the owners of the means of production. If the integration of the 
technological into social life failed, the fault lies in this exploitation. 



B. Gramlville, or the World Exhibitions 
I 

Yes, when all the world from Paris to China 

Pays heed to your doctrine, O divine Saint-Simon, 

The glorious Golden Age will be reborn. 

Rivers will flow with chocolate and tea, 

Sheep roasted whole will frisk on the plain, 

And sauteed pike will swim in the Seine. 

Fricasseed spinach will grow on the ground, 

Garnished with crushed fried croutons; 

The trees will bring forth apple compotes, 

And fanners will harvest boots and coats. 

It will snow wine, it will rain chickens, 

And ducks cooked with turnips will fall from the sky. 

— Langle and Vanderburch, Louis-Bronze et k SaintSimonien 
(Theatre du Palais-Royal, February 27, 1832) 

World exhibitions are places of pilgrimage to the commodity fetish. "Europe is 
off to view the merchandise," says Taine in 1855. 6 The world exhibitions were 
preceded by national exhibitions of industry, the first of which took place on the 
Champ de Mars in 1798. It arose from the wish "to entertain the working classes, 
and it becomes for them a festival of emancipation." 7 The workers would consti- 
tute their first clientele. The framework of the entertainment industry has not yet 
taken shape; the popular festival provides this. Chaptal's celebrated speech on 



industry opens the 1798 exhibition. — The Saint-Simonians, who envision the 
industrialization of the earth, take up the idea of world exhibitions. Chevalier, the 
first authority in this new field, is a student of Enf antin and editor of the Saint- 
Simonian newspaper Le Globe. The Saint-Simonians anticipated the development 
of the global economy, but not the class struggle. Thus, we see that despite their 
participation in industrial and commercial enterprises around the middle of the 
century, they were helpless on all questions concerning the proletariat. 

World exhibitions glorify the exchange value of the commodity. They create a 
framework in which its use value becomes secondary. They are a school in which 
the masses, forcibly excluded from consumption, are imbued with the exchange 
value of commodities to the point of identifying with it: "Do not touch the items 
on display." World exhibitions thus provide access to a phantasmagoria which a 
person enters in order to be distracted. Within these divertissements, to which the 
individual abandons himself in the framework of the entertainment industry, he 
remains always an element of a compact mass. This mass delights in amusement 
parks — with their roller coasters, their "twisters," their "caterpillars" — in an atti- 
tude that is pure reaction. It is thus led to that state of subjection which propa- 
ganda, industrial as well as political, relies on. — The enthronement of the 
commodity, with its glitter of distractions, is the secret theme of Grandville's art. 
Whence the split between its Utopian and cynical elements in his work. The 
subtle artifices with which it represents inanimate objects correspond to what 
Marx calls the "theological niceties" of the commodity. 8 The concrete expression 
of this is clearly found in the specialite — a category of goods which appears at this 
time in the luxuries industry. World exhibitions construct a universe of specialite s. 
The fantasies of Grandville achieve the same thing. They modernize the uni- 
verse. In his work, the ring of Saturn becomes a cast-iron balcony on which the 
inhabitants of Saturn take the evening air. By the same token, at world exhibi- 
tions, a balcony of cast-iron would represent the ring of Saturn, and people who 
venture out on it would find themselves carried away in a phantasmagoria where 
they seem to have been transformed into inhabitants of Saturn. The literary 
counterpart to this graphic Utopia is the work of the Fourierist savant Toussenel. 
Toussenel was the natural-sciences editor for a popular newspaper. His zoology 
classifies the animal world according to the rule of fashion. He considers woman 
the intermediary between man and the animals. She is in a sense the decorator of 
the animal world, which, in exchange, places at her feet its plumage and its furs. 
"The lion likes nothing better than having its nails trimmed, provided it is a 
pretty girl that wields the scissors." 9 

II 

Fashion: "Madam Death! Madam Death!" 

— Leopardi, "Dialogue between Fashion and Death" 10 

Fashion prescribes the ritual according to which the commodity fetish demands 
to be worshipped. Grandville extends the authority of fashion to objects of 
everyday use, as well as to the cosmos. In taking it to an extreme, he reveals its 



nature. It couples the living body to the inorganic world, lb the living, it defends 
the rights of the corpse. The fetishism which thus succumbs to the sex appeal of 
the inorganic is its vital nerve. The fantasies of Grandville correspond to the 
spirit of fashion that Apollinaire later described with this image: "Any material 
from nature's domain can now be introduced into the composition of women's 
clothes. I saw a charming dress made of corks. . . . Steel, wool, sandstone, and 
files have suddenly entered the vestmentary arts. . . . They're doing shoes in 
\fenetian glass and hats in Baccarat crystal." 11 

C. Louis Philippe, or the Interior 
I 

I believe ... in my soul: the Tiling. 

— LeonDeubel, Oeuvres (Paris, 1929), p. 193 

Under the reign of Louis Philippe, the private individual makes his entry into 
history. For the private individual, places of dwelling are for the first time op- 
posed to places of work. The former come to constitute the interior. Its comple- 
ment is the office. (For its part, the office is distinguished clearly from the shop 
counter, which, with its globes, wall maps, and railings, looks like a relic of the 
baroque forms that preceded the rooms in today's residences.) The private indi- 
vidual, who in the office has to deal with realities, needs the domestic interior to 
sustain him in his illusions. This necessity is all the more pressing since he has no 
intention of grafting onto his business interests a clear perception of his social 
function. In the arrangement of his private surroundings, he suppresses both of 
these concerns. From this derive the phantasmagorias of the interior — which, for 
the private individual, represents the universe. In the interior, he brings together 
remote locales and memories of the past. His living room is a box in the theater 
of the world. 

The interior is the asylum where art takes refuge. The collector proves to be 
the true resident of the interior. He makes his concern the idealization of objects. 
To him falls the Sisyphean task of divesting things of their commodity character 
by taking possession of them. But he can bestow on them only connoisseur 
value, rather than use value. The collector delights in evoking a world that is not 
just distant and long gone but also better — a world in which, to be sure, human 
beings are no better provided with what they need than in the real world, but in 
which things are freed from the drudgery of being useful. 

II 

The head . . . 

On the night table, like a ranunculus, 
Rests. 

— Baudelaire, "UneMartyre" 12 



The interior is not just the universe of the private individual; it is also his etui. 
Ever since the time of Louis Philippe, the bourgeois has shown a tendency to 
compensate for the absence of any trace of private life in the big city. He tries to 
do this within the four walls of his apartment. It is as if he had made it a point of 
honor not to allow the traces of his everyday objects and accessories to get lost. 
Indefatigably, he takes the impression of a host of objects; for his slippers and his 
watches, his blankets and his umbrellas, he devises coverlets and cases. He has a 
marked preference for velour and plush, which preserve the imprint of all con- 
tact. In the style characteristic of the Second Empire, the apartment becomes a 
sort of cockpit. The traces of its inhabitant are molded into the interior. Here is 
the origin of the detective story, which inquires into these traces and follows these 
tracks. Poe — with his "Philosophy of Furniture" and with his "new detectives" — 
becomes the fir st physiognomist of the domestic interior. The criminals in early 
detective fiction are neither gentlemen nor apaches, but simple private citizens of 
the middle class ("The Black Cat," "The TellTale Heart," "William Wilson"). 

Ill 

This seeking for my home . . . was my affliction. . . . Where is — 

my home? I ask and seek and have sought for it; I have not found it. 

— Nietzsche, Abo sprach garathltstra 13 

The liquidation of the interior took place during the last years of the nineteenth 
century, in the work of Jugendstil, but it had been coming for a long time. The art 
of the interior was an art of genre. Jugendstil sounds the death knell of the genre. 
It rises up against the infatuation of genre in the name of a mal du siecle, of a 
perpetually open-armed aspiration. Jugendstil for the first time takes into consid- 
eration certain tectonic forms. It also strives to disengage them from their func- 
tional relations and to present them as natural constants; it strives, in short, to 
stylize them. The new elements of iron construction — especially the girder — 
command the attention of this "modern style." In the domain of ornamentation, 
it endeavors to integrate these forms into art. Concrete puts at its disposal new 
potentialities for architecture. With van de Velde, the house becomes the plastic 
expression of the personality. Ornament is to this house what the signature is to a 
painting. It exults in speaking a linear, mediumistic language in which the flower, 
symbol of vegetal life, insinuates itself into the very lines of construction. (The 
curved line of Jugendstil appears at the same time as the tide Les Fleurs du mal. A 
sort of garland marks the passage from the "Flowers of Evil" to the "souls of 
flowers" in Odilon Redon and on to Swaim's fare catleya.) u — Henceforth, as 
Fourier had foreseen, the true framework for the life of the private citizen must be 
sought increasingly in offices and commercial centers. The fictional framework 
for the individual's life is constituted in the private home. It is thus that Tlie 
Master Builder takes the measure of Jugendstil. The attempt by the individual to 
vie with technology by relying on his inner flights leads to his downfall: the 
architect Solness kills himself by plunging from his tower. 15 



D. Baudelaire, or the Streets of Paris 
I 

Everything for me becomes allegory. 
—Baudelaire, "Le Cygne" 16 

Baudelaire's genius, which feeds on melancholy, is an allegorical genius. With 
Baudelaire, Paris becomes for the first time the subject of lyric poetry. This 
poetry of place is the opposite of all poetry of the soil. The gaze which the 
allegorical genius turns on the city betrays, instead, a profound alienation. It is 
the gaze of the flaneur, whose way of life conceals behind a beneficent mirage the 
anxiety of the future inhabitants of our metropolises. The flaneur seeks refuge in 
the crowd. The crowd is the veil through which the familiar city is transformed 
for the flaneur into phantasmagoria. This phantasmagoria, in which the city 
appears now as a landscape, now as a room, seems later to have inspired the 
decor of department stores, which thus put flanerie to work for profit. In any 
case, department stores are the last precincts of flanerie. 

In the person of the flaneur, the intelligentsia becomes acquainted with the 
marketplace. It surrenders itself to the market, thinking merely to look around; 
but in fact it is already seeking a buyer. In this intermediate stage, in which it still 
has patrons but is starting to bend to the demands of the market (in the guise of 
the feuilleton), it constitutes the boheme. The uncertainty of its economic position 
corresponds to the ambiguity of its political function. The latter is manifest 
especially clearly in the figures of the professional conspirators, who are recruited 
from the boheme. Blanqui is the most remarkable representative of this group. No 
one else in the nineteenth century had a revolutionary authority comparable to 
his. The image of Blanqui passes like a flash of lightning through Baudelaire's 
"Litanies de Satan." Nevertheless, Baudelaire's rebellion is always that of the 
asocial man: it is at an impasse. The only sexual communion of his life was with 
a prostitute. 

II 

They were the same, had risen from the same hell, 
ITiese centenarian twins. 

— Baudelaire, "Les Sept Vieillards" 17 

The flaneur plays the role of scout in the marketplace. As such, he is also the 
explorer of the crowd. Within the man who abandons himself to it, the crowd 
inspires a sort of drunkenness, one accompanied by very specific illusions: the 
man flatters himself that, on seeing a passerby swept along by the crowd, he has 
accurately classified him, seen straight through to the innermost recesses of his 
soul — all on the basis of his external appearance. Physiologies of the time 
abound in evidence of this singular conception. Balzac's work provides excellent 
examples. The typical characters seen in passersby make such an impression on 



the senses that one cannot be surprised at the resultant curiosity to go beyond 
them and capture the special singularity of each person. But the nightmare that 
corresponds to the illusory perspicacity of the aforementioned physiognomist 
consists in seeing those distinctive traits — traits peculiar to the person — revealed 
to be nothing more than the elements of a new type; so that in the final analysis a 
person of the greatest individuality would turn out to be the exemplar of a type. 
This points to an agonizing phantasmagoria at the heart of flanerie. Baudelaire 
develops it with great vigor in "Les Sept Vieillards," a poem that deals with the 
seven-fold apparition of a repulsive-looking old man. This individual, presented 
as always the same in his multiplicity, testifies to the anguish of the city dweller 
who is unable to break the magic circle of the type even though he cultivates the 
most eccentric peculiarities. Baudelaire describes this procession as "infernal" in 
appearance. But the newness for which he was on the lookout all his life consists 
in nothing other than this phantasmagoria of what is "always the same." (The 
evidence one could cite to show that this poem transcribes the reveries of a 
hashish eater in no way weakens this interpretation.) 

Ill 

Deep in the Unknown to find the new! 
— Baudelaire, "Le Voyage" 18 

The key to the allegorical form in Baudelaire is bound up with the specific 
signification which the commodity acquires by virtue of its price. The singular 
debasement of things through their signification, something characteristic of sev- 
enteenth-century allegory, corresponds to the singular debasement of things 
through their price as commodities. This degradation, to which things are subject 
because they can be taxed as commodities, is counterbalanced in Baudelaire by 
the inestimable value of novelty. La nouveaute represents that absolute which is 
no longer accessible to any interpretation or comparison. It becomes the ultimate 
entrenchment of art. The final poem of Les Flews du mal: "Le Voyage." "Death, 
old admiral, up anchor now." 13 The final voyage of the flaneur: death. Its destina- 
tion: the new. Newness is a quality independent of the use value of the commod- 
ity. It is the source of that illusion of which fashion is the tireless purveyor. The 
fact that art's last line of resistance should coincide with the commodity's most 
advanced line of attack — this had to remain hidden from Baudelaire. 

"Spleen et id£al" — in the title of this first cycle of poems in Les Fleurs du mal, 
the oldest loanword in the French language was joined to the most recent one. 20 
Ear Baudelaire, there is no contradiction between the two concepts. He recog- 
nizes in spleen the latest transfiguration of the ideal; the ideal seems to him the 
first expression of spleen. With this tide, in which the supremely new is presented 
to the reader as something "supremely old," Baudelaire has given the liveliest 
form to his concept of the modern. The linchpin of his entire theory of art is 
"modern beauty," and for him the proof of modernity seems to be this: it is 
marked with the fatality of being one day antiquity, and it reveals this to whoever 



witnesses its birth. Here we meet the quintessence of the unforeseen, which for 
Baudelaire is an inalienable quality of the beautiful. The face of modernity itself 
blasts us with its immemorial gaze. Such was the gaze of Medusa for the Greeks. 

E. Haussmaim, or the Barricades 
I 

I venerate the Beautiful, the Good, and all things great; 
Beautiful nature, on which great art rests — 
How it enchants the ear and charms the eye! 
I love spring in blossom: women and roses. 

— Baron Haussrnaim, Confession d'un liondevenu vieux 21 

Haussmann's activity is incorporated into Napoleonic imperialism, which favors 
investment capital. In Paris, speculation is at its height. Haussmann's expropria- 
tions give rise to speculation that borders on fraud. The rulings of the Court of 
Cassation, which are inspired by the bourgeois and Orleanist opposition, in- 
crease the financial risks of Haussmannization. Haussmann tries to shore up his 
dictatorship by placing Paris under an emergency regime. In 1864, in a speech 
before the National Assembly, he vents his hatred of the rootless urban popula- 
tion. This population grows ever larger as a result of his projects. Rising rents 
drive the proletariat into the suburbs. The quartiers of Paris in this way lose their 
distinctive physiognomy. The "red belt" forms. Haussmann gave himself the title 
of "demolition artist." He believed he had a vocation for his work, and empha- 
sizes this in his memoirs. The central marketplace passes for Haussmann's most 
successful construction — and this is an interesting symptom. It has been said of 
the He de la Cite, the cradle of the city, that in the wake of Haussmann only one 
church, one public building, and one barracks remained. Hugo and Merimee 
suggest how much the transformations made by Haussmann appear to Parisians 
as a monument of Napoleonic despotism. The inhabitants of the city no longer 
feel at home there; they start to become conscious of the inhuman character of 
the metropolis. Maxime Du Camp's monumen»al work Paris owes its existence 
to this dawning awareness. The etchings of Meryon (around 1850) constitute the 
death mask of old Paris. 

The true goal of Haussmann's projects was to secure the city against civil war. 
He wanted to make the erection of barricades in the streets of Paris impossible 
for all time. With the same end in mind, Louis Philippe had already introduced 
wooden paving. Nevertheless, barricades had played a considerable role in the 
February Revolution. Engels studied the tactics of barricade fighting. Haussmann 
seeks to forestall such combat in two ways. Widening the streets will make the 
erection of barricades impossible, and new streets will connect the barracks in 
straight lines with the workers' districts. Contemporaries christened the opera- 
tion "strategic embellishment." 



II 



The flowery realm of decorations, 
The charm of landscape, of architecture, 
And all the effect of scenery rest 
Solely on the law of perspective. 

— Franz Bohle, 'Theater-Catechisnms (Munich), p. 74 

Haussmann's ideal in city planning consisted of long straight streets opening 
onto broad perspectives. This ideal corresponds to the tendency — common in 
the nineteenth century — to ennoble technological necessities through spurious 
artistic ends. The temples of the bourgeoisie's spiritual and secular power were to 
find their apotheosis within the framework of these long streets. The perspec- 
tives, prior to their inauguration, were screened with canvas draperies and un- 
veiled like monuments; the view would then disclose a church, a train station, an 
equestrian statue, or some other symbol of civilization. With the Haussmanniza- 
tion of Paris, the phantasmagoria was rendered in stone. Though intended to en- 
dure in quasi-perpetuity, it also reveals its brittleness. The Avenue de l'Opera 
— which, according to a malicious saying of the day, affords a perspective on the 
porter's lodge at the Louvre — shows how unrestrained the prefect's megalo- 
mania was. 

Ill 

Reveal to these depraved, 
O Republic, by foiling their plots, 
Your great Medusa face 
Ringed by red lightning. 

— PieiTe Dupont, Chant des owners 

The barricade is resurrected during the Commune. It is stronger and better 
designed than ever. It stretches across the great boulevards, often reaching a 
height of two stories, and shields the trenches behind it. Just as the Communist 
Manifesto ends the age of professional conspirators, so the Commune puts an end 
to the phantasmagoria that dominates the earliest aspirations of the proletariat. It 
dispels the illusion that the task of the proletarian revolution is to complete the 
work of '89 in close collaboration with the bourgeoisie. This illusion had marked 
the period 1831-1871, from the Lyons riots to the Commune. The bourgeoisie 
never shared in this error. Its battle against the social rights of the proletariat 
dates back to the great Revolution, and converges with the philanthropic move- 
ment that gives it cover and that was in its heyday under Napoleon III. Under his 
reign, this movement's monumental work appeared: Le Play's Owners europe'ens 
[European Workers]. 

Side by side with the overt position of philanthropy, the bourgeoisie has always 
maintained the covert position of class struggle. 22 As early as 1831, in the Journal 
des debats, it acknowledged that "every manufacturer lives in his factory like a 



plantation owner among his slaves." If it was fatal for the workers' rebellions of 
old that no theory of revolution had directed their course, it was this absence of 
theory that, from another perspective, made possible their spontaneous energy 
and the enthusiasm with which they set about establishing a new society. This 
enthusiasm, which reaches its peak in the Commune, at times won over to the 
workers' cause the best elements of the bourgeoisie, but in the end led the 
workers to succumb to its worst elements. Rimbaud and Courbet took sides with 
the Commune. The burning of Paris is the worthy conclusion to Baron Hauss- 
mann's work of destruction. 



Conclusion 

Men of the nineteenth century, the hour of our apparitions is 
fixed forever, and always brings us back the very same ones. 

— Auguste Blanqui, L'Etenate par les ashes (Paris, 1872), pp. 74-75 

During the Commune, Blanqui was held prisoner in the fortress of Taureau. It 
was there that he wrote his L'Eternite par les astres [Eternity via the Stars], This 
book completes the century's constellation of phantasmagorias with one last, 
cosmic phantasmagoria which implicitly comprehends the severest critique of all 
the others. The ingenuous reflections of an autodidact, which form the principal 
portion of this work, open the way to merciless speculations that give the lie to 
the author's revolutionary elan. The conception of the universe which Blanqui 
develops in this book, taking his basic premises from the mechanistic natural 
sciences, proves to be a vision of hell. It is, moreover, the complement of that 
society which Blanqui, near the end of his life, was forced to admit had defeated 
him. The irony of this scheme — an irony which doubtless escaped the author 
himself — is that the terrible indictment he pronounces against society takes the 
form of an unqualified submission to its results. Blanqui's book presents the idea 
of eternal return ten years before ^arathustra — in a manner scarcely less moving 
than that of Nietzsche, and with an extreme hallucinatory power. 

This power is anything but triumphant; it leaves, on the contrary, a feeling of 
oppression. Blanqui here strives to trace an image of progress that (immemorial 
antiquity parading as up-to-date novelty) turns out to be the phantasmagoria of 
history itself . Here is the essential passage: 

The entire universe is composed of astral systems. To create them, nature has only a 
hundred simple bodies at its disposal. Despite the great advantage it derives from 
these resources, and the innumerable combinations that these resources afford its 
fecundity, the result is necessarily a finite number, like that of the elements them- 
selves ; and in order to fill its expanse, nature must repeat to infinity each of its 
original combinations or types. So each heavenly body, whatever it might be, exists in 
infinite number in time and space, not only in one of its aspects but as it is at each 
second of its existence, from birth to death. . . . The earth is one of these heavenly 
bodies. Every human being is thus eternal at every second of his or her existence. 
What I write at this moment in a cell of the Fort du Taureau I have written and shall 



write throughout all eternity — at a table, with a pen, clothed as I am now, in circum- 
stances like these. And thus it is for everyone. . . . The number of our doubles is 
infinite in time and space. One cannot in good conscience demand anything more. 
These doubles exist in flesh and bone — indeed, in trousers and jacket, in crinoline 
and chignon. They are by no means phantoms; they are the present eternalized. 
Here, nonetheless, lies a great drawback: there is no progress. . . . What we call 
"progress" is confined to each particular world, and vanishes with it. Always and 
everywhere in the terrestrial arena, the same drama, the same setting, on the same 
narrow stage — a noisy humanity infatuated with its own grandeur, believing itself to 
be the universe and living in its prison as though in some immense realm, only to 
founder at an early date along with its globe, which has borne with deepest disdain 
the burden of human arrogance. The same monotony, the same immobility, on 
other heavenly bodies. The universe repeats itself endlessly and paws the ground in 
place. In infinity, eternity performs — imperturbably — the same routines. 23 

This resignation without hope is the last word of the great revolutionary. The 
century was incapable of responding to the new technological possibilities with a 
new social order. That is why the last word was left to the errant negotiators 
between old and new who are at the heart of these phantasmagorias. The world 
dominated by its phantasmagorias — this, to make use of Baudelaire's term, is 
"modernity." Blanqui's vision has the entire universe entering the modernity of 
which Baudelaire's seven old men are the heralds. In the end, Blanqui views 
novelty as an attribute of all that is under sentence of danmation. Likewise in del 
et enfer [Heaven and Hell], a vaudeville piece that slightly predates the book: in 
this piece the torments of hell figure as the latest novelty of all time, as "pains 
eternal and always new." The people of the nineteenth century, whom Blanqui 
addresses as if they were apparitions, are natives of this region. 



COMMUTES 



Overview 



A Arcades, Magisins de Nouveautes, 
Sales Clerks 31 

IS Fashion 62 

C Ancient Paris, Catacombs, 
Demolitions, Decline of 
Paris 82 

U Boredom, Eternal Return 101 

E Haussmannization, Barricade 
Fighting 120 

F Iron Construction 150 

€S Exhibitions, Advertising, 
Grandville 171 

11 The Collector 203 

I The Interior, The Trace 212 

J Baudelaire 228 

K Dream City and Dream House, 
Dreams of the Future, 
Anthropological Nihilism, 
Jung 388 

L Dream House, Museum, Spa 405 

M The Flaneur 416 

M On the Theory of Knowledge, 
Theory of Progress 456 

© Prostitution, Gambling 489 

P The Streets of Paris 516 

Q Panorama 527 

R Mirrors 537 

S Painringjugendsril, Novelty 543 

T Modes of Lighting 562 

U Saint-Simon, Railroads 571 

\ Conspiracies, Compagnonnage 603 



W Fourier 620 

X Marx 651 

Y Photography 671 

Z The Doll, The Automaton 693 

a Social Movement 698 

b Daumier 740 

e 

4 Literary History, Hugo 744 

e 

f 

g The Stock Exchange, Economic 
History 779 

h 

i Reproduction Technology, 
Lithography 786 

k The Commune 788 

1 The Seine, The Oldest Paris 796 

m Idleness 800 

n 

O 

p Anthropological Materialism, 
History of Sects 807 

q 

r Ecole Poly technique 818 

s 

t 

u 

V 

w 



[Arcades, Magasins de Nouveautes, Sales Clerks] 



The magic columns of these palaces 
Show to the amateur on all sides, 
In the objects their porticos display, 
That industry is the rival of the arts. 

— "Chanson nouvelle" cited in Nouveaux Tableaux de Paris, ou Observa- 
tions sur les moeurs et usages des Parisiens au commencement du XIX 
sikle (Paiis, 1828), vol. 1, p. 27 

For sale the bodies, the voices, the tremendous unquestionable 
wealth, what will never be sold. 

— Rimbaud 1 



"In speaking of the inner boulevards," says the Illustrated Guide to Paris, a com- 
plete picture of the city on the Seine and its environs from the year 1852, "we 
have made mention again and again of the arcades which open onto them. These 
arcades, a recent invention of industrial luxury, are glass-roofed, marble-paneled 
corridors extending through whole blocks of buildings, whose owners have 
joined together for such enterprises. Lining both sides of these corridors, which 
get their light from above, are the most elegant shops, so that the arcade is a city, 
a world in miniature □ Flaneur D, in which customers will find everything they 
need. During sudden rainshowers, the arcades are a place of refuge for the 
unprepared, to whom they offer a secure, if restricted, promenade — one from 
which the merchants also benefit." 0 Wfeather □ 

This passage is the locus classicus for the presentation of the arcades; for not 
only do the divagations on the flaneur and the weather develop out of it, but, 
also, what there is to be said about the construction of the arcades, in an eco- 
nomic and architectural vein, would have a place here. [Al , 1] 

Names of mmgmsins de nouveautes: La FiJle d'Honneur, La Vestale, Le Page Incon- 
stant, Le Masque de Fer <The Iron Mask> , Le Petit Chaperon Rouge <Little Red 
Riding Hood>, Petite Nanette, La Chaumiere allemande <The German Cottage), 
Au Mamelouk, Le Coin de la Rue <On the Streetcorner> — names that mostly come 
from successful vaudevilles. □ Mythology DA glover: Au Ci-Devant Jeune Homme. 
A confectioner: Aux Armes de Werther. 



"The name of the jeweler stands over the shop door in large inlaid letters — inlaid 
with fine imitation gems." Eduard Kroloff, Schilderungen mus Pmris (Hamburg, 
1839), vol. 2, p. 73. "In the Galerie Vero-Dodat, there is a grocery store; above its 
door, one reads the inscription: 'Gastronomie Cosmopolite.' The individual char- 
acters of the sign are formed, in comic fashion, from snipes, pheasants, hares, 
antlers, lohsters, fish, bird kidneys, and so forth." Kroloff, Schilderungen mus 
Paris, vol. 2, p. 75. 0 Grandville D [Al,2] 

As business increased, the proprietor would purchase stock for a week and, to 
make room for the goods being stored, would withdraw to the entresol. In this 
way, the boutique became a magasin. [Al,3] 

It was the time in which Balzac could write: "The great poem of display chants its 
stanzas of color from the Church of the Madeleine to the Porte Saint-Denis." Le 
Diable a Paris (Paris, 1846), vol. 2, p. 91 (Balzac, "Les Boulevards de Paris"). 

[Al,4] 

"The day the word specialty was discovered by Her Majesty Industry, queen of 
France and of neighboring regions: on that day, it is said, Mercury, speciml god of 
merchants and of several other social specialties, knocked three times with his 
caduceus on the front of the Stock Exchange and swore by the beard of Proserpine 
that the word was fine with him." □ Mythology □ The word is used initially, how- 
ever, only for luxury items. Lm Grande Ville: Nouvemu Tmblemu de Pmris (Paris, 
1844), vol. 2, p. 57 (Marc Fournier, "Les Specialities parisiennes"). [Al,5] 

"The narrow streets surrounding the Opera and the hazards to which pedestrians 
were exposed on emerging from this theater, which is always besieged by carriages, 
gave a group of speculators in 1821 the idea of using some of the structures sepa- 
rating the new theater from the boulevard. / This enterprise, a source of riches for 
its originators, was at the same time of great benefit to the public. / By way of a 
small, narrow covered arcade built of wood, one had, in fact, direct access, with 
all the security of the Opera's vestibule, to these galleries, and from there to the 
boulevard. . . . Above the entablature of Doric pilasters dividing the shops rise 
two floors of apartments, and above the apartments — running the length of the 
galleries — reigns an enormous glass-paned roof." J. A. Dulaure, Histoire phy- 
sique, civile et morale de Pmris depuis 1821 jusqu'a nos jours (Paris, 1835), vol. 2, 
pp. 28-29. [Al,6] 

Until 1870, the carriage ruled the streets. On the narrow sidewalks the pedestrian 
was extremely cramped, and so strolling took place principally in the arcades, 
which offered protection from bad weather and from the traffic. "Our larger 
streets and our wider sidewalks are suited to the sweet flanerie that for our fathers 
was impossible except in the arcades." □ Flaneur D Edmond Beaurepaire, Pmris 
d'hier et d'mujourd'hui: Lm Chronique des rues (Paris, 1900), p. 67. [Ala.l] 



Names of arcades: Passage des Panoramas, Passage Vero-Dodat, Passage du Desir os 
(leading in earlier days to a house of ill repute), Passage Colbert, Passage Vivi- 

enne, Passage du Pont-Neuf, Passage du Caire, Passage de la Reunion, Passage de ^ 
1' Opera, Passage de la Trinite, Passage du Cheval-Blanc, Passage Pressiere <Bes- 

sieres?>, Passage du Bois de Boulogne, Passage Grosse-Tete. (The Passage des (L 

Panoramas was known at first as the Passage Mires.) [Ala, 2] - 

I 

The Passage Vero-Dodat (huilt between the Rue de Bouloy and the Rue Grenelle- g' 
Saint-Honore) "owes its name to two rich pork butchers, Messieurs Vero and 
Dodat, who in 1823 undertook its construction together with that of the adjacent 
buildings — an immense development. This led someone at the time to descrihe this S; 
arcade as a 'lovely work of art framed by two neighborhoods.'" J. A. Dulaure, 
Histoire physique, civile et morale de Paris depuis 1821 jusqu'k nos jours (Paris, ^ 
1835), vol. 2, p. 34. [Ala,3] & 

9 

The Passage Vero-Dodat had marble flooring. The actress Rachel lived there for a G 
while. [Ala,4] 



No. 26, Galerie Colbert: "There, in the guise of a female glover, shone a beauty 
that was approachable but that, in the matter of youth, attached importance 
only to its own; she required her favorites to supply her with the finery from 
which she hoped to make a fortune. . . . This young and beautiful woman under 
glass was called 'the Absolute'; but philosophy would have wasted its time pursu- 
ing her. Her maid was the one who sold the gloves; she wanted it that way." □ Dolls 
□ Prostitutes D <Charles> Lefeuve, Les Anciennes Maisons de Pmris, vol. 4. <Paris, 
1875>,p. 70. [Ala,5] 



Cour du Commerce: "Here (using sheep) the first experiments were conducted 
with the guillotine; its inventor lived at that time on the Cour du Commerce and 
the Rue de 1' Ancienne-Comedie." Lefeuve, Les Anciennes Mmisons de Pmris, vol. 
4, p. 148. [Ala,6] 



"The Passage du Caire, 2 where the main business is lithographic printing, must 
have decked itself out in lights when Napoleon III abolished the stamp duty on 
commercial circulars; this emancipation made the arcade rich, and it showed its 
appreciation with expenditures for beautification. Up to that point, when it 
rained, umbrellas had been needed in its galleries, which in several places lacked 
glass covering." Lefeuve, Les Anciennes Maisons de Paris, vol. 2, p. 233. D Dream 
Houses D Weather D (Egyptian ornamentation). [Ala, 7] 



Impasse Maubert, formerly d'Amhoise. Around 1756, at Nos. 4-6, a poisoner 
resided with her two assistants. All three were found dead one morning — killed 
through inhalation of toxic fumes. [Ala, 8] 



Shops in the Passage Vero-Dodat. Courtesy of the Musee Camavalet, Paris. Photo copyright 
© Phototheque des Musees de la Ville de Paris. See Ala,4. 

Years of reckless financial speculation under Louis XVIII. With the dramatic 
signage of the magasins de nouveautes, art enters the service of the businessman. 

[Ala,9] 

"After the Passage de Panoramas, which went hack to the year 1800 and which 
had an established reputation in society, there was, by way of example, the gallery 
that was opened in 1826 hy the butchers Vero and Dodat and that was pictured in 
the 1832 lithograph hy Arnout. After 1800 we must go all the way to 1822 to meet 
with a new arcade: it is between this date and 1834 that the majority of these 
singular passageways are constructed. The most important of them are grouped in 




Glass roof and iron girders, Passage Vivienne. Photographer unknown. Collection of 
Johann Friedrich Geist; courtesy Prestel Verlag, Munich. See Ala, 2. 




The Passage des Panoramas. Watercolor by an unknown artist, ca. 1810. Courtesy of 
Agence Giraudon. See A2,l. 



an area bounded by the Rue Croix-des-Petits-Champs to the south, the Rue de la 
Grange-Bateliere to the north, the Boulevard de Sebastopol to the east, and the 
Rue Ventadour to the west." Marcel Poete, Une vie de cite (Paris, 1925), pp. 373- 
374. [Ala,10] 

Shops in the Passage des Panoramas: Restaurant Veron, reading room, music 
shop, Marquis, wine merchants, hosier, haberdashers, tailors, bootmakers, ho- 
siers, bookshops, caricaturist, Theatre des Varietes. Compared with this, the Pas- 
sage Vivienne was the "solid" arcade. There, one found no luxury shops. D Dream 
Houses: arcade as nave with side chapels. □ [A2,l] 

People associated the "genius of the Jacobins with the genius of the industrials," 
but they also attributed to Louis Philippe the saying: "God be praised, and my 
shops too." The arcades as temples of commodity capital. [A2,2] 

The newest Paris arcade, on the Champs-Elysees, built by an American pearl 
king; no longer in business. D Decline D [A2,3] 

"Toward the end of the ancien regime, there were attempts to establish bazaar-like 
shops and fixed-price stores in Paris. Some large mmgmsins de nouvemutes — such 
as Le Diable Boiteux, Les Deux Magots, Le Petit Matelot, Pygmalion — were 
founded during the Restoration and during the reign of Louis Philippe; hut these 
were businesses of an inferior sort compared to today's establishments. The era of 
the department stores dates, in fact, only from the Second Empire. They have 
undergone a great deal of development since 1870, and they continue to develop." 
E<mile> Levasseur, Histoire du commerce de lm Frmnce, vol. 2 (Paris, 1912), 
p. 449. [A2,4] 

Arcades as origin of department stores? Which of the magasins named above 
were located in arcades? [A2,5] 

The regime of specialties furnishes also — this said in passing — the historical-mate- 
rialist key to the flourishing (if not the inception) of genre painting in the Forties 
of the previous century. With the growing interest of the bourgeoisie in matters 
of art, this type of painting diversified; but in conformity with the meager artistic 
appreciation initially displayed by this class, it did so in terms of the content, in 
terms of the objects represented. There appeared historical scenes, animal stud- 
ies, scenes of childhood, scenes from the life of monks, the life of the family, the 
life of the village — all as sharply defined genres. D Photography D [A2,6] 

The influence of commercial affairs on Lautreamont and Rimbaud should be 
looked into! [A2,7] 



"Another characteristic deriving chiefly from the Directory [presumably until 
around 1830??] would be the lightness of fabrics; on even the coldest days, one was 



seen only rarely in furs or warm overcoats. At the risk of losing their skin, women 
clothed themselves as though the harshness of winter no longer existed, as though 
nature had suddenly been transformed into an eternal paradise." <John> Grand- 
Carteret, Les Elegances de Im toilette (Paris), p. xxxiv. [A2,8] 

In other respects as well, the theater in those days provided the vocabulary for 
articles of fashion. Hats a la Tarare, a la Theodore, a la Figaro, a la Grande- 
Pretresse, a la Iphigenie, a la Calprenade, a la Victoire. The same niauerie that 
seeks in ballet the origin of the real betrays itself when — around 1830 — a news- 
paper takes the name Le Sylphe. 0 Fashion D [A2,9] 

Alexandre Dumas at a dinner party given by Princess Mathilde. The verse is 
aimed at Napoleon III. 

In their imperial splendor, 
The uncle and nephew are equal: 
The uncle seized the capitals, 
The nephew seizes our capital. 

Icy silence followed. Reported in Memoires du comte Hormce de Viel-Cmstel sur le 
regne de Napoleon III, vol. 2 (Paris, 1883), p. 185. [A2.10] 

"The coulisse* guaranteed the ongoing life of the Stock Exchange. Here there was 
never closing time; there was almost never night. When the Cafe Tortoni finally 
closed its doors, the column of stock jobbers would head across the adjacent 
boulevards and meander up and down there, collecting in front of the Passage de 
rOpera." Julius Rodenberg, Pmris bei Sonnenschein and Lmmpenlicht (Leipzig, 
1867), p. 97. [A2.ll] 

Speculation in railroad stocks under Louis Philippe. [A2,12] 

"Of the same extraction, furthermore [that is, from the house of Rothschild], is 
the amazingly eloquent Mires, who needs only to speak in order to convince his 
creditors that losses are profits — but whose name, after the scandalous trial 
against him, was nonetheless obliterated from the Passage Mires, which thereupon 
became the Passage des Princes (with the famous dining rooms of Peters restau- 
rant)." Rodenberg, Pmris bei Sonnenschein and Lmmpenlicht (Leipzig, 1867), 
p. 98. [A2a,l] 

Cry of the vendors of stock-exchange lists on the street: In the event of a rise in 
prices, "Rise in the stock market!" In the event of a fall, "Variations in the stock 
market!" The term "fall" was forbidden by the police. [A2,a,2] 



In its importance for the affairs of the coulisse, the Passage de FOpera is compara- 
ble to the Kranzlerecke. Speculator's argot "in the period preceding the outbreak 
of the German war [of 1866]: the 3-percent interest was called Alphonsine; the 



land credit, le gros Ernest; the Italian revenue, le pauvre Victor; the credit for 
movables, I e petit Jules.'" In Rodenberg <Leipzig, 1867>, p. 100. [A2a,3] 



Range of a stockbroker's fee: between 2 ,000,000 <sic> an d 1 ,400,000 francs. 

[A2a,4] 

"The arcades, nearly all of which date from the Restoration." Theodore Muret, 
L'Histoire pmr le thei.tr e (Paris, 1865), vol. 2, p. 300. [A2a,5] 

Some details concerning Avmnt, pendant, et mpres <Before, During, and After), by 
Scribe and Rougemont. Premier on June 28, 1828. The first part of the trilogy 
represents the society of the ancien regime, the second part depicts the Reign of 
Terror, and the third takes place in the society of the Restoration period. The 
main character, the General, has in peacetime become an industrialist and indeed 
a great manufacturer. "Here manufacturing replaces, at the highest level, the field 
worked by the soldier-laborer. The praises of industry, no less than the praises of 
warriors and Imuremtes, were sung by Restoration vaudeville. The bourgeois class, 
with its various levels, was placed opposite the class of nobles: the fortune ac- 
quired by work was opposed to ancient heraldry, to the turrets of the old manor 
house. This Third Estate, having become the dominant power, received in turn its 
flatterers." Theodore Muret, L'Histoire pmr le theatre, vol. 2, p. 306. [A2a,6] 

The Galeries de Bois, "which disappeared in 1828-1829 to make room for the 
Galerie d' Orleans, were made up of a triple line of shops that could hardly be 
called luxurious. There were two parallel lanes covered by canvas and planks, 
with a few glass panes to let the daylight in. Here one walked quite simply on the 
packed earth, which downpours sometimes transformed into mud. Yet people 
came from all over to crowd into this place, which was nothing short of mag- 
nificent, and stroll between the rows of shops that would seem like mere booths 
compared to those that have come after them. These shops were occupied chielly 
by two industries, each having its own appeal. There were, first, a great many 
milliners, who worked on large stools facing outward, without even a window to 
separate them; and their spirited expressions were, for many strollers, no small 
part of the place's attraction. And then the Galeries de Bois were the center of the 
new book trade." Theodore Muret, L'Histoire pmr le theatre, vol. 2, pp. 225-226. 

[A2a,7] 

Julius Rodenberg on the small reading room in the Passage de l'Opera: "What a 
cheerful air this small, half -darkened room has in my memory, with its high book- 
shelves, its green tables, its red-haired gmrqon (a great lover of books, who was 
always reading novels instead of bringing them to others), its German newspapers, 
which every morning gladdened the heart of the German abroad (all except the 
Cologne paper, which on average made an appearance only once in ten days). But 
when there is any news in Paris, it is here that one can receive it. Softly whispered 
(for the redhead keeps a sharp lookout to make sure that neither he nor other 



o 



readers will be disturbed by this), it passes from lips to ear, passes almost imper- 
ceptibly from pen to paper, and finally from writing desk to nearby letterbox. The 
good dmme du bureau has a friendly smile for all, and papers and envelopes for 
correspondents. The early mail is dispatched, Cologne and Augsburg have their 
news; and now — it is noontime! — to the tavern." Rodenberg, Pmris bei Sonnen- 
schein und Lmmpenlicht (Leipzig, 1867), pp. 6-7. [A2a,8] 

"The Passage du Caire is highly reminiscent, on a smaller scale, of the Passage du 
Saumon, which in the past existed on the Rue Montmartre, on the site of the 
present-day Rue Rachaumont." Paul Leautaud, "Vieux Paris," Mercure de 
France (October 15, 1927), p. 503. [A3,l] 

"Shops on the old model, devoted to trades found nowhere else, surmounted by a 
small, old-fashioned mezzanine with windows that each bear a number, on an 
escutcheon, corresponding to a particular shop. From time to time, a doorway 
giving onto a corridor; at the end of the corridor, a small stairway leading to these 
mezzanines. Near the knob of one of these doors, this handwritten sign: 



The worker next door 
would be obliged if, 
in closing the door, 
you refrained from slamming it. 

[A3 ,2] 

Another sign is cited in the same place (Leautaud, "Vieux Paris," Mercure de 
France [1927], pp. 502-503): 

ANGELA 
2nd floor, to the right 

[A3.3] 

Old name for department stores: docks a bon mmrche — that is, "discount docks." 
<Sigfried> Giedion, Bmuen in Frtmkreich <Leipzig and Rerlin, 1928>, p. 31. 

[A3,4] 

Evolution of the department store from the shop that was housed in arcades. 
Principle of the department store: "The floors form a single space. They can be 
taken in, so to speak, 'at a glance.'" Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 34. [A3,5] 

Giedion shows (in Bauen in Frankreich, p. 35) how the axiom, "Welcome the 
crowd and keep it seduced" [Science et I'industrie, 143 [1925], p. 6), leads to 
corrupt architectural practices in the construction of the department store Au 
Printemps (1881-1889). Function of commodity capital! [A3,6] 



"Even women, who were forbidden to enter the Stock Exchange, assembled at the £ 

door in order to glean some indications of market prices and to relay their orders -~ 

to brokers through the iron grating. " Lm Trmnsformmtion de Pmris sous le Second 'i* 

Empire (authors Poete, Clouzot, Henriot) (Paris, 1910>, on the occasion of the Jf" 

exhibition of the library and the historical works of the city of Paris, p. 66. £L 

[A3,7] ?■ 

I 

"We have no specialty" — this is what the well-known dealer in secondhand 8 

goods, Fremin, "the man with the head of gray," had written on the signboard ; 

advertising his wares in the Place des Abbesses. Here, in antique bric-a-brac, ^ 

reemerges the old physiognomy of trade that, in the first decades of the previous | 

century, began to be supplanted by the rule of the specialite. This "superior | 
scrap-yard" was called Au Philosophe by its proprietor. What a demonstration and 

demolition of stoicism! On his placard were the words: "Maidens, do not dally g£ 

under the leaves!" And: "Purchase nothing by moonlight." [A3,8] ^ 

nT 

Evidently people smoked in the arcades at a time when it was not yet customary to 
smoke in the street. "I must say a word here about life in the arcades, favored 
haunt of strollers and smokers, theater of operations for every kind of small 
business. In each arcade there is at least one cleaning establishment. In a salon 
that is as elegantly furnished as its intended use permits, gentlemen sit upon high 
stools and comfortably peruse a newspaper while someone busily brushes the dirt 
off their clothing and boots." Ferdinand von Gall, Paris und seine Smlons, vol. 2 
<01denburg, 1845>, pp. 22-23. [A3,9] 

A first winter garden — a glassed-in space with flower heds, espaliers, and foun- 
tains, in part underground — on the spot where, in the garden of the Palais-Royal 
in 1864. (and today as well?), the reservoir was located. Laid out in 1788. [A3, 10] 

"It is at the end of the Restoration that we see the first mmgmsins de nouvemutes: 
Les Vepres Siciliennes, Le Solitaire, La Fille Mai Gardee, Le Soldat Lahoureur, 
Les Deux Magots, Le Petit Saint-Thomas, Le Gagne-Denier (Penny Winnings>." 
<Lucien> Dubech and <Pierre> d'Espezel, Histoire de Pmris (Paris, 1926), p. 360. 

[A3, 11] 



"In 1820 . . . the Passage Viollet and the Passage des Deux Pavilions were opened. 
These arcades were among the novelties of their day. The result of private initia- 
tive, they were covered galleries housing shops that fashion made prosperous. The 
most famous was the Passage des Panoramas, which flourished from 1823 to 1831. 
'On Sundays,' observed Musset, one went en masse 'to the Panoramas or else to 
the boulevards.' It was also private initiative that created, somewhat hap- 
hazardly, the housing developments known as cites, the short streets or dead ends 
huilt at shared expense hy a syndicate of property owners." Lucien Dubech and 
Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire de Pmris (Paris, 1926), pp. 355-356. [A3a,l] 



In 1825, opening of the "Passages Dauphine, Saucede, Choiseul" and of the Cite 
Bergere. "In 1827 . . . the Passages Colbert, Crussol, de l'lndustrie. . . . 1828 saw 
the opening ... of the Passages Brady and des Gravilliers and the beginnings of 
the Galerie d' Orleans at the Palais-Royal, which replaced the wooden galleries 
that had burned down that year." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Pmris, 
pp. 357-358. [A3a,2] 

"The ancestor of the department stores, La Ville de Paris, appeared at 174 Rue 
Montmartre in 1843." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 389. [A3a,3] 

"Rainshowers annoy me, so I gave one the slip in an arcade. There are a great 
many of these glass-covered walkways, which often cross through the blocks of 
buildings and make several branchings, thus affording welcome shortcuts. Here 
and there they are constructed with great elegance, and in bad weather or after 
dark, when they are lit up bright as day, they offer promenades — and very popu- 
lar they are — past rows of glittering shops." Eduard Devrient, Briefe mus Pmris 
(Berlin, 1840), p. 34. [A3a,4] 

Rue-gmlerie. — "The street- gallery ... is the most important feature of a Phalan- 
stery and . . . cannot be conceived of in civilization. . . . Street-galleries . . . are 
heated in winter and ventilated in summer. . . . The street-gallery, or continuous 
peristyle, extends along the second story. . . . Those who have seen the gallery of 
the Louvre may take it as a model for the street-gallery in Harmony." E. Silber- 
ling, Dictionnmire de sociologie phmlmnsterienne (Paris, 1911), p. 386; citing 
<Charles> Fourier, Theorie de Vunite universelle (1822), p. 462, and he Nouvemu 
Monde industriel et societmire (1829), pp. 69, 125, 272. In addition: Gmlerie. — 
"All portions of the central edifice can he traversed by means of a wide gallery 
which runs along the second floor. . . . Thus, everything is linked by a series of 
passageways which are sheltered, elegant, and comfortable in winter thanks to the 
help of heaters and ventilators." E. Silberling, Dictionnmire, pp. 197-198; citing 
Fourier, Theorie mixte, ou speculmtive, et synthese routiniere de Vmssocimtion, 
p. 14. 1 [A3a,5] 

The Passage du Caire adjoining the former Cour des Miracles. Built in 1799 on the 
site of the old garden of the Convent of the Daughters of God. [A3a,6] 

Trade and traffic are the two components of the street. Now, in the arcades the 
second of these has effectively died out: the traffic there is rudimentary. The 
arcade is a street of lascivious commerce only; it is wholly adapted to arousing 
desires. Because in this street the juices slow to a standstill, the commodity 
proliferates along the margins and enters into fantastic combinations, like the 
tissue in tumors. — The flaneur sabotages the traffic. Moreover, he is no buyer. He 
is merchandise. [A3a,7] 



For the first time in history, with the establishment of department stores, consum- 
ers begin to consider themselves a mass. (Earlier it was only scarcity which 
taught them that.) Hence, the circus-like and theatrical element of commerce is 
quite extraordinarily heightened. [A4,l] 

With the appearance of mass-produced articles, the concept of specialty arises. Its 
relation to the concept of originality remains to be explored. [A4,2] 

"I grant that business at the Palais-Royal has had its day; but I believe that this 
should be attributed not to the absence of streetwalkers but to the erection of new 
arcades, and to the enlargement and refurbishing of several others. I will mention 
the Passages de l'Opera, du Grand-Cerf , du Saumon, de Vero-Dodat, Delorme, de 
Choiseul, anddes Panoramas." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Pmris et Im 
police qui les regit (Paris and Leipzig, 1839), vol. 1, p. 205. [A4,3] 

"I do not know if business at the Palais-Royal has really suffered from the absence 
of femmes tie debmuche; but what is certain is that public decency there has im- 
proved enormously. ... It seems to me, furthermore, that respectable women now 
willingly do their shopping in the shops of the galleries . . . ; this has to be an 
advantage for the merchants. For when the Palais-Royal was invaded by a swarm 
of practically nude prostitutes, the gaze of the crowd was turned toward them, and 
the people who enjoyed this spectacle were never the ones who patronized the local 
businesses. Some were already ruined by their disorderly life, while others, yield- 
ing to the allure of libertinism, had no thought then of purchasing any goods, even 
necessities. I believe I can affirm . . . that, during those times of inordinate toler- 
ance, several shops at the Palais-Royal were closed, and in others huyers were 
rare. Thus, business did not at all prosper there, and it would be more accurate to 
say that the stagnation of business at that time was owing rather to the free circu- 
lation of the filles publiques than to their absence, which today has brought back 
into the galleries and the garden of this palace numerous strollers, who are far 
more favorable to business than prostitutes and libertines." F. F. A. Beraud, Les 
Filles publiques de Pmris (Paris and Leipzig, 1839), vol. 1, pp. 207-209. [A4,4] 

The cafes are filled 
With gourmets, with smokers; 
The theaters are packed 
With cheerful spectators. 
The arcades are swarming 
With gawkers, with enthusiasts, 
And pickpockets wriggle 
Behind the flaneurs. 



Ennery and Lemoine, Paris la nuit, cited in H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Les Re- 
frains de Im rue de 1830 a 1870 (Paris, 1879), pp. 46-47. — To be compared with 
Baudelaire's "Crepuscule du soir." [A4a,l] 



"And those who cannot pay for ... a shelter? They sleep wherever they find a 
place, in passages, arcades, in corners where the police and the owners leave them 
undisturbed." Friedrich Engels, Die Lage der mrbeitenden Masse in England, 



"In all the shops, like a uniform, the oak counter is adorned with counterfeit 
coins, in every kind of metal and in every format, mercilessly nailed in place like 
birds of prey on a door — unimpeachable evidence of the proprietor's scrupulous 
honesty." Nadar, Qiiand j'etuis photogrmphe (Paris <1900>), p. 294 ("1830 et envi- 



Fourier on the street-galleries: "To spend a winter's day in a Phalanstery, to visit 
all parts of it without exposure to the elements, to go to the theater and the opera 
in light clothes and colored shoes without worrying about the mud and the cold, 
would be a charm so novel that it alone would suffice to make our cities and castles 
seem detestable. If the Phalanstery were put to civilized uses, the mere conven- 
ience of its sheltered, heated, and ventilated passageways would make it enor- 
mously valuable. 6 Its property value . . . would be double that of another building 
its size." E. Poisson, Fourier [Anthology] (Paris, 1932), p. 144. [A4a,4] 

"The street-galleries are a mode of internal communication which would alone be 
sufficient to inspire disdain for the palaces and great cities of civilization. . . .The 
king of France is one of the leading monarchs of civilization; he does not even have 
a porch in his Tuileries palace. The king, the queen, the royal family, when they 
get into or out of their carriages, are forced to get as wet as any petty bourgeois 
who summons a cab before his shop. Doubtless the king will have on hand, in the 
event of rain, a good many footmen and courtiers to hold an umbrella for him . . . ; 
but he will still be lacking a porch or a roof that would shelter his party. . . . Let us 
describe the street-galleries which are one of the most charming and precious 
features of a Palace of Harmony. . . . The Phalanx has no outside streets or open 
roadways exposed to the elements. All portions of the central edifice can be tra- 
versed by means of a wide gallery which runs along the second floor of the whole 
building. At each extremity of this spacious corridor there are elevated passages, 
supported by columns, and also attractive underground passages which connect 
all the parts of the Phalanx and the adjoining buildings. Thus, everything is linked 
by a series of passageways which are sheltered, elegant, and comfortable in winter 
thanks to the help of heaters and ventilators. . . . The street-gallery, or continuous 
peristyle, extends along the second story. It could not be placed on the ground 
floor, since the lower part of the building will be traversed by carriage en- 
trances. . . . The street-galleries of a Phalanx wind along just one side of the cen- 
tral edifice and stretch to the end of each of its wings. All of these wings contain a 
double row of rooms. Thus, one row of rooms looks out upon the fields and gar- 
dens, and the other looks out upon the street-gallery. The street-gallery, then, will 
be three stories high with windows on one side. . . . The kitchens and some of the 



2nd ed. (Leipzig, 1848), p. 46 ("Die grossen Stadte"). 5 



[A4a,2] 



rons"). 



[A4 a ,3] 



public halls will be located on the ground floor. There will also be trap doors in the 

floors of the dining rooms on the second story. Thus, the tables may be set in the -- 

kitchens below and simply raised through the trap doors when it is time to eat. > 

These trap doors will be particularly useful during festivities, such as the visits of tf 

traveling caravans and legions, when there will be too many people to eat in the §^ 

ordinary dining rooms. Then double rows of tables will be set in the street-galler- - w 
ies, and the food will be passed up from the kitchen. / The principal puhlic halls 

should not be situated on the ground floor. There are two reasons for this. The first § 

r .... i' 

is that the patriarchs and children, who have difficulty climbing stairs, should be ^ 
lodged in the lower parts of the huilding. The second is that the children should be 

kept in isolation from the nonindustrial activities of the adults." Poisson, Fourier | 

[Anthology] (Paris, 1932), pp. 139-144. 7 [A5] 1 

Yes, pmrbleu! You know the power of Tibet. 

Implacable enemy of proud innocence, " 

Hardly does it appear than it carries away ^ 

The bookkeeper's wife and the burgher's daughter, £T 

The stern prude and the frigid coquette: 

It signals the victory of lovers; 

For fashion tolerates no resistance, 

And not to have it puts one to shame. 

Its fabric, braving the current bon mot, 

Softens in its folds the arrows of ridicule; 

Seeing it, you think of a magical talisman: 

It braces the spirits and subjugates the heart; 

For it to appear is already a triumph, its coming a conquest; 

It reigns as conqueror, as sovereign, as master; 

And treating its quiver as a burden quite useless, 

Love has fashioned its bandeau of cashmere. 

Edouard [d'Anglemont], Le Cmchemire, one-act comedy in verse, performed for 
the first time in Paris at the Theatre Royal de l'Odeon, on December 16, 1826 
(Paris, 1827), p. 30. [A5a,l] 

Delvau on Chodruc-Duclos: "Under the reign of Louis Philippe, who owed him 
nothing, he . . . did what he had done under the reign of Charles X, who in fact 
owed him something. . . . His bones took more time to rot than his name took to 
erase itself from the memory of men." Alfred Delvau, Les Lions du jour (Paris, 
1867), pp. 28-29. [A5a,2] 

"It was not until after the expedition to Egypt," when people in France gave 
thought to expanding the use of precious cashmere fabric, that a woman, Greek by 
birth, introduced it to Paris. M. Ternaux . . . conceived the admirable project of 
raising Hindustani goats in France. Since then, . . . there have been plenty of 
workers to train and trades to establish, in order for us to compete successfully 
against products renowned through so many centuries! Our manufacturers arc 



beginning to triumph . . . over women's prejudice against French shawls. . . . We 
have managed to make women forget for a moment the ridiculous fabric-designs of 
the Hindus by happily reproducing the vividness and brilliant harmony of the 
flowers found in our own gardens. There is a book in which all these interesting 
subjects are discussed both knowledgeably and elegantly. L'Histoire des schalls, 
by M. Rey, though written for the shawl manufacturers of Paris, is guaranteed to 
captivate women. . . . This book, together with its author's magnificent manufac- 
tured goods, will undoubtedly help to dissipate French people's infatuation with 
the work of foreigners. M. Rey, manufacturer of shawls made of wool, cashmere, 
etc. . . . has brought out several cashmeres ranging in price from 170 to 500 francs. 
We owe to him, among other improvements, . . . the graceful imitation of native- 
grown flowers in place of the bizarre palms of the Orient. Our praise would not he 
equal to the benefits he has bestowed, . . . nor could it render the high honor that 
this litterateur-manufacturer deserves for his long research and his talents. We 
must be content merely to name him." Chenoue and H. D., Notice sur Vexposition 
des produits de Uindustrie et des arts qui m lieu a Doumi en 1827 (Douai, 1827), 
pp. 24-25. [A6,l] 

After 1850: "It is during these years that the department stores are created: Au 
Bon Marche, Le Louvre, La Belle Jardiniere. Total sales for Au Bon Marche in 
1852 were only 450,000 francs; by 1869 they had risen to 21 million." Gisela 
Freund, La Photogrmphie du point de vue sociologique (manuscript, pp. 85-86); 
citing Lavisse, Histoire de France. [A6,2] 

"The printers . . . were able to appropriate, at the end of the eighteenth century, a 
vast area: . . . the Passage du Caire and its environs. . . . But with the extension of 
the boundaries of Paris, printers . . . were dispersed to all parts of the city. . . . 
Alas! A glut of printers! Today workers corrupted by the spirit of speculation 
ought to remember that . . . between the Rue Saint-Denis and the Cour des Mir- 
acles there still exists a long, smoke-filled gallery where their true household gods 
lie forgotten." Fdouard Foucaud, Paris inventeur (Paris, 1844), p. 154. [A6,3] 

Description of the Passage du Saumon, "which, hy way of three stone steps, 
opened onto the Rue Montorgueil. It was a narrow corridor decorated with pilas- 
ters supporting a ridged glass roof, which was littered with garbage thrown from 
neighboring houses. At the entrance, the signboard — a tin salmon indicating the 
main characteristic of the place: the air was filled with the smell of fish . . . and also 
the smell of garlic. It was here, above all, that those arriving in Paris from the 
south of France would arrange to meet. . . . Through the doors of the shops, one 
spied dusky alcoves where sometimes a piece of mahogany furniture, the classic 
furniture of the period, would manage to catch a ray of light. Further on, a small 
bar hazy with the smoke of tobacco pipes; a shop selling products from the colonies 
and emitting a curious fragrance of exotic plants, spices, and fruits; a ballroom 
open for dancing on Sundays and workday evenings; finally the reading room of 



A branch of La Belle Jardiniere in Marseilles. From Le Monde illustre, March 28, 1863. See A6,2. 



Sieur Ceccherini, who offered to patrons his newspapers and his books." J. Lucas- 
Dubreton, L'Affmire Alibmud, ou Louis-Philippe trmque (1836; rpt. Paris, 1927), 
pp. 114-115. [A6a,l] 

On the occasion of disturbances associated with the burial of General Lamarque 
on June 5, 1832, the Passage du Saumon was the scene of a battle waged on 
barricades, in which 200 workers confronted the troops. [A6a,2] 

"Martin: Business, you see, sir, ... is the ruler of the world! — Desgenmis: I am of 
your opinion, Monsieur Martin, but the ruler alone is not enough; there must be 
subjects. And that is where painting, sculpture, music come in. . . . — Martin: A 
little of that is necessary, surely, . . . and ... I myself have encouraged the arts. 
Why, in my last establishment, the Cafe de France, I had many paintings on 
allegorical subjects. . . . What is more, I engaged musicians for the evenings. . . . 
Finally, if I may invite you to accompany me . . . , you will see under my peristyle 
two very large, scantily attired statues, each with a light fixture on its head. — Des- 
genmis: A light fixture? — Mmrtin: That is my idea of sculpture: it must serve some 
purpose. . . . All those statues with an arm or a leg in the air — what are they good 



for, since they've had no pipe installed to carry gas? . . . What are they good for?" 
Theodore Barriere, Les Pmrisiens, produced at the Theatre du Vaudeville on De- 
cember 28, 1854 (Paris, 1855), p. 26. [Tbe play is set in 1839.] [A6a3] 



There was a Passage du Desir. <See Ala, 2. > [A6a,4] 

Chodruc-Duclos — a supernumerary at the Palais-Royal. He was a royalist, an 
opponent of the Vendee, and had grounds for complaining of ingratitude under 
Charles X. He protested by appearing publicly in rags and letting his beard grow. 

[A6a,5] 

Apropos of an engraving that pictures a shopfront in the Passage Vero-Dodat: 
"Onecannotpraisethis arrangement too highly — the purity of its lines; the pictur- 
esque and brilliant effect produced by tbe gaslight globes, which are placed be- 
tween the capitals of the two double columns bordering each shop; and finally the 
shop partitions, which are set off by reflecting plate glass." Cabinet des Estampes 
<in the Bibliotheque Nationale, Paris>. [A7,l] 

At No. 32 Passage Brady there was a dry-cleaning establishment, Maison Donnier. 
It was <famous> for its "giant workrooms" and its "numerous personnel." A con- 
temporary engraving shows the two-story building crowned by small mansards; 
female workers in great numbers are visible through the windows; from the ceil- 
ings bangs the linen. [A7,2] 

Engraving from the Empire: The Dmnce of the Shawl m.mong the Three Sultmnms. 
Cabinet des Estampes. [A7,3] 

Sketch and floor plan of the arcade at 36 Rue Hauteville, in black, blue, and pink, 
from the year 1856, on stamped paper. A hotel attached to the arcade is like- 
wise represented. In boldface: "Property for lease." Cabinet des Estampes. 

[A7.4] 

The first department stores appear to be modeled on oriental bazaars. From 
engravings one sees that, at least around 1880, it was the fashion to cover with 
tapestries the balustrades of the staircases leading to the atrium. For example, in 
the store called City of Saint-Denis. Cabinet des Estampes. [A7,5] 

"The Passage de l'Opera, with its two galleries, the Galerie de l'Horloge and the 
Galerie du Barometre. . . . The opening of the Opera on the Rue Le Peletier, in 
1821, brought this arcade into vogue, and in 1825 the duchesse de Berry came in 
person to inaugurate a 'Europama' in the Galerie du Barometre. . . . The grisettes 
of the Restoration danced in the Idalia Hall, built in the basement. Later, a cafe 
called the Divan de l'Opera was established in the arcade. . . . Also to be found in 
the Passage de l'Opera was the arms manufacturer Caron, the music publisher 



The Passage de l'Opera, 1822-1823, Courtesy of the Musee Camavalet, Paris. Photo copyright 
© Phototheque des Musees de !a Ville de Paris. See A7,6. 



Street scene in front of the Passage des Panoramas. Lithograph by Opitz, 1814. Courtesy of the 
Bibliotheque Nationale de France. See A7,Z 

Marguerie, the pastry chef Rollet, and finally the perfume shop of the Opera. . . . 
In addition, . . . there was Lemoimier, artiste en cheveux— which is to say, manu- 
facturer of handkerchiefs, reliquaries, and funeral items made of hair." Paul 
d'Ariste, La Vieet le monde du. boulevard, 1830-1879 (Paris <1930>), pp. 14-16. 

[A7,6] 



"The Passage des Panoramas, so named in memory of the two panoramas that 
stood on either side of its entranceway and that disappeared in 1831." Paul 
d'Ariste, L« Vie et le monde du boulevmrd (Paris), p. 14. [A7,7] 

The beautiful apotheosis of the "marvel of the Indian shawl," in the section on 
Indian art in Michelet's Bible de I'hummnite (Paris, 1864). [A7a,l] 

And Jehuda ben Halevy, 

In her view, would have been honored 

Quite enough by being kept in 

Any pretty box of cardboard 

With some very swanky Chinese 
Arabesques to decorate it, 
Like a bonbon box from Marquis 
In the Passage Panorama. 

Heinrich Heine, Hebrdische Melodien, "Jehuda ben Halevy," part 4, in Ro- 
mmnzero, book 3 (cited in a letter from Wiesengrund). 9 [A7a,2] 

Signboards. After the rebus style came a vogue for literary and military allusions. 
"If an eruption of the hilltop of Montmartre happened to swallow up Paris, as 
Vesuvius swallowed up Pompeii, one would be able to reconstruct from our sign- 
boards, after fifteen hundred years, the history of our military triumphs and of 
our literature." Victor Fournel, Ce qu'on voit dmns les rues de Paris (Paris, 1858), 
p. 286 ("Enseignes et affiches"). [A7a,3] 

Chaptal, in his speech on protecting brand names in industry: "Let us not 
assume that the consumer will be adept, when making a purchase, at distinguish- 
ing the degrees of quality of a material. No, gentlemen, the consumer cannot 
appreciate these degrees; he judges only according to his senses. Do the eye or 
the touch suffice to enable one to pronounce on the fastness of colors, or to 
determine with precision the degree of fineness of a material, the nature and 
quality of its manufacture?" <Jean-Antoine-Claude> Chaptal, Rapport au nom 
d 'une commission speciale char gee de I'examen du projet de loi relatif aux alterations et 
suppositions de noms sur les produits fthriques [Chambre des Pairs de France, ses- 
sion of July 17, 1824], p. 5. — The importance of good professional standing is 
magnified in proportion as consumer know-how becomes more specialized. 

[A7a,4] 

"What shall I say now of that coulisse which, not content with harboring a two- 
hour illegal session at the Stock Exchange, spawned once again not long ago, in the 
open air, two demonstrations per day on the Boulevard des Italiens, across from 
the Passage de l'Opera, where five or six hundred market speculators, forming a 
compact mass, followed clumsily in the wake of some forty unlicensed brokers, all 
the while speaking in low voices like conspirators, while police officers prodded 



them from behind to get them to move on, as one prods fat, tired sheep being led to 
the slaughterhouse." M. J. Ducos (de Gondrin), Comment on se mine a la Bourse 
(Paris, 1858), p. 19. [A7a,5] 



It was at 271 Rue Saint-Martin, in the Passage du Cheval Rouge, that Lacenaire 
committed his murders. [A7a,6] 

A sign: "L'epe-scie"<The Sawed-Off Epe[e]>. 10 [A7a,7] 

From a prospectus: "To the inhabitants of the Rues Beauregard, Bourbon- Ville- 
neuve, du Caire, and de la Cour des Miracles. ... A plan for two covered arcades 
running from the Place du Caire to the Rue Beauregard, ending directly in front of 
the Rue Sainte-Barbe, and linking the Rue Bourbon- Villeneuve with the Rue 
Hautcville. . . . Gentlemen, for some time now we have been concerned about the 
future of this neighborhood, and it pains us to see that properties so close to the 
boulevard carry a value so far below what they ought to have. This state of affairs 
would change if lines of communication were opened. Since it is impossible to 
construct new streets in this area, due to the great unevenness of the ground, and 
since the only workable plan is the one we have the honor of submitting to you 
here, we hope, Gentlemen, that in your capacity as owners . . . you will in turn 
honor us with your cooperation and affiliation. . . . Every partner will be required 
to pay an installment of 5 francs on each 250-franc share in the future company. 
As soon as a capital sum of 3,000 francs is realized, this provisional subscription 
will become fmal — said sum being judged at present sufficient. . . . Paris, this 20th 
of October, 1847." Printed prospectus inviting subscriptions. [A8,l] 

"In the Passage Choiseul, M. Comte, 'Physician to the King,' presents his cele- 
brated troupe of child actors extraordinaires in the interval between two magic 
shows in which he himself performs." J.-L. Croze, "Quelques spectacles de Paris 
pendant l'ete de 1835" (Le Temps, August 22, 1935). [A8,2] 

"At this turning point in history, the Parisian shopkeeper makes two discoveries 
that revolutionize the world of la nouveaute: the display of goods and the male 
employee. The display, which leads him to deck out his shop from floor to ceiling 
and to sacrifice three hundred yards of material to garland his facade like a flag- 
ship; and the male employee, who replaces the seduction of man by woman — 
something conceived by the shopkeepers of the ancien regime — with the seduction 
of woman by man, which is psychologically more astute. Together with these comes 
the fixed price, the known and nonnegotiable cost." H. Clouzot and R.-H. Valensi, 
Le Paris de "La Comedie humaine": Balzac et ses fournisseurs (Paris, 1926), 
pp. 31-32 ("Magasins de nouveautes"). [A8,3] 

When a magasin de nouveautes rented the space formerly occupied by Hetzel, the 
editor of La Comedie humaine, Balzac wrote: "T/ie Human Comedy has yielded to 



the comedy of cashijieres." (Clouzot and Valensi, Le Paris de "L« Comedie hu- 
muine," p. 37.) [A8,4] 



Passage du Commerce-Saint- Andre: a reading room. [ A8a,l] 

"Once the socialist government had become the legitimate owner of all the houses 
of Paris, it handed them over to the architects with the order ... to establish 
street- galleries . . . . The architects accomplished the mission entrusted to them as 
well as could be expected. On the second story of every house, they took all the 
rooms that faced the street and demolished the intervening partitions; they then 
opened up large bays in the dividing walls, thereby obtaining street-galleries that 
had the height and width of an ordinary room and that occupied the entire length 
of a block of buildings. In the newer qumrtiers, where neighboring houses have 
their floors at approximately the same height, the galleries could be joined to- 
gether on a fairly even level. . . . But on older streets . . . the floors had to be 
carefully raised or lowered, and often the builders had to resign themselves to 
giving the floor a rather steep slant, or breaking it up with stairs. When all the 
blocks of houses were thus traversed by galleries occupying . . . their second story, 
it remained only to connect these isolated sections to one another in order to 
constitute a network . . . embracing the whole city. This was easily done by erect- 
ing covered walkways across every street. . . . Walkways of the same sort, but 
much longer, were likewise put up over the various boulevards, over the squares, 
and over the bridges that cross the Seine, so that in the end ... a person could 
stroll through the entire city without ever being exposed to the elements .... As 
soon as the Parisians had got a taste of the new galleries, they lost all desire to set 
foot in the streets of old — which, they often said, were fit only for dogs." Tony 
Moilin, Pmris enl'mn 2000 (Paris, 1869), pp. 9-11. [A8a,2] 

"The second floor contains the street-galleries. . . . Along the length of the great 
avenues, . . . they form street-salons. . . . The other, much less spacious galleries 
are decorated more modestly. They have been reserved for retail businesses that 
here display their merchandise in such a way that passersby circulate no longer in 
front of the shops but in their interior." Tony Moilin, Pmris en Vmn 2000 (Paris, 
1869), pp. 15-16 ("Maisons-modeles"). [A8a,3] 

Sales clerks: "There are at least 20,000 in Paris. ... A great number of sales clerks 
have been educated in the classics . . . ; one even finds among them painters and 
architects unaffiliated with any workshop, who use a great deal of their knowledge 
... of these two branches of art in constructing displays, in determining the design 
of new items, in directing the creation of fashions." Pierre Larousse, Grmnd Dic- 
tionnmire universel du XIX" siecle, vol. 3 (Paris, 1867), p. 150 (article on "Cali- 
cot"). [A9,l] 

"Why did the author of Etudes de moeurs u <Studies of Manners) choose to pre- 
sent, in a work of fiction, lifelike portraits of the notables of his day? Doubtless for 



his own amusement first of all. . . . This explains the descriptions. For the direct 
citations, another reason must be found — and we see none better than his unmis- 
takable aim of providing publicity. Balzac is one of the first to have divined the 
power of the advertisement and, above all, the disguised advertisement. In those 
days, . . . the newspapers were unaware of such power. ... At the very most, 
around midnight, as workers were finishing up the layout, advertising writers 
might slip in at the bottom of a column some lines on Pate de Regnault or Brazilian 
Blend. The newspaper advertisement as such was unknown. More unknown still 
was a process as ingenious as citation in a novel. . . . The tradesmen named by 
Balzac . . . are clearly his own. . . . No one understood better than the author of 
Cesar Birotteau the unlimited potential of publicity. ... To confirm this, one need 
only look at the epithets ... he attaches to his manufacturers and their products. 
Shamelessly he dubs them: the renowned Victorine; Plaisir, an illustrious hair- 
dresser; Staub, the most celebrated tailor of his age; Gay, af mmous haberdasher 
... on the Rue de la Michodiere (even giving the address!); . . . 'the cuisine of the 
Rocher de Cancale, . . . the premier restaurant in Paris . . . , which is to say, in the 
entire world.'''" H. Clouzot and R.-H. Valensi, Le Paris de "La Comedie hu- 
maine": Balzac et ses fournisseurs (Paris, 1926), pp. 7-9 and 177-179. [A9,2] 

The Passage Vero-Dodat connects the Rue Croix-des-Petits-Champs with the Rue 
Jean- Jacques-Rousseau. In the latter, around 1840, Cabet held his meetings in his 
rooms. We get an idea of the tone of these gatherings from Martin Nadaud's 
Memoir es de Leonard, anciengarqon maqon: "He was still holding in his hand the 
towel and razor he had just been using. He seemed filled with joy at seeing us 
respectably attired, with a serious air: 'Ah, Messieurs,' he said (he did not say 
'Citizens'), 'if your adversaries could only see you now! You would disarm their 
criticisms. Your dress and your bearing are those of well-bred men.'" Cited in 
Charles Benoist, "L'Hommede 1848," part 2, Revue des deux mondes (February 
1, 1914), pp. 641-642. — It was characteristic of Cabet to believe that workers 
need not busy themselves with writing. [A9,3] 

Street-salons: "The largest and most favorably situated among these [street- 
galleries] were tastefully decorated and sumptuously furnished. The walls and 
ceilings were covered with . . . rare marble, gilding, . . . mirrors, and paintings. 
The windows were adorned with splendid hangings and with curtains embroidered 
in marvelous patterns. Chairs, fauteuils, sofas . . . offered comfortable seating to 
tired strollers. Finally, there were artistically designed objects, antique cabi- 
nets, . . . glass cases full of curiosities, . . . porcelain vases containing fresh flow- 
ers, aquariums full of live fish, and aviaries inhabited by rare birds. These 
completed the decoration of the street-galleries, which lit up the evening with . . . 
gilt candelabras and crystal lamps. The government had wanted the streets be- 
longing to the people of Paris to surpass in magnificence the drawing rooms of the 
most powerful sovereigns. . . . First thing in the morning, the street-galleries are 
turned over to attendants who air them out, sweep them carefully, brush, dust, 
and polish the furniture, and everywhere impose the most scrupulous cleanliness. 
Then, depending on the season, the windows are either opened or closed, and 



either a fire is lit or the blinds are lowered. . . . Between nine and ten o'clock this 
cleaning is all completed, and passersby, until then few and far between, begin to 
appear in greater numbers. Entrance to the galleries is strictly forbidden to any- 
one who is dirty or to carriers of heavy loads; smoking and spitting are likewise 
prohibited here." Tony Moilin, Paris en I'mn 2000 (Paris, 1869), pp. 26-29 ("As- 
pect des rues-galeries"). [A9a,l] 

The mmgfLsins de nouvemutes owe their existence to the freedom of trade estab- 
lished by Napoleon I. "Of those establishments, famous in 1817, which gave them- 
selves names like La Fille Mai Gardee, Le Diable Boiteux, Le Masque de Fer, or 
Les Deux Magots, not one remains. Many of those which replaced them under 
Louis Philippe also foundered later on — like La Belle Fermiere and La Chaussee 
d'Antin. Or else they were sold at little profit — like Le Coin de Rue and Le Pauvre 
Diable." G. d'Avenel, "Le Mecanisme de la vie moderne," part 1: "Les Grands 
Magasins," Revue des deux mondes (July 15, 1894), p. 334. [A9a,2] 

The office of Philipon's weekly Lm Cmricttture was in the Passage Vero-Dodat. 

[A9a,3] 

Passage du Caire. Erected after Napoleon's return from Egypt. Contains some 
evocations of Egypt in the reliefs — sphinx-like heads over the entrance, among 
other things. "The arcades are sad, gloomy, and always intersecting in a manner 
disagreeable to the eye. . . . They seem . . . destined to house lithographers' stu- 
dios and binders' shops, as the adjoining street is destined for the manufacture of 
straw hats; pedestrians generally avoid them." Elie Berthet, "Rue et Passage du 
Caire," Pmris chez soi (Paris <1854>), p . 362. [ AlO,l] 

"In 1798 and 1799, the Egyptian campaign lent frightful importance to the fashion 
for shawls. Some generals in the expeditionary army, taking advantage of the 
proximity of India, sent home shawls ... of cashmere to their wives and lady 
friends. . . . From then on, the disease that might be called cashmere fever took on 
significant proportions. It began to spread during the Consulate, grew greater 
under the Empire, became gigantic during the Restoration, reached colossal size 
under the July Monarchy, and has finally assumed Sphinx-like dimensions since 
the February Revolution of 1848." Pmris chez soi (Paris), p. 139 (A. Durand, 
"Chales — Cachemires indiens et francais"). Contains an interview with M. Mar- 
tin, 39 Rue Richelieu, proprietor of a store called The Indians; reports that shawls 
which earlier were priced between 1,500 and 2,000 francs can now be bought for 
800 to 1,000 francs. [A10.2] 

From Brazier, Gabriel, and Dumersan, Les Pmssmges et les rues, vaudeville in one 
act, presented for the first time, in Paris, at the Theatre des Varietes on March 7, 
1827 (Paris, 1827). — Beginning of a song by the shareholder Dulingot: 



For the arcades, I form 
Continual refrains of thanks: 



In the Passage Delorme 

I've put a hundred thousand francs. (Pp. 5-6) 

"I hear they want to roof all the streets of Paris with glass. That will make for 
lovely hothouses; we will live in them like melons" (p. 19). [A10,3] 

From Girard, Des Tombemux, ou De I'Influence des institutions funebres sur les 
moeurs (Paris, 1801): "The new Passage du Caire, near the Rue Saint-Denis, . . . 
is paved in part with funerary stones, on which the Gothic inscriptions and the 
emblems have not yet been effaced." The author wishes to draw attention here to 
the decline of piety. Cited in Edouard Fournier, Chroniques et legendes des rues 
de Pmris (Paris, 1864), p. 154. [A10,4] 

Brazier, Gabriel, and Dumersan, Les Pmssm,ges et les rues, on L* Guerre declmree, 
vaudeville in one act, performed for the first time, in Paris, at the Theatre des 
Varietes on March 7, 1827 (Paris, 1827). — The party of arcades-adversaries is 
composed ofM. Duperron, umbrella merchant; Mme. Duhelder, wife of a carriage 
provider; M. Mouffetard, hatter; M. Blancmanteau, merchant and manufacturer 
of clogs; and Mme. Dubac, rentier — each one coming from a different part of 
town. M. Dulingot, who has bought stock in the arcades, has championed their 
canse. His lawyer is M. Pour; that of his opponents, M. Contre. In the second to 
last (fourteenth) scene, M. Contre appears at the head of a column of streets, 
which are decked with banners proclaiming their names. Among them are the Rue 
aux Ours, Rue Bergere, Rue du Croissant, Rue du Puits-qui-Parle, Rue du 
Grand-Hurleur. Likewise in the next scene — a procession of arcades with their 
banners: Passage du Saumon, Passage de I'Ancre, Passage du Grand-Cerf, Pas- 
sage du Pont-Neuf , Passage de I'Opera, Passage du Panorama <sic> . In the follow- 
ing scene, the last (sixteenth), Lutece 12 emerges from the bowels of the earth, at 
first in the guise of an old woman. In her presence, M. Contre takes up the defense 
of the streets against the arcades. "One hundred forty-four arcades open their 
mouths wide to devour our customers, to siphon off the ever-rising flow of our 
crowds, both active and idle. And you want us streets of Paris to ignore this clear 
infringement of our ancient rights! No, we demand . . . the interdiction of our one 
hundred forty-four opponents and, in addition, fifteen million, five hundred thou- 
sand francs in damages and interest" (p. 29). The argument by M. Pour in favor of 
the arcades takes the form of verse. An extract: 

We whom they would banish — we are more than useful. 
Have we not, by virtue of our cheerful aspect, 
Encouraged all of Paris in the fashion 
Of bazaars, those marts so famous in the East? 



And what are these walls the crowd admires? 
These ornaments, these columns above all? 
You'd think you were in Athens; and this temple 
Is erected to commerce by good taste. (Pp. 29-3#) 



Lutece arbitrates the differences: '"The affair is settled. Genies of light, hearken 
to my voice.' (At this moment the whole gallery is suddenly illuminated by gas- 
light.)" (p. 31). A ballet of streets and arcades concludes the vaudeville. [A10a,l] 

"I do not at all hesitate to write — as monstrous as this may seem to serious writers 
on art — that it was the sales clerk who launched lithography. . . . Condemned to 
imitations of Raphael, to Briseises by Regnault, it would perhaps have died; the 
sales clerk saved it." Henri Bouchot, La Lithographie (Paris <1895>), pp. 50-51. 

[A11.1] 

In the Passage Vivienne 

She told me: "I'm from Vienna." 

And she added: 

"I live with my uncle, 

The brother of Papa! 

I take care of his furuncle — 

It has its charms, this fate." 

I promised to meet the damsel again 

In the Passage Bonne-Nouvelle; 

But in the Passage Brady 

I waited in vain. 



And there you have it: arcade amours! 

Narcisse Lebeau, cited by Leon-Paul Fargue, "Cafes de Paris," part 2 [in Vu, 9, 
no. 416 (March 4, 1936)]. [A11.2] 

"There seems no reason, in particular, at the first and most literal glance, why the 
story should be called after the Old Curiosity Shop. Only two of the characters 
have anything to do with such a shop, and they leave it for ever in the first few 
pages .... But when we feel the situation with more fidelity we realize that this title 
is something in the nature of a key to the whole Dickens romance. His tales always 
started from some splendid hint in the streets. And shops, perhaps the most poeti- 
cal of all things, often set his fancy galloping. Every shop, in fact, was to him the 
door of romance. Among all the huge serial schemes . . . it is a matter of wonder 
that he never started an endless periodical called the The Street, and divided it 
into shops. He could have written an exquisite romance called The Baker's Shop; 
another called The Chemist's Shop; another called The Oil Shop, to keep company 
with The Old Curiosity S/iop." G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, trans. Laurent and 
Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), pp. 82-83. 13 [A11.3] 

"One may wonder to what extent Fourier himself believed in his fantasies. In his 
manuscripts he sometimes complains of critics who take literally what is meant as 
figurative, andwhoinsist moreover on speaking of his 'studied whims.' There may 
have been at least a modicum of deliberate charlatanism at work in all this — an 
attempt to launch his system hy means of the tactics of commercial advertising, 



which had begun to develop. "F. Armani and R. Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), 
vol. 1, p. 158. D Exhibitions D [Alla,l] 



Proudhon's confession near the end of his life (in his bookDe Im justice 1 ' 1 — com- 
pare with Fourier's vision of the phalanstery): "It has been necessary for me to 
become civilized. But need I approve? The little bit of civilizing I've received 
disgusts me. ... I hate houses of more than one story, houses in which, by contrast 
with the social hierarchy, the meek are raised on high while the great are settled 
near the ground." Cited in Armand Cuvillier, Marx et Proudhon: A Im. lumiere du 
Mmrxisme, vol. 2, part 1 (Paris, 1937), p. 211. [Alla,2] 

Blanqui: "'I wore,' he says, 'the first tricolored cockade of 1830, made by Ma- 
dame Bodin in the Passage du Commerce.'" Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 
1897), p. 240. [Alla,3] 

Baudelaire can still write of "a book as dazzling as an Indian handkerchief or 
shawl." Baudelaire, L'Art rommntique (Paris), p. 192 ("Pierre Dupont"). 15 

[Alla,4] 

The Crauzat Collection possesses a beautiful reproduction of the Passage des 
Panoramas from 1808. Also found there: a prospectus for a bootblacking shop, in 
which it is a question mainly of Puss in Boots. [ Al la, 5] 

Baudelaire to his mother on December 25, 1861, concerning an attempt to pawn a 
shawl: "I was told that, with the approach of New Year's Day, there was a glut of 
cashmeres in the stores, and that they were trying to discourage the public from 
bringing any more in." Charles Baudelaire, Lettres a sm mere (Paris, 1932), 
p. 198. [Alla,6] 

"Our epoch will he the link between the age of isolated forces rich in original 
creativeness and that of the uniform but leveling force which gives monotony to its 
products, casting them in masses, and following out one unifying idea — the ulti- 
mate expression of social communities." H. de Balzac, L'lllustre Gmudissmrt, ed. 
Calmann-Levy (Paris, 1837), p. I. 16 [Alla,7] 

Sales at Au Bon Marche, in the years 1852 to 1863, rose from 450,000 to 
7 million francs. The rise in profits could have been considerably less. "High 
turnover and small profi ts" was at that time a new principle, one that accorded 
with the two dominant forces in operation: the multitude of purchasers and the 
mass of goods. In 1852, Boucicaut allied himself with Vidau, the proprietor of Au 
Bon Marche, the magasin de nouveaute's. "The originality consisted in selling 
guaranteed merchandise at discount prices. Items, fi rst of all, were marked with 
fixed prices, another bold innovation which did away with bargaining and with 
'process sales' — that is to say, with gauging the price of an article to the physiog- 
nomy of the buyer; then the 'return' was instituted, allowing the customer to 




Au Bon Marche department store in Paris. Woodcut, ca. 1880. See A12,l. 



cancel his purchase at will; and, finally, employees were paid almost entirely by 
commission on sales. These were the constitutive elements of the new organiza- 
tion." George d'Avenel, "Le Mecanisme de la vie moderne: Les Grands Maga- 
sins," Revue des deux mundes, 124 (Paris, 1894), pp. 335-336. [A12,l] 

The gain in time realized for the retail business by the abolition of bargaining 
may have played a role initially in the calculations of department stores. [ A12,2] 

A chapter, "Shawls, Caslnneres," in Borne's Industrie- Ausstellung im Louvre 
< Exhibition of Industry in the Louvre >. Ludwig Borne, Gesammelte Schriften 
(Hamburg and Frankfurt am Main, 1862), vol. 3, p. 260. [A12,3] 

The physiognomy of the arcade emerges with Baudelaire in a sentence at the 
beginning of "Le Joueur genereux": "It seemed to me odd that I could have passed 
this enchanting haunt so often without suspecting that here was the entrance." 
<Baudelaire, Oeuvres, ed. Y.-G. LeDantec (Paris, 1931),> vol. 1, p. 456." [A12,4] 

Specifics of the department store: the customers perceive themselves as a mass; 
they are confronted with an assortment of goods; they take in all the floors at a 
glance; they pay fixed prices; they can make exchanges. [A12,5] 

"In those parts of the city where the theaters and public walks . . . are located, 
where therefore the majority of foreigners live and wander, there is hardly a 
building without a shop. It takes only a minute, only a step, for the forces of 
attraction to gather; a minute later, a step further on, and the passerby is standing 
before a different shop. . . . One's attention is spirited away as though by violence, 
and one has no choice but to stand there and remain looking up until it returns. 
The name of the shopkeeper, the name of his merchandise, inscribed a dozen times 
on placards that hang on the doors and above the windows, beckon from all sides; 
the exterior of the archway resembles the exercise book of a schoolboy who writes 
the few words of a paradigm over and over. Fabrics are not laid out in samples but 
are hung before door and window in completely unrolled bolts. Often they are 
attached high up on the third story and reach down in sundry folds all the way to 
the pavement. The shoemaker has painted different-colored shoes, ranged in rows 
like battalions, across the entire facade of his building. The sign for the locksmiths 
is a six-foot-high gold-plated key; the giant gates of heaven could require no larger. 
On the hosiers' shops are painted white stockings four yards high, and they will 
startle you in the dark when they loom like ghosts. . . . But foot and eye are 
arrested in a nobler and more charming fashion by the paintings displayed before 
many storefronts. . . . These paintings are, not infrequently, true works of art, 
and if they were to hang in the Louvre, they would inspire in connoisseurs at least 
pleasure if not admiration. . . . The shop of a wigmaker is adorned with a picture 
that, to be sure, is poorly executed but distinguished by an amusing conception. 
Crown Prince Absalom hangs by his hair from a tree and is pierced by the lance of 
an enemy. Underneath runs the verse: 'Here you see Absalom in his hopes quite 



debunked, / Had he worn a peruke, he'd not be defunct.' Another . . . picture, 
representing a village maiden as she kneels to receive a garland of roses — token of 
her virtue — from the hands of a chevalier, ornaments the door of a milliner's 
shop." Ludwig Borne, Schilderungen *us Pmris (1822 und 1823), ch. 6 ("Die 
Laden" <Shops>), in Gesmmmelte Schriften (Hamburg and Frankfurt am Main, 
1862), vol. 3, pp. 46-49. [A12a] 



On Baudelaire's "religious intoxication of great cities":" 5 the department stores 
are temples consecrated to this intoxication. [A13] 



It 

MB 

[Fashion] 



Fashion: Madam Death! Madam Death! 

— Giacomo Leopardi, "Dialogue between Fashion and Death" 1 

Nothing dies; all is transformed. 

— Honore de Balzac, Rnsees, sujets, fragments (Paris, 1910), p. 46 



And boredom is the grating before which the courtesan teases death. 
□ Ennui D [Bl,l] 

Similarity of the arcades to the indoor arenas in which one learned to ride a 
bicycle. In these halls the figure of the woman assumed its most seductive aspect: 
as cyclist. That is how she appears on contemporary posters. Cheret the painter 
of this feminine pulchritude. The costume of the cyclist, as an early and uncon- 
scious prefiguration of sportswear, corresponds to the dream prototypes that, a 
litde before or a little later, are at work in the factory or the automobile. Just as 
the first factory buildings cling to the traditional form of the residential dwelling, 
and just as the first automobile chassis imitate carriages, so in the clothing of the 
cyclist the sporting expression still wresdes with the inherited pattern of elegance, 
and the fruit of this struggle is the grim sadistic touch which made this ideal 
image of elegance so incomparably provocative to the male world in those days. 
D Dream Houses D [Bl,2] 

"In these years [around 1880], not only Joes the Renaissance fashion begin to do 
mischief, but on the other side a new interest in sports — above all, in equestrian 
sports — arises among women, and together these two tendencies exert an influence 
on fashion from quite different directions. The attempt to reconcile these senti- 
ments dividing the female soul yields results that, in the years 1882-1885, are 
original if not always beautiful. To improve matters, dress designers simplify and 
take in the waist as much as possible, while allowing the skirt an amplitude all the 
more rococo." 70 Jmhre deutsche Mode (1925), pp. 84-87. [Bl,3] 

Here fashion has opened the business of dialectical exchange between woman 
and ware — between carnal pleasure and the corpse. The clerk, death, tall and 



loutish, measures the century by the yard, serves as mannequin himself to save 
costs, and manages single-handedly the liquidation that in French is called revolu- 
tion. For fashion was never anything other than the parody of the motley cadaver, 
provocation of death through the woman, and bitter colloquy with decay whis- 
pered between shrill bursts of mechanical laughter. That is fashion. And that is 
why she changes so quickly; she titillates death and is already something differ- 
ent, something new, as he casts about to crush her. For a hundred years she holds 
her own against him. Now, finally, she is on the point of quitting the field. But he 
erects on the banks of a new Lethe, which rolls its asphalt stream through 
arcades, the armature of the whores as a battle memorial. □ Revolution □ Love D 

[B1.4] 

Squares, o square in Paris, infinite showplace, 

where the modiste Madame Lamort 

winds and binds the restless ways of the world, 

those endless ribbons, to ever-new 

creations of bow, frill, flower, cockade, and fruit — 

R. M. Rilke, Duineser Elegien (Leipzig, 1923), p. 23. 2 [Bl,5] 

"Nothing has a place of its own, save fashion appoints that place." L'Esprit d'Al- 
phon.se Kmrr: <Pensees extrmites de ses oeuvres completes) (Paris, 1877), p. 129. 
"If a woman of taste, while undressing at night, should find herself constituted in 
reality as she has pretended to be during the day, I like to think she'd be discov- 
ered next morning drowned in her own tears." Alphonse Karr, cited in F. Th. 
Vischer, Mode und Zynismus (Stuttgart, 1879), pp. 106-107. [Bl,6] 

With Karr, there appears a rationalist theory of fashion that is closely related to 
the rationalist theory of the origin of religions. The motive for instituting long 
skirts, for example, he conceives to be the interest certain women would have 
had in concealing an unlovely <foot>. Or he denounces, as the origin of certain 
types of hats and certain hairstyles, the wish to compensate f or thin hair. [B 1 , 7] 

Who still knows, nowadays, where it was that in the last decade of the previous 
century women would offer to men their most seductive aspect, the most inti- 
mate promise of their figure? In the asphalted indoor arenas where people 
learned to ride bicycles. The woman as cyclist competes with the cabaret singer 
for the place of honor on posters, and gives to fashion its most daring line. 

[Bl,8] 

For the philosopher, the most interesting thing about fashion is its extraordinary 
anticipations. It is well known that art will often — for example, in pictures — pre- 
cede the perceptible reality by years. It was possible to see streets or rooms that 
shone in all sorts of fiery colors long before technology, by means of illuminated 
signs and other arrangements, actually set them under such a light. Moreover, 
the sensitivity of the individual artist to what is coming certainly far exceeds that 



of the grande dame. Yet fashion is in much steadier, much more precise contact 
with the coming thing, thanks to the incomparable nose which the feminine 
collective has for what lies waiting in the future. Each season brings, in its newest 
creations, various secret signals of things to come. Whoever understands how to 
read these semaphores would know in advance not only about new currents in 
the arts but also about new legal codes, wars, and revolutions. 3 — Here, surely, 
lies the greatest charm of fashion, but also the difficulty of making the charming 
fruitful. [BlaJ] 

"Whether you translate Russian fairy tales, Swedish family sagas, or English 
picaresque novels — you will always come back in the end, when it is a question of 
setting the tone for the masses, to France, not because it is always the truth but 
because it will always be the fashion." <Karl> Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris, vol. 2 
<Leipzig, 1842>, pp. 227-228. Each time, what sets the tone is without doubt the 
newest, but only where it emerges in the medium of the oldest, the longest past, 
the most ingrained. This spectacle, the unique self -construction of the newest in 
the medium of what has been, makes for the true dialectical theater of fashion. 
Only as such, as the grandiose representation of this dialectic, can one appreciate 
the singular books of Grandville, which created a sensation toward the middle of 
the century. When Grandville presents a new fan as the "fan of Iris" and his 
drawing suggests a rainbow, or when the Milky Way appears as an avenue 
illuminated at night by gaslamps, or when "the moon (a self-portrait)" reposes on 
fashionable velvet cushions instead of on clouds* — at such moments we first 
come to see that it is precisely in this century, the most parched and imagination- 
starved, that the collective dream energy of a society has taken refuge with 
redoubled vehemence in the mute impenetrable nehula of fashion, where the 
understanding carmot follow. Fashion is the predecessor — no, the eternal dep- 
uty — of Surrealism. [Bla,2] 

A pair of lascivious engravings by Charles Vernier entitled A Wedding on Wheels — 
showing the departure and the return. The bicycle offered unsuspected possibili- 
ties for the depiction of the raised skirt. [Bla,3] 

A definitive perspective on fashion follows solely from the consideration that to 
each generation the one immediately preceding it seems the most radical anti- 
aphrodisiac imaginable. In this judgment it is not so far wrong as might be 
supposed. Every fashion is to some extent a bitter satire on love; all sexual 
perversities are suggested in every fashion by the most ruthless means; every 
fashion is filled with secret resistances to love. It is worthwhile reflecting on the 
following observation by Grand- Carteret, superficial though it is: "It is in scenes 
from the amorous life that one may in fact perceive the full ridiculousness of 
certain fashions. Aren't men and women grotesque in these gestures and atti- 
tudes — in the tufted forelock (already extravagant in itself), in the top hat and the 
nipped- waisted frockcoat, in the shawl, in the grandes pamelas, in the dainty fabric 
boots?" Thus, the confrontation with the fashions of previous generations is a 



Le Pont desplanetes (Interplanetary Bridge). Engraving by Grandville, 1844. See Bla,2. 



matter of far greater importance than we ordinarily suppose. And one of the 
most significant aspects of historical costuming is that — above all, in the thea- 
ter — it undertakes such a confrontation. Beyond the theater, the question of 
costume reaches deep into the life of art and poetry, where fashion is at once 
preserved and overcome. [Bla,4] 

A kindred problem arose with the advent of new velocities, which gave life an 
altered rhythm. This latter, too, was first tried out, as it were, in a spirit of play. 
The loop-the-loop came on the scene, and Parisians seized on this entertainment 
with a frenzy. A chronicler notes around 1810 that a lady squandered 75 francs in 
one evening at the Pare de Montsouris, where at that time you could ride those 
looping cars. The new tempo of life is often announced in the most unforeseen 
ways. For example, in posters. "These images of a day or an hour, bleached by 
the elements, charcoaled by urchins, scorched by the sun — although others are 
sometimes collected even before they have dried — symbolize to a higher degree 
even than the newspapers the sudden, shock-filled, multiform life that carries us 
away." Maurice Talmeyr, La Cite du sang (Paris, 1901), p. 269. In the early days 
of the poster, there was as yet no law to regulate the posting of bills or to provide 
protection for posters and indeed from posters; so one could wake up some 
morning to find one's window placarded. From time immemorial this enigmatic 
need for sensation has found satisfaction in fashion. But in its ground it will be 
reached at last only by theological inquiry, for such inquiry bespeaks a deep 
affective attitude toward historical process on the part of the human being. It is 
tempting to connect this need for sensation to one of the seven deadly sins, and it 
is not surprising that a chronicler adds apocalyptic prophecies to this connection 



and foretells a time when people will have been blinded by the effects of too 
much electric light and maddened by the tempo of news reporting. From Jacques 
Fabien, Paris en songe (Paris, 1863). [B2,l] 



"On October 4, 1856, the Gymnasium Theater presented a play entitled Les Toi- 
lettes Tmpageuses <The Flashy Dressers>. It was the heyday of the crinoline, and 
puffed-out women were in fashion. The actress playing the leading role, having 
grasped the satirical intentions of the author, wore a dress whose skirt, exagger- 
ated by design, had a fullness that was comical and almost ridiculous. The day 
after opening night, she was asked by more than twenty fine ladies to lend her 
dress as a model, and eight days later the crinoline had doubled in size." Maxime 



"Fashion is the recherche — the always vain, often ridiculous, sometimes danger- 
ous quest — for a superior ideal beauty." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 6, p. 294. [B2,3] 

The epigraph from Balzac is well suited to unfolding the temporality of hell: to 
showing how this time does not recognize death, and how fashion mocks death; 
how the acceleration of traffic and the tempo of news reporting (which conditions 
the quick succession of newspaper editions) aim at eliminating all discontinuities 
and sudden ends ; and how death as caesura belongs together with all the straight 
lines of divine temporality. — Were there fashions in antiquity? Or did the 
"authority of the frame" 5 preclude them? [B2,4] 

"She was everybody's contemporary." <Marcel> Jouhandeau, Prudence Haute- 
chaume (Paris, 1927), p. 129. To be contemporaine de tout le monde — that is the 
keenest and most secret satisfaction that fashion can offer a woman. [B2,5] 

An emblem of the power of fashion over the city of Paris: "I have purchased a 
map of Paris printed on a pocket handkerchief." Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris, vol. 1 



Apropos of the medical discussion concerning the crinoline: Some people thought 
to justify its use, together with that of the petticoat, by noting "the agreeable and 
salutary coolness which the limbs enjoyed underneath. . . . Among doctors, [how- 
ever,] it is acknowledged that this celebrated coolness has already led to chills, and 
these have occasioned the unfortunately premature end of a situation which it was 
the original purpose of the crinoline to conceal." F. Th. Vischer, Kritische Gmnge, 
new series, no. 3 (Stuttgart, 1861), p. 100: "Verniinftige Gedanken iiber die jetzige 
Mode" <Reasonable Opinions on Current Fashions). [B2a,2] 



Du Camp, Paris, vol. 6<Paris, 1875>, p. 192. 



[B2,2] 



<Leipzig, 1842>, p. 82. 



[B2a,l] 



It was "madness for the French fashions of the Revolution and the First Empire to 
mimic Greek proportions with clothing cut and sewn in the modern manner." 
Vischer, "Verniinftige Gedanken iiber die jetzige Mode," p. 99. [B2a,3] 



Des damesd'un demi-raoral^raaisn'aynntpastledeini-jiipes 



Fashionable courtesans wearing crinolines. Lithograph by Honore Daumier, 1855. Tlie 
caption reads: "Ladies of the demi-monde, but havingno demi-skirts." See B2,2. 

A knit scarf — a brightly striped muffler — worn also, in muted colors, by men. 

[B2a,4] 

F. Th. Vischer on the men's fashion of wide sleeves that fall below the wrist: "What 
we have here are no longer arms but the rudiments of wings, stumps of penguin 
wings, fish fins. The movement of these shapeless appendages resembles the ges- 
ticulations — the sliding, jerking, paddling — of a fool or simpleton." Vischer, 
"Vernunftige Gedanken iiber die jetzige Mode," p. 111. [B2a,5] 

Important political critique of fashion from the standpoint of the bourgeois: 
"When the author of these reasonable opinions first saw, boarding a train, a 
young man wearing the newest style of shirt collar, he honestly thought that he 
was looking at a priest; for this white band encircles the neck at the same height 
as the well-known collar of the Catholic cleric, and moreover the long smock was 
black. On recognizing a layman in the very latest fashion, he immediately under- 
stood all that this shirt collar signifies: 'O, for us everything, everything is one — 
concordats included! And why not? Should we clamor for enlightenment like 
noble youths? Is not hierarchy more distinguished than the leveling effected by a 
shallow spiritual liberation, which in the end always aims at disturbing the pleas- 
ure of refined people?' — It may be added that this collar, in tracing a neat little 



line around the neck, gives its wearer the agreeable air of someone freshly be- 
headed, which accords so well with the character of the blase." To this is joined 
the violent reaction against purple. Vischer, "Vemirnftige Gedanken iiber die 
jetzige Mode," p. 1 12. [B2a,6] 



On the reaction of 1850-1860: "To show one's colors is considered ridiculous; to 
he strict is looked on as childish. In such a situation, how could dress not become 
equally colorless, flabby, and, at the same time, narrow?" Vischer, p. 117. He thus 
brings the crinoline into relation with that fortified "imperialism which spreads 
out and puffs up exactly like its image here, and which, as the last and strongest 
expression of the reflux of all the tendencies of the year 1848, settles its dominion 
like a hoop skirt over all aspects, good and had, justified and unjustified, of the 
revolution" (p. 119). [B2a,7] 



"At bottom, these things are simultaneously free and unfree. It is a twilight zone 
where necessity and humor interpenetrate. . . . The more fantastic a form, the 
more intensely the clear and ironic consciousness works by the side of the servile 
will. And this consciousness guarantees that the folly will not last; the more con- 
sciousness grows, the nearer comes the time when it acts, when it turns to deed, 
when it throws off the fetters." Vischer, pp. 122-123. [B2a,8] 

One of the most important texts for elucidating the eccentric, revolutionary, and 
surrealist possibilities of fashion — a text, above all, which establishes thereby the 
connection of Surrealism to Grandville and others — is the section on fashion in 
Apollinaire's Poete assassine (Paris, 1927), pp. 74ff.° [B2a,9] 

How fashion takes its cue from everything: Programs for evening clothes ap- 
peared, as if for the newest symphonic music. In 1901, in Paris, Victor Prouve 
exhibited a formal gown with the title, "Riverbank in Spring." [B2a,10] 

Hallmark of the period's fashions: to intimate a body that never knows full 
nakedness. [B3,l] 

"Around 1890 people discover that silk is no longer the most elegant material for 
street clothes; henceforth it is allotted the previously unknown function of lining. 
From 1870 to 1890, clothing is extraordinarily expensive, and changes in fashion 
are accordingly limited in many cases to prudent alterations by which new apparel 
can be derived from remodeling the old." 70 Jmhre deutsche Mode (1925), p. 71. 

[B3,2] 



"1873 . . . , when the giant skirts that stretched over cushions attached to the 
derriere, with their gathered draperies, their pleated frills, their embroidery, and 
their ribbons, seem to have issued less from the workshop of a tailor than from 



that of an upholsterer." J. W. Samson, Die Frmuenmode der Gegenwmrt (Berlin 
and Cologne, 1927), pp. 8-9. [B3,3] 



No immortalizing so unsettling as that of the ephemera and the fashionable 
forms preserved for us in the wax museum. And whoever has once seen her 
must, like Andre Breton, lose his heart to the female figure in the Musee Grevin 
who adjusts her garter in the corner of a loge. <Breton,> Nadja <Paris, 1928>, 
p. 199. 7 ' [B3,4] 

"The flower trimmings of large white lilies or water lilies with stems of rush, which 
look so charming in any coiffure, unintentionally remind one of delicate, gently 
floating sylphids and naiades. Just so, the fiery brunette cannot adorn herself 
more delightfully than with fruit braided in graceful little branches — cherries, red 
currants, even bunches of grapes mingled with ivy and flowering grasses — or than 
with long vivid red velvet fuchsias, whose leaves, red-veined and as though tinged 
with dew, form a crown; also at her disposal is the very lovely cmctus speciosus, 
with its long white filaments. In general, the flowers chosen for decorating the hair 
are quite large; we saw one such headdress of very picturesque and beautiful white 
roses entwined with large pansies and ivy branches, or rather boughs. The ar- 
rangement of the gnarled and tendriled branches was so felicitous that it seemed 
nature itself had lent a hand — long branches bearing buds and long stems swayed 
at the sides with the slightest motion." Der Bmztir, third year (Berlin, 1857), p. 11 
( Veronika von G . , "Die Mode"). [B3.5] 

The impression of the old-fashioned can arise only where, in a certain way, 
reference is made to the most topical. If the beginnings of modern architecture to 
some extent lie in the arcades, their antiquated effect on the present generation 
has exactly the same significance as the antiquated effect of a father on his son. 

[B3,6] 

In my formulation: "The eternal is in any case far more the ruffle on a dress than 
some idea." 8 D Dialectical Image D [B3,7] 

In fetishism, sex does away with the boundaries separating the organic world 
from the inorganic. Clothing and jewelry are its allies. It is as much at home with 
what is dead as it is with living flesh. The latter, moreover, shows it the way to 
establish itself in the former. Hair is a frontier region lying between the two 
kingdoms of sexus. Something different is disclosed in the drunkenness of pas- 
sion: the landscapes of the body. These are already no longer animated, yet are 
still accessible to the eye, which, of course, depends increasingly on touch and 
smell to be its guides through these reahns of death. Not seldom in the dream, 
however, there are swelling breasts that, like the earth, are all appareled in woods 
and rocks, and gazes have sent their life to the bottom of glassy lakes that 
slumber in the valleys. These landscapes are traversed by paths which lead 



sexuality into the world of the inorganic. Fashion itself is only another medium 
enticing it still more deeply into the universe of matter. [B3,8] 



'"This year,' said Tristouse, 'fashions are bizarre and common, simple and full of 
fantasy. Any material from nature's domain can now be introduced into the com- 
position of women's clothes. I saw a charming dress made of corks. ... A major 
designer is thinking about launching tailor-made outfits made of old bookbindings 
done in calf. . . . Fish bones are being worn a lot on hats. One often sees delicious 
young girls dressed like pilgrims of Saint James of Compostella; their outfits, as is 
fitting, are studded with coquilles Saint-Jacques. Steel, wool, sandstone, and files 
have suddenly entered the vestmentary arts. . . . Feathers now decorate not only 
hats but shoes and gloves; and next year they'll be on umbrellas. They're doing 
shoes in Venetian glass and hats in Baccarat crystal. ... I forgot to tell you that 
last Wednesday I saw on the boulevards on old dowager dressed in mirrors stuck 
to fabric. The effect was sumptuous in the sunlight. You'd have thought it was a 
gold mine out for a walk. Later it started raining and the lady looked like a silver 
mine. . . . Fashion is becoming practical and no longer looks down on anything. It 
ennobles everything. It does for materials what the Romantics did for words.'" 
Guillaume Apollinaire, Le Poete mssmssine, new edition (Paris, 1927), pp. 75-77. 9 

[B3a,l] 

A caricaturist — circa 1867 — represents the frame of a hoop skirt as a cage in 
which a girl imprisons hens and a parrot. See Louis Sonolet, Lm Vie pmrisienne 
sous le Second Empire (Paris, 1929), p. 245. [B3a,2] 

"It was bathing in the sea . . . that struck the first blow against the solemn and 
cumbersome crinoline." Louis Sonolet, L« Vie pmrisienne sous le Second Empire 
(Paris, 1929), p. 247. [B3a,3] 

"Fashion consists only in extremes. Inasmuch as it seeks the extremes by nature, 
there remains for it nothing more, when it has abandoned some particular form, 
than to give itself to the opposite form." 70 Jahre deutsche Mode (1925), p. 51. Its 
uttermost extremes: frivolity and death. [B3a,4] 

"We took the crinoline to be the symbol of the Second Empire in France — of its 
overblown lies, its hollow and purse-proud impudence. It toppled . . . , but . . . 
just before the fall of the Empire, the Parisian world had time to indulge another 
side of its temperament in women's fashions, and the Republic did not disdain to 
follow its lead." F. Th. Vischer, Mode und Cynismus (Stuttgart, 1879), p. 6. The 
new fashion to which Vischer alludes is explained: "The dress is cut diagonally 
across the hody and stretched over . . . the helly" (p. 6). A little later he speaks of 
the women thus attired as "naked in their clothes" (p. 8). [B3a,5] 

Friedell explains, with regard to women, "that the history of their dress shows 
surprisingly few variations. It is not much more than a regular rotation of a few 



quickly altering, but also quickly reinstated, nuances: the length of the train, the 
height of the coiffure, the shortness of the sleeves, the fullness of the skirt, the 
placement of the neckline and of the waist. Even radical revolutions like the boy- 
ish haircuts fashionable today are only the 'eternal return of the same. '" Egon 
Friedell, Kidturgeschichte der Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Munich, 1931), p. 88. Women's 
fashions are thus distinguished, according to the author, from the more diverse 
and more categorical fashions for men. [B4,l] 

"Of all the promises made by <Etienne> Cabet's novel Voyage en lemrie <Voyage to 
Icaria>, at least one has been realized. Cabet had in fact tried to prove in the novel, 
which contains his system, that the commnnist state of the future could admit no 
product of the imagination and could suffer no change in its institutions. He had 
therefore banned from Icaria all fashion — particularly the capricious priestesses 
of fashion, the modistes — as well as goldsmiths and all other professions that 
serve luxury, and had demanded that dress, utensils, and the like should never 
be altered." Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter- 
Associmtionen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 2, pp. 165-166. [B4,2] 

In 1828 the first performance of La Muette de Portici took place. 10 It is an undulat- 
ing musical extravaganza, an opera made of draperies, which rise and subside 
over the words. It must have had its success at a time when drapery was begin- 
ning its triumphal procession (at first, in fashion, as Turkish shawls). This revolt, 
whose premier task is to protect the king from its own effect, appears as a prelude 
to that of 1830 — to a revolution that was indeed no more than drapery covering 
a slight reshuffle in the ruling circles. [B4,3] 

Does fashion die (as in Russia, for example) because it can no longer keep up the 
tempo — at least in certain fields? [B4,4] 

Grandville's works are true cosmogonies of fashion. Part of his oeuvre could be 
entitled "The Struggle of Fashion with Nature." Comparison between Hogarth 
and Grandville. Grandville and Lautreamont. — What is the significance of the 
hypertrophy of captions in Grandville? [B4,5] 

"Fashion ... is a witness, but a witness to the history of the great world only, for in 
every country . . . the poor people have fashions as little as they have a history, 
and their ideas, their tastes, even their lives barely change. Without doubt, . . . 
public life is beginning to penetrate the poorer households, but it will take time." 
Eugene Montrue, Le XIX° siecle vecu pmr deuxfrmnquis (Paris), p. 241. [B4,6] 

The following remark makes it possible to recognize how fashion functions as 
camouflage for quite specific interests of the ruling class. "Rulers have a great 
aversion to violent changes. They want everything to stay the same — if possible, 
for a thousand years. If possible, the moon should stand still and the sun move 
no farther in its course. Then no one would get hungry any more and want 



dinner. And when the rulers have fired their shot, the adversary should no longer 
be permitted to fire; their own shot should be the last." Bertolt Brecht, "Funf 
Schwierigkeiten beim Schreiben der Wahrheit," Unsere £eit, 8, nos. 2-3 (Paris, 
Basel, Prague, April 1935), p. 32. [B4a,l] 

MacOrlan, who emphasizes the analogies to Surrealism in Grandville's work, 
draws attention in this connection to the work of Walt Disney, on which he com- 
ments: "It is not in the least morbid. In this it diverges from the humor of Grand- 
vine, which always bore within itself the seeds of death." <Pierre> MacOrlan, 
"Grandville ie precurseur," Arts et metiers grmphiques, 44 (December 15, 1934), 
<p. 24>. [B4a,2] 

"The presentation of a large couture collection lasts two to three hours. Each 
time in accord with the tempo to which the models are accustomed. At the close, 
a veiled bride traditionally appears." Helen Grund, Vom We sen der Mode (Mu- 
nich: Privately printed, 1935), p. 19. In this practice, fashion makes reference to 
propriety while serving notice that it does not stand still before it. [B4a,3] 

A contemporary fashion and its significance. In the spring of 1935, something 
new appeared in women's fashions: medium-sized embossed metal plaquettes, 
which were worn on jumpers or overcoats and which displayed the initial letters 
of the bearer's first name. Fashion thus profited from the vogue for badges which 
had arisen among men in the wake of the patriotic leagues. On the other hand, 
the progressive restrictions on the private sphere are here given expression. The 
name — and, to be sure, the first name — of persons unknown is published on a 
lapel. That it becomes easier thereby to make the acquaintance of a stranger is of 
secondary importance. [B4a,4] 

"The creators of fashions . . . like to frequent society and extract from its grand 
doings an impression of the whole; they take part in its artistic life, are present at 
premieres and exhibitions, and read the hooks that make a sensation. In other 
words, they are inspired hy the . . . ferment . . . which the busy present day can 
offer. But since no present moment is ever fully cut of f from the past, the latter also 
will offer attractions to the creator, . . . though only that which harmonizes with 
the reigning tone can be used. The toque tipped forward over the forehead, a style 
we owe to the Manet exhibition, demonstrates quite simply our new readiness to 
confront the end of the previous century." Helen Grund, Vom Wesen der Mode, 
p. 13. [B4a,5] 

On the publicity war between the fashion house and the fashion columnists: "The 
fashion writer's task is made easier by the fact that our wishes coincide. Yet it is 
made more difficult by the fact that no newspaper or magazine may regard as new 
what another has already published. From this dilemma, we and the fashion 
writer are saved only by the photographers and designers, who manage through 
the pose and lighting to bring out different aspects of a single piece of clothing. The 



most important magazines . . . have their own photo studios, which are equipped 
with all the latest technical and artistic refinements, and which employ highly 
talented specialized photographers. . . . But the publication of these documents is 
not permitted until the customer has made her choice, and that means usually four 
to six weeks after the initial showing. The reason for this measure? — The woman 
who appears in society wearing these new clothes will herself not be denied the 
effect of surprise." Helen Grund, Vom Wesen der Mode, pp. 21-22. [B5,l] 

According to the summary of the first six issues, the magazine published by 
Stephane Mallarme, Lm. Dernier e Mode (Paris, 1874), contains "a delightful spor- 
tive sketch, the result of a conversation with the marvelous naturalist Toussenel." 
Reproduction of this summary in Minotmure, 2, no. 6 (Winter 1935) <p. 27>. 

[B5,2] 

A biological theory of fashion that takes its cue from the evolution of the zebra to 
the horse, as described in the abridged Brehm (p. 771): u "This evolution spanned 
millions of years. . . . The tendency in horses is toward the creation of a first-class 
runner and courser. . . . The most ancient of the existing animal types have con- 
spicuously striped coats. Now, it is very remarkable that the external stripes of the 
zebra display a certain correspondence to the arrangement of the ribs and the 
vertebra inside. One can also determine very clearly the arrangement of these 
parts from the unique striping on the upper foreleg and upper hind leg. What do 
these stripes signify? A protective function can be ruled out. . . . The stripes have 
been . . . preserved despite their 'purposelessness and even unsuitableness,' and 
therefore they must . . . have a particular significance. Isn't it likely that we are 
dealing here with outward stimuli for internal responses, such as would be espe- 
cially active during the mating season? What can this theory contribute to our 
theme? Something of fundamental importance, I believe. — Ever since humanity 
passed from nakedness to clothing, 'senseless and nonsensical' fashion has played 
the role of wise nature. . . . And insofar as fashion in its mutations . . . prescribes 
a constant revision of all elements of the figure, ... it ordains for the woman a 
continual preoccupation with her beauty." Helen Grund, Vom Wesen der Mode, 
pp. 7-8. [B5,3] 

At the Paris world exhibition of 1900 there was a Palais du Costume, in which wax 
dolls arranged before a painted backdrop displayed the costumes of various peo- 
ples and the fashions of various ages. [B5a,l] 

"But as for us, we see . . . around us . . . the effects of confusion and waste inflicted 
by the disordered movement of the world today. Art knows no compromise with 
hurry. Our ideals are good for ten years! The ancient and excellent reliance on the 
judgment of posterity has been stupidly replaced by the ridiculous superstition of 
novelty, which assigns the most illusory ends to our enterprises, condemning them 
to the creation of what is most perishable, of what must be perishable by its 
nature: the sensation of newness. . . . Now, everything to be seen here has been 



enjoyed, has charmed and delighted through the centuries, and the whole glory of 
it calmly tells us: 'I AM NOTHING NET. Time may well spoil the material in which I 
exist; but for so long as it does not destroy me, I cannot be destroyed by the 
indifference or contempt of any man worthy of the name." Paul Valery, "Pream- 
bule" (preface to the catalogue of the exhibition "Italian Art from Cimabue to 
Tiepolo," at the Petit Palais, 1935), pp. iv, vii. 12 [B5a,2] 

"The ascendancy of the bourgeoisie works a change in women's wear. Clothing and 
hairstyles take on added dimensions . . . ; shoulders are enlarged by leg-of-mutton 
sleeves, and ... it was not long before the old hoop-petticoats came back into favor 
and full skirts were the thing. Women, thus accoutered, appeared destined for a 
sedentary life — family life — since their manner of dress had about it nothing that 
couldever suggest or seem to further the idea of movement. It was just the opposite 
with the advent of the Second Empire: family ties grew slack, and an ever-increas- 
ing luxury corrupted morals to such an extent that it became difficult to distin- 
guish an honest woman from a courtesan on the basis of clothing alone. Feminine 
attire had thus been transformed from head to toe. . . . Hoop skirts went the way 
of the accentuated rear. Everything that could keep women from remaining seated 
was encouraged; anything that could have impeded their walking was avoided. 
They wore their hair and their clothes as though they were to be viewed in profile. 
For the profile is the silhouette of someone . . . who passes, who is about to vanish 
from our sight. Dress became an image of the rapid movement that carries away 
the world." Charles Blanc, "Considerations sur le vetement des femmes" (Institut 
tie France, October 25, 1872), pp. 12-13. [B5a,3] 

"In order to grasp the essence of contemporary fashion, one need not recur to 
motives of an individual nature, such as . . . the desire for change, the sense of 
beauty, the passion for dressing up, the drive to conform. Doubtless such motives 
have, at various times, . . . played a part ... in the creation of clothes. . . . Never- 
theless, fashion, as we understand it today, has no individual motives but only a 
social motive, and it is an accurate perception of this social motive that determines 
the full appreciation of fashion's essence. This motive is the effort to distinguish 
the higher classes of society from the lower, or more especially from the middle 
classes .... Fashion is the barrier — continually raised anew hecause continually 
torn down — by which the fashionable world seeks to segregate itself from the 
middle region of society; it is the mad pursuit of that class vanity through which a 
single phenomenon endlessly repeats itself: the endeavor of one group to establish 
a lead, however minimal, over its pursuers, and the endeavor of the other group to 
make up the distance by immediately adopting the newest fashions of the leaders. 
The characteristic features of contemporary fashion are thus explained: above all, 
its origins in the upper circles and its imitation in the middle strata of society. 
Fashion moves from top to bottom, not vice versa. . . . An attempt by the middle 
classes to introduce a new fashion would . . . never succeed, though nothing would 
suit the upper classes better than to see the former with their own set of fashions. 
([Note:] Which does not deter them from looking for new designs in the sewer of 



the Parisian demi-monde and bringing out fashions that clearly bear the mark of 
their unseemly origins, as Fr. Vischer . . . has pointed out in his . . . widely cen- 
sured but, to my mind, . . . highly meritorious essay on fashion.) Hence the un- 
ceasing variation of fashion. No sooner have the middle classes adopted a newly 
introduced fashion than it . . . loses its value for the upper classes. . . . Thus, 
novelty is the indispensable condition for all fashion. . . . The duration of a fash- 
ion is inversely proportional to the swiftness of its diffusion; the ephemerality of 
fashions has increased in our day as the means for their diffusion have expanded 
via our perfected communications techniques. . . . The social motive referred to 
above explains, finally, the third characteristic feature of contemporary fashion: 
its . . . tyranny. Fashion comprises the outward criterion for judging whether or 
not one 'belongs in polite society.' Whoever does not repudiate it altogether must 
go along, even where he . . . firmly refuses some new development. . . . With this, a 
judgment is passed on fashion. ... If the classes that are weak and foolish enough 
to imitate it were to gain a sense of their own proper worth, ... it would be all up 
with fashion, and beauty could once again assume the position it has had with all 
those peoples who . . . did not feel the need to accentuate class differences through 
clothing or, where this occurred , were sensible enough to respect them." Rudolph 
von Jhering, Der Zweck im Recht, vol. 2 (Leipzig, 1883), pp. 234—238. 13 

[B6; B6a,l] 

On the epoch of Napoleon HI: "Making money becomes the object of an almost 
sensual fervor, and love becomes a financial concern. In the age of French Roman- 
ticism, the erotic ideal was the working girl who gives herself; now it is the tart who 
sells herself. ... A hoydenish nuance came into fashion: ladies wore collars and 
cravats, overcoats, dresses cut like tailcoats, . . . jackets a la Zouave, dolmans, 
walking sticks, monocles. Loud, harshly contrasting colors are preferred — for the 
coiffure as well: fiery red hair is very popular. . . . The paragon of fashion is the 
grmnde dmme who plays the cocotte." Egon Friedell, Kultur geschichte der 
Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Munich, 1931), p. 203. The "plebeian character" of this fashion 
represents, for the author, an "invasion . . . from below" by the nouveaux riches. 

[B6a,2] 

"Cotton fahrics replace brocades and satins, . . . and before long, thanks to . . . 
the revolutionary spirit, the dress of the lower classes becomes more seemly and 
agreeable to the eye." Edouard Foucaud, Paris inventeur: Physiologie de I'indus- 
triefrm.nqm.ise (Paris, 1844), p. 64 (referring to the Revolution of 1789). [B6a,3] 

An assemblage which, on closer inspection, proves to be composed entirely of 
pieces of clothing together with assorted dolls' heads. Caption: "Dolls on chairs, 
mannequins with false necks, false hair, false attractions — voila Longchamp!" 
Cahinet des Estampes. [B6a,4] 

"If, in 1829, we were to enter the shops of Delisle, we would find a multitude 
of diverse fabrics: Japanese, Alhambresque, coarse oriental, stocoline, meotide, 



silenian, zinzoline, Chinese Bagazinkoff. . . . With the Revolution of 1830, . . . the 
court of fashion had crossed the Seine and the Chaussee d'Antin had replaced the 
aristocratic faubourg." Paul d'Ariste, Lm Vie et le monde du boulevmrd, 1830- 
1870 <Paris, 1930>, p. 227. [B6a,5] 

"The well-to-do bourgeois, as a friend of order, pays his suppliers at least once a 
year; but the man of fashion, the so-called lion, pays his tailor every ten years, if 
he pays him at all." Acht Tage in Paris (Paris, July 1855), p. 125. [B7,l] 

"It is I who invented tics. At present, the lorgnon has replaced them. . . . The tic 
involves closing the eye with a certain movement of the mouth and a certain move- 
ment of the coat. . . . The face of an elegant man should always have . . . something 
irritated and convulsive about it. One can attribute these facial agitations either to 
a natural satanism, to the fever of the passions, or finally to anything one likes." 
Pmris-Viveui; by the authors of the memoirs of Bilboquet [Taxile Delord] (Paris, 
1854), pp. 25-26. [B7,2] 

"The vogue for buying one's wardrobe in London took hold only among men; the 
fashion among women, even foreigners, has always been to be outfitted in Paris." 
Charles Seignobos, Histoire sincere de lm nation frm.ngm.ise (Paris, 1932), p. 402. 

[B7,3] 

Marcelin, the founder of Lm Vie Pmrisienne, has set forth "the four ages of the 
crinoline." [B7,4] 

The crinoline is "the unmistakable symbol of reaction on the part of an imperial- 
ism that spreads out and puffs up ... , and that . . . settles its dominion like a hoop 
skirt over all aspects, good and bad, justified and unjustified, of the revolu- 
tion. ... It seemed a caprice of the moment, and it has established itself as the 
emblem of a period, like the Second of December." 14 F. Th. Vischer, cited in 
Eduard Fuchs, Die Kmrikmtur der europmischen Volker (Munich <1921>), vol. 2, 
p. 156. [B7,5] 

In the early 1840s, there is a nucleus of modistes on the Rue Vivienne. [B7,6] 

Simmel calls attention to the fact that "the inventions of fashion at the present 
time are increasingly incorporated into the objective situation of labor in the 
economy. . . . Nowhere does an article first appear and then become a fashion; 
rather, articles are introduced for the express purpose of becoming fashions." 
The contrast put forward in the last sentence may be correlated, to a certain 
extent, with that between the feudal and bourgeois eras. Georg Simmel, Philoso- 
phische Kultur (Leipzig, 1911), p. 34 ("Die Mode"). 15 [B7,7] 



Sinunel explains "why women in general are the staunchest adherents of fash- 
ion. . . . Specifically: from the weakness of the social position to which women have 



been condemned for the greater part of history derives their intimate relation with 
all that is 'etiquette.'" GeorgSimmel, Philosophische Kultur (Leipzig, 1911), p. 47 
("Die Mode"). l « [B7,8] 

The following analysis of fashion incidentally throws a light on the significance of 
the trips that were fashionable among the bourgeoisie during the second half of 
the century. "The accent of attractions builds from their substantial center to 
their inception and their end. This begins with the most trifling symptoms, such 
as the . . . switch from a cigar to a cigarette; it is fully manifest in the passion for 
traveling, which, with its strong accentuations of departure and arrival, sets the 
life of the year vibrating as fully as possible in several short periods. The . . . 
tempo of modern life bespeaks not only the yearning for quick changes in the 
qualitative content of life, but also the force of the formal attraction of the bound- 
ary — of inception and end." Georg Simmel, Philosophuche Kultur (Leipzig, 1911), 
p. 41 ("Die Mode").' 7 [B7a,l] 

Simmel asserts that "fashions differ for different classes — the fashions of the up- 
per stratum of society are never identical with those of the lower; in fact, they are 
abandoned by the former as soon as the latter prepares to appropriate them." 
Georg Simmel, Philosophische Kultur (Leipzig, 1911), p. 32 ("Die Mode"). lB 

[B7a,2] 

The quick changing of fashion means "that fashions can no longer be so expensive 
... as they were in earlier times. ... A peculiar circle . . . arises here: the more an 
article becomes subject to rapid changes of fashion, the greater the demand for 
cheap products of its kind; and the cheaper they become, the more they invite 
consumers and constrain producers to a quick change of fashion." Georg Simmel, 
Philosophische Kultur (Leipzig, 1911), pp. 58-59 ("Die Mode"). 1 '' [B7a,3] 

Fuchs on Jhering's analysis of fashion: "It must ... be reiterated that the concern 
for segregating the classes is only one cause of the frequent variation in fashions, 
and that a second cause — the private-capitalist mode of production, which in the 
interests of its profit margin must continually multiply the possibilities of turn- 
over — is of equal importance. This cause has escaped Jhering entirely, as has a 
third: the function of erotic stimulation in fashion, which operates most effectively 
when the erotic attractions of the man or the woman appear in ever new set- 
tings. . . . Friedrich Vischer, who wrote about fashion . . . twenty years before 
Jhering, did not yet recognize, in the genesis of fashion, the tendencies at work to 
keep the classes divided; ... on the other hand, he was fully aware of the erotic 
problems of dress." Eduard Fuchs, Illustrierte Sittengeschichte vom Mittelmlter 
his zur Gegenwmrt: Das biirgerliche Zeitmlter, enlarged edition (Munich <1926'?>), 
pp. 53-54. [B7a,4] 



Eduard Fuchs (Illustrierte Sittengeschichte vom Mittelmlter bis zur Gegenwmrt: 
Dms biirgerliche Zeitmlter, enlarged ed. , pp. 56-57) cites — without references — a 



remark by F. Th. Vischer, according to which the gray of men's clothing symbol- 
izes the "utterly blase" character of the masculine world, its dullness and inertia. 

[B8.1] 

"One of the surest and most deplorable symptoms of that weakness and frivolity of 
character which marked the Romantic age was the childish and fatal notion of 
rejecting the deepest understanding of technical procedures, . . . the consciously 
sustained and orderly carrying through of a work . . . — all for the sake of the 
spontaneous impulses of the individual sensibility. The idea of creating works of 
lasting value lost force and gave way, in most minds, to the desire to astonish; art 
was condemned to a whole series of breaks with the past. There arose an automatic 
audacity, which became as obligatory as tradition had been. Finally, that switch- 
ing — at high frequency — of the tastes of a given public, which is called Fashion, 
replaced with its essential changeableness the old habit of slowly forming styles, 
schools, and reputations. To say that Fashion took over the destinies of the fine 
arts is as much as to say that commercial interests were creeping in." Paul Valery, 
Pieces sur Vmrt (Paris), pp. 187-188 ("Autour de Corot"). 2 " [B8,2] 

"The great and fundamental revolution has been in cotton prints. It has required 
the combined efforts of science and art to force rebellious and ungrateful cotton 
fabrics to undergo every day so many brilliant transformations and to spread 
them everywhere within the reach of the poor. Every woman used to wear a blue or 
black dress that she kept for ten years without washing, for fear it might tear to 
pieces. But now her husband, a poor worker, covers her with a robe of flowers for 
the price of a day's labor. All the women of the people who display an iris of a 
thousand colors on our promenades were formerly in mourning." J. Michelet, Le 
Peuple (Paris, 1846), pp. 80-81. 21 [B8,3] 

"It is no longer art, as in earlier times, but the clothing business that furnishes the 
prototype of the modern man and woman. . . . Mannequins become the model for 
imitation, and the soul becomes the image of the body." Henri Polles, "L'Art du 
commerce," Vendredi, <12> (February 1937). Compare tics and English fashions 
for men. [B8,4] 

"One can estimate that, in Harmony, the changes in fashion . . . and the imperfec- 
tions in manufacturing would occasion an annual loss of 500 francs per person, 
since even the poorest of Harmonians has a wardrobe of clothes for every sea- 
son. . . . As far as clothing and furniture are concerned, . . . Harmony . . . aims 
for infinite variety with the least possible consumption. . . . The excellence of the 
products of societary industry . . . entail perfection for each and every manufac- 
tured object, so that furniture and clothing . . . become eternal." <Fourier,> cited 
in Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 2, pp. 196, 198. [B8a,l] 

"This taste for modernity is developed to such an extent that Baudelaire, like 
Balzac, extends it to the most trifling details of fashion and dress. Both writers 



study these things in themselves and turn them into moral and philosophical ques- 
tions, for these things represent immediate reality in its keenest, most aggressive, 
and perhaps most irritating guise, but also as it is most generally experienced." 
[Note:] "Besides, for Baudelaire, these matters link up with his important theory 
of dandyism, where it is a question, precisely, of morality and modernity." Roger 
Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle Revue frtrnqmise, 25, no. 284> (May 1, 
1937), p. 692. [B8a,2] 

"Sensational event! The belles dames, one fine day, decide to puff up the derriere. 
Quick, by the thousands, hoop factories! . . . But what is a simple refinement on 
illustrious coccyxes? A trumpery, no more. . . . 'Away with the rump! Long live 
crinolines!' And suddenly the civilized world turns to the production of ambula- 
tory bells. Why has the fair sex forgotten the delights of hand bells? ... It is not 
enough to keep one's place; you must make some noise down there. . . . The qumr- 
tier Breda and the Faubourg Saint-Germain are rivals in piety, no less than in 
plasters and chignons. They might as well take the church as their model! At 
vespers, the organ and the clergy take turns intoning a verse from the Psalms. The 
fine ladies with their little bells could follow this example, words and tintinnabula- 
tion by turns spurring on the conversation." A. Blanqui, Critique socimle (Paris, 
1885), vol. 1, pp. 83-84 ("Le Luxe"). — "Le Luxe" is a polemic against theluxury- 
goods industry. [B8a,3] 

Each generation experiences the fashions of the one immediately preceding it as 
the most radical antiaphrodisiac imaginable. In this judgment it is not so far off 
the mark as might be supposed. Every fashion is to some extent a bitter satire on 
love; in every fashion, perversities are suggested by the most ruthless means. 
Every fashion stands in opposition to the organic. Every fashion couples the 
living body to the inorganic world. To the living, fashion defends the rights of the 
corpse. The fetishism that succumbs to the sex appeal of the inorganic is its vital 
nerve. [B9,l] 

Where they impinge on the present moment, birth and death — the former 
through natural circumstances, the latter through social ones — considerably re- 
strict the field of play for fashion. This state of affairs is properly elucidated 
through two parallel circumstances. The first concerns birth, and shows the 
natural engendering of life "overcome" <aufgehoben> by novelty in the realm of 
fashion. The second circumstance concerns death: it appears in fashion as no less 
"overcome," and precisely through the sex appeal of the inorganic, which is 
something generated by fashion. [B9,2] 

The detailing of feminine beauties so dear to the poetry of the Baroque, a process 
in which each single part is exalted through a trope, secretly links up with the 
image of the corpse. This parceling out of feminine beauty into its noteworthy 
constituents resembles a dissection, and the popular comparisons of bodily parts 
to alabaster, snow, precious stones, or other (mostly inorganic) formations makes 



the same point. (Such dismemberment occurs also in Baudelaire: "Le Beau 
Navire.") [B9,3] 



Lipps on the somber cast of men's clothing: He thinks that "our general aversion to 
bright colors, especially in clothing for men, evinces very clearly an oft-noted 
peculiarity of our character. Gray is all theory; green — and not only green but also 
red, yellow, blue — is the golden tree of life. 22 In our predilection for the various 
shades of gray . . . running to black, we fi nd an unmistakable social reflection of 
our tendency to privilege the theory of the formation of intellect above all else. 
Even the beautiful we can no longer just enjoy; rather, ... we must first subject it 
to criticism, with the consequence that . . . our spiritual life becomes ever more 
cool and colorless." Theodor Lipps, "TJber die Symbolik unserer Kleidung," Nord 
und Siid, 33 (Breslau and Berlin, 1885), p. 352. [B9,4] 

Fashions are a collective medicament for the ravages of oblivion. The more short- 
lived a period, the more susceptible it is to fashion. Compare K2a,3. [B9a,l] 

Focillon on the phantasmagoria of fashion: "Most often ... it creates hybrids; it 
imposes on the human being the profile of an animal. . . . Fashion thus invents an 
artificial humanity which is not the passive decoration of a formal environment, 
but that very environment itself. Such a humanity — by turns heraldic, theatrical, 
fantastical, architectural — takes, as its ruling principle, the poetics of ornament, 
and what it calls 'line' ... is perhaps hut a subtle compromise between a certain 
physiological canon . . . and imaginative design." Henri Focillon, Vie des formes 
(Paris, 1934), p. 41. 23 [B9a,2] 

There is hardly another article of dress that can give expression to such divergent 
erotic tendencies, and that has so much latitude to disguise them, as a woman's 
hat. Whereas the meaning of male headgear in its sphere (the political) is strictly 
tied to a few rigid patterns, the shades of erotic meaning in a woman's hat are 
virtually incalculable. It is not so much the various possibilities of symbolic 
reference to the sexual organs that is chiefly of interest here. More surprising is 
what a hat can say about the rest of the outfit. H<elen> Grund has made the 
ingenious suggestion that the bonnet, which is contemporaneous with the crino- 
line, actually provides men with directions for managing the latter. The wide 
brim of the bonnet is turned up — thereby demonstrating how the crinoline must 
be turned up in order to make sexual access to the woman easier for the man. 

[B10.1] 

For the females of the species homo sapiens — at the earliest conceivable period of 
its existence — the horizontal positioning of the body must have had the greatest 
advantages. It made pregnancy easier for them, as can be deduced from the 
back-bracing girdles and trasses to which pregnant women today have recourse. 
Proceeding from this consideration, one may perhaps venture to ask: Mightn't 
walking erect, in general, have appeared earlier in men than in women? In that 



case, the woman would have been the four-footed companion of the man, as the 
dog or cat is today. And it seems only a step from this conception to the idea that 
the frontal encounter of the two partners in coitus would have been originally a 
kind of perversion; and perhaps it was by way of this deviance that the woman 
would have begun to walk upright. (See note in the essay "Eduard Fuchs : Der 
Sanunler und der Historiker.") 24 [B10.2] 

"It would ... he interesting to trace the effects exerted by this disposition to 
upright posture on the structure and function of the rest of the body. There is no 
doubt that all the particulars of an organic entity are held together in intimate 
cohesion, but with the present state of our scientific knowledge we must maintain 
that the extraordinary influences ascribed herewith to standing upright cannot in 
fact be proved. . . . No significant repercussion can be demonstrated for the struc- 
ture and function of the inner organs, and Herder's hypotheses — according to 
which all forces would react differently in the upright posture, and the blood 
stimulate the nerves differently — forfeit all credibility as soon as they are referred 
to differences manifestly important for behavior." Hermann Lotze, Mikrokosmos 



A passage from a cosmetics prospectus , characteristic of the fashions of the Second 
Empire. The manufacturer recommends "a cosmetic ... by means of which ladies, 
if they so desire, can give their complexion the gloss of rose taffeta." Cited in 
Ludwig Borne, Gesammelte Schriften (Hamburg and Frankfurt am Main, 1862), 



(Leipzig, 1858), vol. 2, p. 90. 25 



[BlOa.l] 



vol. 3, p. 282 ("Die Industrie-AussteLlung im Louvre"). 



[Bl0a,2] 



[Ancient Paris, Catacombs, Demolitions, 
Decline of Paris] 



Easy the way that leads into Avemus. 
—Virgil 1 

Even the automobiles have an air of antiquity here. 
— Guillaurne Apollinaire 2 



How gratings — as aJlegories — have their place in hell. In the Passage Vivienne, 
sculptures over the main entrance representing allegories of commerce. [ C 1 , 1 ] 

Surrealism was born in an arcade. And under the protection of what muses! 

[C1.2] 

The father of Surrealism was Dada; its mother was an arcade. Dada, when the 
two first met, was already old. At the end of 1919, Aragon and Breton, out of 
antipathy to Montparnasse and Montmartre, transferred the site of their meet- 
ings with friends to a cafe in the Passage de l'Opera. Construction of the Boule- 
vard Haussmann brought about the demise of the Passage de l'Opera. Louis 
Aragon devoted 135 pages to this arcade; in the sum of these three digits hides 
the number nine — the number of muses who bestowed their gifts on the new- 
born Surrealism. They are named Luna, Countess Geschwitz, Kate Greenaway, 
Mors, Cleo de Merode, Dulcinea, Libido, Baby Cadum, and Friederike Kemp- 
ner. (Instead of Countess Geschwitz: Tipse?) :i [CI, 3] 

Cashier as Banae. [CI, 4] 

Pausanias produced his topography of Greece around A.D. 200, at a time when the 
cult sites and many other monuments had begun to fall into ruin. [CI, 5] 

Few things in the history of humanity are as well known to us as the history of 
Paris. Tens of thousands of volumes are dedicated solely to the investigation of 



this tiny spot on the earth's surface. Authentic guides to the antiquities of the old 
Roman city — Lutetia Parisorum — appear as early as the sixteenth century. The 
catalogue of the imperial library, printed during the reign of Napoleon III, con- 
tains nearly a hundred pages under the rubric "Paris," and this collection is far 
from complete. Many of the main thoroughfares have their own special litera- 
ture, and we possess written accounts of thousands of the most inconspicuous 
houses. In a beautiful turn of phrase, Hugo von Hofmannsthal called <this city> 
"a landscape built of pure life." And at work in the attraction it exercises on 
people is the kind of beauty that is proper to great landscapes — more precisely, to 
volcanic landscapes. Paris is a counterpart in the social order to what Vesuvius is 
in the geographic order: a menacing, hazardous massif, an ever-active hotbed of 
revolution. But just as the slopes of Vesuvius, thanks to the layers of lava that 
cover them, have been transformed into paradisal orchards, so the lava of revolu- 
tions provides uniquely fertile ground for the blossoming of art, festivity, fashion. 
D Fashion D [Cl,6] 

Balzac has secured the mythic constitution of his world through precise topo- 
graphic contours. Paris is the breeding ground of his mythology — Paris with its 
two or three great bankers (Nucingen, du Tillet), Paris with its great physician 
Horace Bianchon, with its entrepreneur Cesar Birotteau, with its four or five 
great cocottes, with its usurer Gobseck, with its sundry advocates and soldiers. 
But above all — and we see this again and again — it is from the same streets and 
corners, the same little rooms and recesses, that the figures of this world step into 
the light. What else can this mean but that topography is the ground plan of this 
mythic space of tradition < lraditiomraum>, as it is of every such space, and that it 
can become indeed its key — just as it was the key to Greece for Pausanias, and 
just as the history and situation of the Paris arcades are to become the key for the 
underworld of this century, into which Paris has sunk. [CI, 7] 

To construct the city topographically — tenfold and a hundredfold — from out of 
its arcades and its gateways, its cemeteries and bordellos, its railroad stations and 
its ... , just as formerly it was defi ned by its churches and its markets. And the 
more secret, more deeply embedded figures of the city: murders and rebellions, 
the bloody knots in the network of the streets, lairs of love, and conflagrations. 
0 Flaneur 0 [Cl,8] 

Couldn't an exciting film be made from the map of Paris? From the unfolding of 
its various aspects in temporal succession? From the compression of a centuries- 
long movement of streets, boulevards, arcades, and squares into the space of half 
an hour? And does the flaneur do anything different? D Flaneur D [CI, 9] 

"Two steps from the Palais-Royal, between the Cour des Fontaines and the Rue 
Neuve-des-Bons-Enfants, there is a dark and tortuous little arcade adorned by a 
public scribe and a greengrocer. It could resemble the cave of Cacus or of Tro- 



phonius, but it could never resemble an arcade — even with good will and gas 
lighting." <Alfred> Delvau, Les Dessous de Paris (Paris, 1860), pp. 105-106. 

[Cla,l] 

One knew of places in ancient Greece where the way led down into the under- 
world. Our waking existence likewise is a land which, at certain hidden points, 
leads down into the underworld — a land full of inconspicuous places from which 
dreams arise. All day long, suspecting nothing, we pass them by, but no sooner 
has sleep come than we are eagerly groping our way back to lose ourselves in the 
dark corridors. By day, the labyrinth of urban dwellings resembles conscious- 
ness; the arcades (which are galleries leading into the city's past) issue unre- 
marked onto the streets. At night, however, under the tenebrous mass of the 
houses, their denser darkness protrudes like a threat, and the nocturnal pedes- 
trian hurries past — unless, that is, we have emboldened him to turn into the 
narrow lane. 

But another system of galleries runs underground through Paris : the Metro, 
where at dusk glowing red lights point the way into the underworld of names. 
Combat, Elysee, Georges V, Etienne Marcel, Solferino, Invalides, Vaugirard — 
they have all thrown off the humiliating fetters of street or square, and here in the 
lightning-scored, whistle-resounding darkness are transformed into misshapen 
sewer gods, catacomb fairies. This labyrinth harbors in its interior not one but a 
dozen blind raging bulls, into whose jaws not one Theban virgin once a year but 
thousands of anemic young dressmakers and drowsy clerks every morning must 
hurl themselves. D Street Names D Here, underground, nothing more of the colli- 
sion, the intersection, of names — that which aboveground forms the linguistic 
network of the city. Here each name dwells alone; hell is its demesne. Amer, 
Picon, Dubonnet are guardians of the threshold. [Cla,2] 

"Doesn't every quartier have its true apogee some time before it is fully built up? 
At that point its planet describes a curve as it draws near businesses, first the large 
and then the small. So long as the street is still somewhat new, it belongs to the 
common people; it gets clear of them only when it is smiled on by fashion. Without 
naming prices, the interested parties dispute among themselves for the rights to 
the small houses and the apartments, but only so long as the beautiful women, the 
ones with the radiant elegance that adorns not only the salon but the whole house 
and even the street, continue to hold their receptions. And should the lady become 
a pedestrian, she will want some shops, and often the street must pay not a little for 
acceding too quickly to this wish. Courtyards are made smaller, and many are 
entirely done away with; the houses draw closer together. In the end, there comes 
a New Year's Day when it is considered bad form to have such an address on one's 
visiting card. By then the majority of tenants are businesses only, and the gateways 
of the neighborhood no longer have much to lose if now and again they furnish 
asylum for one of the small tradespeople whose miserahle stalls have replaced the 
shops." <Charles> Lefeuve, Les An.cienn.es Maisons de Paris sous Napoleon III 
(Paris and Brussels, 1873), vol. 1, p. 482. 1 □ Fashion D [Cla,3] 



It is a sad testimony to the underdeveloped amour-propre of most of the great 
European cities that so very few of them — at any rate, none of the German 
cities — have anything like the handy, minutely detailed, and durable map that 
exists for Paris. I refer to the excellent publication by Taride, with its twenty-two 
maps of all the Parisian arrondissements and the parks of Boulogne and Vmcennes. 
Whoever has stood on a streetcorner of a strange city in bad weather and had to 
deal with one of those large paper maps — which at every gust swell up like a sail, 
rip at the edges, and soon are no more than a little heap of dirty colored scraps 
with which one torments oneself as with the pieces of a puzzle — learns from the 
study of the Plan Taride what a city map can be. People whose imagination does 
not wake at the perusal of such a text, people who would not rather dream of 
their Paris experiences over a map than over photos or travel notes, are beyond 
help. [Cla,4] 

Paris is built over a system of caverns from which the din of Metro and railroad 
mounts to the surface, and in which every passing omnibus or truck sets up a 
prolonged echo. And this great technological system of tunnels and thorough- 
fares interconnects with the ancient vaults, the limestone quarries, the grottoes 
and catacombs which, since the early Middle Ages, have time and again been 
reentered and traversed. Even today, for the price of two francs, one can buy a 
ticket of admission to this most nocturnal Paris, so much less expensive and less 
hazardous than the Paris of the upper world. The Middle Ages saw it differently. 
Sources tell us that there were clever persons who now and again, after exacting 
a considerable sum and a vow of silence, undertook to guide their fellow citizens 
underground and show them the Devil in his infernal majesty. A financial ven- 
ture far less risky for the swindled than for the swindlers: Must not the church 
have considered a spurious manifestation of the Devil as tantamount to blas- 
phemy? In other ways, too, this subterranean city had its uses, for those who 
knew their way around it. Its streets cut through the great customs barrier with 
which the Farmers General had secured their right to receive duties on imports, 
and in the sixteenth and eighteenth centuries smuggling operations went on for 
the most part below ground. We know also that in times of public commotion 
mysterious rumors traveled very quickly via the catacombs, to say nothing of the 
prophetic spirits and fortunetellers duly qualified to pronounce upon them. On 
the day after Louis XVI fled Paris, the revolutionary government issued bills 
ordering a thorough search of these passages. And a few years later a rumor 
suddenly spread through the population that certain areas of town were about to 
cavern. [C2,l] 

To reconstruct the city also from its/orat«ines <springs, wells>. "Some streets have 
preserved these in name, although the most celebrated among them, the Puits 
d' Amour <Well of Love>, which was located not far from the marketplace on the 
Rue de la Truanderie, has been dried, filled up, and smoothed over without a trace 
remaining. Hence, there is hardly anything left of the echoing wells which pro- 
vided a name for the Rue du Puits-qui-Parle, or of the wells which the tanner 



Adam-l'Hermite had dug in the quartier Saint-Victor. We have known the Rues de 
Puits-Mauconseil, du Puits-de-Fer, du Puits-du-Chapitre, du Puits-Certain, du 
Bon-Puits, and finally the Rue du Puits, which, after being the Rue du Bout-du- 
Monde, became the Impasse Saint-Claude-Montmartre. The marketplace wells, 
the bucket-drawn wells, the water carriers are all giving way to the public wells, 
and our children, who will easily draw water even on the top floors of the tallest 
buildings in Paris, will be amazed that we have preserved for so long these primi- 
tive means of supplying one of humankind's most imperious needs." Maxime du 
Camp, Paris: Ses organ.es, sesfonctions et sa vie (Paris, 1875), vol. 5, p. 263. 

[C2.2] 

A different topography, not architectonic but anthropocentric in conception, 
could show us all at once, and in its true light, the most muted quartier: the 
isolated fourteenth arrondusement. That, at any rate, is how Jules Janin already 
saw it a hundred years ago. If you were born into that neighborhood, you could 
lead the most animated and audacious life without ever having to leave it. For in 
it are found, one after another, all the buildings of public misery, of proletarian 
indigence, in unbroken succession: the birthing clinic, the orphanage, the hospi- 
tal (the famous Sante), and finally the great Paris jail with its scaffold. At night, 
one sees on the narrow unobtrusive benches — not, of course, the comfortable 
ones found in the squares — men stretched out asleep as if in the waiting room of 
a way station in the course of this terrible journey. [C2,3] 

There are architectonic emblems of commerce: steps lead to the apothecary, 
whereas the cigar shop has taken possession of the corner. The business world 
knows to make use of the threshold. In front of the arcade, the skating rink, the 
swimming pool, the railroad platform, stands the tutelary of the threshold: a hen 
that automatically lays tin eggs containing bonbons. Next to the hen, an auto- 
mated fortuneteller — an apparatus for stamping our names automatically on a 
tin band, which fixes our fate to our collar. [C2,4] 

In old Paris, there were executions (for example, by hanging) in the open street. 

[C2,5] 

Rodenberg speaks of the "stygian existence" of certain worthless securities — such 
as shares in the Mires fund — which are sold by the "small-time crooks" of the 
Stock Exchange in the hope of a "future resurrection brought to pass by the day's 
market cpaotations." Julius Rodenberg, Paris bei Sonnenschein und Lampenlicht 
(Berlin, 1867), pp. 102-103. [C2a,l] 

Conservative tendency of Parisian life: as late as 1867, an entrepreneur conceived 
the plan of having fi ve hundred sedan chairs circulate throughout the city. 

[C2a,2] 



Concerning the mythological topography of Paris : the character given it by its 
gates. Important is their duality: border gates and triumphal arches. Mystery of 



the boundary stone which, although located in the heart of the city, once marked 
the point at which it ended. — On the other hand, the Arc de Triomphe, which 
today has become a traffic island. Out of the field of experience proper to the 
threshold evolved the gateway that transforms whoever passes under its arch. 
The Roman victory arch makes the returning general a conquering hero. (Ab- 
surdity of the relief on the inner wall of the arch? A classicist misunderstanding?) 

[C2a,3] 

The gallery that leads to the Mothers 5 is made of wood. Likewise, in the large- 
scale renovations of the urban scene, wood plays a constant though ever- 
shifting role: amid the modern traffic, it fashions, in the wooden palings and in 
the wooden planking over open substructions, the image of its rustic prehistory. 
OlronO [C2a,4] 

"It is the obscurely rising dream of northerly streets in a big city — not only Paris, 
perhaps, but also Berlin and the largely unknown London — obscurely rising, in a 
rainless twilight that is nonetheless damp. The streets grow narrow and the houses 
right and left draw closer together; ultimately it becomes an arcade with grimy 
shop windows, a gallery of glass. To the right and left: Are those dirty bistros, with 
waitresses lurking in black-and-white silk blouses? It stinks of cheap wine. Or is it 
the garish vestibule of a bordello? As I advance a little further, however, I see on 
both sides small summer-green doors and the rustic window shutters they call 
volets. Sitting there, little old ladies are spinning, and through the windows by the 
somewhat rigid flowering plant, as though in a country garden, I see a fair-skinned 
young lady in a gracious apartment, and she sings: 'Someone is spinning 
silk. . . ."' Franz Hessel, manuscript. Compare Strindherg, "The Pilot's Trials.'"' 

[C2a,5] 

At the entrance, a mailbox: last opportunity to make some sign to the world one 
is leaving. [C2a,6] 

Underground sightseeing in the sewers. Preferred route: Chatelet-Madeleine. 

[C2a,7] 



"The ruins of the Church and of the aristocracy, of feudalism, of the Middle Ages, 
are sublime — they fill the wide-eyed victors of today with admiration. But the 
ruins of the bourgeoisie will be an ignoble detritus of pasteboard, plaster, and 
coloring." <Honore de Balzac and other authors,) Le Diable a Paris (Paris, 1845), 
vol. 2, p. 18 (Balzac, "Ce qui disparait de Paris"). D Collector D [C2a,8] 

... All this, in our eyes, is what the arcades are. And they were nothing of all this. 
"It is only today, when the pickaxe menaces them, that they have at last become 
the true sanctuaries of a cult of the ephemeral, the ghostly landscape of danmable 
pleasures and professions. Places that yesterday were incomprehensible, and that 
tomorrow will never know." Louis Aragon, Le Paysan de Paris (Paris, 1926), 
p. 19. 7 0 Collector 0 [C2a,9] 



Sudden past of a city: windows lit up in expectation of Christmas shine as though 
their lights have been burning since 1880. [C2a,10] 



The dream — it is the earth in which the find is made that testifies to the primal 
history of the nineteenth century. D Dream D [C2a, 1 1 ] 

Reasons for the decline of the arcades: widened sidewalks, electric light, ban on 
prostitution, culture of the open air. [C2a,12] 



The rebirth of the archaic drama of the Greeks in the booths of the trade fair. 
The prefect of police allows only dialogue on this stage. "This third character is 
mute, by order of Monsieur the Prefect of Police, who permits only dialogue in 
theaters designated as nonresident." Gerard de Nerval, Le Cabaret de la Mere 
Saguet (Paris <1927>), pp. 259-260 ("Le Boulevard du Temple autrefois et 
aujourd'hui"). [C3,l] 



At the entrance to the arcade, a mailbox: a last opportunity to make some sign to 
the world one is leaving. [C3,2] 

The city is only apparently homogeneous. Even its name takes on a different 
sound from one district to the next. Nowhere, unless perhaps in dreams, can the 
phenomenon of the boundary be experienced in a more originary way than in 
cities. To know them means to understand those lines that, running alongside 
railroad crossings and across privately owned lots, within the park and along the 
riverbank, function as limits; it means to know these confines, together with the 
enclaves of the various districts. As threshold, the boundary stretches across 
streets; a new precinct begins like a step into the void — as though one had 
unexpectedly cleared a low step on a flight of stairs. [C3,3] 



At the entrance to the arcade, to the skating rink, to the pub, to the tennis court: 
penates. The hen that lays the golden praline-eggs, the machine that stamps our 
names on nameplates and the other machine that weighs us (the modern gnothi 
seauton)* slot machines, the mechanical fortuneteller — these guard the threshold. 
They are generally found, it is worth noting, neither on the inside nor truly in the 
open. They protect and mark the transitions; and when one seeks out a little 
greenery on a Sunday afternoon, one is turning to these mysterious penates as 
well. D Dream House D Love D [C3 ,4] 



The despotic terror of die hand bell, the terror that reigns throughout the apart- 
ment, derives its force no less from the magic of the threshold. Some things shrill 
as they are about to cross a threshold. But it is strange how the ringing becomes 
melancholy, like a knell, when it heralds departure — as in the Kaiserpanorama, 
when it starts up with the slight tremor of the receding image and announces 
another to come. D Dream House D Love D [C3,5] 



These gateways — the entrances to the arcades — are thresholds. No stone step <g 
serves to mark them. But this marking is accomplished by the expectant posture 

of the handful of people. Tightly measured paces reflect the fact, altogether ft 

unknowingly, that a decision lies ahead. D Dream House D Love D [C3,6] §" 

I' 

Other courts of miracles besides the one in the Passage du Caire that is celebrated 1-3 

in Notre-Dame de Paris <The Hunchback of Notre Dame.) "In the old Paris neigh- §■ 

borhood of the Marais, on the Rue des Tournelles, are the Passage and the Cour O 

des Miracles. There were other cours des miracles on the Rue Saint-Denis, the Rue p> 

du Bac, the Rue de Neuilly, the Rue des Coquilles, the Rue de la Jussienne, the 2 

Rue Saint-Nicaise, and the promontory of Saint-Roch.' <Emile de> Labedolliere, ™ 

Histoire <des environs> du nouveau Paris (Paris <1861?>), p. 31. [The biblical |? 

passages after which these courts were named: Isaiah 26.4-5 and 27.] [C3,7] o, 

I 

In reference to Haussmann's successes with the water supply and the drainage of ~ 
Paris: "The poets would say that Haussmann was inspired more by the divinities £$ 
below than by the gods above." Lucien Dubech and Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire de | 
Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 418. [C3,8] S, 

Metro. "A great many of the stations have been given absurd names. The worst 
seems to belong to the one at the corner of the Rue Breguet and the Rue Saint- 
Sabin, which ultimately joined together, in the abbreviation 'Breguet-Sabin,' the 
name of a watchmaker and the name of a saint." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire 
de Paris, p. 463. [C3,9] 

Wood an archaic element in street construction: wooden barricades. [C3,10] 

June Insurrection. "Most of the prisoners were transferred via the quarries and 
subterranean passages which are located under the forts of Paris, and which are so 
extensive that half the population of the city could be contained there. The cold in 
these underground corridors is so intense that many had to run continually or 
move their arms about to keep from freezing, and no one dared to lie down on the 
cold stones. . . . The prisoners gave all the passages names of Paris streets, and 
whenever they met one another, they exchanged addresses." Englander, 
<Geschichte der franzbsischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864')>, vol. 2, 
pp. 314-315. [C3a,l] 

"The Paris stone quarries are all interconnected. ... In several places pillars have 
been set up so that the roof does not cave in. In other places the walls have been 
reinforced. These walls form long passages under the earth, like narrow streets. 
On several of them, at the end, numbers have been inscribed to prevent wrong 
turns, but without a guide one is not . . . likely to venture into these exhausted 
seams of limestone ... if one does not wish ... to risk starvation." — "The legend 
according to which one can see the stars by day from the tunnels of the Paris 
quarries" originated in an old mine shaft "that was covered over on the surface by 



a stone slab in which there is a small hole some six millimeters in diameter. 
Through this hole, the daylight shines into the gloom helow like a pale star." J . F. 
Benzenberg, Briefe geschrieben auf einer Reise nach Paris (Dortmund, 1805), 
vol. 1 , pp. 207-208. [C3a,2] 

"A thing which smoked and clacked on the Seine, making the noise of a swimming 
dog, went and came beneath the windows of the Tuileries, from the Pont Royal to 
the Pont Louis XV; it was a piece of mechanism of no great value, a sort of toy, the 
daydream of a visionary, a Utopia — a steamboat. The Parisians looked upon the 
useless thing with indifference." Victor Hugo, Les Miserables, part l, 9 cited in 
Nadar, Quand j'etais photographe (Paris <1900>), p. 280. [C3a,3] 

"As if an enchanter or a stage manager, at the first peal of the whistle from the first 
locomotive, gave a signal to all things to awake and take flight." Nadar, Quand 
j'etais photographe (Paris), p. 281. [C3a,4] 

Characteristic is the birth of one of the great documentary works on Paris — 
namely, Maxime Du Camp's Paris: Ses organes, ses fonctions et sa vie dans la 
seconde moitie du XIX' siecle, in six volumes (Paris, 1893-1896). About this book, 
the catalogue of a secondhand bookshop says: "It is of great interest for its 
documentation, which is as exact as it is minute. Du Camp, in fact, has not been 
averse to trying his hand at all sorts of jobs — performing the role of omnibus 
conductor, street sweeper, and sewennan — in order to gather materials for his 
book. His tenacity has won him the nickname 'Prefect of the Seine in partibus,' 
and it was not irrelevant to his elevation to the office of senator." Paul Bourget 
describes the genesis of the book in his "Discours academique du 13 juin 1895: 
Succession a Maxime Du Camp" (Anthologie de V Academe Frmcaue [Paris, 1921], 
vol. 2, pp. 191-193). In 1862, recounts Bourget, after experiencing problems 
with his vision, Du Camp went to see the optician Secretan, who prescribed a 
pair of spectacles for farsightedness. Here is Du Camp: "Age has gotten to me. I 
have not given it a friendly welcome. But I have submitted. I have ordered a 
lorgnon and a pair of spectacles." Now Bourget: "The optician did not have the 
prescribed glasses on hand. He needed a half hour to prepare them. M. Maxime 
Du Camp went out to pass this half hour strolling about the neighborhood. He 
found himself on the Pont Neuf . ... It was, for the writer, one of those moments 
when a man who is about to leave youth behind thinks of life with a resigned 
gravity that leads him to find in all things the image of his own melancholy. The 
minor physiological decline which his visit to the optician had just confirmed put 
him in mind of what is so quickly forgotten: that law of inevitable destruction 

which governs everything human Suddenly he began — he, the voyager to the 

Orient, the sojourner through mute and weary wastes where the sand consists of 
dust of the dead — to envision a day when this town, too, whose enormous breath 
now filled his senses, would itself be dead, as so many capitals of so many 
empires were dead. The idea came to him that it would be extraordinarily inter- 
esting for us to have an exact and complete picture of an Athens at the time of 



Pericles, of a Carthage at the time of Barca, of an Alexandria at the time of the 
Ptolemies, of a Rome at the time of the Caesars. ... By one of those keen 
intuitions with which a magnificent subject for a work flashes before the mind, he 
clearly perceived the possibility of writing about Paris this book which the histo- 
rians of antiquity had failed to write about their towns. He regarded anew the 
spectacle of the bridge, the Seine, and the quay. . . . The work of his mature years 
had announced itself." It is highly characteristic that the modern administrative- 
technical work on Paris should be inspired by classical history. Compare further, 
concerning the decline of Paris, Leon Daudet's chapter on Sacre Coeur in his 
Paris vecu Experiences of Parisx 10 [C4] 

The following remarkable sentence from the bravura piece "Paris souterrain," in 
Nadar's Quand j'etais photographe: "In his history of sewers, written with the 
genial pen of the poet and philosopher, Hugo mentions at one point (after a de- 
scription that he has made more stirring than a drama) that, in China, not a single 
peasant returns home, after selling his vegetables in the city, without bearing the 
heavy load of an enormous bucket filled with precious fertilizer" (p. 124). 

[C4a,l] 

Apropos of the gates of Paris: "Until the moment you saw the toll collector appear 
between two columns, you could imagine yourself before the gates of Rome or of 
Athens." Biographie universelle ancienne et moderne, new edition published un- 
der the direction of M. Michaud, vol. 14 (Paris, 1856), p . 321 (article by P. F. L. 
Fontaine). [C4a,2] 

"In a book by Theophile Gautier, Caprices et zigzags, I find a curious page. 'A 
great danger threatens us,' it says. 'The modern Babylon will not be smashed like 
the tower of Lylak; it will not be lost in a sea of asphalt like Pentapolis, or buried 
under the sand like Thebes. It will simply be depopulated and ravaged by the rats 
of Montfaucon.' Extraordinary vision of a vague but prophetic dreamer! And it 
has in essence proven true. . . . The rats of Montfaucon . . . have not endangered 
Paris; Haussmann's arts of embellishment have driven them off. . . . But from the 
heights of Montfaucon the proletariat have descended, and with gunpowder and 
petroleum they have begun the destruction of Paris which Gautier foresaw." Max 
Nordau, Aus dem wahren Milliardenlan.de: Pariser Studien und Bilder (Leipzig, 
1878), vol. 1, pp. 75-76 ("Belleville"). [C4a,3] 

In 1899, during work on the Metro, foundations of a tower of the Bastille were 
discovered on the Rue Saint-Antoine. Cabinet des Estampes. [C4a,4] 

Halls of wine: "The warehouse, which consists partly of vaults for the spirits and 
partly of wine cellars dug out of stone, forms . . ., as it were, a city in which the 
streets bear the names of the most important wine regions of France. " Acht Tmge in 
Paris (Paris, July 1855), pp. 37-38. [C4a,5] 



5 "The cellars of the Cafe Anglais . . . extend quite a distance under the boulevards, 
~~ forming the most complicated denies. The management took the trouble to divide 
■ g them into streets. . . . You have the Rue du Bourgogne, the Rue du Bordeaux, the 
B« Rue du Beaune, the Rue de l'Ermitaae, the Rue du Chambertin, the crossroads of 

° ... Tonneaux. You come to a cool grotto . . . filled with shellfish . . . ; it is the 

■M grotto for the wines of Champagne. . . . The great lords of bygone days conceived 

Q the idea of dining in their stables. . . . But if you want to dine in a really eccentric 

§ fashion: vivent les caves!'''' Taxile Delord, Paris-viveur (Paris, 1854), pp. 79-81, 

| 83-84. [C4 a ,6] 
1 

^ "Rest assured that when Hugo saw a beggar on the road, ... he saw him for what 

■g he is, for what he really is in reality: the ancient mendicant, the ancient suppli- 

8 cant, ... on the ancient road. When he looked at a marble slab on one of our 

3 

^ mantlepieces, or a cemented brick in one of our modern chimneys, he saw it for 

m what it is: the stone of the hearth. The ancient hearthstone. When he looked at a 

6 door to the street, and at a doorstep, which is usually of cut stone, he distinguished 
g clearly on this stone the ancient line, the sacred threshold, for it is one and the 
■:i same line." Charles Peguy, Oeuvres completes, 1873-1914: Oeuvres de prose 

y (Paris, 1916), pp. 388-389 ("Victor-Marie, Comte Hugo"). [C5,l] 

"The wine shops of the Faubourg Antoine resemble those taverns on Mount 
Aventine, above the Sibyl's cave, which communicated with the deep and sacred 
afflatus; taverns whose tables were almost tripods, and where men drank what 
Ennius calls 'the sibylline wine." 1 Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 8 
(Paris, 1881), pp. 55-56 (Les Miserables, part 4)." [C5,2] 



"Those who have traveled in Sicily will remember the celebrated convent where, 
as a result of the earth's capacity for drying and preserving bodies, the monks at a 
certain time of year can deck out in their ancient regalia all the grandees to whom 
they have accorded the hospitality of the grave: ministers, popes, cardinals, war- 
riors, and kings. Placing them in two rows within their spacious catacombs, they 
allow the public to pass between these rows of skeletons. . . . Well, this Sicilian 
convent gives us an image of our society. Under the pompous garb that adorns our 
art and literature, no heart beats — there are only dead men, who gaze at you with 
staring eyes, lusterless and cold, when you ask the century where the inspiration 
is, where the arts, where the literature." <Alfred> Nettement, Les Ruines morales 
et intellectuelles (Paris, October 1836), p. 32. This may be compared with Hugo's 
"A 1' Arc de Triomphe" of 1837. [C5,3] 



The last two chapters of Leo Claretie's Paris depiris ses origines jusqu'enl'an3000 
(Paris, 1886) are entitled "The Ruins of Paris" and "The Year 3000." The first 
contains a paraphrase of Victor Hugo's verses on the Arc de Triomphe. The second 
reproduces a lecture on the antiquities of Paris that are preserved in the famous 
"Academie de Floksima . . . located in La Cenepire. This is a new continent . . . 



discovered between Cape Horn and the southern territories in the year 2500" 
(p. 347). [C5,4] 



"There was, at the Chatelet de Paris, a broad long cellar. This cellar was eight feet 
deep below the level of the Seine. It had neither windows nor ventilators . . . ; men 
could enter, but air could not. The cellar had for a ceiling a stone arch, and for a 
floor, ten inches of mud. . . . Eight feet above the floor, a long massive beam 
crossed this vaultf rom side to side; from this beam there hung, at intervals, chains 
. . . and at the end of these chains there were iron collars. Men condemned to the 
galleys were put into this cellar until the day of their departure for Toulon. They 
were pushed under this timber, where each had his iron swinging in the darkness, 
waiting for him. ... In order to eat, they had to draw their bread, which was 
thrown into the mire, up their leg with their heel, within reach of their hand. . . . 
In this hell-sepulcher, what did they do? What can be done in a sepulcher: they 
agonized. And what can be done in a hell: they sang. ... In this cellar, almost all 
the argot songs were born. It is from the dungeon of the Grand Chatelet de Paris 
that the melancholy galley refrain of Montgomery comes: 'Timaloumisaine, timou- 
lamison.' Most of these songs are dreary; some are cheerful." Victor Hugo, 
Oeuvres completes novels, vol. 8 (Paris, 1881), pp. 297—298 (Les Miserables). 1 ' 1 
D Subterranean Paris D [C5a,l] 

On the theory of thresholds: '"Between those who go on foot in Paris and those 
who go by carriage, the only difference is the running board,' as a peripatetic 
philosopher has said. Ah, the running board! ... It is the point of departure from 
one country to another, from misery to luxury, from thoughtlessness to thoughtful- 
ness. It is the hyphen between him who is nothing and him who is all. The question 
is: where to put one's foot." Theophile Gautier, Etudes philosophiques: Paris et les 
Parisiens au XIX" siecle (Paris, 1856), p. 26. [C5a,2] 

Slight foreshadowing of the Metro in this description of model houses of the future: 
"The basements, very spacious and well lit, are all connected, forming long galler- 
ies which follow the course of the streets. Here an underground railroad has heen 
built — not for human travelers, to be sure, hut exclusively for cumbersome mer- 
chandise, for wine, wood, coal, and so forth, which it delivers to the interior of the 
home. . . . These underground trains acquire a steadily growing importance." 
Tony Moilin, Paris en Van 2000 (Paris, 1869), pp. 14-15 ("Maisons-modeles"). 

[C5a,3] 

Fragments from Victor Hugo's ode "A I 'Arc de Triomphe": 

II 

Always Paris cries and mutters. 
Who can tell — unfathomable question — 
What would be lost from the universal clamor 
On the day that Paris fell silent! 



Ill 

Silent it will be nonetheless! — After so many dawns, 

So many months and years, so many played-out centuries, 

When this bank, where the stream breaks against the echoing bridges, 

Is returned to the modest and murmuring reeds; 

When the Seine shall flee the obstructing stones, 
Consuming some old dome collapsed into its depths, 
Heedful of the gentle breeze that carries to the clouds 
The rustling of the leaves and the song of birds; 

When it shall flow, at night, pale in the darkness, 
Happy, in the drowsing of its long-troubled course, 
To listen at last to the countless voices 
Passing indistinctly beneath the starry sky; 

When this city, mad and churlish ouvrisre, 
That hastens the fate reserved for its walls, 
And, turning to dust under the blows of its hammer, 
Converts bronze to coins and marble to flagstones; 

When the roofs, the bells, the tortuous hives, 
Porches, pediments, arches full of pride 
That make up this city, many-voiced and tumultuous, 
Stilling, inextricable, and teeming to the eye, 

When from the wide plain all these things have passed, 
And nothing remains of pyramid and pantheon 
But two granite towers built by Charlemagne 
And a bronze column raised by Napoleon, 

You, then, will complete the sublime triangle! 



IV 

Thus, arch, you will loom eternal and intact 
When all that the Seine now mirrors in its surface 

Will have vanished forever, 
When of that city — the equal, yes, of Rome — 
Nothing will be left except an angel, an eagle, a man 

Surmounting three summits! 



V 

No, time takes nothing away from things. 
More than one portico wrongly vaunted 
In its protracted metamorphoses 
Comes to beauty in the end. 
On the monuments we revere 
Time casts a somber spell, 
Stretching from f agade to apse. 
Never, though it cracks and rusts, 



Is the robe which time peels from them 
Worth the one it puts back on. 



to 



It is time who chisels a groove 

In an indigent arch-stone; 

Who rubs his knowing thumb 

On the corner of a barren marble slab; 

It is he who, in correcting the work, 

Introduces a living snake 

Midst the knots of a granite hydra. 

I think I see a Gothic roof start laughing 

When, from its ancient frieze, 

Time removes a stone and puts in a nest. 



VIII 



No, everything will be dead. Nothing left in this campagna 

But a vanished population, still around, 

But the dull eye of man and the living eye of God, 

But an arch, and a column, and there, in the middle 

Of this silver ed-over river, still afoam, 

A church half -stranded in the mist. 

February 2, 1837. 

Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, Poetry, vol. 3 (Paris, 1880), pp. 233-245. 

[C6; C6a,l] 



Demolition sites: sources for teaching the theory of construction. "Never have 
circumstances been more favorable for this genre of study than the epoch we live 
in today. During the past twelve years, a multitude of buildings — among them, 
churches and cloisters — have been demolished down to the first layers of their 
foundations; they have all provided . . . useful instruction." Charles-Francois 
Viel, De V Impuissan.ee des mathematiques pour assurer la solidite des batimens 
(Paris, 1805), pp. 43-44. [C6a,2] 



Demolition sites: "The high walls, with their bister-colored lines around the chim- 
ney flues, reveal, like the cross-section of an architectural plan, the mystery of 
intimate distributions. ... A curious spectacle, these open houses, with their 
floorboards suspended over the abyss, their colorful flowered wallpaper still 
showing the shape of the rooms, their staircases leading nowhere now, their cellars 
open to the sky, their bizarre collapsed interiors and battered ruins. It all resem- 
bles, though without the gloomy tone, those uninhabitable structures which Pira- 
nesi outlined with such feverish intensity in his etchings." Theophile Gautier, 
Mosa'ique de mines: Paris et les Parisiens au XIX e siecle, by Alexandre Dumas, 
Theophile Gautier, Arsene Houssaye, Paul de Musset, Louis Enault, and Du Fayl 
(Paris, 1856), pp. 38-39. [C7,l] 



Conclusion of <Louis> Lurine's article "Les Boulevards": "The boulevards will die 
of an aneurism: the explosion of gas." Paris chez soi (Paris <1854>), p. 62 (anthol- 
ogy issued by Paul Boizard). [C7,2] 



Baudelaire to Poulet-Malassis on January 8, 1860, concerning Mer yon: "In one of 
his large plates, he substituted for a little balloon a cloud of predatory birds, and 
when I pointed out to him that it was implausible that so many eagles could be 
found in a Parisian sky, he answered that it was not without a basis in fact, since 
'those men' (the emperor's government) had often released eagles to study the 
presages according to the rites, and that this had been reported in the newspa- 
pers — even in Le Moniteiir. ,m Cited in Gustave Geffroy, Charles Meryon (Paris, 



On the triumphal arch: "The triumph was an institution of the Roman state and 
was conditioned on the possession of the field-commander's right — the right of the 
military imperium — which, however, was extinguished on the day of the tri- 
umph. ... Of the various provisions attaching to the right of triumph, the most 
important was that the territorial hounds of the city . . . were not to be crossed 
prematurely. Otherwise the commander would forfeit the rights of the auspices of 
war — which held only for operations conducted outside the city — and with them 
the claim to triumph. . . . Every defilement, all guilt for the murderous battle (and 
perhaps originally tliis included the danger posed by the spirits of the slain), is 
removed from the commander and the army; it remains . . . outside the sacred 
gateway. . . . Such a conception makes it clear . . . that the porta triumphalis was 
nothing less than a monument for the glorification of victory." Ferdinand Noack, 
Triumph und Triumphbogen, Warburg Library Lectures, vol. 5 (Leipzig, 1928), 



"Edgar Poe created a character who wanders the streets of capital cities; he called 
him the Man of the Crowd. The restlessly inquiring engraver is the Man of 
Stones. . . . Here we have . . . an . . . artist who did not study and draw, like 
Piranesi, the remnants of a bygone existence, yet whose work gives one the sensa- 
tion of persistent nostalgia. . . . This is Charles Meryon. His work as an engraver 
represents one of the profoundest poems ever written about a city, and what is 
truly original in all these striking pictures is that they seem to be the image, despite 
being drawn directly from life, of things that are finished, that are dead or about to 
die. . . . This impression exists independently of the most scrupulous and realistic 
reproduction of subjects chosen by the artist. There was something of the vision- 
ary in Meryon, and he undoubtedly divined that these rigid and unyielding forms 
were ephemeral, that these singular beauties were going the way of all flesh. He 
listened to the language spoken by streets and alleys that, since the earliest days of 
the city, were being continually torn up and redone; and that is why his evocative 
poetry makes contact with the Middle Ages through the nineteenth-century city, 
why it radiates eternal melancholy through the vision of immediate appearances. 
"OW Paris is gone (no human heart / changes half so f ast as a city's face). " I4 These 



1926), pp. 126-127. 



[C7,3] 



pp. 150-151, 154. 



[C7,4] 



two lines by Baudelaire could serve as an epigraph to Meryon's entire oeuvre." 
Gustave Geffroy, Charles Meryon (Paris, 1926), pp. 1-3. [C7a,l] 



"There is no need to imagine that the ancient porta triumphalis was already an 
arched gateway. On the contrary, since it served an entirely symbolic act, it would 
originally have been erected by the simplest of means — namely, two posts and a 
straight lintel." Ferdinand Noack, Triumph und Triumphbogen, Warburg Library 
Lectures, vol. 5 (Leipzig, 1928), p. 168. [C7a,2] 

The march through the triumphal arch as rite de passage: "The march of the 
troops through the narrow gateway has been compared to a 'rigorous passage 
through a narrow opening,' something to which the significance of a rebirth at- 
taches." Ferdinand Noack, Triumph und Triumphbogen, Warburg Library Lec- 
tures, vol. 5 (Leipzig, 1928), p. 153. [C7a,3] 

The fantasies of the decline of Paris are a symptom of the fact that technology 
was not accepted. These visions bespeak the gloomy awareness that along 
with the great cities have evolved the means to raze them to the ground. 

[C7a,4] 

Noack mentions "that Scipio's arch stood not above but opposite the road that 
leads up to the Capitol (adversus viam, qua in Capitolium ascenditur). . . . We 
are thus given insight into the purely monumental character of these structures, 
which are without any practical meaning." On the other hand, the cultic sig- 
nificance of these structures emerges as clearly in their relation to special occa- 
sions as in their isolation: "And there, where many . . . later arches stand — at the 
beginning and end of the street, in the vicinity of bridges, at the entrance to the 
forum, at the city limit — there was operative for the . . . Romans a conception of 
the sacred as boundary or threshold." Ferdinand Noack, Triumph und Tri- 
umphbogen, Warburg Library Lectures, vol. 5 (Leipzig, 1928), pp. 162, 169. 

[C8,lj 

Apropos of the hicycle: "Actually one should not deceive oneself about the real 
purpose of the fashionable new mount, which a poet the other day referred to as 
the horse of the Apocalypse." U Illustration, June 12, 1869, cited in Vendredi, 
October 9, 1936 (Louis Cheronnet, "Le Coin des vieux"). [C8,2] 

Concerning the fire that destroyed the hippodrome: "The gossips of the district see 
in this disaster a visitation of the wrath of heaven on the guilty spectacle of the 
velocipedes." Le Gaulois, October 2 (3?), 1869, cited in Vendredi, October 9, 1936 
( Louis Cheronnet, "Le Coin des vieux"). The hippodrome was the site of ladies' 
hicycle races. [C8,3] 

To elucidate Les Mysteres de Paris and similar works, Caillois refers to the roman 
noir, in particular The Mysteries of Udolpho, on account of the "preponder- 



ance of vaults and underground passages." Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe 
moderne," Nouvelle Revue francaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), p. 686. 

[CM] 

"The whole of the rive gauche, all the way from the Tour de Nesle to the Tombe 
Issoire . . . , is nothing but a hatchway leading from the surface to the depths. And 
if the modern demolitions reveal the mysteries of the upper world of Paris, per- 
haps one day the inhabitants of the Left Bank will awaken startled to discover the 
mysteries below." Alexandre Dumas, Les Mohicans tie Paris, vol. 3 (Paris, 1863). 

[C8.5] 

"This intelligence of Blanqui's, . . . this tactic of silence, this politics of the cata- 
combs, must have made Barbes hesitate occasionally, as though confronted with 
... an unexpected stairway that suddenly gapes and plunges to the cellar in an 
unfamiliar house." Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 72. 

[C8,6] 

<Regis> Messac (<in he "Detective Novel" et Vinfluence de la pensee scientifique 
[Paris, 1929], > p. 419) quotes from Vidocq's Memoires (chapter 45): "Paris is a 
spot on the globe, but this spot is a sewer and the emptying point of all sewers." 

[C8a,l] 

Le Panorama (a literary and critical revue appearing five times weekly), in vol- 
ume 1, number 3 (its last number), February 25, 1840, under the title "Difficult 
Questions": "Will the universe end tomorrow? Or must it — enduring for all 
eternity — see the end of our planet? Or will this planet, which has the honor of 
bearing us, outlast all the other worlds?" Very characteristic that one could write 
this way in a literary revue. (In the first number, "To Our Readers," it is acknowl- 
edged, furthermore, that Le Panorama was founded to make money.) The 
founder was the vaudevillian Hippolyte Lucas. [C8a,2] 

Saint who each night led back 

The entire flock to the fold, diligent shepherdess, 

When the world and Paris come to the end of their term, 

May you, with a firm step and a light hand, 

Through the last yard and the last portal, 

Lead back, through the vault and the folding door, 

The entire flock to the right hand of the Father. 

Charles Peguy, La Tapisserie de Sainte-Genevieve, cited in Marcel Raymond, De 
Baudelaire au Surrealisme (Paris, 1933), p. 219. 15 [C8a,3] 

Distrust of cloisters and clergy during the Commune: "Even more than with the 
incident of the Rue Picpus, everything possible was done to excite the popular 
imagination, thanks to the vaults of Saint-Laurent. To the voice of the press was 



added publicizing through images. Etienne Carjat photographed the skeletons, <§ 

'with the aid of electric light.' . . . After Picpus, after Saint-Laurent, at an interval -- 

of some days, the Convent of the Assumption and the Church of Notre-Dame-des- {"} 

Victoires. A wave of madness overtook the capital. Everywhere people thought §* 

they were finding buried vaults and skeletons." Georges Laronze, Histoire de la g' 

Commune de 1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 370. [C8a,4] ^ 

1871: "The popular imagination could give itself free reign, and it took every o 

opportunity to do so. There wasn't one civil-service official who did not seek to g 

expose the method of treachery then in fashion: the subterranean method. In the 8 

prison of Saint-Lazare, they searched for the underground passage which was said - 

to lead from the chapel to Argenteuil — that is, to cross two branches of the Seine <? 

and some ten kilometers as the crow fl ies. At Saint-Sulpice, the passage supposedly o, 

abutted the chateau of Versailles." Georges Laronze, Histoire de la Commune de £>' 
1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 399. [C8a,5] 

"As a matter of fact, men had indeed replaced the prehistoric water. Many centu- [f 
ries after it had withdrawn, they had begun a similar overflowing. They had S, 
spread themselves in the same hollows, pushed out in the same directions. It was 
down there — toward Saint-Merri, the Temple, the Hotel de Ville, toward Les 
Halles, the Cemetery of the Innocents, and the Opera, in the places where water 
had found the greatest difficulty escaping, places which had kept oozing with 
infiltrations, with subterranean streams — that men, too, had most completely 
saturated the soil. The most densely populated and busiest quartiers still lay over 
what had once been marsh." Jules Romains, Les Hommes de bonne volonte, book 
1, he 6 octobre (Paris <1932>), p. 191. 16 [C9,l] 

Baudelaire and the cemeteries: "Behind the high walls of the houses, toward Mont- 
martre, toward Menilmontant, toward Montparnasse, he imagines at dusk the 
cemeteries of Paris, these three other cities within the larger one — cities smaller in 
appearance than the city of the living, which seems to contain them, but in reality 
how much more populous, with their closely packed little compartments arranged 
in tiers under the ground. And in the same places where the crowd circulates 
today — the Square des Innocents, for example — he evokes the ancient ossuaries, 
now leveled or entirely gone, swallowed up in the sea of time with all their dead, 
like ships that have sunk with all their crew aboard." Francois Porche, La Vie 
douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire, in series entitled Le Roman des Grandes 
Existences, no. 6 (Paris <1926>), pp. 186-187. [C9,2] 

Parallel passage to the ode on the Arc de Triomphe. Humanity is apostrophized: 

As for your cities, Babels of monuments 
Where all events clamor at once, 

How substantial are they? Arches, towers, pyramids — 
I would not be surprised if, in its humid incandescence, 
The dawn one morning suddenly dissolved them, 



Along with the dewdrops on sage and thyme. 
And all your noble dwellings, many-tiered, 
End up as heaps of stone and grass 
Where, in the sunlight, the subtle serpent hisses. 



Victor Hugo, La Fin de Satan; Dieu (Paris, 1911), pp. 475-476 ("Dieu-L'Ange"). 

[C9.3] 



Leon Daudet on the view of Paris from Sacre Coeur. "From high up you can see 
this population of palaces, monuments, houses, and hovels, which seem to have 
gathered in expectation of some cataclysm, or of several cataclysms — meteorologi- 
cal, perhaps, or social. ... As a lover of hilltop sanctuaries, which never fail to 
stimulate my mind and nerves with their bracing harsh wind, I have spent hours 
on Fourvieres looking at Lyons, on Notre-Dame de la Garde looking at Marseilles, 
on Sacre Coeur looking at Paris. . . . And, yes, at a certain moment I heard in 
myself something like a tocsin, a strange admonition, and I saw these three mag- 
nificent cities . . . threatened with collapse, with devastation by fire and flood, with 
carnage, with rapid erosion, like forests leveled en bloc. At other times, I saw them 
preyed upon by an obscure, subterranean evil, which undermined the monuments 
and neighborhoods, causing entire sections of the proudest homes to crumble. . . . 
From the standpoint of these promontories, what appears most clearly is the men- 
ace. The agglomeration is menacing; the enormous labor is menacing. For man has 
need of labor, that is clear, but he has other needs as well. . . . He needs to isolate 
himself and to form groups, to cry out and to revolt, to regain cabn and to sub- 
mit. . . . Finally, the need for suicide is in him; and in the society he forms, it is 
stronger than the instinct for self-preservation. Hence, as one looks out over 
Paris, Lyons, or Marseilles, from the heights of Sacre Coeur, the Fourvieres, or 
Notre-Dame de la Garde, what astounds one is that Paris, Lyons, and Marseilles 
have endured." Leon Daudet, Paris vecu, vol. 1, Rive droite (Paris <1930>), 



"In a long series of classical writers from Polybius onward, we read of old, re- 
nowned cities in which the streets have become lines of empty, crumbling shells, 
where the cattle browse in forum and gymnasium, and the amphitheater is a sown 
field, dotted with emergent statues and herms. Rome had in the fifth century of our 
era the population of a village, but its imperial palaces were still habitable." 
Oswald Spengler, LeDeclin tie VOccident <trans. M. Tazerout), vol. 2, pt. 1 (Paris, 



pp. 220-221. 



[C9a,l] 



1933), p. 151. 17 



[C9a,2] 



[Boredom, Eternal Return] 



Must the sun therefore murder all dreams, 
the pale children of my pleasure grounds? 
The days have grown so still and glowering. 
Satisfaction lures me with nebulous visions, 
while dread makes away with my salvation — 
as though I were about to judge my God. 

—Jakob van Hoddis' 

Boredom waits for death. 
— Johann Peter HebeP 

Waiting is life. 
— Victor Hugo 3 



Child with its mother in the panorama. The panorama is presenting the Battle 
of Sedan. The child finds it all very lovely: "Only, it's too bad the sky is so 
dreary." — "That's what the weather is like in war," answers the mother. D Dio- 
ramas D 

Thus, the panoramas too are in fundamental complicity with this world of 
mist, this cloud-world: the light of their images breaks as through curtains of rain. 

[Dl.l] 

"This Paris [of Baudelaire's] is very different from the Paris of Verlaine, which 
itself has already faded. The one is somber and rainy, like a Paris on which the 
image of Lyons has been superimposed; the other is whitish and dusty, like a pastel 
by Raphael. One is suffocating, whereas the other is airy, with new buildings 
scattered in a wasteland, and, not far away, a gate leading to withered arbors." 
Francois Porche, La Vie doidoureuse de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1926), p. 119. 

[Dl,2] 

The mere narcotizing effect which cosmic forces have on a shallow and brittle 
personality is attested in the relation of such a person to one of the highest and 
most genial manifestations of these forces: the weather. Nothing is more charac- 



teristic than that precisely this most intimate and mysterious affair, the working 
of the weather on humans, should have become the theme of their emptiest 
chatter. Nothing bores the ordinary man more than the cosmos. Hence, for him, 
the deepest connection between weather and boredom. How fine the ironic 
overcoming of this attitude in the story of the splenetic Englishman who wakes 
up one morning and shoots himself because it is raining. Or Goethe: how he 
managed to illuminate the weather in his meteorological studies, so that one is 
tempted to say he undertook this work solely in order to be able to integrate even 
the weather into his waking, creative life. [Dl,3] 

Baudelaire as the poet of Spleen de Paris: "One of the central motifs of this poetry 
is, in effect, boredom in the fog, ennui and indiscriminate haze (fog of the cities). 
In a word, it is spleen." Fran§ois Porche, La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baude- 
laire (Paris, 1926), p. 184. [Dl,4] 

In 1903, in Paris, Emile Tardieu brought out a book entitled L'Ennui, in which all 
human activity is shown to be a vain attempt to escape from boredom, but in 
which, at the same time, everything that was, is, and will be appears as the 
inexhaustible nourishment of that feeling. To hear this, you might suppose the 
work to be a mighty monument of literamre — a monument aere perennius in 
honor of the taedium uitae of the Romans.' 1 But it is only the self- satisfied shabby 
scholarship of a new Homais, who reduces all greatness, the heroism of heroes 
and the asceticism of saints, to documents of his own spiritually barren, petty- 
bourgeois discontent. [Dl,5] 

"When the French went into Italy to maintain the rights of the throne of France 
over the duchy of Milan and the kingdom of Naples, they returned home quite 
amazed at the precautions which Italian genius had taken against the excessive 
heat; and, in admiration of the arcaded galleries, they strove to imitate them. The 
rainy climate of Paris, with its celebrated mud and mire, suggested the pillars, 
which were a marvel in the old days. Here, much later on, was the impetus for the 
Place Roy ale. A strange thing! It was in keeping with the same motifs that, under 
Napoleon, the Rue de Rivoli, the Rue de Castiglione, and the famous Rue des 
Colonnes were constructed." The turban came out of Egypt in this manner as well. 
he Diable a Paris (Paris, 1845), vol. 2, pp. 11-12 (Balzac, "Ce qui disparait de 
Paris"). 

How many years separated the war mentioned above from the Napoleonic expe- 
dition to Italy? And where is the Rue des Colonnes located? 5 [Dl,6] 

"Rainshowers have given birth to <many> adventures." f ' Diminishing magical 
power of the rain. Mackintosh. [Dl,7] 

Asdust,raintakesits revenge on the arcades. — Under Louis Philippe, dust settled 
even on the revolutions. When the young due d'Orleans "married the princess of 
Mecklenburg, a great celebration was held at that famous ballroom where the 



first symptoms of the Revolution <of 1830> had broken out. When they came to 
prepare the room for the festivities of the young couple, the people in charge 
found it as the Revolution had left it. On the ground could be seen traces of the 
military banquet — candle ends, broken glasses, champagne corks, trampled 
cockades of the Gardes du Corps, and ceremonial ribbons of officers from the 
Flanders regiment." Karl Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 2, p. 87. A 
historical scene becomes a component of the panopticon. D Diorama D Dust and 
Stifled Perspective 0 [Dl a, 1] 

"He explains that the Rue Grange-Bateliere is particularly dusty, that one gets 
terribly grubby in the Rue Reaumur." Louis Aragon, Le Paysan tie Paris (Paris, 
1926), p. 88. 7 [Dla,2] 

Plush as dust collector. Mystery of dustmotes playing in the sunlight. Dust and 
the "best room." "Shortly after 1840, fully padded furniture appears in France, 
and with it the upholstered style becomes dominant." Max von Boehn, Die Mode 
im XIX. Jahrhundert, vol. 2 (Munich, 1907), p. 131. Other arrangements to stir 
up dust: the trains of dresses. "The true and proper train has recently come back 
into vogue, but in order to avoid the nuisance of having it sweep the streets, the 
wearer is now provided with a small hook and a string so that she can raise and 
carry the train whenever she goes anywhere." Friedrich Theodor Vischer, Mode 
und Zynumus (Stuttgart, 1879), p. 12. D Dust and Stifled Perspective □ [Dla,3] 

The Galerie du Thermometre and the Galeric du Barometre, in the Passage de 
l'Opera. [Dla,4] 

A feuilletonist of the 1840s, writing on the subject of the Parisian weather, has 
determined that Corneille spoke only once (in Le Cid) of the stars, and that Racine 
spoke only once of the sun. He maintains, further, that stars and flowers were first 
discovered for literature hy Chateaubriand in America and thence transplanted to 
Paris. See Victor Mery, "Le Climat de Paris," in Le Diable a Paris <vol. 1 (Paris, 
1845), p. 245>. [Dla,5] 

Concerning some lascivious pictures: "It is no longer the fan that's the thing, hut 
the umbrella — invention worthy of the epoch of the king's national guard. The 
umbrella encouraging amorous fantasies! The umhrella furnishing discreet cover. 
The canopy, the roof, over Robinson's island." John Grand -Carteret, Le 
Decollete et le retrousse (Paris <1910>), vol. 2, p. 56. [Dla,6] 

"Only here," Chirico once said, "is it possihle to paint. The streets have such 
gradations of gray. ..." [Dla,7] 



The Parisian atmosphere reminds Carus" of the way the Neapolitan coastline looks 
when the sirocco hlows. [Dla,8] 



Only someone who has grown up in the big city can appreciate its rainy weather, 
which altogether slyly sets one dreaming back to early childhood. Rain makes 
everything more hidden, makes days not only gray but uniform. From morning 
until evening, one can do the same thing — play chess, read, engage in argu- 
ment — whereas sunshine, by contrast, shades the hours and discountenances the 
dreamer. The latter, therefore, must get around the days of sun with subter- 
fuges — above all, must rise quite early, like the great idlers, the waterfront loafers 
and the vagabonds: the dreamer must be up before the sun itself. In the "Ode to 
Blessed Morning," which some years past he sent to Emmy Hennings, Ferdi- 
nand Hardekopf, the only authentic decadent that Germany has produced, 
confides to the dreamer the best precautions to be taken for sunny days. 9 

[Dla,9] 

"To give to this dust a semblance of consistency, as by soaking it in blood." Louis 
Veuillot, Les Odeurs de Paris (Paris, 1914), p. 12. [Dla.10] 

Other European cities admit colonnades into their urban perspective, Berlin 
setting the style with its city gates. Particularly characteristic is the Halle Gate — 
unforgettable for me on a blue picture postcard representing Belle- Alliance Platz 
by night. The card was transparent, and when you held it up to the light, all its 
windows were illuminated with the very same glow that came from the full moon 
up in the sky. [D2,l] 

"The buildings constructed f or the new Paris revive all the styles. The ensemble is 
not lacking in a certain unity, however, because allthe styles belong to the category 
of the tedious — in fact, the most tedious of the tedious, which is the emphatic and 
the aligned. Line up! Eyes front! It seems that the Amphion of this city is a corpo- 
ral. . . . / He moves great quantities of things — showy, stately, colossal — and all of 
them are tedious. He moves other things, extremely ugly; they too are tedious. / 
These great streets, these great quays, these great houses, these great sewers, their 
physiognomy poorly copied or poorly dreamed — all have an indeiinable something 
indicative of unexpected and irregular fortune. They exude tedium." Veuillot, Les 
Odeurs de Paris <Paris, 1914>, p. 9. □ Haussmann D [D2,2] 

Pelletan describes a visit with a king of the Stock Exchange, a multimillionaire: 
"As I entered the courtyard of the house, a squad of grooms in red vests were 
occupied in rubbing down a half dozen English horses. I ascended a marble stair- 
case hung with a giant gilded chandelier, and encountered in the vestibule a major- 
domo with white cravat and plump calves. He led me into a large glass-roofed 
gallery whose walls were decorated entirely with camellias and hothouse plants. 
Something like suppressed boredom lay in the air; at the very first step, you 
breathed a vapor as of opium. I then passed hetween two rows of perches on which 
parakeets from various countries were roosting. They were red, blue, green, gray, 
yellow, and white; but all seemed to suffer from homesickness. At the extreme end 
of the gallery stood a small table opposite a Renaissance-style fireplace, for at this 



hour the master of the house took his breakfast. . . . After I had waited a quarter 5 
of an hour, he deigned to appear. . . . He yawned, looked sleepy, and seemed 

continually on the point of nodding off; he walked Jike a somnambulist. His fatigue g 

had infected the walls of his mansion. The parakeets stood out Jike his separate ts 

thoughts, each one materiaJized and attached to a pole. . . . " D Interior D <Julius> 3 

Rodenberg, Paris bei Sonnenschein und Lampenlicht (Leipzig, 1867), pp. 104- § 

105. [D2,3] „ 

Fetes franqaises, on Paris en miniature <French Festivities, or Paris in Mini- ^ 
ature>: produced by Rougemont and Gentil at the Theatre des Varietes. The plot g 
has to do with the marriage of Napoleon I to Marie-Louise, and the conversation, 3 
at this point, concerns the planned festivities. "Nevertheless," says one of the 
characters, "the weather is rather uncertain." — Reply: "My friend, you may rest 
assured that this day is the choice of our sovereign." He then strikes up a song that 
begins: 

At his piercing glance, doubt not — 
The future is revealed; 
And when good weather is required, 
We look to his star. 

Cited in Theodore Muret, L'Histoire par le theatre, 1 789-1851 (Paris, 1865), vol. 
l,p.262. [D2,4] 

"This dull, glib sadness ca Jled ennui." Louis Venillot , Les Odeurs de Paris (Paris , 
1914), p. 177. [D2.5] 

"Along with every outfit go a few accessories which show it off to best effect — that 
is to say, which cost lots of money because they are so quickly ruined, in particular 
by every downpour." This apropos of the top hat. D Fashion D F. Th. Vischer, 
Verniinftige Gedanken iiber die jetzige Mode <in Kritische Gdnge, new series, no. 
3 (Stuttgart, 1861)>, p. 124. [D2,6] 

We are bored when we don't know what we are waiting for. That we do know, or 
think we know, is nearly always the expression of our superficiality or inatten- 
tion. Boredom is the threshold to great deeds. — Now, it would be important to 
know: What is the dialectical antithesis to boredom? [D2,7] 

The quite humorous book by Emile Tardieu, L'Ennui (Paris, 1903), whose main 
thesis is that life is purposeless and groundless and that all striving after happi- 
ness and equanimity is futile, names the weather as one among many factors 
supposedly causing boredom. — This work can be considered a sort of breviary 
for the twentieth century. [D2,8] 



Boredom is a warm gray fabric lined on the inside with the most lustrous and 
colorful of silks. In this fabric we wrap ourselves when we dream. We are at 



home then in the arabesques of its lining. But the sleeper looks bored and gray 
within his sheath. And when he later wakes and wants to tell of what he 
dreamed, he conununicates by and large only this boredom. For who would be 
able at one stroke to turn the lining of time to the outside? Yet to narrate dreams 
signifies nothing else. And in no other way can one deal with the arcades — struc- 
tures in which we relive, as in a dream, the life of our parents and grandparents, 
as the embryo in the womb relives the life of animals. Existence in these spaces 
flows then without accent, like the events in dreams. Fl&nerie is the rhythmics of 
this slumber. In 1839, a rage for tortoises overcame Paris. One can well imagine 
the elegant set mimicking the pace of this creature more easily in the arcades than 
on the boulevards. D Flaneur □ [D2a,l] 

Boredom is always the external surface of unconscious events. For this reason, 
it has appeared to the great dandies as a mark of distinction. Ornament and 
boredom. [D2a,2] 

On the double meaning of the term temps 10 in French [D2a,3] 

Factory labor as economic infrastructure of the ideological boredom of the up- 
per classes. "The miserable routine of endless drudgery and toil in which the 
same mechanical process is repeated over and over again is like the labor of 
Sisyphus. The burden of labor, like the rock, always keeps falling back on the 
worn-out laborer." Friedrich Engels, Die Lage der arbeitenden Klasse in England 
<2nd ed. (Leipzig, 1848)>, p. 217; cited in Marx, Kapital (Hamburg, 1922), vol. 1, 
p. 388. 11 ' [D2a 4] 

The feeling of an "incurable imperfection in the very essence of the present" 
(see Les Plairirs et les jours, cited in Gide's homage) 52 was perhaps, for Proust, the 
main motive for getting to know fashionable society in its innermost recesses, 
and it is an underlying motive perhaps for the social gatherings of all human 
beings. [D2a,5] 

On the salons: "All faces evinced the unmistakable traces of boredom, and conver- 
sations were in general scarce, quiet, and serious. Most of these people viewed 
dancing as drudgery, to which you had to submit because it was supposed to be 
good form to dance." Further on, the proposition that "no other city in Europe, 
perhaps, displays such a dearth of satisfied, cheerful, lively faces at its soirees as 
Paris does in its salons. . . . Moreover, in no other society so much as in this one, 
and by reason of fashion no less than real conviction, is the unbearable boredom 
so roundly lamented." "A natural consequence of this is that social affairs are 
marked by silence and reserve, of a sort that at larger gatherings in other cities 
would most certainly be the exception." Ferdinand von Gall, Paris und seine 
Salons, vol. 1 (Oldenburg, 1844), pp. 151-153, 158. [D2a,6] 



The following lines provide an occasion for meditating on timepieces in apart- 
ments: " A certain blitheness, a casual and even careless regard for the hurrying 



time, an indifferent expenditure of the all too quickly passing hours — these are 
qualities that favor the superficial salon life." Ferdinand von Gall, Paris und seine 
Salons, vol. 2 (Oldenburg, 1845), p. 171. [D2a,7] 



Boredom of the ceremonial scenes depicted in historical paintings, and the dolce 
far niente of battle scenes with all that dwells in the smoke of gunpowder. From 
the images d 'Epinal to Manet's Execution of Emperor Maximilian, it is always the 
same — and always a new — fata morgana, always the smoke in which Mogreby 
<?> or the genie from the bottle suddenly emerges before the dreaming, absent- 
minded art lover. D Dream House, Museums D 13 [D2a,8] 

Chess players at the Cafe de la Regence: "It was there that clever players could he 
seen playing with their backs to the chessboard. It was enough for them to hear the 
name of the piece moved by their opponent at each turn to be assured of winning." 
Histoire des cafes de Paris (Paris, 1857), p. 87. [D2a,9] 

"In sum, classic urban art, after presenting its masterpieces, fell into decrepitude 
at the time of the philosophes and the constructors of systems. The end of the 
eighteenth century saw the birth of innumerable projects; the Commission of Art- 
ists brought them into accord with a body of doctrine, and the Empire adapted 
them without creative originality. The flexible and animated classical style was 
succeeded by the systematic and rigid pseudoclassical style. . . . The Arc de Tri- 
omphe echoes the gate of Louis XIV; the Vendome column is copied from Rome; 
the Church of the Madeleine, the Stock Exchange, the Palais-Bourbon are so 
many Greco-Roman temples." Lucien Dubech and Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire tie 
Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 345. D Interior D [D3,l] 

"The First Empire copied the triumphal arches and monuments of the two classi- 
cal centuries. Then there was an attempt to revive and reinvent more remote 
models: the Second Empire imitated the Renaissance, the Gothic, the Pompeian. 
After this came an epoch of vulgarity without style." Dubech and d'Espezel, His- 
toire tie Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 464. D Interior D [D3,2] 

Announcement for a book by Benjamin Gastineau, La Vie en chemin de fer <Life 
on the Railroad): "L* Vie en chemin defer is an entrancing prose poem. It is an 
epic of modern life, always fiery and turbulent, a panorama of gaiety and tears 
passing before us like the dust of the rails before the windows of the coach." By 
Benjamin Gastineau, Paris en rose (Paris, 1866), p. 4. [D3,3] 

Rather than pass the time, one must invite it in. To pass the time (to kill time, 
expel it): the gambler. Time spills from his every pore. — To store time as a 
battery stores energy: the flaneur. Finally, the third type: he who waits. He takes 
in the time and renders it up in altered form — that of expectation. "' [D3,4] 

''This recently deposited limestone — the bed on which Paris rests — readily crum- 
bles into a dust which, like all limestone dust, is very painful to the eyes and lungs. 



A little rain does nothing at all to help, since it is immediately absorbed and the 
surface left dry once again." "Here is the source of the unprepossessing bleached 
gray of the houses, which are all built from the brittle limestone mined near Paris; 
here, too, the origin of the dun-colored slate roofs that blacken with soot over the 
years, as well as the high, wide chimneys which deface even the public build- 
ings, . . . and which in some districts of the old city stand so close together that 
they almost block the view entirely." J. F. Benzenberg, Briefe geschrieben auf 
einer Reise nach Paris (Dortmund, 1805), vol. 1, pp. 112, 111. [D3,5] 

"Engels told me that it was in Paris in 1848, at the Cafe de la Regence (one of the 
earliest centers of the Revolution of 1789), that Marx first laid out for him the 
economic determinism of his materialist theory of history." Paul Laf argue, 
"Persbnliche Erinnerungen an Friedrich Engels," Die neue Zeit, 23, no. 2 
(Stuttgart, 1905), p. 558. [D3,6] 

Boredom — as index to participation in the sleep of the collective. Is this the 
reason it seems distinguished, so that the dandy makes a show of it? [D3,7] 

In 1757 there were only three cafes in Paris. [D3a,l] 

Maxims of Empire painting: "The new artists accept only 'the heroic style, the 
sublime,' and the sublime is attained only with 'the nude and drapery.' . . . Paint- 
ers are supposed to find their inspiration in Plutarch or Homer, Livy or Virgil, 
and, in keeping with David's recommendation to Gros, are supposed to choose . . . 
'subjects known to everyone.' . . . Subjects taken from contemporary life were, 
because of the clothing styles, unworthy of 'great art.'" A. Malet and P. Grillet, 
XIX" siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 158. D Fashion D [D3a,2] 

"Happy the man who is an observer! Boredom, for him, is a word devoid of 
sense." Victor Fournel, Ce qu'on voit dans les rues tie Paris (Paris, 1858), p. 271. 

[D3a,3] 

Boredom began to be experienced in epidemic proportions during the 1840s. 
Lamartine is said to be the first to have given expression to the malady. It plays a 
role in a little story about the famous comic Deburau. A distinguished Paris 
neurologist was consulted one day by a patient whom he had not seen before. 
The patient complained of the typical illness of the times — weariness with life, 
deep depressions, boredom. "There's nothing wrong with you," said the doctor 
after a thorough examination. "Just try to relax — find something to entertain 
you. Go see Deburau some evening, and life will look different to you." "Ah, dear 
sir," answered the patient, "I am Deburau." [D3a,4] 

Return from the Courses de la Marche: "The dust exceeded all expectations. The 
elegant folk back from the races are virtually encrusted; they remind you of Pom- 



peii. They have had to be exhumed with the help of a brush, if not a pickaxe." 
H. de Pene, Paris intime (Paris, 1859), p. 320. [D3a,5] 



"The introduction of the Macadam system for paving the boulevards gave rise to 
numerous caricatures. Cham shows the Parisians blinded by dust, and he pro- 
poses to erect ... a statue with the inscription: 'In recognition of Macadam, from 
the grateful oculists and opticians.' Others represent pedestrians mounted on 
stilts traversing marshes and bogs." Paris sous la Republique de 1848: Exposition 
de la Bibliotheque et des Travaux historiques de la Ville de Paris (1909) [Poete, 
Beaurepaire, Clouzot, Henriot], p. 25. [D3a,6] 

"Only England could have produced dandyism. France is as incapable of it as its 
neighbor is incapable of anything like our . . . lions, who are as eager to please as 
the dandies are disdainful of pleasing. . . . D'Orsay . . . was naturally and passion- 
ately pleasing to everyone, even to men, whereas the dandies pleased only in 
displeasing. . . . Between the lion and the dandy lies an abyss. But how much 
wider the abyss between the dandy and the fop!" Larousse, <Grand Dictionnaire 
universelle> du dix-neuvieme sieclei, vol. 6 (Paris, 1870), p. 63 (article on the 
dandy)>. [D4,l] 

In the second-to-last chapter of his hook Paris: From Its Origins to the Year 3000 
(Paris, 1886), Leo Claretie speaks of a crystal canopy that would slide over the city 
in case of rain. "In 1987" is the title of this chapter. [D4,2] 

With reference to Chodruc-Duclos: "We are haunted by what was perhaps the 
remains of some rugged old citizen of Herculaneum who, having escaped from 
his underground bed, returned to walk again among us, riddled by the thousand 
furies of the volcano, living in the midst of death." Memoires de Chodruc-Duclos, 
ed. J. Arago and Edouard Gouin (Paris, 1843), vol. 1, p. 6 (preface). The first: 
flaneur among the declasses. [D4,3] 

The world in which one is bored — "So what if one is bored! What influence can it 
possibly have?" "What influence! . . . What influence, boredom, with us? But an 
enormous influence, ... a decisive influence! For ennui, you see, the Frenchman 
has a horror verging on veneration. Ennui, in his eyes, is a terrihle god with a 
devoted cult following. It is only in the grip of boredom that the Frenchman can be 
serious." Edouard Pailleron, he Monde oil Von s'ennuie (1881), Act 1, scene 2; in 
Pailleron, Theatre complet, vol. 3 (Paris <1911>), p. 279. [D4,4] 

Michelet "offers a description, full of intelligence and compassion, of the condition 
of the first specialized factory workers around 1840. There were 'true hells of 
boredom' in the spinning and weaving mills: 'Ever, ever, ever, is the unvarying 
word thundering in your ears from the automatic equipment which shakes even 
the floor. One can never get used to it.' Often the remarks of Michelet (for exam- 
ple, on reverie and the rhythms of different occupations) anticipate, on an intui- 



tive level, the experimental analyses of modern psychologists." Georges Fried- 
mann, La Crise du progres (Paris <1936>), p. 244; quotation from Michelet, Le 
Peuple (Paris, 1846), p. 83. 15 [D4,5] 



Faire drogiier, in the sense of fair e attendre, "to keep waiting," belongs to the 
argot of the armies of the Revolution and of the Empire. According to <Ferdinand> 
Brunot, Histoire de la languefranqaise, vol. 9, La Revolution et I'Empire (Paris, 
1937) <p. 997>. [D4,6] 

Parisian Life: "The contemporary scene is preserved, like a specimen imder glass, 
in a letter of recommendation to Metella given by Baron Stanislas de Frascata to 
his friend Baron Gondremarck. The writer, tied to the 'cold country' in which he 
lives, sighs for the champagne suppers, Metella's sky-blue boudoir, the songs, the 
glamor of Paris, the gay and glittering city, throbbing with warmth and life, in 
which differences of station are abolished. Metella reads the letter to the strains of 
Offenbach's music, which surrounds it with a yearning melancholy, as though 
Paris were paradise lost, and at the same time with a halo of bliss as though it were 
the paradise to come; and, as the action continues, one is gi ven the impression that 
the picture given in the letter is beginning to come to life." S. Kracauer, Jacques 
Offenbach and das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 1937), pp. 348-349. 16 

[D4a,l] 

"Romanticism ends in a theory of boredom, the characteristically modern senti- 
ment; that is, it ends in a theory of power, or at least of energy. . . . Romanticism, 
in effect, marks the recognition by the individual of a bundle of instincts which 
society has a strong interest in repressing; but, for the most part, it manifests the 
abdication of the struggle. . . . The Romantic writer . . . turns toward ... a poetry 
of refuge and escape. The effort of Balzac and of Baudelaire is exactly the reverse 
of this and tends to integrate into life the postulates which the Romantics were 
resigned to working with only on the level of art. . . . Their effort is thus linked to 
the myth according to which imagination plays an ever-increasing role in life." 
Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," ISouvelle Revue franqaise, 25, no. 284 
(May 1, 1937), pp. 695, 697. [D4a,2] 

1839: "France is bored" (Lamartine). [D4a,3] 

Baudelaire in his essay on Guys: "Dandyism is a mysterious institution, no less 
peculiar than the duel. It is of great antiquity, Caesar, Catiline, and Alcibiades 
providing us with dazzling examples; and very widespread, Chateaubriand having 
found it in the forests and by the lakes of the New World." Baudelaire, L'Art 
romantique (Paris), p. 91. 17 [D4a,4] 

The Guys chapter in L'Art romantique, on dandies: "They are all representatives 
... of that compelling need, alas only too rare today, for combating and destroying 
triviality. . . . Dandyism is the last spark of heroism amid decadence; and the type 
of dandy discovered by our traveler in North America does nothing to invalidate 



this idea; for how can we be sure that those tribes which we call 'savage' may not in 
fact be the disjecta membra of great extinct civilizations? ... It is hardly neces- 
sary to say that when Monsieur G. sketches one of his dandies on paper, he never 
fails to give him his historical personality — his legendary personality, I would 
venture to say, if we were not speaking of the present time and of things generally 
considered frivolous." Baudelaire, L 'Art romantique, vol. 3, ed. Hachette (Paris), 
pp. 94~95. 1!l [D5.1] 



Baudelaire describes the impression that the consummate dandy must convey: "A 
rich man, perhaps, but more likely an out-of-work Hercules!" Baudelaire, L'Art 
romantique (Paris), p. 96. 19 [D5,2] 



In the essay on Guys, the crowd appears as the supreme remedy for boredom: 
'"Any man,' he said one day, in the course of one of those conversations which he 
illumines with burning glance and evocative gesture, 'any man . . . who can yet be 
bored in the heart of the multitude is a blockhead! A blockhead! And I despise 
him!" Baudelaire, U Art romantique, p. 65. 2 * [DJ5,3] 

Among all the subjects first marked out for lyric expression by Baudelaire, one 
can be put at the forefront: bad weather. [D5,4] 



As attributed to a certain "Carlin," the well-known anecdote about Deburau (the 
actor afflicted with boredom) forms the piece de resistance of the versilied Eloge de 
V ennui <Encomium to Boredom), by Charles Boissiere, of the Philotechnical Soci- 
ety (Paris, 1860). — "Carlin" is the name of a breed of dogs; it comes from the first 
name of an Italian actor who played Harlequin. [D5,5] 



"Monotony feeds on the new." Jean Vaudal, Le Tableau noir; cited in E. Jaloux, 
"L'Esprit des livres," Nouvelles litteraires, November 20, 1937. [D5,6] 

Counterpart to Blanqui's view of the world: the universe is a site of lingering 
catastrophes. [D5,7] 

On L'Eternite par les astres: Blanqui, who, on the threshold of the grave, recog- 
nizes the Fort du laureau as his last place of captivity, writes this book in order to 
open new doors in his dungeon. [D5a,l] 

On L'Eternite par les astres: Blanqui yields to bourgeois society. But he's brought 
to his knees with such force that the throne begins to totter. [D5a,2] 

On L'Eternite' par les astres: The people of the nineteenth century see the stars 
against a sky which is spread out in this text. [D5a,3] 



It may be that the figure of Blanqui surfaces in the "Litanies of Satan": "You who 
give the outlaw that serene and haughty look" (<Baudelaire, Oeuvres,> ed. Le 



Dantec, <vol. 1 [Paris, 1931], > p. 138). 21 In point of fact, Baudelaire did a drawing 
from memory that shows the head of Blanqui. [D5a,4] 



To grasp the significance of nouveaute, it is necessary to go back to novelty in 
everyday life. Why does everyone share the newest thing with someone else? 
Presumably, in order to triumph over the dead. This only where there is nothing 
really new. [D5a,5] 

Blanqui's last work, written during his last imprisonment, has remained en- 
tirely unnoticed up to now, so far as I can see. It is a cosmological speculation. 
Granted it appears, in its opening pages, tasteless and banal. But the awkward 
deliberations of the autodidact are merely the prelude to a speculation that only 
this revolutionary could develop. We may call it theological, insofar as hell is a 
subject of theology. In fact, the cosmic vision of the world which Blanqui lays out, 
taking his data from the mechanistic natural science of bourgeois society, is an 
infernal vision. At the same time, it is a complement of the society to which 
Blanqui, in his old age, was forced to concede victory. What is so unsettling is 
that the presentation is entirely lacking in irony. It is an unconditional surrender, 
but it is simultaneously the most terrible indictment of a society that projects this 
image of the cosmos — understood as an image of itself — across the heavens. 
With its trenchant style, this work displays the most remarkable similarities both 
to Baudelaire and to Nietzsche. (Letter of January 6, 1938, to Horkheimer.) 22 

[D5a,6] 

From Blanqui's UEternite par les astres: "What man does not find himself some- 
times faced with two opposing courses? The one he declines would make for a far 
different life, while leaving him his particular individuality. One leads to misery, 
shame, servitude; the other, to glory and liberty. Here, a lovely woman and happi- 
ness; there, fury and desolation. I am speaking now for hoth sexes. Take your 
chances or your choice — it makes no difference, for you will not escape your 
destiny. But destiny finds no footing in infinity, which knows no alternative and 
makes room for everything. There exists a world where a man follows the road 
that, in the other world, his double did not take. His existence divides in two, a 
globe for each; it bifurcates a second time, a third time, thousands of times. He 
thus possesses fully formed doubles with innumerable variants, which, in multi- 
plying, always represent him as a person but capture only fragments of his destiny. 
All that one might have been in this world, one is in another. Along with one's 
entire existence from birth to death, experienced in a multitude of places, one also 
lives, in yet other places, ten thousand different versions of it." Cited in Gustave 
Geffroy, L 'Enferme (Paris, 1897), p. 399. [D6,l] 

From the conclusion of UEternite par les astres: "What I write at this moment in 
a cell of the Fort du Taureau I have written and shall write throughout all eter- 
nity — at a table, with a pen, clothed as I am now, in circumstances like these." 
Cited in Gustave Geffroy, UEnferme (Paris, 1897), p. 401. Right after this, Get- 



froy writes: "He thus inscribes his fate, at each instant of its duration, across the 
numberless stars. His prison cell is multiplied to infinity. Throughout the entire 
universe, he is the same confined man that he is on this earth, with his rebellious 
strength and his freedom of thought." [D6,2] 

From the conclusion of L'Eternite par les astres: "At the present time, the entire 
life of our planet, from birth to death, with all its crimes and miseries, is being 
lived partly here and partly there, day by day, on myriad kindred planets. What 
we call 'progress' is confined to each particular world, and vanishes with it. Al- 
ways and everywhere in the terrestrial arena, the same drama, the same setting, 
on the same narrow stage — a noisy humanity infatuated with its own grandeur, 
believing itself to be the universe and living in its prison as though in some im- 
mense realm, only to founder at an early date along with its globe, which has borne 
with deepest disdain the burden of human arrogance. The same monotony, the 
same immobility, on other heavenly bodies. The universe repeats itself endlessly 
and paws the ground in place." Cited in Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 
1897), p. 402. [D6a,l] 

Blanqui expressly emphasizes the scientific character of liis theses, which would 
have nothing to do with Fourierist frivolities. "One must concede that each par- 
ticular combination of materials and people 'is hound to be repeated thousands of 
times in order to satisfy the demands of infinity.'" Cited in Geffroy, L'Enferme 
(Paris, 1897), p. 400. [D6a,2] 

Blanqui's misanthropy. "The variations begin with those living creatures that 
have a will of their own, or something like caprices. As soon as human beings enter 
the scene, imagination enters with them. It is not as though they have much effect 
on the planet. . . . Their turbulent activity never seriously disturbs the natural 
progression of physical phenomena, though it disrupts humanity. It is therefore 
advisable to anticipate this subversive influence, which . . . tears apart nations 
and brings down empires. Certainly these brutalities run their course without 
even scratching the terrestrial surface . The disappearance of the disruptors would 
leave no trace of their self-styled sovereign presence, and would suffice to return 
nature to its virtually unmolested virginity." Blanqui, L'Eternite <par les astres 
(Paris, 1872)>, pp. 63-64. [D6a,3] 

Final chapter (8, "Resume") of Blanqui's L'Eternite par les astres: "The entire 
universe is composed of astral systems. To create them, nature has only a hundred 
simple bodies at its disposal. Despite the great advantage it derives from these 
resources, and the innumerable combinations that these resources afford its fe- 
cundity, the result is necessarily a finite number, like that of the elements them- 
selves; and in order to fill its expanse, nature must repeat to infinity each of its 
original combinations or types. I So each heavenly body, whatever it might be, 
exists in infinite number in time and space, not only in one of its aspects but as it is 
at each second of its existence, from birth to death. All the heings distributed 



across its surface, whether large or small, living or inanimate, share the privilege 
of this perpetuity. / The earth is one of these heavenly bodies. Every human being 
is thus eternal at every second of his or her existence. What I write at this moment 
in a cell of the Fort du Taureau I have written and shall write throughout all 
eternity — at a table, with a pen, clothed as I am now, in circumstances like these. 
And thus it is for everyone. / All worlds are engulfed, one after another, in the 
revivifying ilames, to be reborn from them and consumed by them once more — 
monotonous flow of an hourglass that eternally empties and turns itself over. The 
new is always old, and the old always new. / Yet won't those who are interested in 
extraterrestrial life smile at a mathematical deduction which accords them not 
only immortality but eternity? The number of our doubles is infinite in time and 
space. One cannot in good conscience demand anything more. These doubles exist 
in flesh and bone — indeed, in trousers and jacket, in crinoline and chignon. They 
are by no means phantoms; they are the present eternalized. / Here, nonetheless, 
lies a great drawback: there is no progress, alas, hut merely vulgar revisions and 
reprints. Such are the exemplars, the ostensible 'original editions,' of all the 
worlds past and all the worlds to come. Only the chapter on bifurcations is still 
open to hope. Let us not forget: all that one might have been in this world, one is 
in another. I In this world, progress is for our descendants alone. They will have 
more of a chance than we did. All the beautiful things ever seen on our world have, 
of course, already been seen — are being seen at this instant and will always be 
seen — by our descendants, and by their doubles who have preceded and will fol- 
low them. Scions of a finer humanity, they have already mocked and reviled our 
existence on dead worlds, while overtaking and succeeding us. They continue to 
scorn us on the living worlds from which we have disappeared, and their contempt 
for us will have no end on the worlds to come. / They and we, and all the inhabi- 
tants of our planet, are reborn prisoners of the moment and of the place to which 
destiny has assigned us in the series of Earth's avatars. Our continuedlife depends 
on that of the planet. We are merely phenomena that are ancillary to its resurrec- 
tions. Men of the nineteenth century, the hour of our apparitions is fixed forever, 
and always brings us back the very same ones, or at most with a prospect of 
felicitous variants. There is nothing here that will much gratify the yearning for 
improvement. What to do? I have sought not at all my pleasure, but only the truth. 
Here there is neither revelation nor prophecy, but rather a simple deduction on 
the basis of spectral analysis and Laplacian cosmogony. These two discoveries 
make us eternal. Is it a windfall? Let us profit from it. Is it a mystification? Let us 
resign ourselves to it. / . . . / At bottom, this eternity of the human being among 
the stars is a melancholy thing, and this sequestering of kindred worlds by the 
inexorable barrier of space is even more sad. So many identical populations pass 
away without suspecting one another's existence! But no — this has finally been 
discovered, in the nineteenth century. Yet who is inclined to believe it? / Until 
now, the past has, for us, meant barbarism, whereas the future has signified pro- 
gress, science, happiness, illusion! This past, on all our counterpart worlds, has 
seen the most brilliant civilizations disappear without leaving a trace, and they will 
continue to disappear without leaving a trace. The future will witness yet again, on 
billions of worlds, the ignorance, folly, and cruelty of our bygone eras! / At the 



present time, the entire life of our planet, from birth to death, with all its crimes 
and miseries, is being lived partly here and partly there, day by day, on myriad 
kindred planets. What we call 'progress' is confined to each particular world, and 
vanishes with it. Always and everywhere in the terrestrial arena, the same drama, 
the same setting, on the same narrow stage — a noisy humanity infatuated with its 
own grandeur, believing itself to be the universe and living in its prison as though 
in some immense realm, only to founder at an early date along with its globe, which 
has borne with deepest disdain the burden of human arrogance. The same monot- 
ony, the same immobility, on other heavenly bodies. The universe repeats itself 
endlessly and paws the ground in place. In infinity, eternity performs — imper- 
turbably — the same routines." Auguste Blanqui, L'Eternite par les astres: Hy- 
pothese astronomique (Paris, 1872), pp. 73-76. The elided paragraph dwells on 
the "consolation" afforded by the idea that the doubles of loved ones departed 
from Earth are at this very hour keeping our own doubles company on another 
planet. [D7; D7a] 

"Let us think this thought in its most terrible form: existence as it is, without 
meaning or aim, yet recurring inevitably without any finale into nothingness: the 
eternal return [p. 45]. . . . We deny end goals: if existence had one, it would have 
to have been reached." Friedrich Nietzsche, Gesammelte Werke (Munich <1926>), 
vol. 18 {The Will to Power, book 1), p. 46. 23 [D8,l] 

"The doctrine of eternal recurrence would have scholarly presuppositions." 
Nietzsche, Gesammelte Werke (Munich), vol. 18 (The Will to Power, book 1), 
p. 49. 24 [D8,2] 

"The old habit, however, of associating a goal with every event ... is so powerful 
that it recmires an effort for a thinker not to fall into thinking of the very aimless- 
ness of the world as intended. This notion — that the world intentionally avoids a 
goal . . . — must occur to all those who would like to force on the world the capacity 
for eternal novelty [p. 369]. . . . The world, as force, may not be thought of as 
unlimited, for it cannot be so thought of. . . . Thus — the world also lacks the 
capacity for eternal novelty." Nietzsche, Gesammelte Werke, vol. 19 (The Will to 
Power, hook 4), p. 370. 25 [D8,3] 

"The world . . . lives on itself: its excrements are its nourishment." Nietzsche, 
Gesammelte Werke, vol. 19 (The Will to Power, hook 4), p. 3 71. 26 [D8,4] 

The world "without goal, unless the joy of the circle is itself a goal; without will, 
unless a ring feels good will toward itself." Nietzsche, Gesammelte Werke, vol. 19 
(The Will to Power, hook 4), p. 374. 27 [D8,5] 

On eternal recurrence: "The great thought as a Medusa head: all features of the 
world become motionless, a frozen death throe." Friedrich Nietzsche, Gesammelte 
Werke (Munich <1925>), vol. 14 (Unpublished Papers, 1882-1888), p. 188. 

[D8,6] 



"We have created the weightiest thought — now let us create the being for whom it 
is light and pleasing!" Nietzsche, Gesammelte Werke (Munich), vol. 14 (Unpub- 
lished Papers, 1882-1888), p. 179. [D8,7] 



Analogy between Engels and Blanqui: each turned to the natural sciences late in 
life. [D8,8] 

"If the world may be thought of as a certain definite cpiantity of force and as a 
certain definite number of centers of force — and every other representation re- 
mains . . . useless — it follows that, in the great dice game of existence, it must pass 
through a calculable number of combinations. In infinite time, every possible 
combination would at some time or another be realized; more: it would be realized 
an infinite number of times. And since between every combination and its next 
recurrence all other possible combinations would have to take place, ... a circu- 
lar movement of absolutely identical series is thus demonstrated. . . . This concep- 
tion is not simply a mechanistic conception; for if it were that, it would not 
condition an infinite recurrence of identical cases but a final state. Because the 
world has not reached this, mechanistic theory must be considered an imperfect 
and merely provisional hypothesis." Nietzsche, Gesammelte Werke (Munich 
<1926>), vol. 19 (The Will to Power, book 4), p. 373. 2,i [D8a,l] 

In the idea of eternal recurrence, the historicism of the nineteenth century cap- 
sizes. As a result, every tradition, even the most recent, becomes the legacy of 
something that has already run its course in the immemorial night of the ages. 
Tradition henceforth assumes the character of a phantasmagoria in which primal 
history enters the scene in ultramodern get-up. [D8a,2] 

Nietzsche's remark that the doctrine of eternal recurrence does not embrace 
mechanism seems to turn the phenomenon of the perpetuum mobile (for the world 
would be nothing else, according to his teachings) into an argument against the 
mechanistic conception of the world. [D8a,3] 

On the problem of modernity and antiquity. "The existence that has lost its stabil- 
ity and its direction, and the world that has lost its coherence and its significance, 
come together in the will of 'the eternal recurrence of the same' as the attempt to 
repeat — on the peak of modernity, in a symbol — the life which the Greeks lived 
within the living cosmos of the visible world. " Karl Lowith, ISietzsches Philosophic 
der ewigen Wiederkunft des Gleichen (Berlin, 1935), p. 83. [D8a,4] 

LEternite par les astres was written four, at most five, years after Baudelaire's 
death (contemporaneously with the Paris Commune?). — This text shows what 
the stars are doing in that world from which Baudelaire, with good reason, 
excluded them. [D9,l] 

The idea of eternal recurrence conjures the phantasmagoria of happiness from 
the misery of the Founders Years. 29 This doctiine is an attempt to reconcile the 



mutually contradictory tendencies of desire: that of repetition and that of eter- 
nity. Such heroism has its counterpart in the heroism of Baudelaire, who conjures 
the phantasmagoria of modernity from the misery of the Second Empire. 

[D9.2] 

The notion of eternal return appeared at a time when the bourgeoisie no longer 
dared count on the impending development of the system of production which 
they had set going. The thought of Zarathustra and of eternal recurrence belongs 
together with the embroidered motto seen on pillows: "Only a quarter hour." 

[D9,3] 

Critique of the doctrine of eternal recurrence: "As natural scientist . . . , Nietzsche 
is a philosophizing dilettante, and as founder of a religion he is a 'hybrid of 
sickness and will to power'" [preface to Ecce Homo] (p. 83). :!0 "The entire doctrine 
thus seems to be nothing other than an experiment of the human will and an 
attempt to eternalize all our doings and failings, an atheistic surrogate for religion. 
With this accords the homiletic style and the composition of Zarathustra, which 
down to its tiniest details often imitates the New Testament" (pp. 86-87). Karl 
Lowith, Nietzsches Philosophie der eivigen Wiederkunft des Gleichen (Berlin, 
1935). [D9,4] 

There is a handwritten draft in which Caesar instead of Zarathustra is the bearer 
of Nietzsche's tidings (Liwith, p. 73). That is of no little moment. It underscores 
the fact that Nietzsche had an inkling of his doctrine's complicity with imperial- 
ism. [D9,5] 

Lowith calls Nietzsche's "new divination . . . the synthesis of divination from the 
stars with divination from nothingness, which is the last verity in the desert of the 
freedom of individual capacity" (p. 81). [D9,6] 



From "Les Etoiles" <The Stars), by Lamartine: 

Thus these globes of gold, these islands of light, 

Sought instinctively hy the dreaming eye, 

Flash up by the thousands from fugitive shadow, 

Like glittering dust on the tracks of night; 

And the breath of the evening that flies in its wake 

Sends them swirling through the radiance of space. 

All that we seek — love, truth, 

These fruits of the sky, fallen on earth's palate, 

Throughout your brilliant climes we long to see — 

Nourish forever the children of life; 

And one day man perhaps, his destiny fulfilled, 

Will recover in you all the things he has lost. 



<Alphonse de> Lamartine, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1 (Paris, 1850), pp. 221, 224 
(Meditations). This meditation closes with a reverie in which Lamartine is pleased 
to imagine himself transformed into a star among stars. [D9a,l] 



From "L'Infini clans les cieux"<Infinity in the Skies>, by Lamartine: 



Man, nonetheless, that indiscoverable insect, 

Crawling about the hollows of an obscure orb, 

Takes the measure of these fiery planets, 

Assigns them their place in the heavens, 

Thinking, with hands that cannot manage the compass, 

To sift suns like grains of sand. 

And Saturn bedimmed by its distant ring! 

Lamartine, Oeuvres completes (Paris, 1850), pp. 81-82, 82 (Harmonies poetiques 
et religieuses ). [D9a,2] 

Dislocation of hell: "And, finally, what is the place of punishments? All regions of 
the universe in a condition analogous to that of the earth, and still worse." Jean 
Reynaud, Tare et del (Paris, 1854), p. 377. This uncommonly fatuous book pre- 
sents its theological syncretism, its philosophic religieuse, as the new theology. The 
eternity of hell's torments is a heresy: "The ancient trilogy of Earth, Sky, and 
Underworld finds itself reduced, in the end, to the druidical duality of Earth and 
Sky" (p. xiii). [D9a,3] 

Waiting is, in a sense, the lined interior of boredom. (Hebel: boredom waits for 
death.) [D9a,4] 

"I always arrived first. It was my lot to wait for her." J. -J. Rousseau, Les Confes- 
sions, ed. Hilsum (Paris <1931>), vol. 3, p. 115. 31 [D9a,5] 

First intimation of the doctrine of eternal recurrence at the end of the fourth book 
of Die frohliche Wissenschaft: "How, if some day or night a demon were to sneak 
after you into your loneliest loneliness and say to you: 'This life as you now live it 
and have lived it, you will have to live once more and innumerable times more; and 
there will he nothingnewin it, but every pain and every joy and every thought and 
sigh and everything immeasurably small or great in your life must return to you — 
all in the same succession and sequence — even this spider and this moonlight 
between the trees, and even this moment and I myself. The eternal hourglass of 
existence is turned over and over, and you with it, a dust grain of dust. ' Would you 
not . . . curse the demon who spoke thus? Or did you once experience a tremen- 
dous moment when you would have answered him: 'You are a god and never have 
I heard anything more godly!'" 1 * 2 Cited in Lowith, ISietzsches Philosophie der 
ewigen Wiederkunft <des Gleichen (Berlin, 1935)>, p. 57-58. [D10,l] 

Blanqui's theory as a repetition du my the — a fundamental example of the primal 
history of the nineteenth century. In every century, humanity has to be held back 
a grade in school. See the basic formulation of the problem of primal history, of 
Urgeschichte, in N3a,2; also N4,l. [D10,2] 



"Eternal return" is the fundamental form of the urgeschichtlichen, mythic conscious- 
ness. (Mythic because it does not reflect.) [Dl0,3] 



L'Eternite par les astres should he compared with the spirit of '48, as it animates 
Reynaud's Terre et del. With regard to this, Cassou: "On discovering his earthly 
destiny, man feels a sort of vertigo and cannot at first reconcile himself to this 
destiny alone. He must link it up to the greatest possible immensity of time and 
space. Only in the context of its most sweeping breadth will he intoxicate himself 
with heing, with movement, with progress. Only then can he in all confidence and 
in all dignity pronounce the sublime words of Jean Reynaud: 'I have long made a 
practice of the universe. '" "We find nothing in the universe that cannot serve to 
elevate us, and we are genuinely elevated only in taking advantage of what the 
universe offers. The stars themselves , in their sublime hierarchy, are hut a series 
of steps by which we mount progressively toward infinity." <Jean> Cassou, Quar- 
ante-huit <Paris, 1939>, pp. 49, 48. [D10.4] 

Life within the magic circle of eternal return makes for an existence that never 
emerges from the auratic. [D10a,l] 

As life becomes more subject to administrative norms, people must learn to wait 
more. Games of chance possess the great charm of freeing people from having to 
wait. [D10a,2] 

The boulevardier (feuilletonist) has to wait, whereupon he really waits. Hugo's 
"Waiting is life" applies first of all to him. [D10a,3] 

The essence of the mythical event is return. Inscribed as a hidden figure in such 
events is the futility that furrows the brow of some of the heroic personages of 
the underworld (Tantalus, Sisyphus, the Danaides). Tfhnking once again the 
thought of eternal recurrence in the nineteenth century makes Nietzsche the 
figure in whom a mythic fatality is realized anew. (The hell of eternal damnation 
has perhaps impugned the ancient idea of eternal recurrence at its most formida- 
ble point, substituting an eternity of torments for the eternity of a cycle.) 

[D10a,4] 

The belief in progress — in an infinite perfectibility understood as an infinite 
ethical task — and the representation of eternal return are complementary. They 
are the indissoluble antinomies in the face of which the dialectical conception of 
historical time must be developed. In this conception, the idea of eternal return 
appears precisely as that "shallow rationalism" which the belief in progress is 
accused of being, while faith in progress seems no less to belong to the mythic 
mode of thought than does the idea of eternal return. [D10a,5] 



[Haussmannization, Barricade Fighting] 



The flowery realm of decorations, 
The charm of landscape, of architecture, 
And all the effect of scenery rest 
Solely on the law of perspective. 

— Franz Bohle, 'llieater-Catechumus, oder humoristuche Erklirwig ver- 
se/ riedener vorziiglich im Buhnenleben ublicher Fremdworter (Munich), 
p. 74 

I venerate the Beautiful, the Good, and all things great; 
Beautiful nature, on which great art rests — 
How it enchants the ear and charms the eye! 
I love spring in blossom: women and roses. 

— Confession d'un lion devenu vieux (Baron Haussmann, 1888) 

The breathless capitals 

Opened themselves to the cannon. 

— Pierre Dupont, Le Chant des etudiants (Paris, 1849) 



The characteristic and, properly speaking, sole decoration of the Biedemieier 
room "was afforded by the curtains, which — extremely refined and compounded 
preferably from several fabrics of different colors — were furnished by the uphol- 
sterer. For nearly a whole century afterward, interior decoration amounts, in 
theory, to providing instructions to upholsterers for the tasteful arrangement of 
draperies." Max von Boehn, Die Mode im XIX. Jahrhundert , vol. 2 (Munich, 
1907), p. 130. This is something like the interior's perspective on the window. 

[El.l] 

Perspectival character of the crinoline, with its manifold flounces. At least five to 
six petticoats were worn underneath. [El, 2] 

Peep-show rhetoric, perspectival figures of speech: "Incidentally, the figure of 
greatest effect, employed by all French orators from their podiums and tribunes, 
sounds pretty much like this: 'There was in the Middle Ages a book which concen- 



trated the spirit of the times as a mirror concentrates the rays of the sun, a book 
which towered up in majestic glory to the heavens like a primeval forest, a hook in 
which ... a hook for which . . . finally, a hook which . . . hy which and through 
which [the most long-winded specifications follow] ... a book ... a book . . . this 
book was the Divine Comedy.'' Loud applause." Karl Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris 
(Leipzig, 1842), vol. 2 , pp. 151-152. [El,3] 

Strategic basis for the perspectival articulation of the city. A contemporary seek- 
ing to justify the construction of large thoroughfares under Napoleon III speaks 
of them as "unfavorable 'to the habitual tactic of local insurrection."' Marcel 
Poete, Une vie de cite (Paris, 1925), p. 469. "Open up this area of continual 
disturbances." Baron Haussmann, in a memorandum calling for the extension of 
the Boulevard de Strasbourg to Chatelet. Emile de Labedolliere, Le Nouveau 
Paris, p. 52. But even earlier than this: "They are paving Paris with wood in 
order to deprive the Revolution of building materials. Out of wooden blocks 
there will be no more barricades constructed." Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris, vol. 1 , 
pp. 60-61. What this means can be gathered from the fact that in 1830 there 
were 6,000 barricades. [El,4] 

"In Paris . . . they are fleeing the arcades, so long in fashion, as one flees stale air. 
The arcades are dying. From time to time, one of them is closed, like the sad 
Passage Delorme, where, in the wilderness of the gallery, female figures of a taw- 
dry antiquity used to dance along the shopfronts, as in the scenes from Pompeii 
interpreted hy Guerinon Hersent. The arcade that for the Parisian was a sort of 
salon-walk, where you strolled and smoked and chatted, is now nothing more than 
a species of refuge which you think of when it rains. Some of the arcades maintain 
a certain attraction on account of this or that famed establishment still to be found 
there. But it is the tenant's renown that prolongs the excitement, or rather the 
death agony, of the place. The arcades have one great defect for modern Parisians: 
you could say that, just like certain paintings done from stifled perspectives, 
they're in need of air." Jules Claretie, La Vie a Paris, 1895 (Paris, 1896), pp. 47ff. 

[El,5] 

The radical transformation of Paris was carried out under Napoleon III mainly 
along the axis running through the Place de la Concorde and the Hotel de Ville. 
It may be that the Franco-Prussian War of 1870 was a blessing for the architec- 
tural image of Paris, seeing that Napoleon III had intended to alter whole dis- 
tricts of the city. Stahr thus writes, in 1857, that one had to make haste now to see 
the old Paris, for "the new ruler, it seems, has a mind to leave but little of it 
standing." < Adolf Stahr, Nach Jiinfjahren, vol. 1 (Oldenburg, 1857), p. 36. > 

[El,6] 



The stifled perspective is plush for the eyes. Plush is the material of the age of 
Louis Philippe. D Dust and Rain D [El, 7] 



Regarding "stifled perspectives": '"You can come to the panorama to do drawings 
from nature,' David told his students." Emile de LabedoJliere, he Nouveau Paris 
(Paris), p. 31. [El,8] 



Among the most impressive testimonies to the age's unquenchable thirst for 
perspectives is the perspective painted on the stage of the opera in the Musee 
Grevin. (This arrangement should be described.) [El,9] 

"Having, as they do, the appearance of walling-in a massive eternity, Hauss- 
mann's urban works are a wholly appropriate representation of the absolute gov- 
erning principles of the Empire: repression of every individual formation, every 
organic self-development, 'fundamental hatred of all individuality."' J. J. Honeg- 
ger, Grundsteine einer allgemeinen Kulturgeschichte der neuesten Zeit, vol. 5 
(Leipzig, 1874), p. 326. But Louis Philippe was already known as the Roi-Macon 
< Mason King>. [Ela.l] 

On the transformation of the city under Napoleon III: "The subsoil has been 
profoundly disturbed by the installation of gas mains and the construction of 
sewers. . . . Never hefore in Paris have so many building supplies been moved 
about, so many houses and apartment buildings constructed, so many monuments 
restored or erected, so many facades dressed with cut stone. ... It was necessary 
to act quickly and to take advantage of properties acquired at a very high cost: a 
double stimulus. In Paris, shallow basements have taken the place of deep cellars, 
which required excavations a full story deep. The use of concrete and cement, 
which was first made possible by the discoveries of Vicat, has contributed both to 
the reasonable cost and to the boldness of these substructions." E. Levasseur, 
Ilistoire des classes ouvrieres et de Vindustrie en France de 1789 a 1870, vol. 2 
(Paris, 1904), pp. 528-529. D Arcades D [Ela,2] 

"Paris, as we find it in the period following the Revolution of 1848, was about to 
become uninhabitable. Its population had been greatly enlarged and unsettled by 
the incessant activity of the railroad (whose rails extended further each day and 
linked up with those of neighboring countries), and now this population was suffo- 
cating in the narrow, tangled, putrid alleyways in which it was forcibly confined." 
<Maxime> Du Camp, Paris, vol. 6 <Paris, 1875>, p. 253. [Ela,3] 

Expropriations under Haussmann. "Certain barristers made a specialty of this 
kind of case. . . . They defended real estate expropriations, industrial expropria- 
tions, tenant expropriations, sentimental expropriations; they spoke of a roof for 
fathers and a cradle for infants. . . . 'How did you make your fortune?' a parvenu 
was asked: 'I've been expropriated,' came the response. ... A new industry was 
created, which, on the pretext of taking in hand the interests of the expropriated, 
dM not shrink from the basest fraud. ... It sought out small manufacturers and 
equipped them with detailed account books, false inventories, and fake merchan- 



dise that often was nothing more than logs wrapped in paper. It would even pro- 
cure groups of customers to fill the shop on the day the jury made their prescribed 
visit. It fabricated leases — exaggerated, extended, antedated— on sheets of old 
paper bearing official stamps, which it had managed to procure. It would have 
stores newly repainted and staffed with improvised clerks, whom it paid three 
francs a day. It was a sort of midnight gang that rifled the till of the city govern- 
ment." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 6, pp. 255-256. [Ela,4] 

Engels' critique of barricade tactics: "The most that the insurrection can actually 
implement in the way of tactical practice is the correct construction and defense of 
a single barricade." But "even in the classic period of street fighting, . . . the 
barricade produced more of a moral than a material effect. It was a means of 
shaking the steadfastness of the military. If it held on until this was attained, then 
victory was won; if not, there was defeat." Friedrich Engels, Introduction to Karl 
Marx, Die Klassenkmmpfe in Frankreich, 1848-1850 (Berlin, 1895), pp. 13, 14. 1 

[Ela,5] 

No less retrograde than the tactic of civil war was the ideology of class struggle. 
Marx on the February Revolution: "In the ideas of the proletarians, . . . who 
confused the finance aristocracy with the bourgeoisie in general; in the imagina- 
tion of good old republicans, who denied the very existence of classes or, at most, 
admitted them as a result of the constitutional monarchy; in the hypocritical 
phrases of the segments of the bourgeoisie up till now excluded from power — in 
all these, the rule of the bourgeoisie was abolished with the introduction of the 
republic. All the royalists were transformed into republicans, and all the million- 
aires of Paris into workers. The phrase which corresponded to this imagined 
liquidation of class relations was fraternite." Karl Marx, Die Klassenkcimfife in 
Frankreich (Berlin, 1895), p. 29. 2 [Ela,6] 

In a manifesto in which he proclaims the right to work, Lamartine speaks of 
the "advent of the industrial Christ." Journal des economistes, 10 (1845), p. 212 , :i 
D Industry D [Ela,7] 

"The reconstruction of the city . , . , by obliging the workers to find lodgings in 
outlying arrondissements, has dissolved the bonds of neighborhood that pre- 
viously united them with the bourgeoisie." Levasseur, Histoire des classes ou- 
vrieres et de Vindustrie en France, vol. 2 <Paris, 1904.>, p. 775. [E2,l] 

"Paris is musty and close." Louis Veuillot, Les Odeurs de Paris (Paris, 1914), 
p. 14. [E2,2] 



Parks, squares, and puhlic gardens first installed under Napoleon III. Between 
forty and fifty were created. [E2,3] 



Construction in the Faubourg Saint-Antoine: Boulevard Prince Eugene, Boule- 
vard Mazas, and Boulevard Richard Lenoir, as strategic axes. [E2,4] 



The heightened expression of the dull perspective is what you get in panoramas. 
It signifies nothing to their detriment but only illuminates their style when Max 
Brod writes: "Interiors of churches, or of palaces or art galleries, do not make for 
beautiful panorama images. They come across as flat, dead, obstructed." <Max 
Brod,> liber die Schonheit hasslicher Bilder (Leipzig, 1913), p. 63. An accurate 
description, except that it is precisely in this way that the panoramas serve the 
epoch's will to expression. □ Dioramas G [E2,5] 

On June 9, 1810, at the Theatre de la Rue de Chartres, a play by Barre, Radet, 
and Desf ontaines is given its first performance. Entitled Monsieur Durelief, ou Les 
Embellissements de Paris, it presents a series of rapid scenes as in a review, show- 
ing the changes wrought in Parisian life by Napoleon I. "An architect who is the 
bearer of one of those significant names formerly in use on the stage, M. Durelief, 
has fabricated a miniature Paris, which he intends to exhibit. Having labored 
thirty years on this project, he thinks he has finished it at last; but suddenly a 
'creative spirit' appears, and proceeds to prune and sharpen the work, creating 
the need for incessant corrections and additions: 



This vast and wealthy capital, 
Adorned with his fine monuments, 
I keep as a cardboard model in my room, 
And I follow the embellishments. 
But always I find myself in arrears — 
By my word, it's getting desperate: 
Even in miniature, one cannot do 
What that man does full-scale." 



The play ends with an apotheosis of Marie-Louise, whose portrait the goddess of 
the city of Paris holds, as her loveliest ornament, high above the heads of the 
audience. Cited in Theodore Muret, L'Histoire par le themtre, 1789-1851 (Paris, 



Use of omnibuses to build barricades. The horses were unharnessed, the passen- 
gers were put off, the vehicle was turned over, and the flag was fastened to an axle. 



On the expropriations: "Before the war, there was talk of demolishing the Passage 
du Caire in order to put a circus on the site. Today there's a shortage of funds, and 
the proprietors (all forty-four of them) are hard to please. Let's hope there's a 
shortage of funds for a long time to come and the proprietors become still harder to 
please. The hideous gap of the Boulevard Haussmann at the corner of the Rue 
Drouot, with all the charming houses it has brought down, should content us for 
the moment." Paul Leautaud, "Vieux Paris," Mercure de France (October 15, 



1865), vol. l,pp. 253-254. 



[E2,6] 



[E2,7] 



1927), p. 503. 



[E2.8] 



Haussmann and the Chamber of Deputies: "One day, in an excess of terror, they 
accused him of having created a desert in the very center of Paris! That desert was 
the Boulevard Sebastopol." Le Corbusier, Urbanisme (Paris <1925>), p. 149.' 1 

[E2.9] 

Very important: "Haussmann's Equipment" — illustrations in Le Corbusier, Ur- 
banisme, p. 150. 5 Various shovels, picks, wheelbarrows, and so on. [E2,U] 

Jules Ferry, Comptesfantastiques d'Haussmann <Paris, 1868>. Pamphlet directed 
against Haussmann's autocratic management of finances. [E2,ll] 

"The avenues [Haussmann] cut were entirely arbitrary: they were not based on 
strict deductions of the science of town planning. The measures he took were of a 
financial and military character." Le Corbusier, Urbanisme (Paris), p. 250/' 

[E2a,l] 

"... the impossibility of obtaining permission to photograph an adorable wax- 
work figure in the Musee Grevin, on the left, between the hall of modern political 
celebrities and the hall at the rear of which, behind a curtain, is shown 'an 
evening at the theater': it is a woman fastening her garter in the shadows, and is 
the only statue I know of with eyes — the eyes of provocation." Andre Breton, 
Nadja (Paris, 1928), pp. 199-200. 7 Very striking fusion of the motif of fashion 
with that of perspective. D Fashion D [E2a,2] 

To the characterization of this suffocating world of plush belongs the description 
of the role of flowers in interiors. After the fall of Napoleon Bonaparte, an 
attempt was made at first to return to rococo. But this was hardly feasible. The 
European situation after the Restoration was the following: "Typically, Corin- 
thian columns are used almost everywhere. . . . This pomp has something 
oppressive about it, just as the restless bustle accompanying the city's trans- 
formation robs natives and foreigners alike of both breathing space and space for 
reflection. . . . Every stone bears the mark of despotic power, and all the ostenta- 
tion makes the atmosphere, in the literal sense of the words, heavy and close. . . . 
One grows dizzy with this novel display; one chokes and anxiously gasps for 
breath. The feverish haste with which the work of several centuries is accom- 
plished in a decade weighs on the senses." Die Grenzboten,]oumcd of politics and 
literature (<Leipzig,> 1861), semester 2, vol. 3, pp. 143-144 ("Die Pariser Kunst- 
ausstellung von 1861 und die bildende Kunst des 19"" Jahrhunderts in Frank- 
reich"). The author probably Julius Meyer. These remarks are aimed at 
Haussmann. D Plush □ [E2a,3] 

Remarkable propensity for structures that convey and connect — as, of course, 
the arcades do. And this connecting or mediating function has a literal and spatial 
as well as a figurative and stylistic bearing. One thinks, above all, of the way the 
Louvre links up with the Tuileries. "The imperial govermnent has built practi- 



cally no new independent buildings, aside from barracks. But, then, it has been 
all the more zealous in completing the barely begun and half -finished works of 
previous centuries. ... At first sight, it seems strange that the government has 
made it its business to preserve existing monuments. . . . The government, how- 
ever, does not aim to pass over the people like a storm; it wants to engrave itself 
lastingly in their existence. . . . Let the old houses collapse, so long as the old 
monuments remain." Die Grenzboten (1861), semester 2, vol. 3, pp. 139-141 
("Die Pariser Kunstausstellung von 1861"). □ Dream House D [E2a,4] 

Connection of the railroads to Haussmann's projects. From a memorandum by 
Haussmann: "The railway stations are today the principal entryways into Paris. 
To put them in communication with the city center by means of large arteries is a 
necessity of theiirst order." E. de Labedolliere, Histoire du nouveau Paris, p. 32. 
This applies in particular to the so-called Boulevard du Centre: the extension of 
the Boulevard de Strasbourg to Chatelet by what is today the Boulevard Sebas- 
topol. [E2a,5] 

Opening of the Boulevard Sebastopollike the unveiling of a monument. "At 2:30 in 
the afternoon, at the moment the [imperial] procession was approaching from the 
Boulevard Saint-Denis, an immense scrim, which had masked the entrance to the 
Boulevard de Sevastopol from this side, was drawn like a curtain. This drapery 
had been hung between two Moorish columns, on the pedestals of which were 
figures representing the arts, the sciences, industry, and commerce." Labedol- 
liere, Histoire du nouveau Paris, p. 32. [E2a,6] 

Haussmann's predilection for perspectives, for long open vistas, represents an 
attempt to dictate art forms to technology (the technology of city planning). This 
always results in kitsch. [E2a,7] 

Haussmann on himself: "Born in Paris, in the old Faubourg du Roule, which is 
joined now to the Fauhourg Saint-Honore at the point where the Boulevard 
Haussmann ends and the Avenue de Friedland begins; student at the College 
Henri IV and the old Lycee Napoleon, which is situated on the Montagne Sainte- 
Genevieve, where I later studied at the law school and, at odd moments, at the 
Sorbonne and the College de France. I took walks, moreover, through all parts of 
the city, and I was often absorbed, during my youth, in protracted contemplation 
of a map of this many-sided Paris , a map which revealed to me weaknesses in the 
network of public streets. / Despite my long residence in the provinces (no less 
than twenty-two years!), I have managed to retain my memories and impressions 
of former times, so that, when I was suddenly called upon, some days ago, to direct 
the transformation of the Capital of the Empire (over which the Tuileries and City 
Hall are currently at loggerheads), I felt myself, in fact, better prepared than one 
might have supposed to fulfill this complex mission, and ready, in any case, to 
enter boldly into the heart of the problems to be resolved." Memoires du Baron 
Haussmann, vol. 2 (Paris, 1890), pp. 34—35. Demonstrates very well how it is 



often distance alone that, intervening hetween plan and work, enahles the plan to 
he realized. [E3,l] 



How Baron Haussmann advanced upon the dream city that Paris still was in 1860. 
From an article of 1882: "There were hills in Paris, even on the Boulevards. . . . 
We lacked water, markets, light in those remote times — scarcely thirty years ago. 
Some gas jets had begun to appear — that is all. We lacked Churches, too. A num- 
ber of the more ancient ones, including the most beautiful, were serving as stores, 
barracks, or offices. The others were wholly concealed by a growth of tumbledown 
hovels. Still, the Railroads existed; each day in Paris they discharged torrents of 
travelers who could neither lodge in our houses nor roam through our tortuous 
streets. / . . . He [Haussmann] demolished some qumrtiers — one might say, entire 
towns. There were cries that he would hring on the plague; he tolerated such 
outcries and gave us instead — through his well-considered architectural break- 
throughs — air, health, and life. Sometimes it was a Street that he created, some- 
times an Avenue or Boulevard; sometimes it was a Square, a Public Garden, a 
Promenade. He established Hospitals, Schools, Campuses. He gave us a whole 
river. He dug magnificent sewers." Memoires du Baron Haussmann, vol. 2 (Paris, 
1890), pp. x, xi. Extracts from an article by Jules Simon in he Gaulois, May 1882. 
The numerous capital letters appear to he a characteristic orthographic interven- 
tion hy Haussmann. [E3,2] 

From a conversation, later on, between Napoleon III and Haussmann. Napoleon: 
"How right you are to maintain that the People of France, who are generally 
thought so fickle, are at bottom the most routine people in the world!" "Yes, Sire, 
though I would add: with regard to things! ... I myself am charged with the 
double offense of having unduly disturbed the Population of Paris by boulever- 
sant, by 'boulevardizing,' almost all the quartiers of the city, and of having al- 
lowed it to keep the same profile in the same setting for too long." Memoires du 
Baron Haussmann, vol. 2 (Paris, 1890), pp. 18-19. <Compare E9,l.> [E3,3] 

From a discussion between Napoleon III and Haussmann on the latter's assuming 
his duties in Paris. Haussmann: "I would add that, although the population of 
Paris as a whole was sympathetic to the plans for the transformation — or, as it was 
called then, the 'embellishment' — of the Capital of the Empire, the greater part of 
the bourgeoisie and almost all the aristocracy were hostile." Why though? 
Memoires du Baron Haussmann, vol. 2 (Paris, 1890), p. 52. [E3,4] 

"I left Munich on the sixth of Fehruary, spent ten days in archives in northern 
Italy, and arrived in Rome under a pouring rain. I found the Haussmannization of 
the city well advanced." Briefe von Ferdinand Gregorovius an den Staatssekretar 
Hermann von Thile, ed. Hermann von Petersdorff (Berlin, 1894), p. 110. 

[E3,5] 

Nickname for Haussmann: "Pasha Osman." He himself makes the comment, with 
reference to his providing the city with spring water: "I must build myself an 



?3 aqueduct." Another bon mot: "My titles? ... I have been named artist-demoli- 

^ tionist." [E3,6] 

bp 

■S 

"In 1864, defending the arbitrary character of the city's government, [Hauss- 
k mann] adopted a tone of rare boldness. 'For its inhabitants, Paris is either a great 

'g marketplace of consumption, a giant stockyard of labor, an arena of ambitions, or 

g simply a rendezvous of pleasures. It is not their home. . . .' Then the statement 

^ that polemicists will attach to his reputation like a stone: 'If there are a great many 

.g who come to find an honorable situation in the city, . . . there are also others, 

veritable nomads in the midst of Parisian society, who are absolutely destitute of 
U municipal sentiment.' And, recalling that everything — railroads, administrative 

£ networks, branches of national activity — eventually leads to Paris, he concluded: 

jjS Tt is thus not surprising that in France, country of aggregation and of order, the 

capital almost always has been placed, with regard to its communal organization, 
under an emergency regime."' Georges Laronze, he Baron Haussmann (Paris, 
1932), pp. 172-173. Speech of November 28, 1864. [E3a,l] 

Political cartoons represented "Paris as bounded by the wharves of the English 
Channel and those of the south of France, by the highways of the Rhine valley and 
of Spain; or, according to Cham, as the city which gets for Christmas the houses in 
the suburbs! . . . One caricature shows the Rue de Rivoli stretching to the hori- 
zon." Georges Laronze, he Baron Haussmann (Paris, 1932), pp. 148-149. 

[E3a,2] 

"New arteries . . . would link the center of Paris with the railroad stations, reduc- 
ing congestion in the latter. Others would take part in the battle against poverty 
and revolution; they would be strategic routes, breaking through the sources of 
contagion and the centers of unrest, and permitting, with the influx of better air, 
the arrival of an armed force, hence connecting, like the Rue de Turbigo, the 
government with the barracks, and, like the Boulevard du Prince-Eugene, the 
barracks with the suburbs." Georges Laronze, he Baron Haussmann, pp. 137— 
138. [E3a,3] 

"An independent deputy, the comte de Durfort-Civrac, . . . objected that these 
new boulevards, which were supposed to aid in repressing disturbances, would 
also make them more likely because, in order to construct them, it was necessary 
to assemble a mass of workers." Georges Laronze, he Baron Haussmann, p. 133. 

[E3a,4] 

Haussmann celebrates the birthday — or name day (April 5)? — of Napoleon III. 
"Running the length of the Champs-Elysees, from the Place de la Concorde to the 
Etoile, there was a scalloped border of 124 sculpted arcades reposing on a double 
row of columns. Tt is a reminiscence,' he Constitutionnel sought to explain, 'of 
Cordova and the Alhambra. ' . . . The visual effect was thus very striking, with the 
swirling branches of the fifty-six great streetlights along the avenue, the reflections 



from the surfaces below, and the flickering of flames from the five hundred thou- 
sand jets of gas." Georges Laronze, he Baron Haussmann, p. 119. D Flaneur Q 

[E3a,5] 

On Haussmann: "Paris now ceased forever to be a conglomeration of small towns, 
each with its distinctive physiognomy and way of life — where one was born and 
where one died, where one never dreamed of leaving home, and where nature and 
history had collaborated to realize variety in unity. The centralization, the mega- 
lomania, created an artificial city, in which the Parisian (and this is the crucial 
point) no longer feels at home; and so, as soon as he can, he leaves. And thus a new 
need arises: the craving for holidays in the country. On the other hand, in the city 
deserted by its inhabitants, the foreigner arrives on a specified date — the start of 
'the season.' The Parisian, in his own town, which has become a cosmopolitan 
crossroads, now seems like one deracinated." Lucien Dubech and Pierre 
d'Espezel, (Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926),> pp. 427-428. [E3a,6] 

"Most of the time, it was necessary to resort to a jury of expropriations. Its mem- 
bers, cavilers from birth, adversaries on principle, showed themselves generous 
with funds which, as they supposed, cost them nothing and from which each was 
hoping one day to benefit. In a single session where the city might offer a million 
and a half, the jury would demand from it nearly three million. The beautiful field 
of speculation! Who wouldn't want to do his part? There were barristers specializ- 
ing in the matter; there were agencies guaranteeing (in return for a commission) a 
serious profit; there were operations for simulating a lease or a commercial trans- 
action, and for doctoring account books." Georges Laronze, Le Baron Hauss- 
mann (Paris, 1932), pp. 190-191. [E4,l] 

From the Lamentations raised against Haussmann: "You will live to see the city 
grown desolate and bleak. / Your glory will be great in the eyes of future archae- 
ologists, but your last days will be sad and bitter. I ... I And the heart of the city 
will slowly freeze. I ... I Lizards, stray dogs, and rats will rule over this mag- 
nificence. The injuries inflicted by time will accumulate on the gold of the balco- 
nies, and on the painted murals. I .... I And loneliness, the tedious goddess of 
deserts, will come and settle upon this new empire you will have made for her by so 
formidable a labor." Paris desert: Lamentations d'un Jeremie haussmannise 
<(Paris, 1868), pp. 7-8>. [E4,2] 

"The problem of the embellishment — or, more precisely, of the regeneration — of 
Paris arose about 1852. Until then, it had been possible to leave this great city in 
its state of dilapidation, but now it became necessary to deal with the matter. This 
was because, by a fortuitous coincidence, France and the countries around it were 
completing the construction of those long lines of railroad tracks which crisscross 
Europe." Paris nouveau juge par un jlaneur (Paris, 1868), p. 8. [E4,3] 

"I read, in a book which enjoyed great success last year, that the streets of Paris 
had been enlarged to permit ideas to circulate and, above all, regiments to pass. 



This malicious statement (which comes in the wake of others) is the equivalent of 
saying that Paris has been strategically embellished. Well, so be it. ... I do not 
hesitate to proclaim that strategic embellishments are the most admirable of em- 
bellishments." Paris nouveau juge par un flaneur (Paris, 1868), pp. 21-22. 

[E4,4] 

"They say that the city of Paris has condemned itself to forced labor, in the sense 
that, if it ever ceased its various construction projects and forced its numerous 
workers to return to their respective provinces, from that day forward its toll 
revenues would diminish considerably." Paris nouveau juge par un flaneur 
(Paris, 1868), p. 23. [E4,5] 

Proposal to link the right to vote for the Paris municipal council to proof of at least 
fifteen months' residence in the city. Part of the reasoning: "If you examine the 
matter closely, you will soon realize that it is precisely during the agitated, adven- 
turous, and turbulent period of his existence , . . that a man resides in Paris." 
Paris nouveau juge par un flimeur, p. 33. [E4,6] 

"It is understood that the follies of the city promote reason of state." Jules Ferry, 
Comptes fantastiques d'Haussmann (Paris, 1868), p. 6. [E4,7] 

"The concessions, worth hundreds of millions, are apportioned sub rosa. The 
principle of public adjudication is set aside, as is that of cooperation." Ferry, 
Comptes fantastiques, p. 11. [E4a,l] 

Ferry analyzes (pp. 21-23 of his Comptes fantastiques) the judgments rendered in 
cases of expropriation — judgments which, in the course of Haussmann's projects, 
took on a tendency unfavorable to the city. Following a decree of December 27, 
1858 — which Ferry regards as merely the normalization of an ancient right, but 
which Haussmann regards as the establishment of a new right — the city was de- 
nied the possibility of expropriating in their entirety properties which lay in the 
way of the new arteries. The expropriation was limited to those portions immedi- 
ately required for the construction of the streets. In this way, the city lost out on 
the profits it had hoped to make from the sale of remaining plots of land, whose 
value was driven up by the construction. [E4a,2] 

From Haussmann's memorandum of December 11, 1867: "There is a deep-rooted 
and long-standing conviction that the last two methods of acquisition did not by 
any means automatically terminate the tenants' occupancy. But the Court of Ap- 
peals has ruled, in various decisions spanning the period 1861-1865, that, vis-a- 
vis the city, the judgment requiring the consent of the seller, taken together with 
the private contract, has the effect ipso jure of dissolving the lease of the tenants. 
As a consequence, many of the tenants doing business in houses acquired for 
the city by mutual agreement . . . have acted to annul their leases before the date 
of expropriation and have demanded to be immediately evicted and compen- 



sated. . . . The city . . . has ha d to pay enormous, unforeseen indemnities." Cited 
in Ferry, Comptes fantastiques, p. 24. [E4a,3] 



"Louis-Napoleon Bonaparte felt his vocation to be the securing of the 'bourgeois 
order.' . . . Industry and trade, the affairs of the bourgeoisie, were to prosper. An 
immense number of concessions were given out to the railroads; public subven- 
tions were granted; credit was organized. The wealth and luxury of the bourgeois 
world increased. The 1850s saw the . . . beginnings of the Parisian department 
stores: Au Bon Marche, Au Louvre, La Belle Jardiniere. The turnover at Au Bon 
Marche — which, in 1852, was only 450,000 francs — rose, by 1869, to 21 million." 
Gisela Freund, "Entwicklung der Photographie in Frankreich" [manuscript]. 8 

[E4a,4] 

Around 1830: "The Rue Saint-Denis and Rue Saint-Martin are the principal ar- 
teries in this quartier, a godsend for rioters. The war for the streets was deplorably 
easy there. The rebels had only to rip up the pavement and then pile up various 
objects: furniture from neighboring houses, crates from the grocer's, and, if need 
be, a passing omnibus, which they would stop, gallantly helping the ladies to 
disembark. In order to gain these Thermopylaes, it was thus necessary to demolish 
the houses. The line infantry would advance into the open, heavily armed and well 
equipped. A handful of insurgents behind a barricade could hold an entire regi- 
ment at bay." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), pp. 365-366. 

[E4a,5] 

Under Louis Philippe; "In the interior of the city, the governing idea seems to have 
been to rearrange the strategic lines that played so important a role in the historic 
days of July: the line of the quays, the line of the boulevards. . . . Finally, at the 
center, the Rue de Rambuteau, grandsire of the Haussmannized thoroughfares: it 
presented, at Les Halles, in the Marais, a breadth that seemed considerable 
then — thirteen meters." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), 
pp. 382-383. [E5,l] 

Saint-Simonians: "During the cholera epidemic of 1832, they called for the demo- 
lition of crowded, closely built neighborhoods, which was excellent. But they de- 
manded that Louis Philippe and Lafayette set the pace with shovel and pickaxe; 
the workers were supposed to work under the direction of uniformed Polytechni- 
cians, and to the sound of military music; the most beautiful women in Paris were 
to come and offer their encouragement." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, 
pp. 392-393. D Industrial Development D Secret Societies D [E5,2] 

"All efforts notwithstanding, the newly constructed buildings did not suffice to 
accommodate the expropriated. The result was a grave crisis in rents: they dou- 
bled. In 1851, the population was 1,053,000; after the annexation in 1866, it 
increased to more than 1,825»000. At the end of the Second Empire, Paris had 
60,000 houses and 612,000 apartments, of which 481,000 were rented f or less than 



500 francs. Buildings grew taller, but ceilings became lower. The government had 
to pass a law requiring a minimum ceiling height of 2 meters 60 centimeters." 
Dubech and d'Espezel, pp. 420-421. [E5,3] 



"Scandalous fortunes were amassed by those in the prefect's inner circle. A legend 
attributes to Madame Haussmann a naive remark in a salon: Tt is curious that 
every time we buy a house, a boulevard passes through it.'" Dubech and 



"At the end of his wide avenues, Haussmann constructs — for the sake of perspec- 
tive — various monuments: a Tribunal of Commerce at the end of the Boulevard 
Sevastopol, and bastard churches in all styles, such as Saint-Augustin (where 
Baltard copies Byzantine structures), a new Saint-Ambroise, and Saint-Francois- 
Xavier. At the end of the Chaussee d'Antin, the Church of La Trinite imitates the 
Renaissance style. Sainte-Clotilde imitates the Gothic style, while Saint- Jean de 
Belleville, Saint-Marcel, Saint-Bernard, and Saint-Eugene are all products of iron 
construction and the hideous embrasures of false Gothic. . . . Though Haussmann 
had some good ideas, he realized them badly. He depended heavily on perspec- 
tives, for example, and took care to put monuments at the end of his rectilinear 
streets. The idea was excellent, but what awkwardness in the execution! The 
Boulevard de Strasbourg frames the enormous flight of steps at the Tribunal of 
Commerce, and the Avenue de l'Opera provides a vista of the porter's lodge at the 
Louvre." Dubech and d'Espezel, pp. 416, 425. [E5,5] 

"Above all, the Paris of the Second Empire is cruelly lacking in beauty. Not one of 
these great straight avenues has the charm of the magnificent curve of the Rue 
Saint-Antoine, and no house of this period affords anything like the tender de- 
lights of an eighteenth-century facade, with its rigorous and graceful orders. Fi- 
nally, this illogical city is structurally weak. Already the architects are saying that 
the Opera is cracked, that La Trinite is crumbling, and that Saint-Augustin is 



"In Haussmann's time, there was a need for new roads, but not necessarily for the 
new roads he built. . . . The most striking feature of his projects is their scorn for 
historical experience. . . . Haussmann lays out an artificial city, like something in 
Canada or the Far West. . . . His thoroughfares rarely possess any utility and 
never any beauty. Most are astonishing architectural intrusions that hegin just 
about anywhere and end up nowhere, while destroying everything in their path; to 
curve them would have been enough to preserve precious old buildings. . . . We 
must not accuse him of too much Haussmannization, but of too little. In spite of 
the megalomania of his theories, his vision was, in practice, not large enough. 
Nowhere did he anticipate the future. His vistas lack amplitude; his streets are too 
narrow. His conception is grandiose but not grand; neither is it just or provident." 



d'Espezel, p. 423. 



[E5.4] 



britde." Dubech and d'Espezel, p. 427. 



[E5,6] 



Dubech and d'Espezel, pp. 424-426. 



[E5a,l] 



"If we had to define, in a word, the new spirit that was coming to preside over the 
transformation of Paris, we would have to call it megalomania. The emperor and 
his prefect aim to make Paris the capital not only of France but of the world. . . . 
Cosmopolitan Paris will he the result." Duhech and d'Espezel, p. 404. [E5a,2] 

"Three facts will dominate the project to transform Paris: a strategic fact that 
demands, at the city's center, the break-up of the ancient capital and a new ar- 
rangement of the hub of Paris; a natural fact, the push westward; and a fact 
entailed by the systematic megalomania of the idea of annexing the suburbs." 
Duhech and d'Espezel, p. 406. [E5a,3] 

Jules Ferry, opponent of Haussmann, at the news of the surrender at Sedan: "The 
armies of the emperor are defeated!" Cited in Dubech and d'Espezel, p. 430. 

[E5a,4] 

"Until Haussmann, Paris had been a city of moderate dimensions, where it was 
logical to let experience rule; it developed according to pressures dictated by na- 
ture, according to laws inscribed in the facts of history and in the face of the 
landscape. Brusquely, Haussmann accelerates and crowns the work of revolution- 
ary and imperial centralization. . . . An artificial and inordinate creation, 
emerged like Minerva from the head of Jupiter, born amid the abuse of the spirit of 
authority, this work had need of the spirit of authority in order to develop accord- 
ing to its own logic. No sooner was it born, than it was cut off at the source. . . . 
Here was the paradoxical spectacle of a construction artificial in principle but 
abandoned in fact only to rules imposed by nature." Dubech and d'Espezel, 
pp. 443^44. [E5a,5] 

"Haussmann cut immense gaps right through Paris, and carried out the most 
startling operations. It seemed as if Paris would never endure his surgical experi- 
ments. And yet, today, does it not exist merely as a consequence of his daring and 
courage? His equipment was meager; the shovel, the pick, the wagon, the trowel, 
the wheelbarrow — the simple tools of every race . . . hefore the mechanical age. 
His achievement was truly admirable." Le Corbusier, Urbanisme (Paris <1925>), 
p. 149.' J [E5a,6] 

The mighty seek to secure their position with blood (police), with cunning (fash- 
ion), with magic (pomp). [E5a,7] 

The widening of the streets, it was said, was necessitated by the crinoline. [E5a,8] 

Manner of life among the masons, who often came from Marche or Limousin. (The 
description dates from 1851 — before the great influx of this social stratum in the 
wake of Haussmann's works.) "The masons, whose way of life is more distinct than 
that of other emigrants, belong ordinarily to families of small farmer-householders 
established in the rural townships and provided with individual pasturage, allow- 



Tools used by Haussmaiin's workers. Artist unknown. See E5a,6. 

ing for the maintenance of at least one dairy cow per family. . . . During his so- 
journ in Paris, the mason lives with all the economy that is consistent with an 
unmarried situation; his provisions . . . come to approximately thirty-eight francs 
a month; his lodgings . . . cost only eight francs a month. Workers of the same 
profession ordinarily share a room, where they sleep two by two. This chamber is 
barely heated; it is lit by means of a tallow candle, which the lodgers take turns in 
buying. . . . Having reached the age of forty-five, the mason . . . henceforth re- 
mains on his property to cultivate it liimself. . . . This way of life forms a marked 
contrast to that of the sedentary population; nevertheless, after some years, it 
tends visibly to alter. . . . Thus, during his stay in Paris, the young mason shows 
himself more willing than before to contract illegitimate unions, to spend money on 
clothing, and to frequent various gathering places and places of pleasure. As he 
becomes less capable of elevating himself to the condition of proprietor, he finds 



himself more susceptible to feelings of jealousy toward the upper classes of society. 
This depravity, to which he succumbs far from the influence of his family, . . . and 
in which the love of gain develops without the counterweight of religious sentiment, 
leads sometimes to the sort of coarseness found . . . among the sedentary workers 
of Paris." F. Le Play, Les Ouvriers europeens (Paris, 1855), p. 277. [E6,l] 

On the politics of finance under Napoleon III: "The financial policy of the Empire 
has been consistently guided by two main concerns: to compensate for the in- 
sufficiency of normal revenues and to multiply the construction projects that keep 
capital moving and provide jobs. The trick was to borrow without opening the 
ledger and to undertake a great number of works without immediately overloading 
the budget. . . . Thus, in the space of seventeen years, the imperial government has 
had to procure for itself, in addition to the natural products of taxation, a sum of 
four billion three hundred twenty-two million francs. With the gathering of this 
enormous subsidy, whether by direct loans (on which it was necessary to pay 
interest) or by putting to work available capital (on which revenues were lost), 
there has resulted from these extra-budgetary operations an increase of debts and 
liabilities for the state." Andre Cochut, Operations et tendances financieres du 
Second Empire (Paris, 1868), pp. 13, 20-21. [E6,2] 

Already at the time of the June Insurrection, "they broke through walls so as to be 
able to pass from one house to another." Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der 
franz6sischenArbeiter-Associationen(Hamburg, 1864), vol. 2, p. 287. [E6,3] 

"In 1852, . . . being a Bonapartist opened up all the pleasures in the world. It was 
these people who, humanly speaking, were the most avid for life; therefore, they 
conquered. Zola was agitated and amazed at this thought; suddenly, here was the 
formula for those men who, each in his own way and from his own vantage point, 
had founded an empire. Speculation (chief of the vital functions of this empire), 
unbridled self -enrichment, pleasure seeking — all three were glorified theatrically 
in exhibitions and festivals, which by degrees took on the aspect of a Babylon. And 
along with these brilliant masses taking part in the apotheosis, close behind 
them, . . . the obscure masses who were awaking and moving to the forefront." 
Heinrich Mann, Geist und Tat (Berlin, 1931), p. 167 ("Zola"). [E6a,l] 

Around 1837, Dupin, in the Galerie Colbert, issued a series of colored lithographs 
(signed Pruche <?>, 1837) representing the theatergoing public in various postures. 
A few plates in the series: Spectators in High Spirits, Spectators Applauding, 
Spectators Intriguing, Spectators Accompanying the Orchestra, Attentive Spec- 
tators, Weeping Spectators. [E6a,2] 

Beginnings of city planning in Boissel's Discours contre les servitudes publiques 
<Discourse against Public Easements> of 1786: "Since the natural community of 
goods has been broken up and distributed, every individual property owner has 
built as he pleases. In the past, the social order would not have suffered from this 



trend, but now that urban construction proceeds at the entire discretion, and to 
the entire advantage, of the owners, there is no longer any consideration at all for 
the security, health, or comfort of society. This is particularly the case in Paris, 
where churches and palaces, boulevards and walkways are built in abundance, 
while housing for the great majority of inhabitants is relegated to the shadows. 
Boissel describes in graphic detail the filth and perils that threaten the poor pedes- 
trian on the streets of Paris. . . . To this miserable arrangement of streets he now 
turns his attention, and he effectively solves the problem by proposing to trans- 
form the ground floors of houses into airy arcades, which would offer protection 
from the vehicles and the weather. He thus anticipates Bellamy's idea of 'one 
umbrella over all heads.'" 10 C. Hugo, "Der Sozialismus in Frankreich wahrend 
der grossen Revolution," part 1, "Francois Boissel," Die neue Zeit, 11, no. 1 
(Stuttgart, 1893), p. 813. [E6a,3] 

On Napoleon III around 1851: "He is a socialist with Proudhon, a reformer with 
Girardin, a reactionary with Thiers, a moderate republican with the supporters of 
the republic, and an enemy of democracy and revolution with the legitimists. He 
promises everything and subscribes to everything." Friedrich Szarvady, Paris, 
vol. 1 [the only volume to appear] (Berlin, 1852), p. 401. [E6a,4] 

"Louis Napoleon, . . . this representative of the lumpenproletariat and of every 
type of fraud and knavery, slowly draws ... all power to himself. . . . With glad 
elan, Daumier reemerges. He creates the brilliant figure of Ratapoil, an audacious 
pimp and charlatan. And this ragged marauder, with his murderous cudgel for- 
ever concealed behind his back, becomes for Daumier the embodiment of the 
downfallen Bonapartist idea." Fritz Th. Schulte, "Honore Daumier," Die neue 
Zeit, 32, no. 1 (Stuttgart <1913-1914>), p. 835. [E7,l] 

With reference to the transformation of the city: "Nothing less than a compass is 
required, if you are to find your way." Jacques Fabien, Paris en songe (Paris, 
1863), p. 7. [E7,2] 

The following remark, by way of contrast, throws an interesting light on Paris: 
"Where money, industry, and riches are present, there are facades; the houses 
have assumed faces that serve to indicate the differences in class. In London, more 
than elsewhere, the distances are pitilessly marked. ... A proliferation of ledges, 
bow windows, cornices, columns — so many columns! The column is nobility." 
FernandLeger, "Londres," Lit, 5, no. 23 (June 7, 1935), p. 18. [E7,3] 

The distant native of the age-old Marais 

Rarely sets foot in the Quartier d'Antin, 

And from Menilmontant, calm lookout point, 

He surveys Paris as from a height; 

His thrift and frugality won't let him budge 

From this spot where the gods have dropped him. 



[Leon Gozlan,] Le Triomphe des omnibus: Poeme hero'i-comique (Paris, 1828), 
p. 7. [E7,4] 



"Hundreds of thousands of families, who work in the center of the capital, sleep in 
the outskirts. This movement resembles the tide: in the morning the workers 
stream into Paris, and in the evening the same wave of people flows out. It is a 
melancholy image. ... I would add . . . that it is the lirst time that humanity has 
assisted in a spectacle so dispiriting for the people." A. Granveau, L'Ouvrier 
devant la societe (Paris, 1868), p. 63 ("Les Logements a Paris"). [E7,5] 

July 27, 1830: "Outside the school, men in shirtsleeves were already rolling casks; 
others brought in paving stones and sand by wheelbarrow; a barricade was be- 
gun." G. Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), p. 142. [E7a,l] 

1833: "The plan to surround Paris with a belt of fortifications . . . aroused pas- 
sionate interest at this time. It was argued that detached forts would be useless for 
the defense of the interior, and threatening only to the population. The opposition 
was universal. . . . Steps were taken to organize a large popular demonstration on 
July 27. Informed of these preparations . . . , the government abandoned the proj- 
ect. . . . Nevertheless, ... on the day of the review, numerous cries of 'Down with 
the forts!' echoed in advance of the procession: i A bas les forts detaches! A bas les 
bastilles!'" G. Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), pp. 214-215. 
The government ministers took their revenge with the affair of the "Gunpowder 
Conspiracy." 11 [E7a,2] 

Engravings from 1830 show how the insurgents threw all sorts of furniture down 
on the troops from out of the windows. This was a feature especially of the battles 
on the Rue Saint- Antoine. Cabinet des Estampes. [E7a,3] 

Rattier invokes a dream Paris, which he calls "the false Paris" — as distinguished 
from the real one: "the purer Paris, . . . the truer Paris, . . . the Paris that doesn't 
exist" (p. 99): "It is grand, at this moment in time, to set well-guarded Babylon 
walzing in the arms of Memphis, and to set London dancing in the embrace of 
Peking. . . . One of these fine mornings, France will have a rude awakening when it 
realizes it is confined within the walls of Lutetia, of which she forms but a cross- 
roads. . . . The next day, Italy, Spain, Denmark, and Russia will be incorporated 
by decree into the Parisian municipality; three days later, the city gates will be 
pushed back to Novaya Zemlya and to the Land of the Papuans. Paris will be the 
world, and the universe will be Paris. The savannahs and the pampas and the 
Black Forest will compose the public gardens of this greater Lutetia; the Alps, the 
Pyrenees, the Andes, the Himalayas will be the Aventine and the scenic bills of this 
incomparable city — knolls of pleasure, study, or solitude. But all this is still noth- 
ing: Paris will mount to the skies and scale the firmament of firmaments; it will an- 
nex, as suburbs, the planets and the stars." Paul-Ernest de Rattier, Paris n 'existe 



pas (Paris, 1857), pp. 47-49. These early fantasies should he compared with the 
satires on Haussmann published ten years later. [E7a,4] 

% Already Rattier assigns to his false Paris "a unique and simple system of traffic 

tS control that links geometrically, and in parallel lines, all the avenues of this false 

^ Paris to a single center, the Tuileries — this being an admirable method of defense 

| and of maintaining order." Paul-Ernest de Rattier, Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 

« 1857), p. 55. [E8,l] 

§ 

"The false Paris has the good taste to recognize that nothing is more useless or 
moreimmoral than a riot. Though it may gain the upper hand for a few minutes, it 
is quelled for several centuries. Instead of occupying itself with politics, ... it is 
peaceably absorbed in questions of economy. ... A prince who is against fraud 
[J ... knows . . . very well . . . that gold, a great deal of gold, is required ... on our 

planet to build a stepladder to the sky." Paul-Ernest de Rattier, Paris n 'existe pas 
(Paris, 1857), pp. 62, 66-67. [E8,2] 



July Revolution: "Fewer were felled ... by bullets than by other projectiles. The 
large squares of granite with which Paris is paved were dragged up to the top fl oors 
of the houses and dropped on the heads of the soldiers. " Friedrich von Raumer, 
Briefe aus Paris und Frankreich im Jahre 1830 (Leipzig <1831>), vol. 2, p. 145. 

[E8,3] 



Report of a third party, in Raumer's book: "I saw a group of Swiss, who had been 
kneeling and begging for their lives, killed amid jeering, and I saw the stripped 
bodies of the gravely wounded thrown contemptuously onto the barricades to 
make them higher." Friedrich von Raumer, Briefe aus Paris und Frankreich in 
Jahre 1830 (Leipzig, 1831), vol. 2, p. 256. [E8,4] 



Descriptions of barricades of 1830: Ch. Motte, Revolutions tie Paris, 1830: Plan 
figuratif'des barricades ainsi que des positions et mouvements des citoyens armes 
et des trou pes (published by the author <Paris, 1830>). [E8,5] 



Caption for a plate in Les Ruines de Paris: 100 photographies, by A. Liebert 
(Paris, 1871), vol. 1: "Barricade of the Federates, Constructed by Gaillard 
Senior." [E8,6] 



"When the emperor . . . enters his capital, the fifty horses of his carriage are at a 
gallop; between the Gateway of Paris and his Louvre, he pauses under two thou- 
sand triumphal arches and passes before fifty colossi erected in his image. . . . And 
this idolizing of the sovereign by his subjects causes some dismay among the latter- 
day pious, to whom it occurs that their idols were never recipients of such hom- 
age. 1 ' Arsene Houssaye, "Le Paris futur"; in (Dumas, Gautier, Houssaye, and 
others,> Paris et les Parisiens au XIX" siecle (Paris, 1856), p. 469. [E8,7] 



High daily allowances for the deputies under Napoleon TIL 



[E8,8] 



"The 4,054 barricades of the 'Three Glorious Days' were made from . . . 
8,125,000 paving stones." Le Romantisme [Exhibition catalogue (at the Bih- 
liotheque Nationale), January 22-March 10, 1930; explanatory note to no. 635, 
A. de Grandsagne and M. Plant, Revolution de 1830, plan des combats de Paris], 

[E8,9] 

"When, last year, thousands of workers marched through the streets of the capital 
in a menacing calm; when, at a time of peace and commercial prosperity, they 
interrupted the course of their work . . . , the government's first responsibility was 
to take forceful measures against a disturbance that was all the more dangerous 
for not knowing itself as such." L. de Carne, "Publications democratiques et 
communistes," Revue des deux mondes, 27 (Paris, 1841), p. 746. [E8a,l] 

"What fate does the present movement of society have in store for architecture? 
Let us look around us. . . . Ever more monuments, ever more palaces. On all sides 
rise up great stone blocks, and everything tends toward the solid, the heavy, the 
vulgar; the genius of art is imprisoned by such an imperative, in which the imagi- 
nation no longer has any room to play, can no longer be great, but rather is 
exhausted in representing . . . the tiered orders on fagades and in decorating 
friezes and the borders of window frames. In the interior, one finds still more of 
the court, more of the peristyle, . . . with the little rooms more and more confined, 
the studies and boudoirs exiled to the niches under the spiral staircase, . . . where 
they constitute pigeonholes for people; it is the cellular system applied to the 
family group. The problem becomes how, in a given space, to make use of the least 
amount of materials and to pack in the greatest number of people (while isolating 
them all from one another). . . . This tendency — indeed, this fait accompli — is the 
result of progressive subdividing. ... In a word, each for himself and each by 
himself has increasingly become the guiding principle of society, while the public 
wealth ... is scattered and squandered. Such are the causes, at this moment in 
France, for the demise of monumentally scaled residential architecture. For pri- 
vate habitations, as they become narrower, are able to sustain but a narrow art. 
The artist, lacking space, is reduced to making statuettes and easel paintings. . . . 
In the presently emerging conditions of society, art is driven into an impasse where 
it suffocates for lack of air. It is already suffering the effects of this new norm of 
limited artistic facility, which certain souls, supposedly advanced, seem to regard 
as the goal of their philanthropy. ... In architecture, we do not make art for art's 
sake; we do not raise monuments for the sole purpose of occupying the imagination 
of architects and furnishing work for painters and sculptors. What is necessary, 
then, is to apply the monumental mode of construction ... to all the elements of 
human dwelling. We must make it possihle not only for a few privileged individuals 
but for all people to live in palaces. And if one is to occupy a palace, one should 
properly live there together with others, in bonds of association .... Where art is 
concerned, therefore, it is only the association of all elements of the community 



that can launch the immense development we are outlining." D. Laverdant, De la 
mission de Vart et du role des artistes: Salon de 1845 (Paris, 1845), from the 
offices of La. Phalange, pp. 13-15. [E8a,2] 



"For some time now, . . . there have heen efforts to discover where this word 
boulevard could have come from. As for me, I am finally satisfied as to the etymol- 
ogy: it is merely a variant of the word bouleversement <commotion, upheavals" 
Edouard Fournier, Chroniques et legendes des rues de Paris (Paris, 1864), p. 16. 

[E9,l] 

"Monsieur Picard, attorney for the city of Paris, . . . has energetically defended 
the interests of the city. What he has heen presented with in the way of antedated 
leases at the moment of expropriations, what he has had to contend with in order 
to nullify fantastic titles and reduce the claims of the expropriated is almost he- 
yond helief. A collier for the city one day placed before him a lease, antedated 
some years, on paper hearing official stamps. The simple man helieved himself 
already in possession of a weighty sum for his shanty. But he did not know that this 
paper bore, in its watermark, the date of its manufacture. The attorney raised it to 
the light; it had been made three years after the date stamped." Auguste Lepage, 
Les Cafes politiques et litteraires de Paris (Paris <1874>), p. 89. [E9>2] 

Observations on the physiology of the uprising, in Niepovie's book: "Nothing has 
changed on the surface, hut there is something unusual in the air. The cabriolets, 
omnibuses, and hackney coaches seem to have quickened their pace, and the 
drivers keep turning their heads as though someone were after them. There are 
more groups standing around than is usual. . . . People look at one another with 
anxious interrogation in their eyes. Perhaps this urchin or this worker hastening 
by will know something; and he is stopped and questioned. What's going on? ask 
the passersby. And the urchin or the worker responds, with a smile of utter indif- 
ference, 'They are gathering at the Place de la Bastille,' or 'They are gathering 
near the Temple' (or somewhere else), and then hurries off to wherever they are 
gathering. . . . On the sites themselves, the scene is pretty much as he said: the 
population has massed to such an extent that you can hardly get through. The 
pavement is strewn with sheets of paper. What is it? A proclamation of he 
Moniteur republicain, which dates from the Year 50 of the one and indivisible 
French republic. People have gathered, you are told, to discuss the proclamation. 
The shops have not yet been closed; shots have not yet been fired. . . . Now then, 
behold the saviors. . . . All of a sudden, the holy battalion has halted before a 
house, and, just as quicldy, the third-story windows are thrown open and packets 
of cartridges rain down. . . . The distribution is accomplished in the twinkling of 
an eye and, with that, the battalion is dispatched on the run — a portion to one 
side, a portion to the other. . . . Vehicles are no longer passing on the streets; there 
is less noise. And that's why one can hear, if I do not deceive myself . . . Listen, 
they're beating the drum. It is the call to arms. The authorities are roused." 



Gaetan Niepovie, Etudes physiologiques sur les grandes metro poles de I'Europe 
occidental: Paris (Paris, 1840), pp. 201-204, 206. [E9,3] 



A barricade: "At the entrance to a narrow street, an omnibus lies with its four 
wheels in the air. A pile of crates, which had served perhaps to hold oranges, rises 
to the right and to the left, and behind them, between the rims of the wheels and 
the openings, small fires are blazing, continually emitting small blue clouds of 
smoke." Gaetan Niepovie, Etudes physiologiques sur les grandes metropoles de 
I'Europe occidentale: Paris (Paris, 1840), p. 207. [E9a,l] 

1868: death of Meryon. [E9a,2] 

"It has been said that Charlet and Raffet by themselves prepared the way for the 
Second Empire in France." Henri Bouchot, La Lithographie (Paris <1895>), 
pp. 8-9. [E9a,3] 

From Arago's letter on the encirclement of Paris (Associations Nationales en 
Faveur de la Presse Patriote) [extract from he National of July 21, 1833]: "All the 
projected forts, with regard to distance, would give access to the most populous 
districts of the capital" (p. 5). "Two of the forts, those of Italie and Passy, would be 
enough to set fire to all sections of Paris on the Left Bank of the Seine; . . . two 
others, Fort Philippe and Fort Saint-Chaumont, could cover the rest of the city 
with their circle of fire" (p. 8). [E9a,4] 

In Le Figaro of April 27, <1936,> Gaetan Sanvoisin cites this remark by Maxime 
Du Camp: "If there were only Parisians in Paris, there would be no revolutionar- 
ies." Compare with similar statements by Haussmann. [E9a,5] 

"A one-act play by Engels, written in haste and performed in September 1847 at 
the German Alliance for Workers in Brussels, already represented a battle on the 
barricades in a German petty state — a battle which ended with the abdication of 
the prince and the proclamation of a republic." Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, 
vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner Friihzeit, 2nd ed. (Berlin <1933>), p. 269. 12 

[E9a,6] 

During the suppression of the June Insurrection, artillery came to be used for the 
first time in street fighting. [E9a,7] 

Haussmann's attitude toward the Parisian population recalls that of Guizot to- 
ward the proletariat. Guizot characterized the proletariat as the "external popula- 
tion." (See Georgi Plekhanov, "Uber die Anfange der Lehre vom Klassenkampf," 
Die neue £eit, 21, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1903), p. 285. [E9a,8] 

The building of barricades appears in Fourier as an example of "nonsalaried but 
impassioned work." [E9a,9] 



The practice of bamboozling the municipal expropriations committee became an 
industry under Haussmann. "Small traders and shopkeepers . . . would be sup- 
plied with false books and inventories, and, when necessary, their premises would 
(it turned out) be newly redecorated and refurnished; while during the visit of the 
committee to the premises, a constant stream of unexpected customers would pour 
in." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach und das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 
1937), p. 254. 13 [E10.1] 



City planning in Fourier: "Each avenue, each street, should open onto some par- 
ticular prospect, whether the countryside or a public monument. The custom of 
civilized nations — where streets come to an end with a wall, as in fortresses, or 
with a heap of earth, as in the newer sections of Marseilles- — should be avoided. 
Every house that faces the street should be obliged to have ornamentation of the 
first class, in the gardens as well as on the buildings." Charles Fourier, Cites 
ouvrieres: Des modifications a introduire dans V architecture des villes <extracts 
from La Phalange> (Paris, 1849), p. 27. [E10.2] 



In connection with Haussmann: "The mythic structure develops rapidly: opposing 
the vast city is the legendary hero destined to conquer it. In fact, there are hardly 
any works of the period that do not contain some invocation inspired by the 
capital, and the celebrated cry of Rastignac" is of unusual simplicity. . . . The 
heroes of Ponson du Terrail are more lyrical in their inevitable apostrophe to the 
'modern Babylon' (this is always the name used for Paris). See, for example, that 
... of the . . . false Sir Williams in the novel he Club des Valets de coeur: '0 Paris, 
Paris! You are the true Babylon, the true arena of intellectual hattle, the true 
temple where evil has its cult and its priesthood; and I am sure that the breath of 
the archangel of shadows passes over you eternally, like the winds over the infinity 
of the seas. 0 motionless tempest, ocean of stone, I want to be that dark eagle 
which, amid your angry waves, disdains the lightning and sleeps cheerfully on the 
thunderstorm, his great wing extended. I want to be the genius of evil, the vulture 
of the seas, of this most perfidious and tempestuous sea on which the human 
passions toss and unfurl.'" Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle 
Revuefrancaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), p. 686. [E10.3] 



Blanquist revolt of May 12, 1839: "He had waited a week to profit from the instal- 
lation of new troops unfamiliar with the maze of Paris streets. The thousand men 
on whom he counted for the engagement were supposed to assemble hetween the 
Rue Saint-Denis and the Rue Saint-Martin. . . . Under a magnificent sun ... to- 
ward three in the afternoon, in the midst of a hurgeoning Sunday crowd, the 
revolutionary hand all at once musters and appears. Immediately a vacuum, a 
silence, sets in around them." Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, 
pp. 81-82. [ElOa.l] 



In 1830, rope was used, among other things, to harricade the streets. 



[E10a,2] 



Rastignac's famous challenge (cited in Messac (he "Detective Novel" et I'influence 
tie la pensee scientifique [Paris, 1929]>, pp. 419—420): "Eugene, now alone, 
walked a few steps to the topmost part of the graveyard. He saw Paris, spread 
windingly along the two banks of the Seine. Lights were beginning to twinkle. His 
gaze fixed itself almost avidly on the space between the column in the Place 
Vendome and the cupola of Les Invalides. There lived the world into which he had 
wished to penetrate. He fastened on the murmurous hive a look that seemed al- 
ready to be sucking the honey from it, and uttered these words: 'Now I'm ready 
for you!'" 15 [E10a,3] 

To the theses of Haussmann corresponds the tahulation of Du Camp, according to 
which the population of Paris during the Commune was 75.5 percent foreigners 
and provincials. [E10a,4] 

For the Blanquist putsch of August 14, 1870, 300 revolvers and 400 heavy dag- 
gers were made available. It is characteristic of the street fighting in this period 
that the workers preferred daggers to revolvers. [E10a,5] 

Kauf mann places attheheadof his chapter entitled "Architectural Autonomy" an 
epigraph from he Contrat social: "a form ... in which each is united with all, yet 
obeys only himself and remains as free as before. — Such is the fundamental prob- 
lem that the social contract solves" (p. 42). 16 In this chapter (p. 43): "[Ledoux] 
justifies the separation of the buildings in the second project for Chaux with the 
words: 'Return to principle. . . . Consult nature; man is everywhere isolated' (Ar- 
chitecture, p. 70). The feudal principle of prerevolutionary society . . . can have 
no further validity now. . . . The autonomously grounded form of every object 
makes all striving after theatrical effect appear senseless. ... At a stroke, it would 
seem, . . . the Baroque art of the prospect disappears from sight." E. Kaufmann, 
Von Ledoux bis he Corbusier (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933), p. 43. [E10a,6] 

"The renunciation of the picturesque has its architectural equivalent in the refusal 
of all prospect-art. A highly significant symptom is the sudden diffusion of the 
silhouette. . . . Steel engraving and wood engraving supplant the mezzotint, which 
had Hourished in the Baroque age. ... To anticipate our conclusions, ... let it be 
said that the autonomous principle retains its efficacy ... in the first decades after 
the architecture of the Revolution, becoming ever weaker with the passage of time 
until, in the later decades of the nineteenth century, it is virtually unrecogniz- 
able." Emil Kaufmann, Von hedoux bis he Corbusier (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933), 
pp. 47, 50. [El 1,1] 

Napoleon Gaillard: builder of the mighty barricade that, in 1871, stood at the 
entrance of the Rue Royale and the Rue de Rivoli. [El 1 ,2] 



"At the corner of the Rue de la Chaussee-d'Antin and the Rue Basse-du-Rampart, 
there sits a house that is remarkable for the caryatids on the facade facing the Rue 



Basse-du-Rampart. Because this latter street must disappear, the magnificent 
house with the caryatids, built only twenty years ago, is going to be demolished. 
The jury for expropriations grants the three million francs demanded by the 
owner and approved by the city. Three million! What a useful and productive 
expenditure!" Auguste Blanqui, Critique sociale, vol. 2, Fragments et notes 
(Paris, 1885), p. 341. [Ell,3] 

"Against Paris. Obdurate scheme to clear out the city, to disperse its population of 
workers. Hypocritically — on a humanitarian pretext — they propose to redistrib- 
ute throughout the 38,000 townships of France the 75,000 workers affected by 
unemployment. 1849." Blanqui, Critique sociale, vol. 2, Fragments et notes 
(Paris, 1885), p. 313. [El 1,4] 

"A Monsieur d'Havrincourt recently expounded on the strategic theory of civil 
war. The troops must never be allowed to spend much time in the main areas of 
disturbance. They are corrupted by contact with the rebels and refuse to fire 
freely when repression becomes necessary. . . . The best system: construct citadels 
dominating the suspect towns and ready at any moment to crush them. Soldiers 
must be kept garrisoned, away from the popular contagion." Auguste Blanqui, 
Critique sociale, vol. 2 (Paris, 1885), pp. 232-233 ("Saint-Etienne, 1850"). 

[E11.5] 

"The Haussmanization of Paris and the provinces is one of the great plagues of the 
Second Empire. No one will ever know how many thousands of unfortunates have 
lost their lives as a consequence of deprivations occasioned by these senseless 
constructions. The devouring of so many millions is one the principal causes of the 
present distress. . . . 'When building goes well, everything goes well,' runs a popu- 
lar adage, which has attained the status of economic axiom. By this standard, a 
hundred pyramids of Cheops, rising together into the clouds, would attest to 
overflowing prosperity. Singular calculus. Yes, in a well-ordered state, where 
thrift did not strangle exchange, construction would be the true measure of public 
fortune. For then it would reveal a growth in population and an excess of labor 
that . . . would lay a foundation for the future. In any other circumstances, the 
trowel merely betrays the murderous fantasies of absolutism, which, when its fury 
for war momentarily slackens, is seized by the fury for building. . . . All merce- 
nary tongues have been loosed in a chorus of celebration for the great works that 
are renewing the face of Paris. Nothing so sad, so lacking in social spontaneity, as 
this vast shifting of stones by the hand of despotism. There is no more dismal 
symptom of decadence. In proportion as Rome collapsed in agony, its monuments 
grew more numerous and more colossal. It was building its own sepulcher and 
making ready to die gloriously. But as for the modern world — it has no wish to die, 
and human stupidity is nearing its end. People are weary of grandiose homicidal 
acts. The projects that have so disrupted the capital, conditioned as they are on 
repression and vanity, have failed the future no less than the present." A. Blanqui, 



Critique sociale, vol. 1, Capital et travail (Paris, 1885), pp. 109-111 (conclusion 
of "Le Luxe"). The foreword to Capital et travail is dated May 26, 1869. 

[Ella,l] 



"The illusions about the fantastic structures are dispelled. Nowhere are there 
materials other than the hundred simple bodies. ... It is with this meager assort- 
ment that the universe is necessarily made and remade, without respite. M. Hauss- 
mann had just as much to rebuild Paris with; he had precisely these materials. Itis 
not variety that stands out in his constructions. Nature, which also demolishes in 
order to reconstruct, does a little better with the things it creates. It knows how to 
make such good use of its meager resources that one hesitates to say there is a limit 
to the originality of its works." A. Blanqui, L'Eternite par les astres: Hypothese 
astronomique (Paris, 1872), p. 53. [Ella, 2] 

Die neue Weltbiihne, 34, no. 5 (February 3, 1938), in an essay by H. Budzislawski, 
"Croesus Builds" (pp. 129-130), quotes Engels' "Zur Wohnungsfrage" <On the 
Housing Question) of 1872: "In reality the bourgeoisie has only one method of 
settling the housing question after its fashion — that is to say, of settling it in such a 
way that the solution continually poses the question anew. This method is called 
'Haussmann.' By the term 'Haussmann,' I do not mean merely the specifically 
Bonapartist manner of the Parisian Haussmann — cutting long, straight, broad 
streets right through closely built working-class neighborhoods and lining them 
on both sides with big luxurious buildings, the intention having been, apart from 
the strategic aim of making barricade fighting more difficult, to develop a spe- 
cifically Bonapartist building-trades proletariat dependent on the govermnent, 
and to turn the city into a luxury city pure and simple. By 'Haussmann' I mean 
the practice, which has now become general, of making breaches in the working- 
class neighborhoods of our big cities, particularly in those which are centrally 
situated. . . . The result is everywhere the same: the most scandalous alleys . . . 
disappear to the accompaniment of lavish self-glorification by the bourgeoi- 
sie ... , but — they reappear at once somewhere else, often in the immediate 
neighborhood." 17 — With this goes the prize question: Why was the mortality rate 
in London so much higher in the new working-class districts (around 1890?) 
than in the slums? — Because people went hungry so that they could afford the 
high rents. And Peladan's observation: the nineteenth century forced everyone to 
secure lodgings for himself, even at the cost of food and clothing. [E12,l] 

Is it true, as Paul Westheim maintains in his article "Die neue Siegesallee" {Die 
neue Weltbiihne, 34, no. 8, p. 240), that Haussmann spared Parisians the misery of 
large blocks of fiats? [E12,2] 



Haussmann who, faced with the city plan of Paris, takes up Rastignac's cry of "A 
nous deux maintenant!" [E12,3] 



"The new boulevards have introduced light and air into unwholesome districts, 
but have done so by wiping out, along their way, almost all the courtyards and 
gardens — which moreover have been ruled out by the progressive rise in real 
estate prices." Victor Fournel, Paris nouveau et Paris futur (Paris, 1868), p. 224 
("Conclusion"). [E12,4] 

The old Paris bewails the monotony of the new streets; whereupon the new Paris 
responds: 

Why all these reproaches? , . . 

Thanks to the straight line, the ease of travel it affords, 

One avoids the shock of many a vehicle, 

And, if one's eyes are good, one likewise avoids 

The fools, the borrowers, the bailiffs, the bores; 

Last but not least, down the whole length of the avenue, 

Each passerby now avoids the others, or nods from afar. 

M. Barthelemy, Le Vieux Paris et le nouveau (Paris, 1861), pp. 5-6. [E12a,l] 

The old Paris: "The rent devours all, and they go without meat." M. Barthelemy, 
Le Vieux Paris et le nouveau. (Paris, 1861), p. 8. [E12a,2] 

Victor Fournel, in his Paris nouveau et Paris futur (Paris, 1868), particularly in 
the section "Un chapitre des mines de Paris moderne," gives an idea of the scale 
on which Haussmann engineered destruction in Paris . "Modern Paris is a parvenu 
that goes back no further in time than its own beginnings , and that razes the old 
palaces and old churches to build in their place beautiful white houses with stucco 
ornaments and pasteboard statues. In the previous century, to write the annals of 
the monuments of Paris was to write the annals of Paris itself, from its origins up 
through each of its epochs; soon, however, it will be . . . merely to write the annals 
of the last twenty years of our own existence" (pp. 293-294). [E12a,3] 

Fournel, in his eminent demonstration of Haussmann's misdeeds: "From the Fau- 
bourg Saint-Germain to the Fauhourg Saint-Honore, from the Latin Quarter to 
the environs of the Palais-Royal, from the Faubourg Saint-Denis to the Chaussee 
d'Antin, from the Boulevard des Italiens to the Boulevard du Temple, it seemed, 
in each case, that you were passing from one continent to another. It all made for 
so many distinct small cities within the capital city — a city of study, a city of 
commerce, a city of luxury, a city of refuge, a city of movement and of popular 
pleasures— all of them nonetheless linked to one another by a host of gradations 
and transitions. And this is what is being obliterated ... by the construction 
everywhere of the same geometrical and rectilinear street, with its unvarying mile- 
long perspective and its continuous rows of houses that are always the same 
house.''' Victor Fournel, Paris nouveau et Paris futur, pp. 220-221 ("Con- 
clusion"). [E12a,4] 



"They . . . transplant the Boulevard des Italiens in its entirety to the Montagne 
Sainte-Genevieve — with about as much utility and profit as a hothouse flower in 
the forest — and they create Rues de Rivoli in the ancient city center, which has no 
need of them. Eventually this cradle of the capital, having been demolished, will 
comprise at most a barracks, a church, a hospital, and a palace." Victor Fournel, 
Paris nouveau et Paris futur (Paris, 1868), p. 223. The last thought echoes a 
stanza from Hugo's "A l'Arc. de Triomphe." [E13,l] 

Haussmann's work is accomplished today, as the Spanish war makes clear, by 
quite other means. [E13,2] 

Temporary tenants under Haussmann: "The industrial nomads among the new 
ground-floor Parisians fall into three principal categories: commercial photogra- 
phers; dealers in bric-a-brac, who run bazaars and cheap shops; and exhibitors of 
curiosities, particularly of female giants. Up to now, these interesting personages 
have numbered among those who have profited the most from the transformation 
of Paris." Victor Fournel, Paris nouveau et Parisfutur (Paris, 1868), pp. 129-130 
("Promenade pittoresque a travers le nouveau Paris"). [E13,3] 

"The covered market of Les Halles, by universal consent, constitutes the most 
irreproachable construction of the past dozen years. ... It manifests one of those 
logical harmonies which satisfy the mind by the obviousness of its signification." 
Victor Fournel, Paris nouveau et Parisfutur, p. 213. [E13,4] 

Already Tissot invites speculation: "The city of Paris is supposed to make a series 
of loans totaling hundreds of millions of francs and, at the same time, purchase the 
better part of a quartier in order to rebuild it in a manner conforming to the re- 
quirements of taste, hygiene, and ease of communication. Here is matter 
for speculation." Amedee de Tissot, Paris et Londres compares (Paris, 1830), 



In Le Passe, le present, I'avenir de la Republique (Paris, 1850), p. 31 (cited in 
<Jean> Cassou, Quarante-huit <Paris, 1939>, pp. 174—175), Lamartine already 
speaks of the "nomadic, indecisive, and dissolute city dwellers who are corrupted 
by their idleness in public places and who go whichever way the wind of factional- 



Stahl on the Parisian tenement houses: "It was already [in the Middle Ages] an 
overpopulated metropolis that was squeezed within the tight belt of a walled for- 
tification. For the mass of people, there were neither single-family houses nor 
separately owned houses nor even modest cottages. Buildings of many stories were 
erected on the narrowest of lots, generally allowing only two, often only one, front 
window (though elsewhere three-window houses were the rule). These buildings 
usually remained wholly unadorned, and when they did not simply come to a stop 



pp. 46-47. 



[E13,5] 



ism blows, heeding the voice of him who shouts the loudest. 



[E13a,l] 



at the top, there was at most a single gable affixed there. . . . On the roofs, the 
situation was strange enough, with unassumijig superstructures and mansardes 
nestled next to the chimney flues, which were placed extremely close to one an- 
other." Stahl sees, in the freedom of the roofing structures — a freedom to which 
modern architects in Paris likewise adhere — "a fantastic and thoroughly Gothic 
element." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), pp. 79-80. [E13a,2] 

"Everywhere . . . the peculiar chimneys serve only to heighten the disorder of 
these forms [the mansardes]. This is ... a trait common to all Parisian houses. 
Even the oldest of them have that high wall from which the tops of the chimney 
flues extend. . . . We are far removed here from the Roman style, which has been 
taken to he the foundation of Parisian architecture. We are in fact nearer its 
opposite, the Gothic, to which the chimneys clearly allude. ... If we want to call 
this more loosely a "northern style," then we can see that a second . . . northern 
element is present to mitigate the Roman character of the streets. This is none 
other than the modern boulevards and avenues . . . , which are planted, for the 
most part, with trees; . . . and rows of trees, of course, are a feature of the north- 
ern city." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin), pp. 21-22. [E13a,3] 

In Paris, the modern house has "developed gradually out of the preexisting one. 
This could happen hecause the preexisting one was already a large townhouse of 
the type created here ... in the seventeenth century on the Place Vendome, where 
today the residential palaces of former times have come to harhor business estab- 
lishments of every kind — without having suffered the least alteration to their 
facades." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin), p. 18. [El4] 

A plea for Haussmann: "It is well known that . . . the nineteenth century entirely 
lost, together with other fundamental concepts of art, the concept of the city as . . . 
a unified whole. Henceforth there was no longer any city planning. New huildings 
were introduced into the old network of streets without a plan, and they were 
expanded without a plan. . . . What can properly be called the architectural his- 
tory of a city . . . was in this way everywhere terminated. Paris is the only excep- 
tion, and as such it was greeted with incomprehension and disapproval" 
(pp. 13-14). "Three generations failed to understood what city planning is. We 
know what it is, but in our case this knowledge generally brings only regret for 
missed opportunities. . . . These considerations make it possihle to appreciate the 
only city planner of genius in the modern world — a man, moreover, who indirectly 
created all the American metropolises" (pp. 168-169). "It is solely in this perspec- 
tive, then, that Haussmann's great thoroughfares take on their real meaning. With 
them, the new city . . . intervenes in the old and, in a certain sense, draws on the 
old, without otherwise violating its character. Thus, these thoroughfares may be 
said to have, along with their utility, an aesthetic effect, such that the old city and 
the new are not left standing opposite each other, as is the case everywhere else, 
hut are drawn together into one. The moment you come out of some ancient lane 
onto one of Haussmann's avenues, you're in contact with this newer Paris — the 



Paris of the past three centuries. For Haussmann took over not only the form of 
the avenue and boulevard but also the form of the house from the imperial capital 
laid out by Louis XIV. That is why his streets can perform the function of making 
the city into a conspicuous unity. No, he has not destroyed Paris ; rather, he has 
brought it to completion. . . . This must be acknowledged even when you realize 
how much beauty was sacrificed. . . . Haussmann was assuredly a fanatic — but his 
work could be accomplished only by a fanatic." Fritz Stahl, Paris: Eine Stadt als 
Kunstiverk (Berlin), pp. 173-174. [E14a] 



[Iron Construction] 



Each epoch dreams the one to follow. 

— Michelet, "Avenir! Avenir!" [Europe, 73, p. 6) 



Dialectical deduction of iron construction: it is contrasted both with Greek con- 
struction in stone (raftered ceiling) and with medieval construction in stone 
(vaulted ceiling) . "Another art, in which another static principle establishes a tone 
even more magnificent than that of the other two, will struggle from the womb of 
time to be born. ... A new and unprecedented ceiling system, one that will 
naturally bring in its wake a whole new realm of art forms, can . . . make its 
appearance only after some particular material — formerly neglected, if not un- 
known, as a basic principle in that application — begins to be accepted. Such a 
material is . . . iron, which our century has already started to employ in this 
sense. In proportion as its static properties are tested and made known, iron is 
destined to serve, in the architecture of the future, as the basis for the system of 
ceiling construction; and with respect to statics, it is destined to advance this 
system as far beyond the Hellenic and the medieval as the system of the arch 
advanced the Middle Ages beyond the monolithic stone-lintel system of antiq- 
uity. ... If the static principle of force is thus borrowed from vaulted construc- 
tions and put to work for an entirely new and unprecedented system, then, with 
regard to the art forms of the new system, the formal principle of the Hellenic 
mode must find acceptance." ^um himdertjihrigen Geburtstag Karl Boettichers 
(Berlin, 1906), pp. 42, 44-46. (The principle of Hellenic architecture and Ger- 
manic architecture as carried over into the architecture of our time.) [Fl, 1 ] 

Glass before its time, premature iron. In the arcades, both the most brittle and the 
strongest materials suffered breakage; in a certain sense, they were deflowered. 
Around the middle of the past century, it was not yet known how to build with 
glass and iron. Hence, the light that fell from above, through the panes between 
the iron supports, was dirty and sad. [Fl.2] 

"The mid-1830s see the appearance of the first iron furniture, in the form of 
bedsteads, chairs, small tables, jardinieres; and it is highly characteristic of the 
epoch that this furniture was preferred because it could be made to imitate per- 



fectly any type of wood. Shortly after 1840, fully padded furniture appears in 
France, and with it the upholstered style becomes dominant." Max von Boehn, Die 
Mode im XIX. J ahrhundert, vol. 2 (Munich, 1907), p. 131. [Fl,3] 

The two great advances in technology — gas 1 and cast iron — go together. "Aside 
from the great quantity of lights maintained by the merchants, these galleries are 
illuminated in the evening by thirty-four jets of hydrogen gas mounted on cast- 
iron volutes on the pilasters." The quote is probably referring to the Galerie de 
l'Opera.J. A. Dulaure, Hutoire de Paris . . . depuu 1821 jusqu'a nos jours, vol. 2 
<(Paris, 1835), p. 29>. [Fl,4] 

"The stagecoach gallops up to the quay, by the Seine. A bolt of lightning flashes 
over the Pont d!Austerlitz. The pencil comes to rest." Karl Gutzkow, Brief e aus 
Paris, vol. 2 <Leipzig, 1842>, p. 234. The Austerlitz Bridge was one of the first 
iron structures in Paris. With the lightning flash above, it becomes an emblem of 
the dawning technological age. Close by, the stagecoach with its team of black 
horses, whose hoofs strike romantic sparks. And the pencil of the German author 
who sketches them: a splendid vignette in the style of Grandville. 

[Fl,5] 

"In reality, we know of no beautiful theaters, no beautiful railroad stations, no 
beautiful exhibition halls, no beautiful casinos — that is to say, no beautiful houses 
of industry or of frivolity." Maurice Talmeyr, La Cite du sang (Paris, 1908), 
p. 277. [F1.6] 

Magic of cast iron: "Hahblle 2 was able then to convince himself that the ring 
around this planet was nothing other than a circular balcony on which the inhabi- 
tants of Saturn strolled in the evening to get a breath of fresh air." Grandville, Un 
autre monde (Paris <1844>), p. 139. □ Hashish Q [Fl,7] 

In mentioning factories built in the style of residential houses, and other things of 
this kind, we must take into account the following parallel from the history of 
architecture: "I said earlier that in the period of 'sensibility,' temples were erected 
to friendship and tenderness; as taste subsequently turned to the classical style, a 
host of temples or temple-like buildings immediately sprang up in gardens, in 
parks, on hills. And these were dedicated not only to the Graces or to Apollo and 
the Muses; farm buildings, too, including barns and stables, were built in the 
style of temples." Jacob Falke, Geschichte des modemen Geschmacks (Leipzig, 1866), 
pp. 373-374. There are thus masks of architecture, and in such masquerade the 
architecture of Berlin around 1800 appears on Sundays, like a ghost at a costume 
ball. [Fla,l] 



"Every tradesman imitates the materials and methods of others, and thinks he 
has accomplished a miracle of taste when he brings out porcelain cups resem- 
bling the work of a cooper, glasses resembling porcelains, gold jewelry like leather 



thongs, iron tables with the look of rattan, and so on. Into this arena rushes the 
confectioner as well — quite forgetting his proper domain, and the touchstone of 
his taste — aspiring to be a sculptor and architect." Jacob Falke, Geschichte des 
modernen Geschmacks, p. 380. This perplexity derived in part from the superabun- 
dance of technical processes and new materials that had suddenly become avail- 
able. The effort to assimilate them more thoroughly led to mistakes and failures. 
On the other hand, these vain attempts are the most authentic proof that techno- 
logical production, at the beginning, was in the grip of dreams. (Not architecture 
alone but all technology is, at certain stages, evidence of a collective dream.) 

[Fla,2] 

"With iron construction — a secondary genre, it is true — a new art was horn. The 
east-side railroad station designed by Duquesnay, the Gare de l'Est, was in this 
regard worthy of architects' attention. The use of iron greatly increased in that 
period, thanks to the new combinations to which it lent itself . Two quite different 
but equally remarkable works in this genre deserve to be mentioned first: the 
Bibliotheque Sainte-Genevieve and the cental marketplace, Les Halles. The latter 
is ... a veritable archetype: reproduced several times in Paris and other cities, it 
proceeded, as the Gothic cathedral had done, to appear all over France. . . . Nota- 
hle improvements can be observed in the details. The monumental lead-work has 
become rich and elegant; the railings, candelabras, and mosaic flooring all testify 
to an often successful quest for heauty. Technological advances have made it possi- 
ble to sheathe cast iron with copper, a process which must not he abused. Ad- 
vances in luxury have led, even more successfully, to the replacement of cast iron 
by bronze, something which has turned the streetlamps in certain public places 
into objets d'art." 0 Gas D Note to this passage: "In 1848, 5,763 tons of iron en- 
tered Paris; in 1854, 11,771; in 1862, 41,666; in 1867, 61,572." E. Levasseur, 
Histoire des classes ouvrieres et de Vindustrie en France de 1 789 a 1870, vol. 2 
(Paris, 1904), pp. 531-532. [Fla,3] 

"Henri Labrouste, an artist whose talents are sober and severe, successfully in- 
augurated the ornamental use of iron in the construction of the Bihliotheque 
Sainte-Genevieve and the Bibliotheque Nationale." Levasseur, Histoire des 
classes ouvrieres, p. 197. [Fla,4] 

First construction of Les Halles in 1851, long after the project had been approved 
hy Napoleon in 1811. It met with general disfavor. This stone structure was known 
as lefort de la Halle. "It was an unfortunate attempt which will not be repeated. 
... A mode of construction better suited to the end proposed will now be sought. 
The glassed sections of the Gare de l'Ouest and the memory of the Crystal Palace, 
which had housed the world exhibition at London in 1851, were no doubt respon- 
sible for the idea of using glass and cast iron almost exclusively. Today we can see 
the justification for turning to such lightweight materials, which, better than any 
others, fulfilled the conditions laid down for these establishments. Work on Les 



Halles has not let up since 1851, yet they are still not finished." Maxime Du Camp, 



Plan for a train station intended to replace theGare Saint-Lazare. Corner of Place 
de la Madeleine and Rue Tronchet. "According to the report, the rails — supported 
by 'elegant cast-iron arches rising twenty feet above the ground, and having a 
length of 615 meters' — would have crossed the Rue Saint-Lazare, the Rue Saint- 
Nicolas, the Rue des Mathurins, and the Rue Castellane, each of which would have 
had its own station." D Flaneur. Railroad station near <?> the streets 0 ". . . Merely 
by looking at them, we can see how little these plans actually anticipated the future 
of the railroads. Although described as 'monumental,' the facade of this train 
station (which, fortunately, was never built) is of unusually small dimensions; it 
would not even serve to accommodate one of those shops that nowadays extend 
along the corners of certain intersections. It is a sort of Italianate building, three 
stories high, with each story having eight windows; the main entrance is marked by 
a stairway of twenty-four steps leading to a semicircular porch wide enough for 
five or six persons to pass through side by side." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 1, pp. 238— 



The Gare del'Ouest (today?) presents "the double aspect of a factory in operation 
and a ministry." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 1, p. 241. "With your back to the three 
tunnels that pass under the Boulevard des Batignolles, you can take in the whole of 
the train station. You see that it almost has the shape of an immense mandolin: the 
rails would form the strings, and the signal posts, placed at every crossing of the 
tracks, would form the pegs." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 1, p. 250. [F2,2] 

"Charon . . . ruined by the installation of a wire footbridge over the Styx." Grand- 
ville, Un autre monde (Paris, 1844), p. 138. [F2,3] 

The fi rst act of Offenbach's Vie parisienne takes place in a railroad station. "The 
industrial movement seems to run in the blood of this generation — to such an 
extent that, for example, Flachat has built his house on a plot of land where, on 
either side, trains are always whistling by." Sigf ried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich 
(Leipzig and Berlin <1928>), p. 13. Eugene Flachat (1802-1873), builder of rail- 
roads, designer. [F2,4] 

On the Galerie d'Orleans in the Palais-Royal (1829-1831): "Even Fontaine, one of 
the originators of the Empire style, is converted in later years to the new material. 
In 1835-1836, moreover, he replaced the wooden flooring of the Galerie des 
Batailles in Versailles with an iron assembly. — These galleries, like those in the 
Palais-Royal, were subsequently perfected in Italy. For us, they are a point of 
departure for new architectural problems: train stations, and the like." Sigf'ried 
Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 21. [F2,5] 



Paris (Paris, 1875), vol. 2, pp. 121-122. 



[Fla,5] 



239. 



[F2,l] 



"The complicated construction (out of iron and copper) of the Corn Exchange in 
1811 was the work of the architect Bellange and the engineer Brunet. It is the first 
time, to our knowledge, that architect and engineer are no longer united in one 
person. . . . Hittorff, the builder of the Gare du Nord, got his insight into iron 
construction from Bellange. — Naturally, it is a matter more of an application of 
iron than a construction in iron. Techniques of wood construction were simply 
transposed to iron." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 20. [F2,6] 

Apropos of Veugny's covered market built in 1824 near the Madeleine: "The slen- 
derness of the delicate cast-iron columns brings to mind Pompeian wall paintings. 
'The construction, in iron and cast iron, of the new market near the Madeleine is 
one of the most graceful achievements in this genre. One cannot imagine anything 
more elegant or in better taste. . . .' Eck, Traite." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in 
Frankreich, p. 21. [F2,7] 

"The most important step toward industrialization: mechanical prefabrication of 
specific forms (sections) out of wrought iron or steel. The fields interpenetrate: . . . 
in 1832, railroad workers began not with building components but with rails. Here 
is the point of departure for sectional iron, which is the basis of iron construction. 
[Note to this passage: The new methods of construction penetrate slowly into 
industry. Double-T iron was used in flooring for the first time in Paris in 1845, 
when the masons were out on strike and the price of wood had risen due to in- 
creased construction and larger spans.]" Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 26. 

[F2,8] 

The first structures made of iron served transitory purposes: covered markets, 
railroad stations, exhibitions. Iron is thus immediately allied with functional 
moments in the life of the economy. What was once functional and transitory, 
however, begins today, at an altered tempo, to seem formal and stable. [F2,9] 

"Les Halles consist of two groups of pavilions joined to each other by covered 
lanes. It is a somewhat timid iron structure that avoids the generous spans of 
Horeau and Flachat and obviously keeps to the model of the greenhouse." 
Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 28. [F2a,l] 

On the Gare du Nord: "Here they have entirely avoided that abundance of space 
which is found in waiting rooms, entryways, and restaurants around 1880, and 
which led to the problem of the railroad station as exaggerated baroque palace. " 
Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 31. [F2a,2] 

"Wherever the nineteenth century feels itself to be unobserved, it grows bold." 
Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 33. hi fact, this sentence holds good in the 
general form that it has here: the anonymous art of the illustrations in family 
magazines and children's books, for example, is proof of the point. [F2a,3] 



Railroad stations <Bahnhofe> used to be known as Eisenbahnhqfe? 



[F2a,4] 



There is talk of renewing art by beginning with forms. But are not forms the true 
mystery of nature, which reserves to itself the right to remunerate — precisely 
through them — the accurate, the objective, the logical solution to a problem posed 
in purely objective terms? When the wheel was invented, enabling continuous 
forward motion over the ground, wouldn't someone there have been able to say, 
with a certain justification, "And now, into the bargain, it's round — it's in the form 
of a wheel?" Are not all great conquests in the field of forms ultimately a matter of 
technical discoveries? Only now are we beginning to guess what forms — and 
they will be determinative for our epoch — lie hidden in machines. "To what 
extent the old forms of the instruments of production influenced their new forms 
from the outset is shown, . . . perhaps more strikingly than in any other way, by 
the attempts, before the invention of the present locomotive, to construct a loco- 
motive that actually had two feet, which, after the fashion of a horse, it raised 
alternately from the ground. It is only after considerable development of the 
science of mechanics, and accumulated practical experience, that the form of a 
machine becomes settled entirely in accordance with mechanical principles, and 
emancipated from the traditional form of the tool that gave rise to it." (In this 
sense, for example, the supports and the load, in architecture, are also "forms") 
Passage is from Marx, Kapital, vol. 1 (Hamburg, 1922), p. 347n." [F2a,5] 

Through the Ecole des Beaux-Arts, architecture is linked with the plastic arts. 
"That was a disaster for architecture. In the Baroque age, this unity had been 
perfect and self-evident. In the course of the nineteenth century, however, it 
became untenable." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich <Leipzig and Berlin, 
1928>, p. 16. This not only provides a very important perspective on the Ba- 
roque; it also indicates that architecture was historically the earliest field to out- 
grow the concept of art, or, better, that it tolerated least well being contemplated 
as "art" — a category which the nineteenth century, to a previously unimagined 
extent but with hardly more justification at bottom, imposed on the creations of 
intellectual productivity. [F3,l] 

The dusty fata morgana of the winter garden, the dreary perspective of the train 
station, with the small altar of happiness at the intersection of the tracks — it all 
molders under spurious constructions, glass before its time, premature iron. For 
in the first third of the previous century, no one as yet understood how to build 
with glass and iron. That problem, however, has long since been solved by 
hangars and silos. Now, it is the same with the human material on the inside of 
the arcades as with the materials of their construction. Pimps are the iron up- 
rights of this street, and its glass breakables are the whores. [F3,2] 

"The new 'architecture' <B*uen> has its origin in the moment of industry's forma- 
tion, around 1830 — the moment of mutation from the craf tsmanly to the industrial 
production process." Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 2. [F3,3] 



"Railroad tracks," with the peculiar and unmistakable dream world that attaches 
to them, are a very impressive example of just how great the natural symbolic 
power of technological innovation can be. In this regard, it is illuminating to learn 
of the bitter polemic waged against iron rails in the 1830s. In A Treatise in 
Elementary Locomotion, for example, A. Gordon argued that the steam carriage {as 
it was called then) should run on lanes of granite. It was deemed impossible to 
produce enough iron for even the very small number of railway lines being 
planned at that time. [F3,4] 

It must be kept in mind that the magnificent urban views opened up by new 
constructions in iron — Giedion, in bis Bauen in Frankreich (illustrations 61-63), 
gives excellent examples with the Pont Transbordeur in Marseilles — for a long 
time were evident only to workers and engineers. Q Marxism □ For in those days 
who besides the engineer and the proletarian had climbed the steps that alone 
made it possible to recognize what was new and decisive about these structures: 
the feeling of space? [F3,5] 

In 1791, the term ingenieur began to be used in France for those officers skilled in 
the arts of fortification and siege. "At the same time, and in the same country, the 
opposition between 'construction' and 'architecture' began to make itself felt; and 
before long it figured in personal attacks. This antithesis had been entirely un- 
known in the past. . . . But in the innumerable aesthetic treatises which after the 
storms of the Revolution guided French art back into regular channels, . . . the 
constructeurs stood opposed to the decorateurs, and with this the further question 
arose: Did not the ingenieurs, as the allies of the former, necessarily occupy with 
them, socially speaking, a distinct camp?" A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 
1907), p. 3. [F3,6] 

"The technique of stone architecture is stereotomy; that of wood is tectonics. What 
does iron construction have in common with the one or the other?" Alfred Gott- 
hold Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 1907), p. 5. "In stone we feel the natural 
spirit of the mass. Iron is, for us, only artificially compressed durability and 
tenacity" (p. 9). "Iron has a tensile strength forty times greater than that of stone 
and ten times greater than that of wood, although its net weight is only four times 
that of stone and only eight times that of wood. In comparison with a stone mass of 
the same dimensions, therefore, an iron hody possesses, with only four times the 
weight, a load limit forty times higher" (p. 11). [F3,7] 

"This material, in its first hundred years, has already undergone essential trans- 
formations — cast iron, wrought iron, ingot iron — so that today the engineer has at 
his disposal a huilding material completely different from that of some fifty years 
ago. ... In the perspective of historical reflection, these are 'ferments' of a disqui- 
eting instability. No other huilding material offers anything remotely similar. We 
stand here at the heginning of a development that is sure to proceed at a furious 
pace. . . . The . . . conditions of the material . . . are volatilized in 'limitless 



possibilities.'" A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten, p. 11. Iron as revolutionary building 
material! [F3a,l] 



Meanwhile, how it looked in the vulgar consciousness is indicated by the crass 
yet typical utterance of a contemporary journalist, according to whom posterity 
will one day have to confess, "In the nineteenth century, ancient Greek architec- 
ture once again blossomed in its classical purity." Europa, 2 (Stuttgart and 
Leipzig, 1837), p. 207. [F3a,2] 

Railroad stations as "abodes of art." "If Wiertz had had at his disposal . . . the 
public monuments of modern civilization — railway stations, legislative chambers, 
university lecture halls, marketplaces, town halls — . . . who can say what bright 
and dramatic new worlds he would have traced upon his canvas!" A. J. Wiertz, 
Oeuvres litteraires (Paris, 1870), pp. 525-526. [F3a,3] 

The technical absolutism that is fundamental to iron construction — and funda- 
mental merely on account of the material itself — becomes apparent to anyone 
who recognizes the extent to which it contrasts with traditional conceptions of 
the value and utility of building materials. "Iron inspired a certain distrust just 
because it was not immmediately furnished by nature, but instead had to be 
artificially prepared as a building material. This distrust is only a specific applica- 
tion of that general sentiment of the Renaissance to which Leon Battista Alberti 
(De re aedificatoria [Paris, 1512], fol. xliv) gives expression at one point with the 
words: 'Nam est quidem cujusquis corporis pars indissolubilior, quae a natura 
concreta et counita est, quam quae hominum manu et arte conjuncta atque, 
compacta est' <For there is, in each thing, a part that is the work and the assem- 
blage of nature, and that is more indissoluble than that which is produced and 
assembled by the hand of man with his art>." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslin- 
gen, 1907), p. 14. [F3a,4] 

It is worth considering — and it appears that the answer to this question would be 
in the negative — whether, at an earlier period, technical necessities in architecture 
(but also in the other arts) determined the forms, the style, as thoroughly as they 
do today, when such technological derivation seems actually to become the 
signature of everything now produced. With iron as a material, this is already 
clearly the case, and perhaps for the first time. Indeed, the "basic forms in which 
iron appears as a building material are . . . already themselves, as distinct synthe- 
ses, partly new. And their distinctiveness, in large measure, is the product and 
expression of the natural properties of the building material, since such properties 
have been technically and scientifically developed and exploited precisely for 
these forms. The systematic industrial process which converts raw material into 
immediately available building material begins, with iron, at a much earlier stage 
than with previously existing building materials. Between matter and material, in 
this case, there is a relationship quite different from that between stone and 
ashlar, clay and tile, timber and beam: with iron, building material and structural 



form are, as it were, more homogeneous." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 
1907), p. 23. [F3a,5] 



1840-1844: "The construction of fortifications, inspired by Thiers. . . . Thiers, 
who thought that railroads would never work, had gates constructed in Paris at 
the very moment when railroad stations were needed." Dubech and d'Espezel, 
Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 386. [F3a,6] 

"From the fifteenth century onward, this nearly colorless glass, in the form of 
window panes, rules over the house as well. The whole development of interior 
space obeys the command: 'More light!' 5 — In seventeenth-century Holland, this 
development leads to window openings that, even in houses of the middle class, 
ordinarily take up almost half the wall. . . . / The abundance of light occasioned 
by this practice must have . . . soon become disagreeable. Within the room, 
curtains offered a relief that was quickly to become, through the overzealous art 
of the upholsterer, a disaster. . . . / The development of space by means of glass 
and iron had come to a standstill. / Suddenly, however, it gained new strength 
from a perfectly inconspicuous source. / Once again, this source was a 'house,' 
one designed to 'shelter the needy,' but it was a house neither for mortals nor for 
divinities, neither for hearth fires nor for inanimate goods; it was, rather, a house 
for plants. / The origin of all present-day architecture in iron and glass is the 
greenhouse." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten, p. 55. D Light in the Arcades D Mirrors □ 
The arcade is the hallmark of the world Proust depicts. Curious that, like this 
world, it should be bound in its origin to the existence of plants. [F4,l] 

On the Crystal Palace of 1851: "Of all the great things about this work, the great- 
est, in every sense of the word, is the vaulted central hall. . . . Now, here too, at 
first, it was not a space-articulating architect who did the talking but a — gar- 
dener. . . . This is literally true: the main reason for the elevation of the central 
hall was the presence, in this section of Hyde Park, of magnificent elm trees, which 
neither the Londoners nor Paxton himself wished to see felled. Incorporating them 
into his giant glass house, as he had done earlier with the exotic plants at 
Chatsworth, Paxton almost unconsciously — but nonetheless fundamentally — en- 
hanced the architectural value of his construction." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten 
(Esslingen, 1907), p. 62. [F4,2] 

In opposition to the engineers and builders, <Charles-Francois> Viel, as architect, 
publishes his extremely violent, comprehensive polemic against static calculation, 
under the title De I Impuissance des mathematiques pour assurer la solidite des 
bdtiments <On the Uselessness of Mathematics for Assuring the Stability of Build- 
ings) (Paris, 1805). [F4,3] 

The following holds good for the arcades, particularly as iron structures: "Their 
most essential component ... is the roof. Even the etymology of the word 'hall"' 
points to this. It is a covered, not an enclosed space; the side walls are, so to 



Interior of the Crystal Palace, London, from a photograph by William Henry Fox Talbot. See 
F4.2. 



speak, 'concealed.'" This last point pertains in a special sense to the arcades, 
whose walls have only secondarily the function of partitioning the hall; primarily, 
they serve as walls or facades for the commercial spaces within them. The pas- 
sage is from A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten, p. 69. [F4,4] 

The arcade as iron construction stands on the verge of horizontal extension. 
That is a decisive condition for its "old-fashioned" appearance. It displays, in this 
regard, a hybrid character, analogous in certain respects to that of the Baroque 
church — "the vaulted 'hall* that comprehends the chapels only as an extension of 
its own proper space, which is wider than ever before. Nevertheless, an attraction 
'from on high' is also at work in this Baroque hall — an upward-tending ecstasy, 
such as jubilates from the frescoes on the ceiling. So long as ecclesiastical spaces 
aim to be more than spaces for gathering, so long as they strive to safeguard the 
idea of the eternal, they will be satisfied with nothing less than an overarching 
unity, in which the vertical tendency outweighs the horizontal." A. G. Meyer, 
Eisenbauten, p. 74. On the other hand, it may be said that something sacral, a 
vestige of the nave, still attaches to this row of commodities that is the arcade. 
From a functional point of view, the arcade already occupies the field of horizon- 
tal amplitude; architecturally, however, it still stands within the conceptual field of 
the old "hall." ' [F4,5] 

The Galerie des Machines, built in 1889, 7 was torn down in 1910 "out of artistic 
sadism." [F4,6] 

Historical extension of the horizontal: "From the palaces of the Italian High Ren- 
aissance, the chateaux of the French kings take the 'gallery,' wliich — as in the case 
of the 'Gallery of Apollo' at the Louvre and the 'Gallery of Mirrors' at Versailles — 
becomes the emblem of majesty itself. . . . / Its new triumphal advance in the nine- 
teenth century begins under the sign of the purely utilitarian structure, with those 
halls known as warehouses and markets, workshops and factories; the problem of 
railroad stations and, above all, of exhibitions leads it back to art. And every- 
where the demand for continuous horizontal extension is so great that the stone 
arch and the wooden ceiling can have only very limited applications. ... In Gothic 
structures, the walls turn into the ceiling, whereas in iron halls of the type . . . 
represented by the Gallery of Machines in Paris, the ceiling slides over the walls 
without interruption." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten, pp. 74—75. [F4a,l] 

Never before was the criterion of the "minimal" so important. And that includes 
the minimal element of quantity: the "little," the "few." These are dimensions 
that were well established in technological and architectural constructions long 
before literature made bold to adapt them. Fundamentally, it is a question of 
the earliest manifestation of the principle of montage. On building the Eiffel 
Tower: "Thus, the plastic shaping power abdicates here in favor of a colossal 
span of spiritual energy, which channels the inorganic material energy into the 
smallest, most efficient forms and conjoins these forms in the most effective 



maimer. . . . Each of the twelve thousand metal fittings, each of the two and a half 
million rivets, is machined to the millimeter. . . . On this work site, one hears no 
chisel-blow liberating form from stone; here thought reigns over muscle power, 
which it transmits via cranes and secure scaffolding." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten, 
p. 93. 0 Precursors D [F4a,2] 

"Haussmann was incapable of having what could be called a policy on railroad 
stations. . . . Despite a directive from the emperor, who justly baptized les gares 
'the new gateways of Paris,' the continued development of the railroads surprised 
everyone, surpassing all expectations. . . . The habit of a certain empiricism was 
not easily overcome." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), 
p. 419. [F4a,3] 

Eiffel Tower. "Greeted at first by a storm of protest, it has remained quite ugly, 
though it proved useful for research on wireless telegraphy. ... It has been said 
that this world exhibition marked the triumph of iron construction. It would he 
truer to say that it marked its bankruptcy." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de 
Paris, pp. 461-462. [F4a,4] 

"Around 1878, it was thought that salvation lay in iron construction. Its 'yearning 
for verticality' (as Salomon Reinach put it), the predominance of empty spaces 
over filled spaces, and the lightness of its visible frame raised hopes that a style was 
emerging in which the essence of the Gothic genius would be revived and rejuve- 
nated by a new spirit and new materials. But when engineers erected the Galerie 
des Machines and the Eiffel Tower in 1889, people despaired of the art of iron. 
Perhaps too soon." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 464. [F4a,5] 

Beranger: "His sole reproach to the regime of Louis Philippe was that it put the 
republic to grow in a hothouse." Franz Diederich, "Victor Hugo," Die neue Zeit, 
20, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1901), p. 648. [F4a,6] 

"The path that leads from the Empire form of the first locomotive to the fin- 
ished objective and functional form of today marks an evolution." Joseph Aug. 
Lux, "Maschinenasthetik," Die neue Zeit, 27, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1909), p. 439. 

[F4a,7] 

''Those endowed with an especially fine artistic conscience have hurled down, 
from the altar of art, curse after curse on the building engineers. It suffices to 
mention Ruskin." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 1907), p. 3. [F5,l] 

Concerning the artistic idea of Empire. On Daumier: "He displayed the greatest 
enthusiasm for muscular excitations. Tirelessly his pencil exalts the tension and 
movement of muscles. . . . But the public of which he dreamed was proportioned 
differently from this ignoble . . . society of shopkeepers. He yearned for a social 
milieu that would have provided, like that of ancient Greece, a hase from which 



people could raise themselves, as from a pedestal, in vigorous beauty. ... A gro- 
tesque distortion must . . . result when the bourgeoisie is viewed from the angle of 
such ideals. Daumier's caricatures were thus the almost involuntary consequence 
of a lofty ambition that failed in its aim of attunement with the middle-class pub- 
lic. ... In 1835, an attempt on the life of the king" presented an . . . opportunity to 
curtail . . . the boldness of the press, which had been publicly blamed for the deed. 
Political caricature became impossible. . . . Hence, the drawings of lawyers done 
in this period are ... by far the most passionate and animated. The courtroom is 
the only place where pitched battles can still be waged in all their fury, and lawyers 
are the only people in whom an emphatically muscular rhetoric and a profession- 
ally dramatic pose have made for an elaborate physiognomy of the body." Fritz 
Th. Schulte, "Honore Daumier," Die neue Zeit, 32, no. 1 (Stuttgart <1913>), 
pp. 833-835. [F5,2] 

The miscarriage of Baltard's design for Les Halles, built in 1853, is due to the 
same unfortunate combination of masonry and ironwork as in the original proj- 
ect for the London exhibition hall of 1851, the work of the Frenchman Horeau. 
Parisians referred to Baltard's structure, which was subsequently torn down, as le 
fort de la Halle. [F5,3] 

On the Crystal Palace, with the elms in its midst: "Under these glass arches, 
thanks to awnings, ventilators, and gushing fountains, visitors revel in a delicious 
coolness. In the words of one observer: 'You might think you were under the 
billows of some fabulous river, in the crystal palace of a fairy or naiad.'" A. Demy, 
Essai historique <sur les expositions universelles de Paris (Paris, 1907)>, p. 40. 

[F5,4] 

"After the closing of the London Exhibition in 1851, people in England won- 
dered what was to become of the Crystal Palace. Although a clause inserted in 
the deed of concession for the grounds required . . . the demolition ... of the 
building, public opinion was unanimous in asking for the abrogation of this 
clause. . . . The newspapers were full of proposals of all kinds, many of which 
were distinctly eccentric. A doctor wanted to turn the place into a hospital; 
another suggested a bathing establishment. . . . One person had the idea of mak- 
ing it a gigantic library. An Englishman with a violent passion for flowers insisted 
on seeing the whole palace become a garden." The Crystal Palace was acquired 
by Francis Fuller and transferred to Sydenham. A. S. de Doncourt, Les Expositions 
universelles (Lille and Paris <1889>), p. 77. Compare F6a,l. The Bourse could 
represent anything; the Crystal Palace could be used for anything. [F5a,l] 

"Furniture making in tubular iron . . . rivals furniture making in wood, and even 
surpasses it. Furniture of such iron, with baked-on color, . . . enameled with flow- 
ers or with patterns imitating those of inlaid wood, is elegant and nicely turned, 



like the tops of Boucher's gates." Edouard Foucaud, Paris inventeur: Physiologie 
de Vindustriefranqaise (Paris, 1844), pp. 92-93. [F5a,2] 



The square opposite the Gare du Nord was known in 1860 as the Place de 
Roubaix. [F5a,3] 

In engravings of the period, horses are prancing across railroad station espla- 
nades, and stagecoaches roll by in clouds of dust. [F5a,4] 

Caption for a woodcut representing a catafalque in the Gare du Nord: "Last 
respects paid to Meyerbeer in Paris at the gare de chemin defer du Nord." 

[F5a,5] 

Factories with galleries inside and winding iron staircases. Early prospectuses and 
illustrations show production rooms and display rooms, which are often under the 
same roof, fondly represented in cross-section like doll houses. Thus a prospectus 
of 1865 for the footwear company Pinet. Not infrequently one sees ateliers, like 
those of photographers, with sliding shades in front of the skylight. Cabinet des 
Estampes. [F5a,6] 

The Eiffel Tower: "It is characteristic of this most famous construction of the 
epoch that, for all its gigantic stature, ... it nevertheless feels like a knickknack, 
which . . . speaks for the fact that the second-rate artistic sensibility of the era 
could think, in general, only within the framework of genre and the technique of 
filigree." Egon Friedell, Kulturgeschichte der Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Munich, 1931), 
p. 363. [F5a,7] 

"Michel Chevalier sets down his dreams of the new temple in a poem: 
I would have you see my temple, the Lord God said. 



The eolumns of the temple 

Were strong beams; 
Of hollow cast-iron columns 
Was the organ of this new temple. 



The framework was of iron, of molded steel, 

Of copper and of bronze. 
The architect had placed it upon the columns 
Like a stringed instrument upon a woodwind. 



From the temple came, moreover, at each moment of the day, 
The sounds of a new harmony. 
The slender spire rose up like a lightning rod; 
It reached to the clouds, 



La Casse-tete-omanie, ou La Fureur du jour (Picture Puzzle Mania, or They're All the Rage These 
Days). See F6,2. 



To seek there electrie force; 
Storms have charged it with vitality and tension. 



At the top of the minarets 
The telegraph was waving its arms, 
Bringing from all parts 
Good news to the people." 

Henry-Rene D'Allemagne, Les Saint-Simoniens, 1827-1837 (Paris, 1930), p. 308. 

[F6.1] 

Hie "Chinese puzzle," which comes into fashion during the Empire, reveals the 
century's awakening sense for construction. The problems that appear, in the 
puzzles of die period, as hatched portions of a landscape, a building, or a figure 
are a first presentiment of the cubist principle in the plastic arts. (To verify: 
whether, in an allegorical representation in the Cabinet des Estampes, the brain- 
teaser undoes the kaleidoscope or vice versa.) [F6,2] 

"Paris a vol d'oiseau" <A Bird's-Eye View of Paris) — Notre-Dame de Pans, vol. 1, 
book 3 — concludes its overview of the architectural histoiy of the city with an 
ironic characterization of the present day, which culminates in a description of the 
architectural insignificance of the Stock Exchange. The importance of the chap- 
ter is underlined by a note added to the definitive edition of 1832, which says: 
"The author . . . enlarges, in one of these chapters, upon the current decadence of 
architecture and the now (in his view) almost inevitable demise of this king of the 



arts — a view which is, unhappily, deeply rooted in him and deeply pondered." 
Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 3 (Paris, 1880), p. 5." [F6,3] 



Before the decision to build the Palais de 1'Industrie 10 was made, a plan had 
existed to roof over a section of the Champs-Elysees — along with its trees — in the ^ 
manner of the Crystal Palace. [F6,4] | 

Victor Hugo, in JSotre-Dame de Paris, on the Bourse: "If it he the rule that the g 
architecture of a building should he adapted to its function, ... we can hardly 
wonder enough at a monument which might equally well be a king's palace, a house 
of commons, a town hall, a college, a riding school, an academy, a warehouse, a 
law court, a museum, a barracks, a sepulcher, a temple, or a theater. For the 
present, it is a stock exchange. ... It is a stock exchange in France just as it would 
have been a temple in Greece. . . . We have the colonnade encircling the monu- 
ment, beneath which, on days of high religious solemnity, the theory of stockbro- 
kers and jobbers can be majestically expounded. These, for sure, are very stately 
monuments. If we add to them many fine streets, as amusing and diverse as the 
Rue de Rivoli, then I do not despair but that one day a balloon's-eye view of Paris 
will offer us that wealth of lines, . . . that diversity of aspect, that somehow . . . 
unexpected beauty, which characterizes a checkerboard." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres 
completes, novels, vol. 3 (Paris, 1880), pp. 206-207 (JSotre-Dame de Paris). 11 

[F6a,l] 




The Paris Stock Exchange, mid-nineteenth century. Courtesy of the Paris Stock Exchange. 
SeeF6a,l. 



The Palais de l'lndustrie at the world exhibition of 1855. See F6a,2. 



Palais de l'lndustrie: "One is struck by the elegance and lightness of the iron 
framework; yet the engineer, . . . Monsieur Barrault, has shown more skill than 
taste. As for the domed glass roof, ... it is awkwardly placed, and the idea evoked 
. . . is . . . that of a large cloche: industry in a hothouse. . . . On each side of the 
entrance have been placed two superb locomotives with their tenders." This last 
arrangement presumably occasioned by the distribution of prizes which closed the 
exhibition on November 15, 1855. Louis Enault, "Le Palais de l'lndustrie," in 
Paris et les Parisiens auXIX" siecle (Paris, 1856), pp. 313, 315. [F6a,2] 

From Charles-Franyois Viel, De Vlmpuissance des mathematiques pour assurer la 
solidite des batiments (Paris, 1805): Viel distinguishes ordonnance <planning, lay- 
out) from construction and faults the younger architects above all for insufficient 
knowledge of the former. Ultimately responsible is "the new direction that public 
instruction in this art has taken, in the wake of our political tempests" (p. 9). "As 
for the geometers who practice architecture, their buildings — as regards invention 
and construction — prove the nullity of mathematics where ordonnance and struc- 
tural stability are concerned" (p. 10). "The mathematicians . . . claim to have . . . 
reconciled boldness with stability. It is only under the aegis of algebra that these 



two words can meet" (p. 25; it remains to be determined whether this last sentence 
is meant ironically, or whether it distinguishes between algebra and mathematics). 
The author criticizes the Pont du Louvre and the Pont de la Cite (both bridges 
from 1803) in accordance with the principles of Leon Battista Alberti. [F6a,3] 

According to Viel, the first bridges to be built on a constructive basis would have 
been undertaken around 1730. [F7,l] 

In 1855, the Hotel du Louvre was constructed at a rapid tempo, so as to be in place 
for the opening of the world exhibition. "For the first time, the entrepreneurs used 
electric light on the site, in order to double the day's labor; some unexpected 
delays occurred; the city was just coming out of the famous carpenters' strike, 
which put an end to wood-frame structures in Paris. Consequently, the Hotel du 
Louvre possesses the rare distinction of having wedded, in its design, the wood 
paneling of old houses to the iron flooring of modern buildings." V"' G. d'Avenel, 
"Le Mecanisme de la vie moderne," part 1, "Les Grands Magasins," Revue des 
deux mondes (July 15, 1894), p. 340. [F7,2] 

"In the beginning, railroad cars look like stagecoaches, autobuses like omnibuses, 
electric lights like gas chandeliers, and the last like petroleum lamps." Leon 
Pierre-Quint, "Signification du cinema," L'Art cinematographique, 2 (Paris, 
1927), p. 7. [F7.3] 

Apropos of the Empire style of Schinkel: "The building that brings out the lo- 
cation, the substructure that embodies the true seat of invention, . . . these 
things resemble — a vehicle. They convey architectural ideals, which only in this 
sort of way can still be 'practiced.'" Carl Linfert, "Vom Ursprung grosser 
Baugedanken," Frankfurter Zeitung, January 9, 1936. [F7,4] 

On the world exhibition of 1889: "We can say of this festivity that it has been 
celebrated, ahove all, to the glory of iron. . . . Having undertaken to give readers 
of Le Correspondant a rough idea of industry in connection with the Exposition du 
Champ de Mars, we have chosen for our theme 'Metal Structures and Railroads.'" 
Albert de Lapparent, Le Siecle dufer (Paris, 1890), pp. vii-viii. [F7,5] 

On the Crystal Palace: "The arcliitect, Paxton, and the contractors, Messrs. Fox 
and Henderson, had systematically resolved not to use parts with large dimen- 
sions. The heaviest were hollow cast-iron girders, eight meters long, none of which 
weighed more than a ton. . . . Their chief merit was that they were economical. . . . 
Moreover, the execution of the plan was remarkahly rapid, since all the parts were 
of a sort that the factories could undertake to deliver quickly. " Albert de Lappar- 
ent, Le Siecle dufer (Paris, 1890), ]>. 59. [F7,6] 



Lapparent divides iron structures into two classes: iron structures with stone 
facings and true iron structures. He places the following example among the fi rst 



sort. "Labrouste . . . , in 1868, . . . gave to the puhlic the reading room of the 
Bibliotheque Nationale. ... It is difficult to imagine anything more satisfying or 
more harmonious than this great chamher of 1,156 square meters, with its nine 
fretted cupolas, incorporating arches of iron lattice and resting on sixteen light 
cast-iron columns, twelve of which are set against the walls, while four, completely 
free-standing, rise from the floor on pedestals of the same metal." Alhert de Lap- 
parent, Le Siecle dufer (Paris, 1890), pp. 56-57. [F7a,l] 

The engineer Alexis Barrault, who with Viel built the Palace of Industry in 1855, 
was a brother of Emile Barrault. [F7a,2] 

In 1779, the first cast-iron bridge (that of Coalbrookdale). In 1788, its builder 12 
was awarded the Gold Medal of the English Society of Arts. "Since it was in 1790, 
furthermore, that the architect Louis completed the wrought-iron framework for 
the Theatre Frangais in Paris, we may say that the centenary of metal construction 
coincides almost exactly with that of the French Revolution." A. de Lapparent, Le 



On the suhject of the Chinese puzzle, a lithograph: The Triumph of the Kaleido- 
scope, or the Demise »f the Chinese Game. A reclining Chinese man with a hrain- 
teaser spread out on the ground before him. On his shoulder, a female figure has 
planted her foot. In one hand, she carries a kaleidoscope; in the other, a paper or 
a scroll with kaleidoscope patterns. Cahinet des Estampes (dated 1818). [F7a,5] 

"The head turns and the heart tightens when, for the first time, we visit those fairy 
halls where polished iron and dazzling copper seem to move and think by them- 
selves, while pale and feeble man is only the humble servant of those steel giants." 
J. Michelet, Le Peuple (Paris, 1846), p. 82. The author in no way fears that me- 
chanical production will gain the upper hand over human heings. The individual- 
ism of the consumer seems to him to speak against this: each "man now . . . wants 
to be himself. Consequently, he will often care less for products fahricated by 
classes, without any individuality that speaks to his own" (ihid. , p. 78). 13 [F7a,6] 

"Viollet-le-Duc (1814-1879) shows that the architects of the Middle Ages were also 
engineers and resourceful inventors." Amedee Ozenfant, "La Peinture murale," 
Encyclopedia francaise, vol. 16, Arts et litteratu res dans la societe contempo- 
raine, part 1 , p. 70, column 3. [F8,l] 

Protest against the Eiffel Tower: "We come, as writers, painters, sculptors, archi- 
tects, ... in the name of French art and French history, hoth of which are threat- 
ened, ... to protest against the construction, in the very heart of our capital, of 
the useless and monstrous Eiffel Tower. ... Its harharous mass overwhelms 
Notre-Dame, the Sainte-Chapelle, the Tower of Saint- Jacques. All our monuments 



Siecle dufer (Paris, 1890), pp. 11-12. 



[F7a,3] 



Paris, in 1822: a "woodwork strike. 



[F7a,4] 




Le Triomphe du kaleidoscope, ou Le Tombeau du jeu chinois (The 
Triumph of die Kaleidoscope, or The Demise of the Chinese 
Game), 1818. Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale, Paris. 
See F7a,5. 



are debased , our architecture diminished." Cited in Louis Cheronnet, "Les Trois 
Grand-meres de Imposition," Vendredi, April 30, 1937. [F8,2] 

Supposedly there were trees within Musard's "Harmony Hall," on the Boulevard 
Montmartre. [F8,3] 

"It was in 1783, in the construction of the Theatre Francais, that iron was em- 
ployed for the first time on a large scale, by the architect Louis. Never perhaps, 
has a work so audacious been attempted. When, in 1900, the theater was rehuiltin 
the aftermath of a fi re, it was with a weight of iron one hundred times greater than 
that which the architect Louis had used for the same trusswork. Construction in 
iron has provided a succession of buildings, of which the great reading room of the 
Bihliotheque Nationale hy Lahrouste was the first, and one of the most success- 
ful. . . . But iron requires costly maintenance. . . . The world exhibition of 1889 



marked the triumph of exposed ironwork . . . ; at the exhibition of 1900, nearly all 
the iron frames were covered with plasterwork." L' Encyclopedic francaise, vol. 
16, 16-68, pp. 6-7 (Auguste Perret, "Les Besoins collectifs et l'architecture"). 



The "triumph of exposed ironwork" in the age of the genre: "It may be . . . the . . . 
enthusiasm for machine technology and the faith in the superior durability of its 
materials that explains why the attribute 'iron' is used . . . whenever . . . power 
and necessity are supposed to be manifest. Iron are the laws of nature, and iron is 
the 'stride of the worker battalion 1 ; the . . . union of the German empire is suppos- 
edly made of iron, and so is . . . the chancellor himself." Dolf Sternberger, Pano- 



The iron balcony. "In its most rigorous form, the house has a uniform facade. . . . 
Articulation results only from doors and windows. In France, the window is, 
without exception, even in the poorest house, a porte-fenetre, a 'French window' 
opening to the floor. . . . This makes a railing necessary; in the poorer houses it is 
a plain iron bar, hut in the wealthier houses it is of wrought iron. ... At a certain 
stage, the railing becomes an ornament. ... It further contributes to the articula- 
tion of the facade by . . . accenting the lower line of the window. And it fulfills both 
functions without hreaking the plane of the facade. For the great architectural 
mass of the modern house, with its insistent lateral extension, this articulation 
could not possibly suffice. The architects' building-sense demanded that the ever 
stronger horizontal tendency of the house ... be given expression. . . . And they 
discovered the means for this in the traditional iron grille. Across the entire length 
of the building front, on one or two stories, they set a balcony provided with an 
iron grating of this type, which, being black, stands out very distinctly and makes 
a vigorous impression. These balconies, ... up to the most recent period of build- 
ing, were kept very narrow; and if through them the severity of the surface is 
overcome, what can be called the relief of the facade remains nonetheless quite 
flat, overcoming the effect of the wall as little as does the sculpted ornamentation, 
likewise kept flat. In the case of adjoining houses , these balcony railings fuse with 
one another and consolidate the impression of a walled street; and this effect is 
heightened by the fact that, wherever the upper stories are used for commercial 
purposes, the proprietors put up . . . not signboards but matched gilded letters in 
roman style, which, when well spaced across the ironwork, appeal - purely decora- 



[F8,4] 



rama (Hamburg, 1938), p. 31. 



[F8,5] 



live." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), pp. 18-19. 



[F8a] 



[Exhibitions, Advertising, Grandville] 

Yes, when all the world from Paris to China 

Pays heed to your doctrine, O divine Saint-Simon, 

The glorious Golden Age will be reborn. 

Rivers will flow with chocolate and tea, 

Sheep roasted whole will frisk on the plain, 

And sauteed pike will swim in the Seine. 

Fricasseed spinach will grow on the ground, 

Garnished with crushed fried croutons; 

The trees will bring forth apple compotes, 

And fanners will harvest boots and coats. 

It will snow wine, it will rain chickens, 

And ducks cooked with turnips will fall from the sky. 

— Ferdinand Langle and Emile Vanderburch, Louis-Bronze et k Saint- 
Simonien: Parodie de Louis XI (Theatre du Palais-Royal, February 27, 
1832), cited in Theodore Muret, L'Hhtoire par k theitre, 1789-1851 
(Paris, 1865), vol. 3, p. 191 

Music such as one gets to hear on the pianofortes of Saturn's 
ring. 

— Hector Berlioz, A travers chants, authorized German edition pre- 
pared by Richard Pobl (Leipzig, 1864), p. 104 ("Beethoven im Ring 
des Satxim") 



From a European perspective, things looked this way : In all areas of production, 
from the Middle Ages until the beginning of the nineteenth century, the develop- 
ment of technology proceeded at a much slower rate than the development of art. 
Art could take its time in variously assimilating the technological modes of 
operation. But the transformation of things that set in around 1800 dictated the 
tempo to art, and the more breathtaking this tempo became, the more readily the 
dominion of fashion overspread all fields. Finally, we arrive at the present state of 
things: the possibility now arises that art will no longer lind time to adapt some- 
how to technological processes. The advertisement is the ruse by which the 
dream forces itself on industry. [Gl,l] 



Within the frames of the pictures that hung on dining room walls, the advent of 
whiskey advertisements, of Van Houten cocoa, of Amieux canned food is her- 



aided. Naturally, one can say that the bourgeois comfort of the dining room has 
survived longest in small cafes and other such places; but perhaps one can also 
say that the space of the cafe, within which every square meter and every hour 
are paid for more punctually than in apartment houses, evolved out of the latter. 
The apartment from which a cafe was made is a picture puzzle < Vexierbild> with 
the caption: Where is the capital hiding? [Gl ,2] 

Grandville's works are the sibylline books oipublicite. Everything that, with him, 
has its preliminary form as joke, or satire, attains its true unfolding as adver- 
tisement. [Gl,3] 

Handbill of a Parisian textiles dealer from the 1830s: "Ladies and Gentlemen: / I 
ask you to cast an indulgent eye on the following observations; my desire to con- 
tribute to your eternal salvation impels me to address you. Allow me to direct your 
attention to the study of the Holy Scriptures, as well as to the extremely moderate 
prices which I have been the first to introduce into the field of hosiery, cotton 
goods, and related products. No. 13, Rue Pave-Saint-Sauveur." Eduard Kroloff, 
Schilderungen aus Paris (Hamburg, 1839), vol. 2, pp. 50-51. [Gl,4] 

Superposition and advertising: "In the Palais-Royal, not long ago, between the 
columns on the upper story, I happened to see a life-sized oil painting repre- 
senting, in very lively colors, a French generalin full-dress uniform. I take out my 
spectacles to examine more closely the historical subject of the picture, and my 
general is sitting in an armchair holding out a bare foot: the podiatrist, kneeling 
before him, excises the corns." J. F. Reichardt, Vertraute Briefe aus Paris (Ham- 
burg, 1805), vol. 1, p. 178. [Gl,5] 

In 1861, the first lithographic poster suddenly appeared on walls here and there 
around London. It showed the back of a woman in white who was thickly 
wrapped in a shawl and who, in all haste, had just reached the top of a flight of 
stairs, where, her head half turned and a finger upon her lips, she is ever so 
slightly opening a heavy door, through which one glimpses the starry sky. In this 
way Wilkie Collins advertised his latest book, one of the greatest detective novels 
ever written: The Woman in White. See Talmeyr, La Cite' du sang (Paris, 1901), 
pp. 263-264. [Gl,6] 

It is significant that Jugendstil failed in interior design, and soon afterward in 
architecture too, whereas in the street, with the poster, it often found very suc- 
cessful solutions. This is fully confirmed in Behne's discerning critique: "By no 
means was Jugendstil ridiculous in its original intentions. It was looking for 
renewal because it clearly recognized the peculiar contradictions arising between 
imitation Renaissance art and new methods of production determined by the 
machine. But it gradually became ridiculous because it believed that it could 
resolve the enormous objective tensions formally, on paper, in the studio." D In- 
terior D Adolf Behne, Neues Wthnen — Neues Bauen (Leipzig, 1927), p. 15. Of 



course, in the end, the law according to which an action brings about an opposite 
reaction holds true for Jugendstil. The genuine liberation from an epoch, that is, 
has the structure of awakening in this respect as well: it is entirely ruled by 
cunning. Only with cunning, not without it, can we work free of the realm of 
dream. But there is also a false liberation; its sign is violence. From the beginning, 
it condemnedjugendstil to failure. D Dream Structure D [Gl , 7] 

Innermost, decisive significance of the advertisement: "Good posters exist . . . 
only in the domain of trifles, of industry, or of revolution." Maurice Talmeyr, La 
Cite du sang (Paris, 1901), p. 277. The same thought with which the bourgeois 
here detects the tendency of advertising in its early period: "In short, the moral of 
the poster has nothing to do with its art, and its art nothing to do with the moral, 
and this defines the character of the poster" (ibid., p. 275). [Gl,8] 

Just as certain modes of presentation — genre scenes and the like — begin, in the 
course of the nineteenth century, to "cross over" into advertising, so also into the 
realm of the obscene. The Nazarene style and the Makart style have their black 
and their colored lithographic cousins in the field of obscene graphics. I saw a 
plate that, at first glance, could have passed as something like Siegfried's bath in 
dragon blood: green sylvan solitude, crimson mantle of the hero, naked flesh, a 
sheet of water — it was the most complicated embrace of three human bodies, and 
it looked like the frontispiece of an inexpensive book for young people. This is 
the language of color characteristic of the posters that flourished in the arcades. 
When we hear that portraits of famous cancan dancers like Rigolette and 
Frichette would have hung there, we have to imagine them colored like this. 
Falser colors are possible in the arcades; that combs are red and green surprises 
no one. Snow White's stepmother had such things, and when the comb did not 
do its work, the beautiful apple was there to help out — half red, half poison- 
green, like cheap combs. Everywhere gloves play a starring role, colored ones, 
but above all the long black variety on which so many, following Y/ette Guilbert, 
have placed their hopes for happiness, and which will bring some, let us hope, to 
Margo Lion. And laid out on a side table in a tavern, stockings make for an 
ethereal meat counter. [Gla.l] 

The writings of the Surrealists treat words like trade names, and their texts are, at 
bottom, a form of prospectus for enterprises not yet off the ground. Nesting 
today in trade names are figments such as those earlier thought to be hidden in 
the cache of "poetic" vocables. [Gla,2] 

In 1867, a wallpaper dealer put up his posters on the columns of bridges. [Gla,3] 

Manyyears ago, on the streetcar, I saw a posterthat, if things had their due in this 
world, would have found its admirers, historians, exegetes, and copyists just as 
surely as any great poem or painting. And, in fact, it was both at the same time. 



As is sometimes the case with very deep, unexpected impressions, however, the 
shock was too violent: the impression, if I may say so, struck with such force that 
it broke through the bottom of my consciousness and for years lay irrecoverable 
somewhere in the darkness. I knew only that it had to do with "Bullrich Salt" and 
that the original warehouse for this seasoning was a small cellar on Flottwell 
Street, where for years I had circumvented the temptation to get out at this point 
and inquire about the poster. There I traveled on a colorless Sunday afternoon in 
that northern Moabit, a part of town that had already once appeared to me as 
though built by ghostly hands for just this time of day. That was when, four years 
ago, I had come to Liitzow Street to pay customs duty, according to the weight of 
its enameled blocks of houses, on a china porcelain city which I had had sent 
from Rome. There were omens then along the way to signal the approach of a 
momentous afternoon. And, in fact, it ended with the story of the discovery of an 
arcade, a story that is too berlinisch to be told just now in this Parisian space of 
remembrance. Prior to this incident, however, I stood with my two beautiful 
companions in front of a miserable cafe, whose window display was enlivened by 
an arrangement of signboards. On one of these was the legend "Bullrich Salt." It 
contained nothing else besides the words; but around these written characters 
there was suddenly and effortlessly configured that desert landscape of the 
poster. I had it once more. Here is what it looked like. In the foreground, a 
horse-drawn wagon was advancing across the desert. It was loaded with sacks 
bearing the words "Bullrich Salt." One of these sacks had a hole, from which salt 
had already trickled a good distance on the ground. In the background of the 
desert landscape, two posts held a large sign with the words "Is the Best." But 
what about the trace of salt down the desert trail? It formed letters, and these 
letters formed a word, the word "Bullrich Salt." Was not the preestablished 
harmony of a Leibniz mere child's play compared to this tightly orchestrated 
predestination in the desert? And didn't that poster furnish an image for things 
that no one in this mortal life has yet experienced? An image of the everyday in 
Utopia? [Gla,4] 



"The store known as La Chaussee d!Antin had recently announced its new 
inventory of yard goods. Over two million meters of barege, over five million of 
grenadine and poplin, and over diree million of other fabrics — altogether about 
eleven million meters of textiles. Le Tintamarre now remarked, after recommend- 
ing La Chaussee d'Antin to its female readers as the 'foremost house of fashion in 
the world,' and also the 'most dependable': 'The entire French railway system 
comprises barely ten thousand kilometers of tracks — that is, only ten million 
meters. This one store, therefore, with its stock of textiles, could virtually stretch a 
tent over all the railroad tracks of France, "which, especially in the heat of 
summer, would be very pleasant.'" Three or four other establishments of diis 
kind publish similar figures, so that, with all these materials combined, one could 
place not only Paris . . . but the whole departement of the Seine under a massive 
canopy, 'which likewise would be welcome in rainy weather.' But we cam rot help 
asking: How are stores supposed to fi nd room to stock diis gigantic quantity of 



goods? The answer is very simple and, what is more, very logical: each firm is 
always larger than the others. 

"You hear it said: 'La Ville de Paris, the largest store in the capital,' 'Les Villes 
de France, the largest store in the Empire,' 'La Chaussee d'Antin, the largest store 
in Europe,' 'Le Coin de Rue, the largest store in the world.' — 'In the world': that 
is to say, on the entire earth there is none larger; you'd think that would be the 
limit. But no: Les Magasins du Louvre have not been named, and they bear the 
title 'The largest stores in the universe.' The universe! Including Sirius appar- 
ently, and maybe even the 'disappearing twin stars' of which Alexander von 
Humboldt speaks in bis Kosmos." 1 

Here we see the connection between capitalism's evolving commercial adver- 
tising and the work of Grandville. 

< Adolf Ebeling,> Lebende Bilder aus dem modernen Paris, 4 vols. (Cologne, 1863- 
1866), vol. 2, pp. 292-294. [G2,l] 

"Now then, you princes and sovereign states, resolve to pool your riches, your 
resources, your energies in order to ignite, as we do our gas jets, long-extinct 
volcanoes [whose craters, though filled with snow, are spewing torrents of inflam- 
mable hydrogen] ; high cylindrical towers would be necessary to conduct the hot 
springs of Europe into the air, from which — so long as care is taken to avoid any 
premature contact with cooling waters — they will tumble down in cascades [and 
thereby warm the atmosphere]. Artificial concave minors, arranged in a semi- 
circle on mountaintops to refl ect the rays of the sun, would suitably augment the 
tendency of these springs to heat the air." E v. Brandenburg, Victoria! Eine neae 
Welt! Frendevoller Ausnifin Being daraitf, ditfi anf tmserm Planeten, besonders anf der 
von urn bewohnten nbrdlichen Halbkugel eine Male Temperatar-Verdnderimg hinsicht- 
lich der Vermehrung der atmospharischen Warme eingetreten ist,' 2 2nd expanded ed. 
(Berlin, 1835) <pp. 4-5>. D Gas D 

This fanatasy of an insane mind effectively constitutes, under the influence of 
the new invention, an advertisement for gas lighting — an advertisement in the 
comic-cosmic style of Grandville. In general, the close connection between adver- 
tising and the cosmic awaits analysis. [G2,2] 

Exhibitions. "All regions and indeed, retrospectively, all times. From farming and 
mining, from industry and from the machines that were displayed in operation, 
to raw materials and processed materials, to art and the applied arts. In all these 
we see a peculiar demand for premature synthesis, of a kind that is characteristic 
of the nineteenth century in other areas as well: think of the total work of art. 
Apart from indubitably utilitarian motives, the century wanted to generate a 
vision of the human cosmos, as launched in a new movement." Sigf ried Giedion, 
Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig and Berlin, 1928>, p. 37. But these "premature syn- 
theses" also bespeak a persistent endeavor to close up the space of existence and 
of development. To prevent the "airing-out of the classes." [G2,3] 



Apropos of the exhihition of 1867, organized according to statistical principles: 
"To take a turn ahout this place, circular like the equator, is literally to travel 



around the world, for all nations have come here; enemies are coexisting in peace. 
Just as, at the origin of things, the divine spirit was hovering over the orb of the 
waters, so now it hovers over this orb of iron." ^Exposition universelle de 1867 
illustree: Publication internationale autorisee par la commission imperiale, vol. 
2, p. 322 (cited in Giedion, <Banen in Frankreich,> p. 41). [G2,4] 

In connection with the exhibition of 1867. On Offenbach. "For the past ten years, 
this verve of the comic author and this joyous inspiration of the composer have 
been vying with each other for fantastic and serendipitous effects; but only in 
1867, the year of the Universal Exposition, did they attain the height of hilarity, 
the ultimate expression of their exuberance. 3 The success of this theater company, 
already so great, became delirious — something of which our petty victories of 
today can furnish no idea. Paris, that summer, suffered sunstroke." From the 
speech before the Academie Francaise by Henri Lavedan, December 31, 1899 (on 
the election of Meilhac). [G2a,l] 

Advertising is emancipated in Jugendstil. Jugendstil posters are "large, always 
figurative, refined in their colors but not gaudy; they show balls, night clubs, 
movie theaters. They are made for a frothy life — a life with which the sensual 
curves of Jugendstil are well matched." Frankfurter ^eitmg, signed F. L. On an 
exhibition of posters in Mannheim in 1927. D Dream Consciousness D [G2a,2] 

The first London exhibition brings together industries from around the world. 
Following this, the South Kensington museum is founded. Second world exhibition 
in 1862, likewise in London. With the Munich exhibition of 1875, the German 
Renaissance style comes into fashion. [G2a,3] 

Wiertz on the occasion of a world exhibition: "What strikes one at first is not at all 
the things people are making today but the things they will be making in the future. 
/ The human spirit begins to accustom itself to the power of matter." A. J. Wiertz, 
Oeuvres litteraires (Paris, 1870), p. 374. [G2a,4] 

Talmeyr calls the poster "the art of Gomorrah." La Cite du sang (Paris, 1901), 
p. 286. D Jugendstil D [G2a,5] 

Industrial exhibitions as secret blueprint for museums. Art: industrial products 
projected into the past. [G2a,6] 

Joseph Nash painted a series of watercolors for the king of England showing the 
Crystal Palace, the edifice built expressly for London's industrial exhibition in 
1851. The first world exhibition and the first monumental structure in glass and 
ironl From these watercolors, one sees with amazement how the exhibitors took 
pains to decorate the colossal interior in an oriental-fairy-tale style, and how — 
alongside the assortment of goods that filled the arcaded walks — bronze monu- 



ments, marble statues, and bubbling fountains populated the giant halls. D Iron 
□ Interior D [G2a,7] 



The design for the Crystal Palace is by Joseph Paxton, chief gardener to the duke 
of Devonshire, for whom he had built a conservatory (greenhouse) of glass and 
iron at Chatsworth House. His design provided for fir eproofing, plenty of light, 
and the possibility of speedy and inexpensive assembly, and it prevailed over 
those of the London Building Committee, whose competition was held in vain. 4 

[G2a,8] 

"Yes, long live the beer of Vienna! Is it native to this land that produces it? In 
truth, I do not know. But of one thing, there can be no doubt: it is a refined and 
comforting brew. It is not like the beer of Strasbourg ... or Bavaria. ... It is 
divine beer, . . . clear as the thought of a poet, light as a swallow in flight, robust 
and alcohol-charged as the pen of a German philosopher. It is digested like the 
purest water, and it refreshes like ambrosia." Advertisement for Fanta Beer of 
Vienna. No. 4, Rue Halevy, near the Nouvel Opera, New Year's 1866. Almanack 
indicateur parisien (Paris, 1866), p. 13. [G2a,9] 

"Another new word: la reclame (advertisement). Will it make a fortune?" Nadav, 
Quand j'etais photographe (Paris <1900>), p. 309. [G2a,l#] 

Between the February Revolution and the June Insurrection: "All the walls were 
covered with revolutionary posters which, some years later, Alfred Delvau re- 
printed in two thick volumes under the title Les Murailles revolutionnaires, so 
that today we can still get some idea of this remarkable poster literature. There 
was scarcely a palace or a church on which these notices could not be seen. Never 
before was such a multitude of placards on view in any city. Even the government 
made use of this medium to publish its decrees and proclamations, while thou- 
sands of other people resorted to affiches in order to air their views publicly on all 
possible questions. As the time for the opening of the National Assembly drew 
near, the language of the posters grew wilder and more passionate. . . . The num- 
ber of public criers increased every day; thousands and thousands of Parisians, 
who had nothing else to do, became news vendors." Sigmund Englander, 
Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 2, 
pp. 279-280. [G3,l] 

"A short merry piece that is customarily presented here before the performance of 
a new play: Harlequin afficheur <Harlequin the Bill-Sticker >. In one quite funny 
and charming scene, a poster for the comedy is stuck on Columbine's house." J. F. 
Reichardt, Vertraute Briefe aus Paris (Hamburg, 1805), vol. 1, p. 457. [G3,2] 

"These days, a good many houses in Paris appear to be decorated in the style of 
Harlequin's costume; I mean a patchwork of large green, yellow, [a word illegible] 
and pink pieces of paper. The bill-stickers wrangle over the walls and come to 



blows over a streetcorner. The best of it is that all these posters cover one another 
up at least ten times a day." Eduard Kroloff , Schilderungen aus Paris (Hamburg, 
1839), vol. 2, p. 57. [G3,3] 



"Paul Siraudin, born in 1814., has been active in the theater since 1835; he has 
supplemented this activity with practical efforts in the field of confectionery. The 
results of these efforts beckon no less temptingly from the large display window in 
the Rue de la Paix than the sugar almonds, bonbons, honey cakes, and sweet 
crackers offered to the public in the form of one-act dramatic sketches at the 
Palais-Royal." Rudolf Gottschall, "Das Theater und Drama des Second Empire," 
in Unsere Zeit: Deutsche Revue — Monatsschrift zum Conversationslexicon 
(Leipzig, 1867), p. 933. [G3,4] 

From Coppee's speech to the Academie Francaise ("Response to Heredia," May 
30, 1895), it can be inferred that a strange sort of written image could formerly be 
seen in Paris: "Calligraphic masterpieces which, in the old days, were exhibited on 
every streetcorner, and in which we could admire the portrait of Beranger or 'The 
Taking of the Bastille' in the form of paraphs" <p. 46>. [G3 ,5] 

Le Charivari of 1836 has an illustration showing a poster that covers half a 
housefront. The windows are left uncovered, except for one, it seems. Out of 
that a man is leaning while cutting away the obstructing piece of paper. 

[G3,6] 

"Essence d'Amazilly, fragrance and antiseptic, hygienic toiletries from Duprat 
and Company." "If we have named our essence after the daughter of a cacique, it 
is only to indicate that the vegetal ingredients to which this distillation owes its 
surprising effectiveness come from the same torrid climate as she does. The term 
'antiseptic' belongs to the lexicon of science, and we use it only to point out that, 
apart from the incomparable benefits our product offers to ladies, it possesses 
hygienic virtues calculated to win the confidence of all those willing to be convinced 
of its salutary action. For if our lotion, unlike the waters of the Fountain of Youth , 
has no power to wash away the accumulated years, at least it does have, in addi- 
tion to other merits, the inestimable advantage (we believe) of restoring to the full 
extent of its former radiance the lost majesty of that consummate entity, that 
masterpiece of Creation which, with the elegance, purity, and grace of its forms, 
makes up the lovelier half of humanity. Without the providential supervention of 
our discovery, this most brilliant and delicate ornament — resembling, in the ten- 
der charms of its mysterious structure, a fragile blossom that wilts at the first hard 
rain — would enjoy, at best, but a fugitive splendor, after the fading of which it 
must needs languish under the ruinous cloud of illness, the fatiguing demands of 
nursing, or the no less injurious embrace of the pitiless corset. Developed, above 
all, in the interests of ladies, our Essence d'Amazilly answers to the most exacting 
and most intimate requirements of their toilette. It unites, thanks to a happy 
infusion, all that is necessary to revive, foster, and enhance natural attractions, 



without the slightest detriment." (Cited in> Charles Simond, Paris de 1800 a 1900 
(Paris, 1900), vol. 2, p. 510 ("Une Reclame de parfumeur en 1857")/' [G3a,l] 



"Gravely, the sandwich-man bears his double burden, light as it is. A young lady 
whose rotundity is only temporary smiles at the walking poster, yet wishes to read 
it even as she smiles. The happy author of her abdominal salience likewise bears a 
burden of his own." <The husband has his wife on his right arm and a large box 
under his left. Along with four other people, they are clustered around a sand- 
wich-man seen from the haclo Text accompanying a lithograph entitled 
"L'Homme-affiche sur la Place des Victoires," from Nouveaux Tableaux de Paris, 
text to plate 63 [the lithographs are by Marie t]. This hook is a sort of Hogaith ad 
usum Delphini. [G3a,2] 

Beginning of Alfred Delvau's preface to Les Murailles revolutionnaires: "These 
revolutionary placards — at the bottom of which we set our obscure name — form 
an immense and unique composition, one without precedent, we believe, in the 
history of books. They are a collective work. The author is Monsieur Everyone — 
Mein Herr Omnes, as Luther says." Les Murailles revolutionnaires de 1848, 16th 
ed. (Paris <1852>), vol. 1, p. 1 . [G3a,3] 

"When, in 1798, under the Directory, the idea of puhlic exhibitions was inaugu- 
rated on the Champ de Mars, there were 110 exhibitors, of whom twenty-five were 
awarded medals." Palais de I'Industrie (distributed hy H. Plon). [G4,l] 

"Beginning in 1801, the products of newly emerging industries were exhibited in 
the courtyard of the Louvre." Lucien Dubech and Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire de 
Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 335. [G4,2] 

"Every fi ve years — in 1834, 1839, and 1844 — the products of industry are exhib- 
ited in Marigny Square." Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 389. 

[G4,3] 

"The first exhibition dates back to 1798; set up on the Champ de Mars, it was . . . 
an exhihition of the products of French industry and was conceived by Francois de 
Neufchateau. There were three national exhibitions under the Empire (in 1801, 
1802, and 1806), the first two in the courtyard of the Louvre, the third at the 
Invalides. There were three during the Restoration (in 1819, 1823, and 1827), all 
at the Louvre; three during the July Monarchy (in 1834 , 1839, and 1844), on the 
Place de la Concorde and the Champs-Elysees; and one under the Second Repuh- 
lic, in 1849. Then, following the example of England, which had organized an 
international exhibition in 1851, Imperial France held world exhibitions on the 
Champ de Mars in 1855 and 1867. The fi rst saw the birth of the Palais de I'Indus- 
trie, demolished during the Republic; the second was a delirious festival marking 
the high point of the Second Empire. In 1878, a new exhihition was organized to 
attest to rehirth after defeat; it was held on the Champ de Mars in a temporary 



palace erected by Formige. It is characteristic of these enormous fairs to be 
ephemeral, yet each of them has left its trace in Paris. The exhibition of 1878 was 
responsible for the Trocadero, that eccentric palace clapped down on the top of 
Chaillot by Davioud and Boivrdais, and also for the footbridge at Passy, built to 
replace the Pont d'lena, which was no longer usable. The exhibition of 1889 left 
behind the Galerie des Machines, which was eventually torn down, although the 
Eiffel Tower still stands." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), 
p. 461. [G4,4] 

'"Europe is off to view the merchandise,' said Renan — contemptuously — of the 
1855 exhibition." Paul Morand, 1900 (Paris, 1931), p. 71. [G4,5] 

'"This year has been lost for propaganda,' says a socialist orator at the congress of 
1900." Paul Morand, 1900 (Paris, 1931), p. 129. [G4,6] 

"In 1798, a universal exposition of industry was announced; it was to take place 
... on the Champ de Mars. The Directory had charged the minister of the interior, 
Francois de Neuf chateau, with organizing a national festival to commemorate the 
founding of the Republic. The minister had conferred with several people, who 
proposed holding contests and games, like greasy-pole climbing. One person sug- 
gested that a great market be set up after the fashion of country fairs, but on a 
larger scale. Finally, it was proposed that an exhibition of paintings be included. 
These last two suggestions gave Francois de Neuf chateau the idea of presenting an 
exhibition of industry in celebration of the national festival. Thus, the first indus- 
trial exposition is born from the wish to amuse the working classes , and it becomes 
for them a festival of emancipation. . . . The increasingly popular character of 
industry starts to become evident. . . . Silk fabrics are replaced by woolens, and 
satin and lace by materials more in keeping with the domestic requirements of the 
Third Estate: woolen bonnets and corduroys. . . . Chaptal, the spokesman for this 
exhibition, calls the industrial state by its name for the first time." Sigmund 
Englander, Geschichte der franzosischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 
1864), vol. 1, pp. 51-53. [G4.7] 

"In celebrating the centenary of the great Revolution, the French bourgeoisie has, 
as it were, intentionally set out to demonstrate to the proletariat ad oculos the 
economic possibility and necessity of a social uprising. The world exhibition has 
given the proletariat an excellent idea of the unprecedented level of development 
which the means of production have reached in all civilized lands — a development 
far exceeding the boldest Utopian fantasies of the century preceding this one. . . . 
The exhibition has further demonstrated that modern development of the forces of 
production must of necessity lead to industrial crises that, given the anarchy cur- 
rently reigning in production, will only grow more acute with the passage of time, 
and hence more destructive to the course of the world economy." G. Plekhanov, 
"Wie die Bourgeoisie ihrer Revolution gedenkt," Die neue Zeit, 9, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 
1891), p. 138. [G4a,l] 



"Despite all the posturing with which Teutonic arrogance tries to represent the 
capital of the Reich as the brightest beacon of civilization, Berlin has not yet been 
able to mount a world exhibition. ... To try to excuse this deplorable fact by 
claiming that world exhibitions have had their day and now are nothing but gaudy 
and grandiose vanity fairs, and so forth, is a crass evasion. We have no wish to 
deny the drawbacks of world exhibitions . . . ; nevertheless, in every case they 
remain incomparably more powerful levers of human culture than the countless 
barracks and churches with which Berlin has been inundated at such great cost. 
The recurrent initiatives to establish a world exhibition have foundered, first of 
all, on the lack of energy . . . afflicting the bourgeoisie, and, second, on the poorly 
disguised resentment with which an absolutist-feudal militarism looks on anything 
that could threaten its — alas! — still germinating roots." <Anonymous,> "Klass- 
enkampfe," Die neue Zeit, 12, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1894), p. 257. [G4a,2] 

On the occasion of the world exhibition of 1867, Victor Hugo issued a manifesto to 
the peoples of Europe. [G4a,3] 

Chevalier was a disciple of Enfantin. Editor of he Globe. [G4a,4] 

Apropos of Roland de la Platiere's Encyclopedic methodique: "Turning to les 
manufactures, . . . Roland writes: 'Industry is born of need. . . .' It might appear 
from this that the term is being used in the classical sense of industria. What 
follows provides clarification: 'But this fecund and perverse riverhead, of irregu- 
lar and retrogressive disposition, eventually came down from the uplands to flood 
the fields, and soon nothing could satisfy the need which overspread the land.' . . . 
What is significant is his ready employment of the word industrie, more than thirty 
years before the work of Chaptal." Henri Hauser, Les Debuts du capitalisme 
(Paris, 1931), pp. 315-316. [G4a,5] 

"With price tag affixed, the commodity comes on the market. Its material quality 
and individuality are merely an incentive for buying and selling; for the social 
measure of its value, such quality is of no importance whatsoever. The commodity 
has become an abstraction. Once escaped from the hand of the producer and 
divested of its real particularity, it ceases to be a product and to he ruled over by 
human beings. It has acquired a 'ghostly objectivity' and leads a life of its own. 'A 
commodity appears, at fi rst sight, to be a trivial and easily understood thing. Our 
analysis shows that, in reality, it is a vexed and complicated thing, abounding in 
metaphysical subtleties and theological niceties.' Cut off from the will of man, it 
aligns itself in a mysterious hierarchy, develops or declines exchangeability, and, 
in accordance withits own peculiar laws, performs as an actor on a phantom stage. 
In the language of the commodities exchange, cotton 'soars,' copper 'slumps,' 
corn 'is active,' coal 'is sluggish,' wheat 'is on the road to recovery,' and petro- 
leum 'displays a healthy trend.' Things have gained autonomy, and they take on 
human features. . . . The commodity has been transformed into an idol that, al- 
though the product of human hands, disposes over the human. Marx speaks of the 



fetish character of the commodity. 'This fetish character of the commodity world 
has its origin in the peculiar social character of the labor that produces commodi- 
ties. ... It is only the particular social relation between people that here assumes, 
in the eyes of these people, the phantasmagorical form of a relation between 
things.'" 6 Otto Riihle, KarlMarx (Hellerau <1928>), pp. 384-385. [G5,l] 

"According to official estimates, a total of about 750 workers, chosen by their 
comrades or else named by the entrepreneurs themselves, visited London's world 
exhibition in 1862. . . . The official character of this delegation, and the manner in 
which it was constituted, naturally inspired little confidence in the revolutionary 
and republican emigres from France. This circumstance perhaps explains why the 
idea of an organized reception for this deputation originated with the editors of an 
organ dedicated to the cooperative movement. ... At the urging of the editorial 
staff of The Working Man, a committee was formed to prepare a welcome for the 
French workers .... Those named to participate included . . . J . Morton Peto, . . . 
and Joseph Paxton. . . . The interests of industry were put foremost, . . . and the 
need for an agreement between workers and entrepreneurs, as the sole means of 
bettering the difficult condition of the workers, was strongly underlined. . . . We 
cannot . . . regard this gathering as the birthplace ... of the International Work- 
ingmen's Association. That is a legend. . . . The truth is simply that this visit 
acquired, through its indirect consequences, momentous importance as a key step 
on the way to an understanding between English and French workers." 
D. Rjazanov, "Zur Geschichte der ersten Internationale," in Marx-Engels Archiv, 
vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main, 1928>, pp. 157, 159-160. [G5,2] 

"Already, for the first world exhibition in 1851, some of the workers proposed by 
the entrepreneurs were sent to London at the state's expense. There was also, 
however, an independent delegation dispatched to London on the initiative of 
Blanqui (the economist) and Emile de Girardin. . . . This delegation submitted a 
general report in which, to be sure, we find no trace of the attempt to establish a 
permanent liaison with English workers, but in which the need for peaceful rela- 
tions between England and France is stressed. ... In 1855, the second world 
exhibition took place, this time in Paris. Delegations of workers from the capital, 
as well as from the provinces, were now totally barred. It was feared that they 
would give workers an opportunity for organizing." D. Rjazanov, "Zur Geschichte 
del - ersten Internationale," in Marx-Engels Archiv, ed. Rjazanov, vol. 1 (Frank- 
furt am Main), pp. 150-151. [G5a,l] 

The subtleties of Grandville aptly express what Marx calls the "theological nice- 
ties'" of the commodity. [G5a,2] 



"The sense of taste is a carriage with four wheels, which are: (1) Gastronomy, (2) 
Cuisine; (3) Company; (4) Culture." From <Fourier's> ISouveau Monde industriel 
et societaire (1829), cited in E. Poisson, Fourier (Paris, 1932), p. 130. [G5a,3] 



Connection of the first world exhibition in London in 18 51 with the idea of free 
trade. [G5a,4] 



"The world exhibitions have lost much of their original character. The enthusiasm 
that, in 1851, was felt in the most disparate circles has subsided, and in its place 
has come a kind of cool calculation. In 1851, we were living in the era of free 
trade. . . . For some decades now, we have witnessed the spread of protection- 
ism. . . . Participation in the exhibition becomes ... a sort of representation . . . ; 
and whereas in 1850 the ruling tenet was that the government need not concern 
itself in this affair, the situation today is so far advanced that the government of 
each country can be considered a veritable entrepreneur." Julius Lessing, Das 
halbe Jahrhundert der Weltausstellungen (Berlin, 1900), pp. 29-30. [G5a,5] 

In London, in 1851, "appeared . . . the first cast-steel cannon by Krupp. Soon 
thereafter, the Prussian minister of war placed an order for more than 200 exem- 
plars of this model." Julius Lessing, Das halbe Jahrhundert der Weltausstellun- 
gen (Berlin, 1900), p. 11. [G5a,6] 

"From the same sphere of thought that engendered the great idea of free trade 
arose . . . the notion that no one would come away empty-handed — rather, the 
contrary — from an exhibition at which he had staked his best so as to be able to 
take home the best that other people had to offer. . . . This bold conception, in 
which the idea for the exhibition originated, was put into action. Within eight 
months, everything was finished. 'An absolute wonder that has become a part of 
history. ' At the foundation of the entire undertaking, remarkably enough, rests 
the principle that such a work must be backed not by the state but by the free 
activity of its citizens. . . . Originally, two private contractors, the Munday broth- 
ers, offered to build, at their own risk, a palace costing a million marks. But 
grander proportions were resolved on, and the necessary funds for guaranteeing 
the enterprise, totaling many millions, were subscribed in short order. The great 
new thought found a great new form. The engineer Paxton built the Crystal Pal- 
ace. In every land rang out the news of something fabulous and unprecedented: a 
palace of glass and iron was going to be built, one that would cover eighteen acres. 
Not long before this, Paxton had constructed a vaulted roof of glass and iron for 
one of the greenhouses at Kew, in which luxuriant palms were growing, and this 
achievement gave him the courage to take on the new task. Chosen as a site for the 
exhibition was the finest park in London, Hyde Park, which offered in the middle 
a wide open meadow, traversed along its shorter axis by an avenue of splendid 
elms. But anxious onlookers soon raised a cry of alarm lest these trees be sacrificed 
for the sake of a whim. 'Then I shall roof over the trees,' was Paxton's answer, and 
he proceeded to design the transept, which, with its semicylindrical vault elevated 
112 feet above the ground, . . . accommodated the whole row of elms. It is in the 
highest degree remarkable and significant that this Great Exhibition of London — 
born of modern conceptions of steam power, electricity, and photography, and 
modern conceptions of free trade — should at the same time have afforded the 



decisive impetus, within this period as a whole, for the revolution in artistic forms. 
To build a palace out of glass and iron seemed to the world, in those days, a 
fantastic inspiration for a temporary piece of architecture. We see now that it was 
the first great advance on the road to a wholly new world of forms. . . . The con- 
structive style, as opposed to the historical style, has become the watchword of the 
modern movement. When did this idea make its triumphal entry into the world? In 
the year 1851, with the Crystal Palace in London. At first, people thought it impos- 
sible that a palace of colossal proportions could be built f rom glass and iron. In the 
publications of the day, we find the idea of assembling iron components, so famil- 
iar to us now, represented as something extraordinary. England can boast of hav- 
ing accomplished this quite novel task in the space of eight months, using its 
existing factories, without any additional capacity. One points out triumphantly 
that ... in the sixteenth century a small glazed window was still a luxury item, 
whereas today a building covering eighteen acres can be constructed entirely out 
of glass. To a manlike Lothar Bucher, the meaning of this new structure was clear: 
it was the undisguised architectural expression of the transverse strength of slen- 
der iron components. But the fantastic charm which the edifice exerted on all souls 
went well beyond such a characterization, however crucial for the program of the 
future; and in this regard, the preservation of the magnificent row of trees for the 
central transept was of capital importance. Into this space were transported all the 
horticultural glories which the rich conservatories of England had been able to 
cultivate. Lightly plumed palms from the tropics mingled with the leafy crowns of 
the five-hundred-year-old elms; and within this enchanted forest the decorators 
arranged masterpieces of plastic art, statuary, large bronzes, and specimens of 
other artworks. At the center stood an imposing crystal fountain. To the right and 
to the left ran galleries in which visitors passed from one national exhibit to the 
other. Overall, it seemed a wonderland, appealing more to the imagination than to 
the intellect. 'It is with sober economy of phrase that I term the prospect incompa- 
rably fairy-like. This space is a summer night's dream in the midnight sun 1 
(Lothar Bucher). Such sentiments were registered throughout the world. I myself 
recall, from my childhood, how the news of the Crystal Palace reached us in 
Germany, and how pictures of it were hung in the middle-class parlors of distant 
provincial towns. It seemed then that the world we knew from old fairy tales — of 
the princess in the glass coffin, of queens and elves dwelling in crystal houses — had 
come to life . . . , and these impressions have persisted through the decades. The 
great transept of the palace and part of the pavilions were transferred to Syden- 
ham, where the building stands today;" there I saw it in 1862, with feelings of awe 
and the sheerest delight. It has taken four decades, numerous fires, and many 
depredations to ruin this magic, although even today it is still not completely 
vanished." Julius Lessing, Das halbe ] ahrhundert der Weltausstellungen (Berlin, 



1900), pp. 6-10. 



[G6; G6a,l] 



Organizing the New York exhibition of 1853 fell to Phineas Barnum. 



[G6a,2] 



"Le Play has calculated that the number of years required to prepare a world 
exhibition equals the number of months it runs. . . . There is obviously a shocking 



Exterior of the Crystal Palace, London. See G6; G6a,l. 



disproportion here between the period of gestation and the duration of the enter- 
prise." Maurice Pecard, Les Expositions internationales au point de vue econo- 
mique et social, particulierement en France (Paris, 1901), p. 23. [G6a,3] 

A bookseller's poster appears in Les Murailles revolutionnaires de 1848 with the 
following explanatory remark: "We offer this afjiche, as later we shall offer others 
unrelated to the elections or to the political events of the day. We offer it hecause it 
tells why and how certain manufacturers profi t from certain occasions." From the 
poster: "Read this important notice against Swindlers. Monsieur Alexandre 
Pierre, wishing to stop the daily abuses created hy the general ignorance of the 
Argot and Jargon of swindlers and dangerous men, has made good use of the 
unhappy time he was forced to spend with them as a victim of the fallen Govern- 
ment; now restored to liberty by our noble Repuhlic, he has just puhlished the 
fruit of those sad studies he was able to make in prison. He is not afraid to descend 



into the midst «f these horrible places, and even into the Lions' Den, if hy these 
means ... he can shed light on the principal words of their conversations, and 
thus make it possible to avoid the misfortunes and abuses that result from not 
knowing these words, which until now were intelligible only to swindlers. . . . On 
sale from public vendors and from the Author." Les Murailles revolutionnaires de 
1848 (Paris <1852>), vol. 1, p. 320. [G7,l] 

If the commodity was a fetish, then Grandville was the tribal sorcerer. [G7,2] 

Second Empire: "The government's candidates . . . were able to print their procla- 
mations on white paper, a color reserved exclusively for official publications." 
A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 271. [G7,3] 

Injugendstil we see, for the first time, the integration of the human body into 
advertising. D Jugendstil □ [G7,4] 

Worker delegations at the world exhibition of 1867. At the top of the agenda is the 
demand for the abrogation of Article 1781 of the Civil Code, which reads: "The 
employer's word shall be taken as true in his statement of wages apportioned, of 
salary paid for the year ended, and of accounts given for the current year" 
(p. 140). — "The delegations of workers at the exhibitions of London and Paris in 
1862 and in 1867 gave a direction to the social movement of the Second Empire, 
and even, we may say, to that of the second half of the nineteenth century. . . . 
Their reports were compared to the records of the Estates General; the former 
were the signal for a social evolution, just as the latter, in 1789, had been the cause 
of a political and economic revolution" (p. 207). — [This comparison comes from 
Michel Chevalier.] Demand for a ten-hour workday (p. 121). — "Four hundred 
thousand free tickets were distributed to the workers of Paris and various 
departements . A barracks with more than 30,000 beds was put at the disposal of 
the visiting workers" (p. 84). Henry Fougere, Les Delegations ouvrieres aux expo- 
sitions universelles (Montlucon, 1905). [G7,5] 

Gatherings of worker delegations of 1867 at the "training ground of the Passage 
Raoul." Fougere, p. 85. [G7a,l] 

"The exhibition had long since closed, but the delegates continued their discus- 
sions, and the parliament of workers kept holding sessions in the Passage Raoul." 
Henry Fougere, Les Delegations ouvrieres aux expositions universelles sous le 
second empire (Montlucon, 1905), pp. 86-87. Altogether, the sessions lasted from 
July 21,1867, until July 14, 1869. [G7a,2] 

International Association of Workers. '"The Association . . . dates from 1862, 
from the time of the world exhibition in London. It was there that English and 
French workers first met, to hold discussions and seek mutual enlightenment.' 
Statement made by M. Tolain on March 6, 1868, . . . during thefirst suit brought 



by the government against the International Association of Workers." Henry 
Fougere, Les Delegations ouvrieres aux expositions universelles sous le second 
empire (Montlucon, 1905), p. 75. The first great meeting in London drafted a 
declaration of sympathy for the liberation of the Poles. [G7a,3] 

In the three or four reports by the worker delegations who took part in the world 
exhibition of 1867, there are demands for the abolition of standing armies and for 
general disarmament. Delegations of porcelain painters, piano repairmen, shoe- 
makers, and mechanics. See Fougere, pp. 163-164.. [G7a,4] 

1867. "Whoever visited the Champ de Mars for the first time got a singular impres- 
sion. Arriving by the central avenue, he saw at first . . . only iron and smoke. . . . 
This initial impression exerted such an influence on the visitor that, ignoring the 
tempting diversions offered by the arcade, he would hasten toward the movement 
and noise that attracted him. At every point . . . where the machines were momen- 
tarily still, he could hear the strains of steam-powered organs and the symphonies 
of brass instruments." A. S. de Doncourt, Les Expositions universelles (Lille and 
Paris <1889>), pp. 111-112. [G7a,5] 

Theatrical works pertaining to the world exhibition of 1855: Paris trop petit, 
August 4, 1855, Theatre du Luxembourg; Paul Meurice, Paris, July 21, Porte- 
Saint-Martin; Theodore Barriere and Paul de Kock, L 'Histoire de Paris and Les 
Grands Siecles, September 29; Les Modes de Vex position; Dzim boom boom: Re- 
vue de V exhibition; Sebastien Rheal, La Vision de Faustus, ou L 'Exposition uni- 
verselle de 1855. In Adolphe Demy, Esstii historique sur les expositions 
universelles de Paris (Paris, 1907), p. 90. [G7a,6] 

London's world exhibition of 1862: "No trace remained of the edifying impression 
made hy the exhibition of 1851. . . . Nevertheless, this exhibition had some note- 
worthy results. . . . The greatest surprise . . . came from China. Up l:o this time, 
Europe had seen nothing of Chinese art except . . . the ordinary porcelains sold on 
the market. But now I he Anglo-Chinese war had taken place . . ., and the Summer 
Palace had been burned to the ground, supposedly as punishment. '' In truth, 
however, the English had succeeded even more than their allies, the French, in 
carrying away a large portion of the treasures amassed in that palace, and these 
treasures were subsequently put on exhibit in London in 1862. For the sake of 
discretion, it was women rather than men . . . who acted as exhibitors." Julius 
Lessing, Das halbe Jahrhundert der Weltausstellungen (Berlin, 1900), p. 16. 

[G8.1] 

Lessing (Das halbe Jahrhundert der Weltausstellungen [Berlin, 1900], p. 4) 
points up the difference between the world exhibitions and the fairs. For the latter, 
the merchants hrought their whole stock of goods along with them. The world 
exhibitions presuppose a considerable development of commercial as well as in- 




dustrial credit — that is to say, credit on the part of the customers, as well as on the 
part of the firms taking their orders. [G8,2] 



"You deliberately had to close your eyes in order not to realize that the fair on the 
Champ de Mars in 1798, that the superb porticoes of the courtyard of the Louvre 
and the courtyard of the Invalides constructed in the following years, and, finally, 
that the memorahle royal ordinance of January 13, 1819,"' have powerfully con- 
tributed to the glorious development of French industry. ... It was reserved for 
the king of France to transform the magnificent galleries of his palace into an 
immense bazaar, in order that his people might contemplate . . . these unblooclied 
trophies raised up by the genius of the arts and the genius of peace." <J»seph- 
Charles> Chenou and H.D., Notice sur V exposition des produits de I'industrie et 
des arts qui a eu lieu a Douai en 1827 (Douai, 1827), p. 5. [G8,3] 

Three different delegations of workers were sent to London in 1851; none of 
them accomplished anything significant. Two were official: one represented the 
National Assembly, and one the municipality of Paris. The private delegation 
was put together with the support of the press, in particular of Emile de Girardin. 
The workers themselves played no part in assembling these delegations. [G8,4] 

The dimensions of the Crystal Palace, according to A. S. Doncourt, Les Exposi- 
tions universelles (Lille and Paris <1889>), p. 12. The long sides measured 560 
meters. [G8,5] 

On the workers' delegations to the Great Exhibition in London in 1862: "Electoral 
offices were being rapidly organized when, on the eve of elections, an incident . . . 
arose to impede the operations. The Paris police . . . took umbrage at this unprece- 
dented development, and the Workers Commission was ordered to cease its ac- 
tivities. Convinced that this measure . . . could only be the result of a mis- 
understanding, members of the Commission took their appeal directly to His 
Majesty. . . . The emperor . . . was, in fact, willing to authorize the Commisssion to 
pursue its task. The elections . . . resulted in the selection of two hundred dele- 
gates .... A period of ten days had been granted to each group to accomplish its 
mission. Each delegate received, on his departure, the sum of 115 francs, a sec- 
ond-class round-trip train ticket, lodging, and a meal, as well as a pass to the 
exhibition. . . . This great popular movement took place without the slightest inci- 
dent that . . . could have been termed regrettable." Rapports des delegues des 
ou.vriers parisiens a Vexposition de Londres en 1862, publies par la Commission 
ouvriere (Paris, 1862-1864) [1 vol.!], pp. iii-iv. (The document contains fifty- 
three reports by delegations from the different trades.) [G8a,l] 

Paris, 1855. "Four locomotives were guarding the hall of machines, like those 
great bulls of Ninevah, or like the sphinxes to be seen at the entrance to Egyptian 
temples. This hall was a land of iron and fire and water; the ears were deafened, 
the eyes dazzled. . . . All was in motion. One saw wool combed, cloth twisted, yarn 



clipped, grain threshed, coal extracted, chocolate refined, and on and on. All 
exhibitors without exception were allowed motility and steam, contrary to what 
went on in London in 1851, when only the English exhibitors had had the benefit of 
fire and water." A. S. Doncourt, Les Expositions universelles (Lille and Paris 



<1889>), p. 53. [G8a,2] 

In 1867, the "oriental quarter" was the center of attraction. [G8a,3] 

Fifteen million visitors to the exhibition of 1867. [G8a,4] 

In 1855, for the first time, merchandise could be marked with a price. [G8a,5] 



"Le Play had . . . understood how necessary it would become to find what we call, 
in modern parlance, 'a draw' — some star attraction. He likewise foresaw that this 
necessity would lead to mismanagement of the exhibitions, and this is the issue . . . 
to which M. Claudio- Janet addressed himself in 1889: 'The economist M. Frederic 
Passy, a worthy man, has for many years now, in his speeches to Parliament and to 
the Academie, been denouncing the abuses of the street fairs. Everything he says 
about the gingerbread fair . . . can also be said (allowing for differences in magni- 
tude) of the great centennial celebration."' A note at this point: "The centennial 
celebration, in fact, was so successful that the Eiffel Tower, which cost 6 million 
francs, had already earned, by the fifth of November, 6,459,581 francs." Maurice 
Pecard, Les Expositions internationales au point de vue economique et sociale, 
particulierement en France (Paris, 1901), p. 29. [G9,l] 

The exhibition palace of 1867 on the Champ de Mars — compared by some to 
Rome's Colosseum: "The arrangement conceived by Le Play, the head of the exhi- 
bition committee, was a most felicitous one. The objects on exhibit were distrib- 
uted, according to their materials, in eight concentric galleries; twelve avenues . . . 
branched out from the center, and the principal nations occupied the sectors cut 
by those radii. In this way, ... by strolling around the galleries, one could . . . 
survey the state of one particular industry in all the different countries, whereas, 
by strolling up the avenues that crossed them, one could survey the state of the 
different branches of industry in each particular country." Adolphe Demy, Essai 
historique sur les expositions universelles de Paris (Paris, 1907), p. 129. — Cited 
here is Theophile Gautier's article about the palace in Le Moniteur of September 
17, 1867: "We have before us, it seems, a monument created on another planet, on 
Jupiter or Saturn, according to a taste we do not recognize and with a coloration to 
which our eyes are not accustomed." Just before this: "The great azure gulf, with 
its blood-colored rim, produces a vertiginous effect and unsettles our ideas of 
architecture.'" [G9,2] 

Resistance to the world exhibition of 1851: "The king of Prussia forbade the royal 
prince and princess . . . from traveling to London. . . . The diplomatic corps re- 
fused to address any word of congratulations to the queen. 'At this moment,' 



wrote . . . Prince Albert to his mother on April 15, 1851, . . . 'the opponents of the 
Exhibition are hard at work. . . . The foreigners, they cry, will start a radical 
revolution here; they will kill Victoria and myself and proclaim a red republic. 
Moreover, the plague will surely result from the influx of such multitudes and will 
devour those who have not been driven away by the high prices on everything.'" 
Adolphe Demy, Essai historique sur les expositions universelles (Paris, 1907), 
p. 38. [G9,3] 

Francois de Neuf chateau on the exhibition of 1798 (in Demy, Essai historique sur 
les expositions universelles). '"The French,' he declared, . . . 'have amazed 
Europe by the swiftness of their military successes; they should launch a career in 
commerce and the arts with just the same fervor'" (p. 14). "This initial exposition 
... is really an initial campaign, a campaign disastrous for English industry" 
(p. 18). — Martial character of the opening procession: "(1) a contingent of trum- 
peters; (2) a detachment of cavalry; (3) the first two squads of mace bearers; (4) 
the drums; (5) a military marching band; (6) a squad of infantry; (7) the heralds; 
(8) the festival marshal; (9) the artists registered in tbe exhibition; (10) the jury" 
(p. 15). — Neuf chateau awards the gold medal to the most heroic assault on English 
industry. [G9a,l] 

The second exhibition, in Year IX," was supposed to bring together, in the court- 
yard of the Louvre, works of industry and of the plastic arts. But the artists 
refused to exhibit their work alongside that of manufacturers (Demy, p. 19). 

[G9a,2] 

Exhibition of 1819. "The king, on the occasion of the exhibition, conferred the 
title of baron on Ternaux and Oberkampf. . . . The granting of aristocratic titles to 
industrialists had provoked some criticisms. In 1823, no new titles were con- 
ferred." Demy, Essai historique, p. 24. [G9a,3] 

Exhibition of 1844. Madame de Girardin's comments on the event, <in> Vicomte de 
Launay, Lettres parisiennes, vol. 4, p. 66 (cited in Demy, Essai historique, p. 27): 
'"Itis a pleasure,' she remarked, 'strangely akin to a nightmare.' And she went on 
to enumerate the singularities, of which there was no lack: the flayed horse, the 
colossal beetle, the moving jaw, the chronometric Turk who marked the hours by 
the number of bis somersaults, and — last but not least — M. and Mme. Pipelet, the 
concierges in Les Mysteres de Paris, 1 ' 2 as angels." [G9a,4] 

World exhibition of 1851: 14,837 exhibitors; that of 1855: 80,000. [G9a,5] 

In 1867, the Egyptian exhibit was housed in a building whose design was based on 
an Egyptian temple. [G9a,6] 



In his novel The Fortress, Walpole describes the precautions that were taken in a 
lodging-house specially designed to welcome visitors to the world exhibition of 



1851. These precautions included continuous police surveillance of the dormito- 
ries, the presence of a chaplain, and a regular morning visit by a doctor. [G10,1] 

Walpole describes the Crystal Palace, with the glass fountain at its center and the 
old elms — the latter "looking almost like the lions of the forest caught in a net of 
glass" (p. 307). He describes the booths decorated with expensive carpets, and 
above all the machines. "There were in the machine-room the 'self-acting mules,' 
the Jacquard lace machines, the envelope machines, the power looms, the model 
locomotives, centrifugal pumps, the vertical steam-engines, all of these working 
like mad, while the thousands nearby, in their high hats and bonnets, sat patiently 
waiting, passive, unwitting that the Age of Man on this Planet was doomed." Hugh 
Walpole, The Fortress (Hamburg, Paris, and Bologna <1933>), p. 306. 13 [G10.2] 

Delvau speaks of "men who, each evening, have their eyes glued to the display 
window of La Belle Jardinere to watch the day's receipts being counted." Alfred 
Delvau, Les Heures parisiennes (Paris, 1866), p. 144 ("Huit heures du soir"). 

[G10.3] 

In a speech to the Senate, on January 31, 1868, Michel Chevalier makes an effort 
to save the previous year's Palace of Industry from destruction. Of the various 
possibilities he lays out for salvaging the building, the most noteworthy is that of 
using the interior — which, with its circular form, is ideally suited to such a pur- 
pose — for practicing troop maneuvers. He also proposes developing the structure 
into a permanent merchandise mart for imports. The intention of the opposing 
party seems to have been to keep the Champ de Mars free of all construction — this 
for military reasons. See Michel Chevalier, Discours sur line petition reclamant 
contre la destruction du palais de VExposition universelle de 1867 (Paris, 1868). 

[G10.4] 

"The world exhibitions . . . cannot fail to provoke the most exact comparisons 
between the prices and the qualities of the same article as produced in different 
countries. How the school of absolute freedom of trade rejoices then! The world 
exhibitions contribute ... to the reduction, if not the abolition, of custom duties." 
Achille de Colusont <?>, Histoire des expositions des produits de I'industrie 
franqaise (Paris, 1855), p. 544. [G10a,l] 

Every industry, in exhibiting its trophies 
In this bazaar of universal progress, 
Seems to have borrowed a fairy's magic wand 
To bless the Crystal Palace. 



Rich men, scholars, artists, proletarians — 
Each one lahors for the common good; 
And, joining together like noble brothers, 
All have at heart the happiness of each. 



ClairviJle and Jules Cordier, he Palais de Cristal, ou Les Parisiens a Londres 
[Theatre de la Porte-Saint-Martin, May 26, 1851] (Paris, 1851), p. 6. [G10a,2] 



The last two tableaux from ClairviJle's Palais de Cristal take place in front of and 
inside the Crystal Palace. The stage directions for the <next to> last tableau: "The 
main gallery of the Crystal Palace. To the left, downstage, a bed, at the head of 
which is a large dial. At center stage, a small table holding small sacks and pots of 
earth. To the right, an electrical machine. Toward the rear, an exhibition of vari- 
ous products (based on the descriptive engraving done in London)" (p. 30). 

[G10a,3] 

Advertisement for Marquis Chocolates, from 1846: "Chocolate from La Maison 
Marquis, 44 Rue Vivienne, at the Passage des Panoramas. — The time has come 
when chocolate praline, and all the other varieties of chocolat defantaisie, will be 
available . . . from the House of Marquis in the most varied and graceful of 
forms. . . . We are privileged to be able to announce to our readers that, once 
again, an assortment of pleasing verses, judiciously selected from among the year's 
purest, most gracious, and most elevated publications, will accompany the exqui- 
site confections of Marquis. Confident in the favorable advantage that is ours 
alone, we rejoice to bring together that puissant name with so much lovely verse." 
Cabinet des Estampes. [G10a,4] 

Palace of Industry, 1855: "Six pavilions border the building on four sides, and 306 
arcades run through the lower story. An enormous glass roof provides light to the 
interior. As materials, only stone, iron, and zinc have been used; building costs 
amounted to 11 million francs. . . . Of particular interest are two large paintings 
on glass at the eastern and western ends of the main gallery. . . . The figures repre- 
sented on these appear to be life-size, yet are no less than six meters high." Acht 
Tage in Paris (Paris, July 1855), pp. 9-10. The paintings on glass show figures 
representing industrial France and Justice. [Gll,l] 

"I have . . . written, together with my collaborators on L'Atelier, that the moment 
for economic revolution has come . . . , although we had all agreed some time 
previously that the workers of Europe had achieved solidarity and that it was 
necessary now to move on, before anything else, to the idea of a political federation 
of peoples." A. Corbon, he Secret du peuple de Paris (Paris, 1863), p. 196. Also 
p. 242: "In sum, the political attitude of the working class of Paris consists almost 
entirely in the passionate desire to serve the movement of federation of nationali- 
ties." [G11.2] 

Nina Lassave, Fieschi's beloved, was employed, after his execution on February 
19, 1836, as a cashier at the Cafe de la Renaissance on the Place de la Bourse. 

[G11.3] 

Animal symbolism in Toussenel: the mole. "The mole is . . . not the emhlem of a 
single character. It is the emblem of a whole social period: the period of industry's 



CO 



infancy, the Cyclopean period. ... It is the . . . allegorical expression of the abso- E 
lute predominance of brute force over intellectual force. . . . Many estimable 
analogists (ind a marked resemblance between moles, which upturn the soil and 
pierce passages of subterranean communication, . . . and the monopolizers of rail- 
roads and stage routes. . . . The extreme nervous sensibility of the mole, which 
fears the light . . . , admirably characterizes the obstinate obscurantism of those g- 
monopolizers of banking and of transportation, who also fear the light." 5 
A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes: Zoologie passionnelle — Mammiferes de France ^ 
(Paris, 1884), pp. 469, 473-474. 1 ' 1 [G11.4] | 

Animal symbolism in Toussenel: the marmot. "The marmot . . . loses its hair at its q 

work — in allusion to the painful labor of the chimney sweep, who rubs and spoils g 

his clothes in his occupation." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 1884), ^ 
p. 334. lr ' [Gll,5] 



Plant symbolism in Toussenel: the vine. "The vine loves to gossip . . . ; it mounts 
familiarly to the shoulder of plum tree, olive, or elm, and is intimate with all the 
trees." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 1884), p. 107. [Gll.6] 

Toussenel expounds the theory of the circle and of the parabola with reference 
to the different childhood games of the two sexes. This recalls the anthropo- 
morphisms of Grandville. "The figures preferred by childhood are invariably 
round — the ball, the hoop, the marble; also the fruits which it prefers: the cherry, 
the gooseberry, the apple, the jam tart. . . . The analogist, who has observed these 
games with continued attention, has not failed to remark a characteristic differ- 
ence in the choice of amusements, and the favorite exercises, of the children of 
the two sexes. . . . What then has our observer remarked in the character of the 
games of feminine infancy? He has remarked in the character of these games a 
decided proclivity toward the ellipse. / 1 observe among the favorite games of 
feminine infancy the shuttlecock and the jump rope. . . . Both the rope and the 
cord describe parabolic or elliptical curves. Why so? Why, at such an early age, 
tliis preference of the minor sex for the elliptical curve, this manifest contempt for 
marbles, ball, and top? Because the ellipse is the curve of love, as the circle is that 
of friendship. The ellipse is the figure in which God . . . has profiled the form of 
His favorite creatures — woman, swan, Arabian horse, dove; the ellipse is the 
essentially attractive form. . . . Astronomers were generally ignorant as to why 
the planets describe ellipses and not circumferences around their pivot of attrac- 
tion; they now know as much about this mystery as I do." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit 
des betes, pp. 89-91. 16 [Glla.l] 



Toussenel posits a symbolism of curves, according to which the circle represents 
friendship; the ellipse, love; the parabola, the sense of family; the hyperbola, 
ambition. In the paragraph concerning the hyperbola, there is a passage closely 
related to Grandville: "The hyperbola is the curve of ambition. . . . Admire die 
determined persistence of the ardent asymptote pursuing the hyperbola in head- 



long eagerness: it approaches, always approaches, its goal . . . but never attains 
it." A. Toussenel, LEsprit des betes (Paris, 1884), p. 92. 17 [Glla,2] 



Animal symbolism in Toussenel: the hedgehog. "Gluttonous and repulsive, it is 
also the portrait of the scurvy slave of the pen, trafficking with all subjects, selling 
postmaster's appointments and theater passes, . . . and drawing . . . from his 
sorry Christian conscience pledges and apologies at fixed prices. ... It is said that 
the hedgehog is the only quadruped of France on which the venom of the viper has 
no effect. I should have guessed this exception merely from analogy. . . . For 
explain . . . how calumny (the viper) can sting the literary blackguard." 
A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 1884), pp. 476, 478. 1(i [Glla,3] 

"Lightning is the kiss of clouds, stormy but faithful. Two lovers who adore each 
other, and who will tell it in spite of all ohstacles, are two clouds animated with 
opposite electricities, and swelled with tragedy." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes: 
Zoologie passionnelle — Mammiferes de France, 4th ed. (Paris, 1884), pp. 100- 
101. 19 [G12.1] 

The first edition of Toussenel's L'Esprit des betes appeared in 1847. [G12,2] 

"I have vainly questioned the archives of antiquity to find traces of the setter dog. 
I have appealed to the memory of the most lucid somnambulists to ascertain the 
epoch when this race appeared. All the information I could procure . . . leads to 
this conclusion: the setter dog is a creation of modern times." A. Toussenel, L'Es- 
prit des betes (Paris, 1884), p. 159. 20 [G12.3] 

"A heautiful young woman is a true voltaic cell, ... in which the captive fluid is 
retained by the form of surfaces and the isolating virtue of the hair; so that when 
this fluid would escape from its sweet prison, it must make incredihle efforts, 
which produce in turn, by influence on bodies differently animated, fearful rav- 
ages of attraction. . . . The history of the human race swarms with examples of 
intelligent and learned men, intrepid heroes, . . . transfixed merely hy a woman's 
eye. . . . The holy King David proved that he perfectly understood the condensing 
properties of polished elliptical surfaces when he took unto himself the young 
Abigail." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 1884), pp. 101-103. 21 [G12,4] 

Toussenel explains the rotation of the earth as the resultant of a centrifugal force 
and a force of attraction. Further on: "The star . . . begins to waltz its frenetic 
waltz. . . . Everything rustles, stirs, warms up, shines on the surface of the globe, 
which only the evening before was entomhed in the frigid silence of night. Marvel- 
ous spectacle for the well-placed observer — change of scene wonderful to behold. 
For the revolution took place between two suns and, that very evening, an ame- 
thyst star made its first appearance in our skies" (p. 45). And, alluding to the 
volcanism of earlier epochs of the earth: "We know the effects which the first waltz 
usually has on delicate constitutions. . . . The Earth, too, was rudely awakened by 



its first ordeal." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes: Zoologie passionnelle (Paris, 
1884), pp. 44^15. [G12.5] 



Principle of Toussenel's zoology: "The rank of the species is in direct proportion to 
its resemblance to the human being." A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 
1884), p. i. Compare the epigraph to the work: '"The best thing about man is his 
dog.'— Charlet." [G12a,l] 

The aeronaut Poitevin, sustained by great publicity, undertook an "ascent to Ura- 
nus" accompanied in the gondola of his balloon by young women dressed as 
mythological figures. Paris sous la Republique de 1848: Exposition de la Bib- 
liotheque et des travaux historiques de I* Ville de Paiis (1909), p. 34. [G12a,2] 

We can speak of a fetishistic autonomy not only with regard to the commodity 
but also — as the following passage from Marx indicates — with regard to the 
means of production: "If we consider the process of production from the point of 
view of the simple labor process, the laborer stands, in relation to the means of 
production, ... as the mere means ... of his own intelligent productive activ- 
ity. . . . But it is different as soon as we deal with the process of production from 
the point of view of the process of surplus- value creation. The means of produc- 
tion are at once changed into means for the absorption of the labor of others. It is 
now no longer the laborer that employs the means of production, but the means 
of production that employ the laborer. Instead of being consumed by him as 
material elements of his productive activity, they consume him as the ferment 
necessary to their own life process. . . . Furnaces and workshops that stand idle 
by night, and absorb no living labor, are a 'mere loss' to the capitalist. Hence, 
furnaces and workshops constitute lawful claims upon the night labor of the 
workpeople." 22 This observation can be applied to the analysis of Grandville. To 
what extent is the hired laborer the "soul" of Grandville's fetishistically animated 
objects? [G12a,3] 

"Night distributes the stellar essence to the sleeping plants. Every bird which flies 
has the thread of the infinite in its claw." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes (Paris, 
1881), novels, vol. 8, p. 114 (Les Miserables, book 4). 23 [G12a,4] 

Drumont calls Toussenel "one of the greatest prose writers of the century." 
Edouard Drumont, Les Heros et les pitres (Paris <1900>), p. 270 ("Toussenel"). 

[G12a,5] 

Technique of exhibition: "A fundamental rule, quickly learned through observa- 
tion, is that no object should be placed directly on the floor, on a level with the 
walkways. Pianos, furniture, physical apparatus, and machines are better dis- 
played on a pedestal or raised platform. The best exhibits make use of two quite 
distinct systems: displays under glass and open displays. To be sure, some prod- 
ncts, by their very nature or hecause of their value, have to be protected from 



contact with the air or the hand; others benefit from being left uncovered." Expo- 
sition universelle de 1867, a Paris: Album des installations les plus remarquables 
de VExposition de 1862, a Londres, publie par la commission imperiale pour 
servir de renseignement aux exposants des diver ses nations (Paris, 1866) <p. 5>. 
Album of plates in large folio, with very interesting illustrations, some in color, 
showing — in cross-section or longitudinal section, as the case may be — the pavil- 
ions of the world exhibition of 1862. Bibliotheque Nationale, V.644. [G13,l] 

Paris in the year 2855: "Our many visitors from Saturn and Mars have entirely 
forgotten, since arriving here, the horizons of their mother planet! Paris is hence- 
forward the capital of creation! . . . Where are you, Champs-Elysees, favored 
theme of newswriters in 1855? . . . Buzzing along this thoroughfare that is paved 
with hollow iron and roofed with crystal are the bees and hornets of finance! The 
capitalists of Ursa Major are conferring with the stockbrokers of Mercury! And 
coming on the market this very day are shares in the debris of Venus half con- 
sumed by its own flames!" Arsene Houssaye, "Le Paris futur," in Paris et les 
Parisiens au XIX" siecle (Paris, 1856), pp. 458-459. [G13.2] 

At the time of the establishment, in London, of the General Council of the Workers 
International, 24 the following remark circulated: "The child born in the work- 
shops of Paris was nursed in London." See Charles Benoist, "Le 'My the' de la 
classe ouvriere," Revue des deux mondes (March 1, 1914), p. 104. [G13,3] 

"Seeing that the gala ball is the sole occasion on which men contain themselves, let 
us get used to modeling all our institutions on gatherings such as these, where the 
woman is queen." A. Toussenel, Le Monde des oiseaux, vol. 1 (Paris, 1853), 
p. 134. And: "Many men are courteous and gallant at a ball, doubting not that 
gallantry is a commandment of God" (ibid., p. 98). [G13,4] 

On Gabriel Engelmann: "When he published his Essais lithographiques in 1816, 
great care was taken to reproduce this medallion as the frontispiece to his book, 
with the inscription: 'Awarded to M. G. Engelmann of Mulhouse (Upper Rhine). 
Large-scale execution, and refinement, of the art of lithography. Encouragement. 
1816. Henri Bouchot, La Lithographie (Paris <1895>), p. <38>. [G13,5] 

On the London world exhibition: "In making the rounds of this enormous exhibi- 
tion, the observer soon realizes that, to avoid confusion, ... it has been necessary 
to cluster the different nationalities in a certain number of groups, and that the 
only useful way of establishing these industrial groupings was to do so on the basis 
of — oddly enough — religious beliefs. Each of the great religious divisions of hu- 
manity corresponds, in effect, ... to a particular mode of existence and of indus- 
trial activity. "Michel Chevalier, Du Progres (Paris, 1852), p. 13. [G13a,l] 

From the first chapter of Capital: "A commodity appears, at first sight, a very 
trivial thing and easily understood. Its analysis shows that in reality it is a very 



queer thing, abounding in metaphysical subtleties and theological niceties. So far 
as it is a value in use, there is nothing mysterious about it. . . . The form of wood is 
altered by making a table out of it; nevertheless, this table remains wood, an 
ordinary material thing. As soon as it steps forth as commodity, however, it is 
transformed into a material immaterial thing. It not only stands with its feet on the 
ground, but, in the face of all other commodities, it stands on its head, and out of 
its wooden brain it evolves notions more whimsically than if it had suddenly begun 
to dance." 25 Cited in Franz Mehring, "Karl Marx und das Gleichnis," in Karl 
Marx als Denker, Mensch, unci Revolutiondr, ed. Rjazanov (Vienna and Berlin 
<1928>), p. 57 (first published in Die neue Zeit, March 13, 1908). [G13a,2] 

Renan compares the world exhibitions to the great Greek festivals, the Olympian 
games, and the Panathenaea. But in contrast to these, the world exhibitions lack 
poetry. "Twice, Europe has gone off to view the merchandise and to compare 
products and materials; and on returning from this new kind of pilgrimage, no one 
has complained of missing anything." Some pages later: "Our century tends to- 
ward neither the good nor the had; it tends toward the mediocre. What succeeds in 
every endeavor nowadays is mediocrity." Ernest Renan, Essais de morale et de 
critique (Paris, 1859), pp. 356-357, 373 ("La Poesie de l'Exposition"). [G13a,3] 

Hashish vision in the casino at Aix-la-Chapelle. "The gaming table at Aix-la- 
Chapelle is nothing short of an international congress, where the coins of all king- 
doms and all countries are welcome. ... A storm of Leopolds, Friedrich Wilhelms, 
Queen Victorias, and Napoleons rain down ... on the table. Looking over this 
shining alluvium, I thought I could see . . . the effigies of the sovereigns . . . irrevo- 
cably fade from their respective ecus, guineas, or ducats, to make room for other 
visages entirely unknown to me. A great many of these faces . . . wore grimaces . . . 
of vexation, of greed, or of fury. There were happy ones too, but only a few. . . . 
Soon this phenomenon . . . grew dim and passed away, and another sort of vision, 
no less extraordinary, now loomed before me. . . . The bourgeois effigies which 
had supplanted the monarchs began themselves to move ahout within the metallic 
disks. . . that confined them. Before long, they had separated from the disks. They 
appeared in full relief; then their heads hurgeoned out into rounded forms. They 
had taken on . . . not only faces but living flesh. They had all sprung Lilliputian 
bodies. Everything assumed a shape . . . somehow or other; and creatures exactly 
like us, except for their size, . . . began to enliven the gaming table, from which all 
currency had vanished. I heard the ring of coins struck hy the steel of the crou- 
pier's rake, but this was all that remained of the old resonance ... of louis and 
ecus, which had become men. These poor myrmidons were now taking to their 
heels, frantic at the approach of the murderous rake of the croupier; but escape 
was impossible. . . . Then . . . the dwarfish stakes, obliged to admit defeat, were 
ruthlessly captured hy the fatal rake, which gathered them into the croupier's 
clutching hand. The croupier — how horrihle! — took up each small body daintily 
between his fingers and devoured it with gusto. In less than half an hour, I saw 
some half-dozen of these imprudent Lilliputians hurled into the abyss of this terri- 



ble tomb. . . . But what appalled me the most was that, on raising my eyes (alto- 
gether by chance) to the gallery surrounding this valley of death, I noticed not just 
an extraordinary likeness but a complete identity between the several kingpins 
playing the life-sized game and the miniature humans struggling there on the ta- 
hle. . . . What's more, these kingpins . . . appeared to me ... to collapse in des- 
peration precisely as their childlike facsimiles were overtaken hy the formidable 
rake. They seemed to share ... all the sensations of their little doubles; and never, 
for as long as I live, will I forget the look and the gesture — full of hatred and 
despair — which one of those gamhlers directed toward the hank at the very mo- 
ment that his tiny simulacrum, coralled by the rake, went to satisfy the ravenous 
appetite of the croupier." Felix Mornand, La Vic des eaux (Paris, 1862), pp. 219- 
221 ("Abc-la-Chapelle"). [G14] 

It would be useful to compare the way Grandville portrays machines to the way 
Chevalier, in 1852, still speaks of the railroad. He calculates that two locomo- 
tives, having a total of 400 horsepower, would correspond to 800 actual horses. 
How would it be possible to harness them up? How supply the fodder? And, in a 
note, he adds: "It must also be kept in mind that horses of flesh and blood have 
to rest after a brief journey; so that to furnish the same service as a locomotive, 
one must have on hand a very large number of animals." Michel Chevalier, 
Chemins de fer: Extrait du dictionnaire de I'economie politique (Paris, 1852), p. 10. 

[G14a,l] 



The principles informing the exhibition of objects in the Galerie des Machines of 
1867 were derived from Le Play. [G14a,2] 

A divinatory representation of architectural aspects of the later world exhibitions 
is found in Gogol's essay "On Present-Day Architecture," which appeared in the 
mid-Thirties in his collection Arabesques. "Away with this academicism which 
commands that buildings be built all one size and in one style! A city should 
consist of many different styles of building, if we wish it to be pleasing to the eye. 
Let as many contrasting styles combine there as possible! Let the solemn Gothic 
and the richly embellished Byzantine arise in the same street, alongside colossal 
Egyptian halls and elegantly proportioned Greek structures! Let us see there the 
slightly concave milk-white cupola, the soaring church steeple, the oriental miter, 
the Italianate flat roof, the steep and heavily ornamented Flemish roof, the quad- 
rilateral pyramid, the cylindrical column, the faceted obelisk!" 26 Nikolai Gogol, 
"Sur l Architecture du temps present," cited in Wladimir Weidle, Les Abeilles 
d'Aristee (Paris <1936>), pp. 162-163 ("LAgonie de Part"). [G14a,3] 

Fourier refers to the folk wisdom that for some time has defined "Civilization" as 
le monde a rebours <the world contrariwise). [G14a,4] 



Fourier cannot resist describing a banquet held on the banks of the Euphrates to 
honor the victors in both a competition among zealous dam workers (600,000) and 



a contest of pastry cooks. The 600,000 athletes of industry are furnished with 
300,000 bottles of champagne, whose corks, at a signal from the "command 
tower," are all popped simultaneously. To echo throughout the "mountains of the 
Euphrates." Cited in <Armand ancb Maubl<anc, Fourier (Paris, 1937)>, vol. 2, 
pp. 178-179. [G14a,5] 

"Poor stars! Their role of resplendence is really a role of sacrifice. Creators and 
servants of the productive power of the planets, they possess none of their own 
and must resign themselves to the thankless and monotonous career of providing 
torchlight. They have luster without enjoyment; behind them shelter, invisible, 
the living creatures. These slave-queens are nevertheless of the same stuff as their 
happy subjects. . . . Dazzling flames today, they will one day be dark and cold, 
and only as planets can they be reborn to life after the shock that has volatilized 
the retinue and its queen into a nebula." A. Blanqui, L'Eternite par les astres (Paris, 
1872), pp. 69-70. Compare Goethe: "Euch bedaur' ich, ungliickselge Sterne" 
<I pity you, unhappy stars>. 27 [G15,l] 

"The sacristy, the stock exchange, and the barracks — those three musty lairs that 
together vomit night, misery, and death upon the nations. October 1869." Auguste 
Blanqui, Critique sociale (Paris, 1885), vol. 2, p. 351 ("Fragments et notes"). 

[G15,2] 

"A rich death is a closed ahyss." From the fifties. Auguste Blanqui, Critique so- 
ciale (Paris, 1885), vol. 2, p. 315 ("Fragments et notes"). [G15,3] 

An image d'Epinal by Sellerie shows the world exhibition of 1855. [G15,4] 

Elements of intoxication at work in the detective novel, whose mechanism is 
described by Caillois (in terms that recall the world of the hashish eater) : "The 
characters of the childish imagination and a prevailing artificiality hold sway over 
this strangely vivid world. Nothing happens here that is not long premeditated; 
nothing corresponds to appearances. Rather, each thing has been prepared for 
use at the right moment by the omnipotent hero who wields power over it. We 
recognize in all this the Paris of the serial installments of Fantomas." Roger Cail- 
lois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle Revue frangaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), 
p. 688. [G15.5] 

"Every day I see passing beneath my window a certain number of Kalmucks, 
Osages, Indians, Chinamen, and ancient Greeks, all more or less Parisianized." 
Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, <ed. and annotated by Y.-G. Le Dantec (Paris, 
1932),> vol. 2, p. 99 ("Salon de 1846," section 7, "De lTdeal et du modele"). 21! 

[G15,6] 



Advertising under the Empire, according to Ferdinand Brunot, Histoire de la 
langue francaise des origines a 1900, vol. 9, La Revolution et I'Empire, part 9, 



"Les Evenements, les institutions et la langue" (Paris, 1937): "We shall freely 
imagine that a man of genius conceived the idea of enshrining, within the banality 
of the vernacular, certain vocables calculated to seduce readers and buyers, and 
that he chose Greek not only because it furnishes inexhaustible resources to work 
with hut also because, less widely known than Latin, it has the advantage of being 
. . . incomprehensible to a generation less versed in the study of ancient 
Greece. . . . Only, we know neither who this man was, nor what his nationality 
might be, nor even whether he existed or not. Let us suppose that . . . Greek words 
gained currency little by little until, one day, . . . the idea . . . was born . . . that, 
by their own intrinsic virtue, they could serve for advertising. ... I myself would 
like to think that . . . several generations and several nations went into the making 
of that verhal billboard, the Greek monster that entices by surprise. I believe it 
was during the epoch I'm speaking of that the movement began to take shape. . . . 
The age of 'comagenic' hair oil had arrived." Pp. 1229-1230 ("Les Causes du 
triomphe du grec"). [G15a,l] 

"What would a modern Winckelmann say . , . were he confronted hy a product 
from China — something strange, bizarre, contorted in form, intense in color, and 
sometimes so delicate as to he almost evanescent? It is, nevertheless, an example of 
universal beauty. But in order to understand it, the critic, the spectator, must 
effect within himself a mysterious transformation; and by means of a phenomenon 
of the will acting on the imagination, he must learn hy himself to participate in the 
milieu which has given hirth to this strange flowering." Further along, on the same 
page, appear "those mysterious flowers whose deep color enslaves the eye and 
tantalizes it with its shape." Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, <ed. Le Dantec (Paris, 
1932),> vol. 2, pp. 144-145 ("Exposition universelle, 1855").-' [G15a,2] 

"In French poetry before Baudelaire, as in the poetry of Europe generally, the 
style and accents of the Orient were never more than a faintly puerile and facti- 
tious game. With Les Fleurs du mal, the strange color is not produced without a 
keen sense of escape. Baudelaire . . . invites himself to absence. ... In making a 
journey, he gives us the feel of . . . unexplored nature, where the traveler parts 
company with himself. . . . Douhtless, he leaves the mind and spirit unchanged; 
but he presents a new vision of his soul. It is tropical, African, black, enslaved. 
Here is the true country, an actual Africa, an authentic Indies." Andre Suares, 
Preface to Charles Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1933), pp. xxv-xxvii. 

[G16.1] 

Prostitution of space in hashish, where it serves for all that has been. 3 * [G16,2] 

Grandville's masking of nature with the fashions of midcentury — nature under- 
stood as the cosmos, as well as the world of animals and plants — lets history, in 
the guise of fashion, be derived from the eternal cycle of nature. When Grand- 
ville presents a new fan as the "fan of Iris," when the Milky Way appears as an 




"avenue" illuminated at night by gas lamps, when "the moon (a self-portrait)" 
reposes on fashionable velvet cushions instead of on clouds, then history is being 
secularized and drawn into a natural context as relentlessly as it was three hun- 
dred years earlier with allegory. [ G 1 6 , 3 ] 

The planetary fashions of Grandville are so many parodies, drawn by nature, of 
human history. Grandville's harlequinades turn into Blanqui's plaintive ballads. 

[G16.4] 

"The exhibitions are the only properly modern festivals." Hermann Lotze, Mi- 
krokosmos, vol. 3 (Leipzig, 1864), p. ? [G16.5] 

The world exhibitions were training schools in which the masses, barred from 
consuming, learned empathy with exchange value. "Look at everything; touch 
nothing." [G16.6] 

The entertainment industry refines and multiplies the varieties of reactive behav- 
ior among the masses. In this way, it makes them ripe for the workings of 
advertising. The link between this industry and the world exhibitions is thus well 
established. [G16.7] 

Proposal for urban planning in Paris: "It would he advisable to vary the forms of 
the houses and, as for the districts, to employ different architectural orders, even 
those in no way classical — such as the Gothic, Turkish, Chinese, Egyptian, Bur- 
mese, and so forth." Amedee de Tissot, Paris et Londres compares (Paris, 1830), 
p. 151. — The architecture of future exhibitions! [G16a.l] 

"As long as this unspeakable construction [the Palace of Industry] survives, ... I 
shall take satisfaction in renouncing the title 'man of letters'. . . . Art and indus- 
try! Yes, it was in fact for them alone that, in 1855, this impossible tangle of 
galleries was reserved, this jumble where the poor writers have not even been 
granted six square feet — the space of a grave! Glory to thee, 0 Stationer. . . . 
Mount to the Capitol, 0 Publisher . . . ! Triumph, you artists and industrials, you 
who have had the honors and the profit of a world exhibition, whereas poor litera- 
ture . . ." (pp. v-vi). "A world exhihition for the man of letters, a Crystal Palace 
for the author-modiste!" Whisperings of a scurrilous demon whom Babou, accord- 
ing to his "Lettre a Charles Asselineau," is supposed to have encountered one day 
along the Champs-Elysees. Ilippolyte Babou, Les Payens innocents (Paris, 1858), 
p. xiv. [G16a,2] 

Exhibitions. "Such transitory installations, as a rule, have had no influence on the 
configuration of cities. ... It is otherwise ... in Paris. Precisely in the fact that 
here giant exhibitions could be set up in the middle of town, and that nearly always 
they would leave hehind a monument well suited to the city's general aspect — pre- 



cisely in this, one can recognize the blessing of a great original layout and of a 
continuing tradition of urban planning. Paris could . . . organize even the most 
immense exhibition so as to be . . . accessible from the Place de la Concorde. Along 
the quays leading west from this square, for a distance of kilometers, the curbs 
have heen set back from the river in such a way that very wide lanes are opened, 
which, abundantly planted with rows of trees, make for the loveliest possihle 
exhibition routes." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), p. 62. [Gl6a,3] 



[The Collector] 



All these old things have a moral value. 
— Charles Baudelaire 1 

I believe ... in my soul: the Thing. 
—Leon »eubel, Oeuvres (Paris, 1929), p. 193 



Here was the last refuge of those infant prodigies that saw the light of day at the 
time of the world exhibitions : the briefcase with interior lighting, the meter-long 
pocket knife, or the patented umbrella handle with built-in watch and revolver. 
And near the degenerate giant creatures, aborted and broken-down matter. We 
followed the narrow dark corridor to where — between a discount bookstore, in 
which dusty tied-up bundles tell of all sorts of failure, and a shop selling only 
buttons (mother-of-pearl and the kind that in Paris are called de fantairie) — there 
stood a sort of salon. On the pale-colored wallpaper full of figures and busts 
shone a gas lamp. By its light, an old woman sat reading. They say she has been 
there alone for years, and collects sets of teeth "in gold, in wax, and broken." 
Since that day, moreover, we know where Doctor Miracle got the wax out of 
which he f ashioned Olympia. 2 □ Dolls D [ H 1 , 1 ] 

"The crowd throngs to the Passage Vivieime, where people never feel conspicu- 
ous, and deserts the Passage Colbert, where they feel perhaps too conspicuous. 
At a certain point, an attempt was made to entice the crowd back by filling the 
rotunda each evening with harmonious music, which emanated invisibly from 
the windows of a mezzanine. But the crowd came to put its nose in at the door 
and did not enter, suspecting in this novelty a conspiracy against its customs and 
routine pleasures." Le Livre des cent-et-un, vol. 10 (Paris, 1833), p. 58. Fifteen 
years ago, a similar attempt was made — likewise in vain — to boost the <Berlin> 
department store W. Wertheim. Concerts were given in the great arcade that ran 
through it. [Hl,2] 

Never trust what writers say about their own writings. When Zola undertook to 
defend his Tlierese Raqain against hostile critics, he explained that his book was a 
scientific study of the temperaments. His task had been to show, in an example, 



exactly how the sanguine and the nervous temperaments act on one another — to 
the detriment of each. But this explanation could satisfy no one. Nor does it 
explain the admixture of colportage, the bloodthirstiness, the cinematic goriness 
of the action. Which — by no accident — takes place in an arcade. 3 If this book 
really expounds something scientifically, then it's the death of the Paris arcades, 
the decay of a type of architecture. The book's atmosphere is saturated with the 
poisons of this process: its people drop like flies. [Hl,3] 

In 1893, the cocottes were driven from the arcades. [HI, 4] 

Music seems to have setded into these spaces only with their decline, only as the 
orchestras themselves began to seem old-fashioned in comparison to the new 
mechanical music. So that, in fact, these orchestras would just as soon have taken 
refuge there. (The "theatrophone" in the arcades was, in certain respects, the 
forerunner of the gramophone.) Nevertheless, there was music that conformed 
to the spirit of the arcades — a panoramic music, such as can be heard today only 
in old-fashioned genteel concerts like those of the casino orchestra in Monte 
Carlo: the panoramic compositions of <Felicien> David, for example — Le Desert, 
Christoph Colomb, Herculanum. When, in the 1860s (?), an Arab political delega- 
tion came to Paris, the city was very proud to be able to mount a performance of 
Le Desert for them in the great Theatre de l'Opera (?}. [HI, 5] 

"Cineoramas. The Grand Glohe Celeste: a gigantic sphere forty-six meters in di- 
ameter, where you can hear the music of Saint-Saens." Jules Claretie, La Vie a 
Paris 1900 (Paris, 1901), p. 61. D Diorama D [Hl,6] 

Often these inner spaces harbor antiquated trades, and even those that are 
dioroughly up to date will acquire in them something obsolete. They are the site 
of information bureaus and detective agencies, which there, in the gloomy light 
of die upper galleries, follow the trail of the past. In hairdressers' windows, you 
can see the last women with long hair. They have richly undulating masses of 
hair, which are "permanent waves," petrified coiffures. They ought to dedicate 
small votive plaques to those who made a special world of these buildings — to 
Baudelaire and Odilon Redon, whose very name sounds like an all too well- 
turned ringlet. Instead, they have been betrayed and sold, and the head of 
Salome made into an ornament — if that which dreams of the console diere below 
is not the embalmed head of Anna Czyllak. ' And while these things are petrified, 
the masonry of the walls above has become britde. Brittle, too, are 0 Mirrors □ 
<SeeRl,3.> [Hla.l] 

What is decisive in collecting is that the object is detached from all its original 
functions in order to enter into the closest conceivable relation to things of the 
same kind. This relation is die diametric opposite of any utility, and falls into the 
peculiar category of completeness. What is diis "completeness"? It is a grand 
attempt to overcome the wholly irrational character of the object's mere presence 



at hand through its integration into a new, expressly devised historical system: 
the collection. And for the true collector, every single thing in this system be- 
comes an encyclopedia of all knowledge of the epoch, the landscape, the indus- 
try, and the owner from which it comes. It is the deepest enchantment of the 
collector to enclose the particular item within a magic circle, where, as a last 
shudder runs through it (the shudder of being acquired), it turns to stone. Every- 
thing remembered, everything thought, everything conscious becomes socle, 
frame, pedestal, seal of his possession. It must not be assumed that the collector, 
in particular, would find anything strange in the topos hyperonranios — that place 
beyond the heavens which, for Plato, 5 shelters the unchangeable archetypes of 
things. He loses himself, assuredly. But he has the strength to pull himself up 
again by nothing more than a straw; and from out of the sea of fog that envelops 
his senses rises the newly acquired piece, like an island. — Collecting is a form of 
practical memory, and of all the profane manifestations of "nearness" it is the 
most binding. Thus, in a certain sense, the smallest act of political reflection 
makes for an epoch in the antiques business. We construct here an alarm clock 
that rouses the kitsch of the previous century to "assembly." [Hla,2] 

Extinct nature: the shell shop in the arcades, hi "The Pilot's Trials," Strindberg 
tells of "an arcade with brightly lit shops." "Then he went on into the arcade. . . . 
There was every possible kind of shop, but not a soul to be seen, either behind or 
before the counters. After a while he stopped in front of a big window in which 
there was a whole display of shells. As the door was open, he went in. From floor 
to ceiling there were rows of shells of every kind, collected from all the seas of the 
world. No one was in, but there was a ring of tobacco smoke in the air. . . . So he 
began his walk again, following the blue and white carpet. The passage wasn't 
straight but winding, so that you could never see the end of it; and there were 
always fresh shops there, but no people; and the shopkeepers were not to be 
seen." The unfathomability of the moribund arcades is a characteristic motif. 
Strindberg, Marchen (Munich and Berlin, 1917), pp. 52-53, 59. 6 [Hla,3] 

One must make one's way through Les Flenrs du malWith. a sense for how things 
are raised to allegory. The use of uppercase lettering should be followed carefully. 

[Hla,4] 

At the conclusion oiMatiere et memoire, Bergson develops the idea that perception 
is a function of time. If, let us say, we were to live vis-a-vis some things more 
calmly and vis-a-vis others more rapidly, according to a different rhythm, there 
would be nothing "subsistent" for us, but instead everything would happen right 
before our eyes; everything would strike us. But this is the way things are for the 
great collector. They strike him. How he himself pursues and encounters them, 
what changes in the ensemble of items are effected by a newly supervening 
item — all this shows him his affairs in constant flux. Here, the Paris arcades are 
examined as though they were properties in the hand of a collector. (At bottom, 
we may say, the collector lives a piece of dream life. For in the dream, too, the 



rhythm of perception and experience is altered in such a way that everything — 
even the seemingly most neutral — comes to strike us; everything concerns us. In 
order to understand the arcades from the ground up, we sink them into the 
deepest stratum of the dream; we speak of them as though they had struck us.) 

[Hla,5] 

"'ibur understanding of allegory assumes proportions hitherto unknown to you; 
I will note, in passing, that allegory — long an object of our scorn because of 
maladroit painters, but in reality a most spiritual art form, one of the earliest and 
most natural forms of poetry — resumes its legitimate dominion in a mind illumi- 
nated by intoxication." Charles Baudelaire, Les Paradis artificiels (Paris, 1917), 
p. 73/ (On the basis of what follows, it cannot be doubted that Baudelaire indeed 
had allegory and not symbol in mind. The passage is taken from the chapter on 
hashish.) The collector as allegorist. 0 Hashish D [H2,l] 

"The publication <in 1864> oiL'Histoire de la societefranqaise pendant la Revolu- 
tion et sous le Directoire opens the era of the curio — and the word 'curio' should 
not he taken as pejorative. In those days, the historical curio was called a 'relic.'" 
Remy de Gourmont, Le Deuxieme Livre des masques (Paris, 1924), p. 259. This 
passage concerns a work by Edmond and Jules de Goncourt. [H2,2] 

The true method of making things present is to represent them in our space (not 
to represent ourselves in their space). (The collector does just this, and so does 
the anecdote.) Thus represented, the things allow no mediating construction 
from out of "large contexts." The same method applies, in essence, to the consid- 
eration of great things from the past — the cathedral of Chartres, the temple of 
Paestum — when, that is, a favorable prospect presents itself: the method of re- 
ceiving the things into our space. We don't displace our being into theirs; they 
step into our life. [H2,3] 

Fundamentally a very odd fact — that collector's items as such were produced 
industrially. Since when? It would be necessaiy to investigate the various fash- 
ions that governed collecting in the nineteenth century. Characteristic of the 
Biedermeier period (is this also the case in France?) is the mania for cups and 
saucers. "Parents, children, friends, relatives, superiors, and subordinates make 
their feelings known through cups and saucers. The cup is the preferred gift, the 
most popular kind of knickknack for a room. Just as Friedrich Wilhelmlll filled 
his study with pyramids of porcelain cups, the ordinary citizen collected, in the 
cups and saucers of his sideboard, the memory of the most important events, the 
most precious hours, of his life." Max von Boehn, Die Mode im XIX. Jahrhnn- 
dert, vol. 2 (Mimich, 1907), p. 136. [H2,4] 

Possession and having are allied with the tactile, and stand in a certain opposition 
to the optical. Collectors are beings with tactile instincts. Moreover, with the 
recent turn away from naturalism, the primacy of the optical that was determi- 



nate for the previous century has come to an end. □ Flaneur D Hie flaneur optical, 
the collector tactile. 8 [H2,5] 



Broken-down matter: the elevation of the commodity to the status of allegory. 
Allegory and the fetish character of the commodity. [H2,6] 

One may start from the fact that the true collector detaches the object from its 
functional relations. But that is hardly an exhaustive description of this remark- 
able mode of behavior. For isn't this the foundation (to speak with Kant and 
Schopenhauer) of that "disinterested" contemplation by virtue of which the col- 
lector attains to an unei[ualed view of the object — a view which takes in more, 
and other, than that of the profane owner and which we would do best to 
compare to die gaze of the great physiognomist? But how his eye comes to rest 
on the object is a matter elucidated much more sharply through another consid- 
eration. It must be kept in mind that, for the collector, the world is present, and 
indeed ordered, in each of his objects. Ordered, however, according to a surpris- 
ing and, for the profane understanding, incomprehensible connection. This con- 
nection stands to the customary ordering and schematization of things something 
as their arrangement in the dictionary stands to a natural arrangement. We need 
only recall what importance a particular collector attaches not only to his object 
but also to its entire past, whether this concerns the origin and objective charac- 
teristics of the thing or the details of its ostensibly external history: previous 
owners, price of purchase, current value, and so on. All of these — the "objective" 
data together with the other — come together, for the true collector, in every 
single one of his possessions, to form a whole magic encyclopedia, a world order, 
whose outline is the Jkte of his object. Here, therefore, within this circumscribed 
field, we can understand how great physiognomists (and collectors are physiog- 
nomists of the world of things) become interpreters of fate. It suffices to observe 
just one collector as he handles the items in his showcase. No sooner does he 
hold them in his hand than he appears inspired by them and seems to look 
through them into their distance, like an augur. (It would be interesting to study 
the bibliophile as the only type of collector who has not completely withdrawn 
his treasures from their functional context.) [H2,7; H2a,l] 

The great collector Pachinger, Wolfskehl's friend, has put together a collection 
that, in its array of proscribed and damaged objects, rivals the Figdor collection 
in Vienna. He hardly knows any more how things stand in the world; explains to 
his visitors — alongside die most antique implements — die use of pocket handker- 
chiefs, hand mirrors, and the like. It is related of him that, one day, as he was 
crossing the Stachus, he stooped to pick something up. Before him lay an object 
he had been pursuing for weeks: a misprinted streetcar ticket that had been in 
circulation for only a few hours. [H2a,2] 

An apology for the collector ought not to overlook this invective: "Avarice and 
old age, remarks Gui Patin, are always in collusion. With individuals as with 



societies, the need to accumulate is one of the signs of approaching death. This is 
confirmed in the acute stages of preparalysis. There is also the mania for collec- 
tion, known in neurology as 'collectionism.' / From the collection of hairpins to 
the cardboard box bearing the inscription: 'Small bits of string are useless.'" Les 
Sept Pe'clies capitaux (Paris, 1929), pp. 26-27 (Paul Morand, "L'Avarice"). But 
compare collecting done by children! [H2a,3] 

"I am not sure I should have been so thoroughly possessed by this one subject, hut 
for the heaps of fantastic things I had seen huddled together in the curiosity- 
dealer's warehouse. These, crowding on my mind, in connection with the child, 
and gathering round her, as it were, brought her condition palpably before me. I 
had her image, without any effort of imagination, surrounded and heset by every- 
thing that was foreign to its nature, and farthest removed from the sympathies of 
her sex and age. If these helps to my fancy had all been wanting, and I had been 
forced to imagine her in a common chamber, with nothing unusual or uncouth in 
its appearance, it is very probable that I should have been less impressed with her 
strange and solitary state. As it was, she seemed to exist in a kind of allegory." 
Charles Dickens, Der Raritiitenladen (Leipzig, ed. Insel), pp. 18-19. 9 [H2a,4] 

Wiesengrund, in an unpublished essay on The Old Curiosity Shop, by Dickens: 
"Nell's death is decided in the sentence that reads: 'There were some trilles 
there — poor useless things — that she would have liked to take away; but that was 
impossible.'. . . Yet Dickens recognized that the possibility of transition and dia- 
lectical rescue was inherent in this world of things , this lost, rejected world; and he 
expressed it, better than Romantic nature-worship was ever able to do, in the 
powerful allegory of money with which the depiction of the industrial city ends: 
'. . . two old, hattered, smoke-encrusted penny pieces. Who knows but they shone 
as brightly in the eyes of angels, as golden gifts that have been chronicled on 
tombs?'" 10 [H2a,5] 

"Most enthusiasts let themselves be guided by chance in forming their collection, 
like bibliophiles in their browsing. . . . M. Thiers has proceeded otherwise: before 
assembling his collection, he formed it as a whole in his head; he laid out his plan 
in advance, and he has spent thirty years executing it. . . . M. Thiers possesses 
what he wanted to possess. . . . And what was the point? To arrange around him- 
self a miniature of the universe — that is, to gather, within an environment of eighty 
square meters, Rome and Florence, Pompeii and Venice, Dresden and the Hague, 
the Vatican and the Escorial, the British Museum and the Hermitage, the Alham- 
bra and the Summer Palace. . . . And M. Thiers has been able to realize this vast 
project with only modest expenditures made each year over a thirty-year pe- 
riod. . . . Seeking, in particular, to adorn the walls of lus residence with the most 
precious souvenirs of his voyages, M. Thiers had reduced copies made of the most 
famous paintings. . . . And so, on entering his home, you lind yourself immediately 
surrounded by masterpieces created in Italy during the age of Leo X. The wall 
facing the windows is occupied by The Last Judgment, hung between The Dispute 



of the Holy Sacrament and The School of Athens. Titian's Assumption adorns the 
mantelpiece, between The Communion of Saint Jerome and The Transfiguration. 
The Madonna of Saint Sixtus makes a pair with Saint Cecila, and on the pilaster 
are framed the Sibyls of Raphael, between the Sposalizio and the picture repre- 
senting Gregory IX delivering the decretals to a delegate of the Consistory. . . . 
These copies all heing reduced in accordance with the same scale, or nearly so, . . . 
the eye discovers in them, with pleasure, the relative proportions of the originals. 
They are painted in watercolor." Charles Blanc, Le Cabinet de M. Thiers (Paris, 
1871), pp. 16-18. [H3,l] 

"Casimir Perier said one day, while viewing the art collection of an illustrious 
enthusiast . . . : 'All these paintings are very pretty — but they're dormant capi- 
tal.'. . . Today, . . . one could say to Casimir Perier . . . that . . . paintings . . ., 
when they are indeed authentic, that drawings, when recognizahly by the hand of 
a master, . . . sleep a sleep that is restorative and profitable. . . . The . . . sale of 
the curiosities and paintings of Monsieur R. . . . has proven in round figures that 
works of genius possess a value just as solid as the Orleans <Railroad Co.> and a 
little more secure than bonded warehouses." Charles Blanc, Le Tresor de la cu- 
riosite, vol. 2 (Paris, 1858), p. 578. [H3,2] 

The positive countertype to the collector — which also, insofar as it entails the 
liberation of things from the drudgery of being useful, represents the consumma- 
tion of the collector — can be deduced from these words of Marx: "Private prop- 
erty has made us so stupid and inert that an object is ours only when we have it, 
when it exists as capital for us, or when ... we use it." Karl Marx, Der historische 
Materialismus, in Die Friihschriften, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig < 193 2 >), vol. 
1, p. 299 ("Nationalokonomie und Pbilosopbie"). 11 [H3 a ,l] 

'''All the physical and intellectual senses have heen replaced hy the simple aliena- 
tion of all these senses, the sense of having. . . . (On the category of having, see 
Hess in Tiventy-One Sheets)." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus 
(Leipzig), vol. 1, p. 300 ("Nationalokonomie und Philosophic"). 12 [H3a,2] 



"I can, in practice, relate myself humanly to an object only if the ohject relates 
itself humanly to man." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus (Leipzig), vol. 
1, p. 300 ("Nationalokonomie und Philosophic"). 13 [H3 a ,3] 

The collections of Alexandre du Sommerard in the holdings of the Musee Cluny. 

[H3a,4] 

The •(uodlibet has something of the genius of both collector and flaneur. 

[H3 a ,5] 



The collector actualizes latent archaic representations of property. These repre- 
sentations may in fact be connected with taboo, as the following remark indi- 



cates: "It . . . is . . . certain that taboo is the primitive form of property. At first 
emotively and 'sincerely,' then as a routine legal process, declaring something 
taboo would have constituted a title. To appropriate to oneself an object is to 
render it sacred and redoubtable to others; it is to make it 'participate' in oneself." 
N. Guterman and H. Lefebvre, La Conscience mystifiee (Paris, 1936), p. 228. 

[H3a,6] 

Passages hy Marx from "Nationalokonomie und Philosophic": "Private property 
has made us so stupid and inert that an object is ours only when we have it." "All 
the physical and intellectual senses . . . have been replaced by the simple aliena- 
tion of all these senses, the sense of having." 1 ' 1 Cited in Hugo Fischer, Karl Marx 
und sein Verhmltnis zu Staat und Wirtschaft (Jena, 1932), p. 64. [H3a,7] 

The ancestors of Balthazar Claes were collectors. [H3a,8] 

Models for Cousin Pons: Sommerard, Sauvageot, Jacaze. [H3a,9] 

The physiological side of collecting is important. In the analysis of this behavior, 
it should not be overlooked that, with the nest-building of birds, collecting ac- 
quires a clear biological function. There is apparently an indication to this effect 
in Vasari's treatise on architecture. Pavlov, too, is supposed to have occupied 
himself with collecting. [H4,l] 

Vasari is supposed to have maintained (in his treatise on architecture?) that 
the term "grotesque" comes from the grottoes in which collectors hoard their 
treasures. [H4,2] 

Collecting is a primal phenomenon of study: the student collects knowledge. 

[H4.3] 

In elucidating the relation of medieval man to his affairs, Huizinga occasionally 
adduces the literary genre of the "testament": "This literary form can be . . . 
appreciated only by someone who remembers that the people of the Middle Ages 
were, in fact, accustomed to dispose of even the meanest [!] of their possessions 
through a separate and detailed testament. A poor woman bequeathed her Sun- 
day dress and cap to her parish, her bed to her godchild, a fur to her nurse, her 
everyday dress to a beggar woman, and four pounds tournois (a sum which 
constituted her entire fortune), together with an additional dress and cap, to the 
Franciscan friars (Champion, Villon, vol 2, p. 182). Shouldn't we recognize here, 
too, a quite trivial manifestation of the same cast of mind that sets up every case 
of virtue as an eternal example and sees in every customary practice a divinely 
willed ordinance?" J. Huizinga, Herbst des Mittelalters (Munich, 1928), p. 346." 
What strikes one most about this noteworthy passage is that such a relation to 
movables would perhaps no longer be possible in an age of standardized mass 
production. It would follow quite naturally from this to ask whether or not the 



forms of argumentation to which the author alludes, and indeed certain forms of 
Scholastic thought in general (appeal to hereditary authoritary), belong together 
with the forms of production. The collector develops a similar relationship with 
his objects, which are enriched through his knowledge of their origin and their 
duration in history — a relationship that now seems archaic. [H4,4] 

Perhaps the most deeply hidden motive of the person who collects can be de- 
scribed this way: he takes up the struggle against dispersion. Right from the start, 
the great collector is struck by the confusion, by the scatter, in which the things of 
the world are found. It is the same spectacle that so preoccupied the men of the 
Baroque; in particular, the world image of the allegorist caimot be explained 
apart from the passionate, distraught concern with this spectacle. The allegorist 
is, as it were, the polar opposite of the collector. He has given up the attempt to 
elucidate things through research into their properties and relations. He dis- 
lodges things from their context and, from the outset, relies on his profundity to 
illuminate their meaning. The collector, by contrast, brings together what be- 
longs together; by keeping in mind their affinities and their succession in time, he 
can eventually furnish information about his objects. Nevertheless — and this is 
more important than all the differences that may exist between them — in every 
collector hides an allegorist, and in every allegorist a collector. As far as the 
collector is concerned, his collection is never complete; for let him discover just a 
single piece missing, and everything he's collected remains a patchwork, which is 
what things are for allegory from the beginning. On the other hand, the allego- 
rist — for whom objects represent only keywords in a secret dictionary, which will 
make known their meanings to the initiated — precisely the allegorist can never 
have enough of things. With him, one thing is so little capable of taking the place 
of another that no possible reflection suffices to foresee what meaning his profun- 
dity might lay claim to for each one of them.' 6 [H4a,l] 

Animals (birds, ants), children, and old men as collectors. [H4a,2] 

A sort of productive disorder is the canon of the memoir e involontaire, as it is the 
canon of the collector. "And I had already lived long enough so that, for more 
than one of the human beings with whom I had come in contact, I found in 
antipodal regions of my past memories another being to complete the picture. . . . 
In much the same way, when an art lover is shown a panel of an altar screen, he 
remembers in what church, museum, and private collection the other panels are 
dispersed (likewise, he finally succeeds, by following the catalogues of art sales or 
frequenting antique shops, in finding the mate to the object he possesses and 
thereby completing the pair, and so can reconstruct in his mind the predella and 
the entire altar)." Marcel Proust, Le Temps retrouve (Paris), vol. 2, p. 158. 17 The 
memoir e volontaire, on the other hand, is a registry providing the object with a clas- 
sificatory number behind which it disappears. "So now we've been there." ("I've 
had an experience.") How the scatter of allegorical properties (the patchwork) 
relates to this creative disorder is a question calling for further study. [H5,l] 



[The Interior, The Trace] 



"In 1830, Romanticism was gaining the upper hand in literature. It now invaded 
architecture and placarded house facades with a fantastic gothicism, one all too 
often made of pasteboard. It imposed itself on furniture making. 'Allofa sudden,' 
says a reporter on the exhibition of 1834', 'there is boundless enthusiasm for 
strangely shaped furniture. From old chateaux, from furniture warehouses and 
junk shops, it has been dragged out to embellish the salons, which in every other 
respect are modern. . . .' Feeling inspired, furniture manufacturers have been 
prodigal with their 'ogives and machicolations.' You see beds and armoires bris- 
tling with battlements, like thirteenth-century citadels." E. Levasseur, <Histoire 
des classes ouvrieres et de I'industrie en France, de 1789 a 1870 (Paris, 1904), > 



Apropos of a medieval armoire, this interesting remark from Behne". "Movables 
<fumiture> quite clearly developed out of immovables <real estate>." The armoire 
is compared to a "medieval fortress. Just as, in the latter, a tiny dwelling space is 
surrounded in ever-widening rings by walls, ramparts, and moats, forming a 
gigantic outwork, so the contents of the drawers and shelves in the armoire are 
overwhelmed by a mighty outwork." Adolf Behne, Meues Wohnen — M'eues Bauen 



The importance of movable property, as compared with immovable property: 
Here our task is slightly easier. Easier to blaze a way into the heart of things 
abolished or superseded, in order to decipher the contours of the banal as picture 
puzzle — in order to start a concealed William Tell from out of wooded entrails, or 
in order to be able to answer the question, "Where is the bride in this picture?" 
Picture puzzles, as schemata of dreamwork, were long ago discovered by psycho- 
analysis. We, however, with a similar conviction, are less on the trail of the psyche 
than on the track of things. We seek the totemic tree of objects within the thicket 
of primal history. The very last — the topmost — face on the totem pole is that of 



vol. 2, pp. 206-207. 



[11,1] 



(Leipzig, 1927), pp. 59, 61-62. 



[11,2] 



kitsch. 



[11,3] 



The confrontation with furniture in Poe. Struggle to awake from the collective 
dream. [11,4] 



How the interior defended itself against gaslight: "Almost all new houses have 
gas today; it burns in the inner courtyards and on the stairs, though it does not 
yet have free admission to the apartments. It has been allowed into the antecham- 
ber and sometimes even into the dining room, but it is not welcome in the 
drawing room. Why not? It fades the wallpaper. That is the only reason I have 
run across, and it carries no weight at all." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 5, p. 309. 

[11,5] 

Hessel speaks of the "dreamy epoch of bad taste." Yes, this epoch was wholly 
adapted to the dream, was furnished in dreams. The alternation in styles — 
Gothic, Persian, Renaissance, and so on — signified: that over the interior of the 
middle-class dining room spreads a banquet room of Cesare Borgia's, or that out 
of the boudoir of the mistress a Gothic chapel arises, or that the master's study, in 
its iridescence, is transformed into the chamber of a Persian prince. The photo- 
montage that fixes such images for us corresponds to the most primitive percep- 
tual tendency of these generations. Only gradually have the images among 
which they lived detached themselves and settled on signs, labels, posters, as the 
figures of advertising. [11,6] 

A series of lithographs from 18< — > showed women reclining voluptuously on 
ottomans in a draperied, crepuscular boudoir, and these prints bore inscriptions: 
On the Banks of the Tagus, On the Banks $j the Neva, On the Banks of the Seine, and 
so forth. The Guadalquivir, the Rhone, the Rhine, the Aar, the Tamis — all had 
their turn. That a national costume might have distinguished these female figures 
one from another may be safely doubted. It was up to the legende, the caption 
inscribed beneath them, to conjure a fantasy landscape over the represented 
interiors. [11,7] 

To render the image of those salons where the gaze was enveloped in billowing 
curtains and swollen cushions, where, before the eyes of the guests, full-length 
mirrors disclosed church doors and settees were gondolas upon which gaslight 
from a vitreous globe shone down like the moon. [11,8] 

"We have witnessed the unprecedented — marriages hetween styles that one would 
have believed eternally incompatible: hats of the First Empire or the Restoration 
worn with Louis XV jackets, Directory-style gowns paired with high-heeled ankle 
hoots — and, still better, low-waisted coats worn over high-waisted dresses." John 
Grand-Carteret, Les Elegances de la toilette (Paris), p. xvi. [Ila,l] 

Names of different types of traveling car from the early years of the railroad: 
berlin (closed and open), diligence, furnished coach, unfurnished coach. D Iron 
Construction D [Ila,2] 



"This year, too, spring arrived earlier and more heautiful than ever, so that, to tell 
the truth, we coidd not rightly rememher the existence of winter in these parts, nor 



whether the fireplace was there for any purpose other than supporting on its 
mantel the timepieces antl candelabra that are known to ornament every room 
here; for the true Parisian would rather eat one course less per day than forgo his 
'mantelpiece arrangement.'" Lebende Bilder aus dem modernen Paris, 4 vols. 
(Cologne, 1863-1866), vol. 2, p. 369 ("Ein kaiserliches Familienhild"). [Ila,3] 

Threshold magic. At the entrance to the skating rink, to the pub, to the tennis 
court, to resort locations: penates. The hen that lays the golden praline-eggs, the 
machine that stamps our names on nameplates, slot machines, fortunetelling 
devices, and above all weighing devices (the Delphic gnothi seauton 1 of our day) — 
these guard the threshold. Oddly, such machines don't flourish in the city, but 
rather are a component of excursion sites, of beer gardens in the suburbs. And 
when, in search of a little greenery, one heads for these places on a Sunday 
afternoon, one is turning as well to the mysterious thresholds. Of course, this 
same magic prevails more covertly in the interior of the bourgeois dwelling. 
Chairs beside an entrance, photographs flanking a doorway, are fallen household 
deities, and the violence they must appease grips our hearts even today at each 
ringing of the doorbell. Try, though, to withstand the violence. Alone in an 
apartment, try not to bend to the insistent ringing. You will find it as difficult as 
an exorcism. Like all magic substance, this too is once again reduced at some 
point to sex — in pornography. Around 1830, Paris amused itself with obscene 
lithos that featured sliding doors and windows. These were the Images dites a 
portes et a /metres, by Numa Bassajet. [Ila,4] 

Concerning the dreamy and, if possible, oriental interior: "Everyone here dreams 
of instant fortune; everyone aims to have, at one stroke, what in peaceful and 
industrious times would cost a lifetime of effort. The creations of the poets are full 
of sudden metamorphoses in domestic existence; they all rave about marquises 
and princesses, about the prodigies of the Thousand and One Nights. It is an 
opium trance that has overspread the whole population, and industry is more to 
blame for this than poetry. Industry was responsible for the swindle in the Stock 
Exchange, the exploitation of all things made to serve artificial needs, and the . . . 
dividends." Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842>, vol. 1, p. 93. [Ila,5] 

While art seeks out the intimate view, . . . industry marches to the fore." Oc- 
tave Mirbeau, in he Figaro (1889). (See Encyclopedic d' architecture [1889] 



On the exhibition of 1867. "These high galleries, kilometers in length, were of an 
undeniable grandeur. The noise of machinery filled them. And it should not be 
forgotten that, when this exhibition held its famous galas, guests still drove up to 
the festivities in a coach-and-eight. As was usual with rooms at this period, at- 
tempts were made — through furniture-like installations — to prettify these twenty- 
five-meter-high galleries and to relieve the austerity of their design. One stood in 
fear of one's own magnitude." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig and 



p. 92.) 



[Ila,6] 



Berlin, 1928>, p. 43. 



[Ila,7] 



Under the bourgeoisie, cities as well as pieces of furniture retain the character of 
fortifications. "Till now, it was the fortified city which constantly paralyzed town 
planning." Le Corbusier, Urbanume (Paris <1925>), p. 249. 2 [Ha,8] 



The ancient correspondence between house and cabinet acquires a new variant 
through the insertion of glass roundels in cabinet doors. Since when? Were these 
also found in France? [Ila,9] 

The bourgeois pasha in the imagination of contemporaries: Eugene Sue. He had 
a casde in Sologne. There, it was said, he kept a harem filled with women of 
color. After his death, the legend arose that he had been poisoned by the Jesuits. :! 

[12,1] 



Gutzkow reports that the exhibition salons were full of oriental scenes calculated 
to arouse enthusiasm for Algiers. [12,2] 

On the ideal of "distinction." "Everything tends toward the flourish, toward the 
curve, toward intricate convolution. What the reader does not perhaps gather at 
first sight, however, is that diis manner of laying and arranging diings also incor- 
porates a setting apart — one that leads us back to the knight. / The carpet in the 
foreground lies at an angle, diagonally. The chairs are likewise arranged at an 
angle, diagonally. Now, diis could be a coincidence. But if we were to meet widi 
this propensity to situate objects at an angle and diagonally in all the dwellings of 
all classes and social strata — as, in fact, we do — then it can be no coincidence. . . . 
In the first place, arranging at an angle enforces a distinction — and this, once 
more, in a quite literal sense. By the obliquity of its position, the object sets itself 
off from the ensemble, as the carpet does here. . . . But the deeper explanation for 
all this is, again, the unconscious retention of a posture of struggle and defense. / 
In order to defend a piece of ground, I place myself expressly on the diagonal, 
because then I have a free view on two sides. It is for this reason that the bastions 
of a fortification are constructed to form salient angles. . . . And doesn't the 
carpet, in this position, recall such a bastion? . . . / Just as the knight, suspecting 
an attack, positions himself crosswise to guard both left and right, so the peace- 
loving burgher, several centuries later, orders his art objects in such a way that 
each one, if only by standing out from all the rest, has a wall and moat surround- 
ing it. He is thus truly a Spiessbiirger, a militant philistine." Adolf Belme, Neues 
Wohnen — Neues Bauen (Leipzig, 1927), pp. 45-48. In elucidating diis point, the 
author remarks half-seriously: "The gendemen who could afford a villa wanted 
to mark their higher standing. What easier way than by borrowing feudal forms, 
knighdy forms?" (ibid., p. 42). More universal is Lukacs' remark that, from the 
perspective of the philosophy of history, it is characteristic of the middle classes 
that their new opponent, the proletariat, should have entered the arena at a 
moment when the old adversary, feudalism, was not yet vanquished. And they 
will never quite have done with feudalism. [12,3] 



Maurice Barres has characterized Proust as "a Persian poet in a concierge's box." 
Could the first person to grapple with the enigma of the nineteenth-century 
interior be anything else? (The citation is in Jacques-Emile Blanche, Mes Modeles 
[Paris, 1929] 7f " [12,4] 



Announcement published in the newspapers: "Notice. — Monsieur Wiertz offers to 
paint a picture free of charge for any lovers of painting who, possessing an original 
Rubens or Raphael, would like to place his work as a pendant beside the work of 
either of these masters." A. J. Wiertz, Oeuvres litteraires (Paris, 1870), p. 335. 

[12,5] 



Nineteenth-century domestic interior. The space disguises itself — puts on, like an 
alluring creature, the costumes of moods. The self-satisfied burgher should know 
something of the feeling that the next room might have witnessed the coronation 
of Charlemagne as well as the assassination of Henri rV, the signing of the Treaty 
of Verdun as well as the wedding of Otto and Theophano. In the end, things are 
merely mannequins, and even the great moments of world history are only 
costumes beneath which they exchange glances of complicity with nothingness, 
with the petty and the banal. Such nihilism is the innermost core of bourgeois 
coziness — a mood that in hashish intoxication concentrates to Satanic content- 
ment, satanic knowing, satanic calm, indicating precisely to what extent the 
nineteenth-century interior is itself a stimulus to intoxication and dream. This 
mood involves, furthermore, an aversion to the open air, the (so to speak) Ura- 
nian atmosphere, which throws a new light on the extravagant interior design of 
the period. To live in these interiors was to have woven a dense fabric about 
oneself, to have secluded oneself within a spider's web, in whose toils world 
events hang loosely suspended like so many insect bodies sucked dry. From this 
cavern, one does not like to stir. 5 [12,6] 



During my second experiment with hashish. Staircase in Charlotte Joel's studio. 
I said: "A structure habitable only by wax figures. I could do so much with it 
plastically; Piscator and company can just go pack. Would be possible for me to 
change the lighting scheme with tiny levers. I can transform the Goethe house 
into the Covent Garden opera; can read from it the whole of world history. I see, 
in this space, why I collect colportage images. Can see everything in this room — 
the sons of Charles III and what you will." 6 [I2a,l] 



"The serrated collars and puffed sleeves . . . which were mistakenly thought to he 
the garh of medieval ladies." Jacob Falke, Geschichte des modernen Geschmacks 
(Leipzig, 1866), p. 347. [I2a,2] 



"Since the glittering arcades have been cut through the streets, the Palais-Royal 
has effectively lost out. Some would say: since the times have grown more virtuous. 
What were once small cabinets particuliers of ill repute have now become smoking 



rooms in coffeehouses. Each coffeehouse has a smoking room known as the di- 
van." Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, p. 226. D Arcades D 

[I2a,3] 

"The great Berlin industrial exhibition is full of imposing Renaissance rooms; even 
the ashtrays are in antique style, the curtains have to he secured with halberds, 
and the bull's-eye rules in window and cabinet." 70 Jahre deutsche Mode (1925), 
p. 72. [I2a,4] 

An observation from the year 1837. "In those days, the classical style reigned, 
just as the rococo does today. With a stroke of its magic wand, fashion . . . 
transformed the salon into an atrium, armchairs into curule seats, dresses with 
trains into tunics, drinking glasses into goblets, shoes into buskins, and guitars 
into lyres." Sophie Gay, Der Salon der Fraulein Contet (in Europa: Chronik der 
gebildeten Welt, ed. August Lewald, vol. 1 [Leipzig and Stuttgart, 1837], p. 358). 
Hence the following: "What is the height of embarrassment?" "When you bring 
a harp to a party and no one asks you to play it." This piece of drollery, which 
also illuminates a certain type of interior, probably dates from the First Empire. 

[I2a,5] 

"As to Baudelaire's 'stage properties' — which were no doubt modeled on the 
fashion in interior decoration of his day — they might provide a useful lesson for 
those elegant ladies of the past twenty years, who used to pride themselves that 
not a single 'false note' was to be found in their town houses. They would do well 
to consider, when they contemplate the alleged purity of style which they have 
achieved with such infinite trouble, that a man may be the greatest and most 
artistic of writers, yet describe nothing but beds with 'adjustable curtains' . . . , 
halls like conservatories . . . , beds filled with subtle scents, sofas deep as tombs, 
whatnots loaded with flowers, lamps burning so briefly . . . that the only light 
comes from the coal fire." Marcel Proust, Chroniques (Paris <1927>), pp. 224-225 7 
(the titles of works cited are omitted) . These remarks are important because they 
make it possible to apply to the interior an antinomy formulated with regard to 
museums and town planning — namely, to confront the new style with the mysti- 
cal-nihilistic expressive power of the traditional, the "antiquated." Which of these 
two alternatives Proust would have chosen is revealed not only by this passage, it 
may be added, but by the whole of his work (compare renferme — "closed-up," 
"musty"). [I2a,6] 

Desideratum: the derivation of genre painting. What function did it serve in the 
rooms that had need of it? It was the last stage—harbinger of the fact that soon 
these spaces would no longer, in general, welcome pictures. "Genre painting. . . . 
Conceived in this way, art could not fail to resort to the specialties so suited to the 
marketplace: each artist wants to have his own specialty, from the pastiche of the 
Middle Ages to microscopic painting, from the routines of the bivouac to Paris 
fashions, from horses to dogs. Public taste in this regard does not discrimi- 



nate. . . . The same picture can be copied twenty times without exhausting de- 
mand and, as the vogue prescribes, each well-kept drawing room wants to have 
one of these fashionable furnishings." Wiertz, Oeuvres litteraires <Paiis, 1870>, 
pp. 527-528. [I2a,7] 

Against the armature of glass and iron, upholstery offers resistance with its 
textiles. [13,1] 

One need only study with due exactitude the physiognomy of the homes of great 
collectors. Then one would have the key to the nineteenth-century interior. Just 
as in the former case the objects gradually take possession of the residence, so in 
the latter it is a piece of furniture that would retrieve and assemble the stylistic 
traces of the centuries. D World of Things D [13,2] 

Why does the glance into an unknown window always find a family at a meal, or 
else a solitary man, seated at a table under a hanging lamp, occupied with some 
obscure niggling thing? Such a glance is the germ cell of Kafka's work. [13,3] 

The masquerade of styles, as it unfolds across the nineteenth century, results 
from the fact that relations of dominance become obscured. The holders of 
power in the bourgeoisie no longer necessarily exercise this power in the places 
where they live (as rentiers) , and no longer in direct unmediated forms. The style 
of their residences is their false iimnediacy. Economic alibi in space. Interior alibi 
in time. [13,4] 

"The art would be to be able to feel homesick, even though one is at home. 
Expertness in the use of illusion is required for this." Kierkegaard, Samtliclie 
Werke <properly: Gesammelte Werke>, vol. 4 <Jena, 19 14>, p. 12 <Stages on Life's 
Way>. 8 This is the formula for the interior. [13,5] 

"Inwardness is the historical prison of primordial human nature." Wiesengrund- 
Adorno, Kierkegaard (Tiibingen, 1933), p. 68.'' [13,6] 

Second Empire. "It is tliis epoch that sees the birth of the logical specialization by 
genus and species that still prevails in most homes, and that reserves oak and solid 
walnut for the dining room and study, gilded wood and lacquers for the drawing 
room, marquetry and veneering for the bedroom." Louis Sonolet, La Vie 
parisienne sous le Second Empire (Paris, 1929), p. 251. [13,7] 

"What dominated this conception of furnishing, in a manner so pronounced as to 
epitomize the whole, was the taste for draped fabrics, ample hangings, and the art 
of harmonizing them all in a visual ensemhle." Louis Sonolet, La Vie parisienne 
sous le Second Empire (Paris, 1929), p. 253. [13,8] 



"The drawing rooms of the Second Empire contained ... a piece of furniture quite 
recently invented and today completely extinct: it was the fumeu.se. You sat on it 
astride, while leaning hack on upholstered arm-rests and enjoying a cigar." Louis 
Sonolet, La Vie parisienne sous le Second Empire (Paris, 1929), p. 253. [13,9] 

On the "filigree of chimneys" as "fata morgana" of the interior: "Whoever raises 
his eyes to the housetops, with their iron railings tracing the upper edge of the long 
gray boulevard blocks, discovers the variety and inexhaustibility of the concept 
'chimney.' In all degrees of height, breadth, and length, the smokestacks rise from 
their base in the common stone flues; they range from simple clay pipes, oftentimes 
half -broken and stooped with age, and those tin pipes with flat plates or pointed 
caps, ... to revolving chimney cowls artfully perforated like visors or open on one 
side, with hizarre soot-blackened metal flaps. ... It is the . . . tender irony of the 
one single form hy which Paris . . . has been able to preserve the magic of inti- 
macy. ... So it is as if the urhane coexistence . . . that is characteristic of this city 
were to be met with again up there on the rooftops." Joachim von Helmersen, 
"Pariser Kamine," Frankfurter Zeitung, Fehruary 10, 1933. [13,10] 

Wiesengrund cites and comments on a passage from the Diary of a Seducer — a 
passage that he considers the key to Kierkegaard's "entire oeuvre": "Environment 
and setting still have a great influence upon one; there is something ahout them 
which stamps itself firmly and deeply in the memory, or rather upon the whole 
soul, and which is therefore never forgotten. However old I may become, it will 
always he impossible for me to think of Cordelia amid surroundings different from 
this little room. When I come to visit her, the maid admits me to the hall; Cordelia 
herself comes in from her room, and, just as I open the door to enter the living 
room, she opens her door, so that our eyes meet exactly in the doorway. The living 
room is small, comfortable, little more than a cahinet. Although I have now seen it 
from many different viewpoints, the one dearest to me is the view from the sofa. 
She sits there by my side; in front of us stands a round tea table, over which is 
draped a rich tahlecloth. On the tahle stands a lamp shaped like a flower, which 
shoots up vigorously to bear its crown, over which a delicately cut paper shade 
hangs down so lightly that it is never still. The lamp's form reminds one of oriental 
lands; the shade's movement, of mild oriental breezes. The floor is concealed hy a 
carpet woven from a certain kind of osier, which immediately hetrays its foreign 
origin. For the moment, I let the lamp become the keynote of my landscape. I am 
sitting there with her outstretched on the floor, under the lamp's flowering. At 
other times I let the osier rug evoke thoughts of a ship, of an officer's cahin — we 
sail out into the middle of the great ocean. When we sit at a distance from the 
window, we gaze directly into heaven's vast horizon. . . . Cordelia's environment 
must have no foreground, hut only the infinite boldness of far horizons" (Gesam- 
melte Schrif te/i (properly: Werke (Jena, 1911)>, vol. 1, pp. 348-349 [Either /Or]). 
Wiesengrund remarks: "Just as external history is 'reflected' in internal history, 
semblance < Schein> is in the interieur space. Kierkegaard no more discerned the 
element of semhlance in all merely reflected and reflecting intrasuhjective reality 



than he sees through the semblance of the spatial in the image of the interior. But 
here he is exposed by the material. . . . The contents of the interior are mere 
decoration, alienated from the purposes they represent, deprived of their own use 
value, engendered solely by the isolated dwelling-space. . . . The self is over- 
whelmed in its own domain by commodities and their historical essence. Their 
semblance-character is historically-economically produced hy the alienation of 
thing from use value. But in the interior, things do not remain alien. . . . Foreign- 
ness transforms itself from alienated things into expression; mute things speak as 
'symbols.' The ordering of things in the dwelling-space is called 'arrangement.' 
Historically illusory <Geschichtlich scheinhafte) ohjects are arranged in it as the sem- 
blance of unchangeable nature. In the interior, archaic images unfold: the image of 
the flower as that of organic life; the image of the orient as specifically the home- 
land of yearning; the image of the sea as that of eternity itself. For the semblance 
to which the historical hour condemns things is eternal." Theodor Wiesengrund- 
Adorno, Kierkegaard (Tiihingen, 1933), pp. 46-48."' [13 a] 

The bourgeois who came into ascendancy with Louis Philippe sets store by the 
transformation of nature into the interior, hi 1839, a ball is held at the British 
embassy. Two hundred r«se bushes are ordered. "The garden," so runs an eye- 
witness account, "was covered by an awning and had the feel of a drawing room. 
But what a drawing room! The fragrant, well-stocked flower beds had turned 
into enormous jardinieres, the graveled walks had disappeared under sumptuous 
carpets, and in place of the cast-iron benches we found sofas covered in damask 
and silk; a round table held books and albums. From a distance, the strains of an 
orchestra drifted into this colossal boudoir." [14,1] 

Fashion journals of the period contained instructions for preserving bouquets. 

[14,2] 

"Like an odalisque upon a shimmering bronze divan, the proud city lies amid 
warm, vine-clad hills in the serpentine valley of the Seine." Friedrich Engels, "Von 
Paris nach Bern," Die neue Zeit, 17, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1899), p. 10. [14,3] 

The difficulty in reflecting on dwelling: on the one hand, there is something 
age-old — perhaps eternal — to be recognized here, the image of that abode of the 
human being in the maternaJ womb; on the other hand, this motif of primal 
history notwithstanding, we must understand dwelling in its most extreme form 
as a condition of nineteenth-century existence. The originaJ form of all dwelling 
is existence not in the house but in the shell. The shell bears the impression of its 
occupant. In the most extreme instance, the dwelling becomes a shell. The nine- 
teenth century, like no other century, was addicted to dwelling. It conceived the 
residence as a receptacle for the person, and it encased him with all his appurte- 
nances so deeply in the dwelling's interior that one might be reminded of the 
inside of a compass case, where the instrument with all its accessories lies embed- 
ded in deep, usually violet folds of velvet. What didn't the nineteenth century 



invent some sort of casing for! Pocket watches, slippers, egg cups, thermometers, 
playing cards — and, in lieu of cases, there were jackets, carpets, wrappers, and 
covers. The twentieth century, with its porosity and transparency, its tendency 
toward the well-lit and airy, has put an end to dwelling in the old sense. Set off 
against the doll house in the residence of the master builder Solness are the 
"homes for human beings.'" 1 Jugendstil unsettled the world of the shell in a 
radical way. Today this world has disappeared entirely, and dwelling has dimin- 
ished: for the living, through hotel rooms; for the dead, through crematoriums. 

[14,4] 

"To dwell" as a transitive verb — as in the notion of "indwelt spaces"; 13 herewith 
an indication of the frenetic topicality concealed in habitual behavior. It has to do 
with fashioning a shell for ourselves. [14,5] 

"From under all the coral branches and bushes, they swam into view; from under 
every table, every chair; from out of the drawers of the old-fashioned cabinets and 
wardrobes that stood within this strange clubroom — in short, from every hand's- 
hreadth of hiding which the spot provided to the smallest of fi sh, they suddenly 
came to life and showed themselves." Friedrich Gerstacker, Die versunkene Stadt 
(Berlin: Neufeld and Henius, 1921), p. 46. [I4a,l] 

From a review of Eugene Sue's J uif errant (Wandering Jew>, criticized for various 
reasons, including the denigration of the Jesuits and the unmanageable ahundance 
of characters who do nothing hut appear and disappear: "A novel is not a place 
one passes through; it is a place one inhabits." Paulin Limayrac, "Du Roman 
actuel et de nos romanciers," Revue des deux mondes, 11, no. 3 (Paris, 1845), 
p. 951. [I4a,2] 

On literary Empire. Nepomucene Lemercier brings onto the stage, under allegori- 
cal names, the Monarchy, the Church, the Aristocracy, the Demagogues, the Em- 
pire, the Police, Literature, and the Coalition of European powers. His artistic 
means: "the fantastic applied emhlematically." His maxim: "Allusions are my 
weapons; allegory, my buckler." Nepomucene Lemercier, Suite de la Panhy- 
pocrisiade, ou he Spectacle infernal du dix-neuvieme siecle (Paris, 1832), pp. ix, 
vii. [I4a,3] 

From the "Expose preliminaire" to Lemercier's Lampelie et Daguerre: "A short 
preamble is necessary to introduce my audience to the compositional strategy of 
this poem, whose suhject is praise for the discovery made by the illustrious artist 
M. Daguerre; this is a discovery of equal interest to the Academy of Science and 
the Academy of Fine Arts, for it concerns the study of drawing as much as the 
study of physics. . . . On the occasion of such an homage, I would like to see a new 
invention in poetry applied to this extraordinary discovery. Wc know that ancient 
mythology . . . explained natural phenomena by symbolic beings, active repre- 
sentations of the particular principles embodied in things. . . . Modern imitations 



have, up to now, borrowed only the forms of classical poetry; I am endeavoring to 
appropriate for us the principle and the substance. The tendency of the versifiers 
of our century is to reduce the art of the muses to practical and trivial realities, 
easily comprehensible hy the average person. This is not progress but decadence. 
The original enthusiasm of the ancients, hy contrast, tended to elevate the human 
intelligence hy initiating it into those secrets of nature revealed by the elegantly 
ideal fahles. ... It is not without encouragement that I lay bare for yon the foun- 
dations of my theory, which I have applied ... to Newtonian philosophy in my 
Atlantiade. The learned geometer Lagrange has been so generous as to voice ap- 
proval of my attempt to create for our modern muses that great rarity: a theoso- 
phy . . . conforming to acquired knowledge." Nepomucene Lemercier, Sur la 
Decouverte de I'ingenieux peintre du diorama: Seance publique annuelle des cinq 
academies de jeudi 2 mai 1839 (Paris, 1839), pp. 21-23. [I4a,4] 

On the illusionistic painting of the Juste Milieu: l,i "The painter must ... be a good 
dramatist, a good costumer, and a skillful director. . . . The public ... is much 
more interested in the subject than in the artistic qualities. 'Isn't the most difficult 
thing the blending of colors? — No, responds a connoisseur, it's getting the fish's 
scales right. Such was the idea of aesthetic creation among professors, lawyers, 
doctors; everywhere one admired the miracle of Irompe-l'oeil. Any minimally 
successful imitation would garner praise.'" Gisela Freund, "La Photographie dn 
point de vue sociologique" (Manuscript, p. 102). The quotation is from Jules 
Breton, /Vos peintres du siecle, p. 41. [15,1] 

Plush — the material in which traces are left especially easily. [15,2] 

Furthering the fashion in knickknacks are the advances in metallurgy, which has 
its origins in the First Empire. "During this period, groups of cupids and hacchan- 
tes appeared for the first time. . . . Today, art owns a shop and displays the mar- 
vels of its creations on shelves of gold or crystal, whereas in those days 
masterpieces of statuary, reduced in precise proportion, were sold at a discount. 
The Three Graces of Canova found a place in the houdoir, while the Bacchantes 
and the Faun of Pradier had the honors of the hridal chamber." Edouard Fou- 
caud, Paris inventeur: Physiologie de Vindustriefranqaise (Paris, 1844), pp. 196- 
197. [15,3] 

"The science of the poster . . . has attained that rare degree of perfection at which 
skill turns into art. And here I am not speaking of those extraordinary placards 
... on which experts in calligraphy . . . undertake to represent Napoleon on 
horsehack hy an ingenious combination of lines in which the course of his history 
is simultaneously narrated and depicted. No, I shall confine myself to ordinary 
posters. Just see how far these have heen able to push the eloquence of typo- 
graphy, the seductions of the vignette, the fascinations of color, hy using the most 
varied and brilliant of hues to lend perfidious support to the ruses of the publish- 



ers!" Victor Fournel, Ce qu'on voit dans les rues de Paris (Paris, 1858), pp. 293- 
294 ("Enseignes et af fiches"). [15,4] 



Interior of Alphonse Karr's apartment: "He lives like no one else. These days he's 
on the sixth or seventh floor above the Rue Vivienne. The Rue Vivienne for an 
artist! His apartment is hung in black; he has windowpanes of violet or white 
frosted glass. He has neither tables nor chairs (at most, a single chair for excep- 
tional visitors), and he sleeps on a divan — fully dressed, I'm told. He lives like a 
Turk, on cushions, and writes sitting on the fl oor. . . . His walls are decorated with 
various old things . . . ; Chinese vases, death-heads, fencer's foils, and tobacco 
pipes ornament every corner. For a servant, he has a mulatto whom he outfits in 
scarlet from head to toe." Jules Lecomte, Les Lettres de Van Engelgom, ed. Al- 
meras (Paris, 1925), pp. 63-64. [15,5] 

From Daumier's Croquis pris au Saion (Sketches Made at the Salon>. A solitary 
art-lover indicating a picture on which two miserable poplars are represented in a 
flat landscape: "What society could be as degenerate and corrupt as ours? . . . 
Everyone looks at pictures of more or less monstrous scenes, but no one stops 
before an image of beautiful and pure nature." [I5a,l] 

On the occasion of a murder case in London which turned on the discovery of a 
sack containing the victim's body parts, together with remnants of clothing; from 
the latter, the police were able to draw certain conclusions. '"So many things in a 
minuet!' a celebrated dancer used to say. So many things in an overcoat! — when 
circumstances and men make it speak. You will say it's a bit much to expect a 
person, each time he acquires a topcoat, to consider that one day it may serve him 
as a winding sheet. I admit that my suppositions are not exactly rose-colored. But, 
I repeat, . . . the week's events have been doleful." H. de Pene, Paris intime 



Furniture at the time of the Restoration: "sofas, divans, ottomans, love seats, 
recliners, settees." Jacques Robiquet, L'4rt et le gout sous la Restauration (Paris, 



"We have already said . . . that humanity is regressing to the state of cave dweller, 
and so on — but that it is regressing in an estranged, malignant form. The savage in 
his cave . . . feels ... at home there. . . . But the basement apartment of the poor 
man is a hostile dwelling, 'an alien, restraining power, which gives itself up to him 
only insofar as he gives up to it his blood and sweat. ' Such a dwelling can never feel 
like home, a place where he might at last exclaim, 'Here I am at home!' Instead, 
the poor man finds himself in someone else's home, . . . someone who daily lies in 
wait for him and throws him out if he does not pay his rent. He is also aware of the 
contrast in quality between his dwelling and a human dwelling — a residence in that 
other world, the heaven of wealth." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus, 



(Paris, 1859), p. 236. 



[I5a,2] 



1928), p. 202. 



[I5a,3] 



ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig <1932>), vol. 1, p. 325 ("Nationalokonomie und 
Philosophic"). 1 ' 1 [I5a,4] 



Valery on Poe. He underlines the American writer's incomparable insight into the 
conditions and effects of literary work in general: "What distinguishes a truly 
general phenomenon is its fertility. ... It is therefore not surprising that Poe, 
possessing so effective and sure a method, became the inventor of several different 
literary forms — that he provided the first . . . examples of the scientific tale, the 
modern cosmogonic poem, the detective novel, the literature of morbid psycho- 
logical states." Valery, "Introduction" to Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal <Paris, 
1926>, p. xx. 15 [I5a,5] 

Iii the following description of a Parisian salon, Gautier gives drastic expression 
to the integration of the individual into the interior: "The eye, entranced, is led to 
the groups of ladies who, fluttering their fans, listen to the talkers half-reclining. 
Their eyes are sparkling like diamonds; their shoulders glisten like satin; and 
their lips open up like flowers." (Artificial things come forth!) Paris et les Parisiens 
mix XIX siecle (Paris, 1856), p. iv (Theophile Gautier, "Introduction"). [16,1] 

Balzac's interior decorating in the rather ill-fated property Les Jardies: 10 "This 
house . . . was one of the romances on which M. de Balzac worked hardest 
during his life, but he was never able to finish it. . . . 'On these patient walls,' as 
M. Gozlan has said, 'there were charcoal inscriptions to this effect: "Here a facing 
in Parian marble"; "Here a cedar stylobate"; "Here a ceiling painted by Eugene 
Delacroix"; "Here a fireplace in cipolin marble.'"" Alfred Nettement, Histoire de 
la litterature frangaise sous le gouvernement de juillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 2, pp. 266- 
267. [16,2] 

Development of "The Interior" chapter: entry of the prop into film. [16,3] 

E. R. Curtius cites the following passage from Balzac's Petits Bourgeois: "The 
hideous unbridled speculation that lowers, year by year, the height of the ceilings, 
that fits a whole apartment into the space formerly occupied by a drawing room 
and declares war on the garden, will not fail to have an influence on Parisian 
morals. Soon it will become necessaiy to live more outside the house than within 
it." Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), p. 28. Increasing importance of 
the streets, for various reasons. [16,4] 

Perhaps there is a connection between the shrinking of residential space and the 
elaborate furnishing of the interior. Regarding the first, Balzac makes some telling 
observations: "Small pictures alone are in demand because large ones can no 
longer be hung. Soon it will be a formidable problem to house one's library. . . . 
One can no longer find space for provisions of any sort. Hence, one buys things 
that are not calculated to wear well. The shirts and the books won't last, so there 



you are. The durability of products is disappearing on all sides.'" Ernst Robert 
Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), pp. 28-29. [16,5] 



"Sunsets cast their glowing colors on the walls of dining room and drawing room, 
filtering softly through lovely hangings or intricate high windows with mullioned 
panes. All the furniture is immense, fantastic, strange, armed with locks and 
secrets like all civilized souls. Mirrors, metals, fabrics, pottery, and works of the 
goldsmith's art play a mute mysterious symphony for the eye." Charles Baude- 
laire, he Spleende Paris, ed. R. Simon (Paris), p. 27 ("L'Invitation au voyage"). 17 

[I6a,l] 

Etymology of the word "comfort." "In English, it used to mean consolation ('Com- 
forter' is the epithet applied to the Holy Spirit). Then the sense became, instead, 
ivell-being. Today, in all languages of the world, the word designates nothing more 
than rational convenience." Wladimir Weidle, Les Abeilles d'Aristee (Paris 
<1936>), p. 175 ("L'Agonie de Part"). [I6a,2] 

"The artist-midinettes ... no longer occupy rooms; rather, they live in studios. 
(More and more, you hear everyplace of habitation called a 'studio,' as if people 
were more and more becoming artists or students.)" Henri Polles, "L'Art du com- 
merce," Vendredi, February 12, 1937. [I6a,3] 

Multiplication of traces through the modem administrative apparatus. Balzac 
draws attention to this: "Do your utmost, hapless Frenchwomen, to remain 
unknown, to weave the very least little romance in the midst of a civilization 
which takes note, on public squares, of the hour when every hackney cab comes 
and goes; which counts every letter and stamps them twice, at the exact time they 
are posted and at the time they are delivered; which numbers the houses . . . ; 
which ere long will have every acre of land, down to the smallest holdings . . . , 
laid down on the broad sheets of a survey — a giant's task, by command of a 
giant." Balzac, Modeste Mignon, ]t cited in Regis Messac, Le "Detective Novel" <et 
I'injiuence de la pensee scientifique) (Paris, 1929), p. 461. [I6a,4] 

"Victor Hugo works standing up, and, since he cannot find a suitable antique to 
serve as his desk, he writes on a stack of stools and large books which is covered 
with a carpet. It is on the Bible, it is on the Nuremberg Chronicles, that the poet 
leans and spreads his paper." Louis Llhach, Les Contemporains (Paris, 1833), 
cited in Raymond Escholier, Victor Hugo raconte par ceux qui Vont vu (Paris, 
1931), p. 352. [17, 1] 

The Louis Philippe style: "The belly overspreads everything, even the time- 
pieces." [17,2] 



There is an apocalyptic interior — a complement, as it were, of the bourgeois 
interior at midcentury. It is to be found with Victor Hugo. He writes of spiritual- 



istic manifestations: "I have been checked for a moment in my miserable human 
amour-propre by actual revelation, coming to throw around my little miner's lamp 
a streak of lightning and of meteor." In Les Contemplations, he writes: 

We listen for any sounds in these dismal empty spaces; 
Wandering through the shadows, we listen to the breath 

That makes the darkness shudder; 
And now and then, lost in unfathomable nights, 
We see lit up by mighty lights 

The window of eternity. 

(Cited in Claudius Grillet, Victor Hugo spirite (Lyons and Paris, 1929>, pp. 52, 
22.) ' ' ' [17,3] 

Lodgings around 1860: "The apartment . . . was situated on the Rue d'Anjou. It 
was decorated . . . with carpets, door curtains, fringed valances, double draper- 
ies, so that you would think the Stone Age had been succeeded hy an Age of 
Hangings." Louise Weiss, Souvenirs cl'iuie enfance republicaine (Paris <1937>), 
p. 212. [17,4] 

The relation of the Jugendstil interior to its predecessors comes down to the fact 
that the bourgeois conceals bis alibi in history with a still more remote alibi in 
natural history (specifically in the realm of plants). [17,5] 

The etuis, dust covers, sheaths with which the bourgeois household of the pre- 
ceding century encased its utensils were so many measures taken to capture and 
preserve traces. [17,6] 

On the history of the domestic interior. The residential character of the rooms in 
the early factories, though disconcerting and inexpedient, adds this homely 
touch: that within these spaces one can imagine the factory owner as a quaint 
figurine in a landscape of machines, dreaming not only of his own but of their 
future greatness. With the dissociation of the proprietor from the workplace, this 
characteristic of factory buildings disappears. Capital alienates the employer, too, 
from his means of production, and the dream of their future greatness is finished. 
Tbis alienation process culminates in the emergence of the private home. 

[I7a,l] 

"During the first decades of the nineteenth century, furniture and the objects that 
surrounded us for use and pleasure were relatively simple and durable, and ac- 
corded with the needs of hoth the lower and the upper strata. This resulted in 
people's attachment, as they grew up, to the objects of their surroundings. . . . The 
differentiation of objects has broken down this situation in three different 
ways. . . . First, the sheer quantity of very specifically formed ohjects make a close 
. . . relationship to each of them more difficult. . . . This is expressed ... in the 
housewife's complaint that the care of the household becomes ceremonial fetish- 
ism. . . . This concurrent differentiation has the same effect as consecutive differ- 



entiation. Changes in fashion disrupt that . . . process of . . . assimilation between 
subject and object. . . . [In the third place, tbere is] the multitude of styles that 
confronts us when we view the objects that surround us." Georg Simmel, Philoso- 



On the theory of the trace. To "the Harbor-Master, . . . [as] a sort of . . . deputy- 
Neptune for the circumambient seas, ... I was, in common with the other sea- 
men of the port, merely a subject for official writing, filling up of forms with all 
the artificial superiority of a man of pen and ink to the men who grapple with 
realities outside the consecrated walls of official buildings. What ghosts we must 
have been to him! Mere symbols to juggle with in books and heavy registers, 
without brains and muscles and perplexities; something hardly useful and decid- 
edly inferior." Joseph Conrad, Die Schattenlinie (Berlin <1926>), p. 51. 20 (Compare 
with the Rousseau passage <cited belowx) [I7a,3] 

On the theory of the trace. Practice is eliminated from the productive process by 
machinery. In the process of administration, something analogous occurs with 
heightened organization. Knowledge of human nature, such as the senior em- 
ployee could acquire through practice, ceases to be decisive. This can be seen 
when one compares Conrad's observations in "The Shadow-Line" with a pas- 
sage from Les Confessions. [18,1] 

On the theory of the trace: administration in the eighteenth century. As secretary 
to the French embassy in Venice, Rousseau had abolished the tax on passports 
for the French. "As soon as the news got around that I had reformed the passport 
tax, my only applicants were crowds of pretended Frenchmen who claimed in 
abominable accents to be either from Provence, Picardy, or Burgundy. As I have 
a fairly good ear, I was not easily fooled, and I doubt whether a single Italian 
cheated me out of my sequin, or a single Frenchmen paid it." Jean Jacques Rous- 
seau, Les Confessions, ed. Hilsum (Paris < 1 9 3 1 >) , vol. 2, p. 137. 21 [18,2] 

Baudelaire, in the introduction to his translation of Poe's "Philosophy of Furni- 
ture," which originally appeared in Octoher 1852 in he Magasin des families: 
"Who among us, in his idle hours, has not taken a delicious pleasure in construct- 
ing for himself a model apartment, a dream house, a house of dreams?" Charles 
Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, ed. Crepet, Histoires grotesques et serieuses par 



phiedes Geldes (Leipzig, 1900), pp. 491-494. 19 



[I7a,2] 



Poe (Paris, 1937), p. 304. 



[18,3] 



J 



[Baudelaire] 



For it pleases me, all for your sake, to row 
My own oars here on my own sea, 
And to soar heavenward by a strange avenue, 
Singing you the unsung praises of Death. 

— Pieixe Ronsard, "Hymne de la Mort," A Louys dcs Masures 



"Baudelaire's problem . . . must have . . . posed itself in these terms: 'How to he a 
great poet, but neither a Lamartine nor a Hugo nor a Musset.' I do not say that 
these words were consciously formulated, but they must have heen latent in 
Baudelaire's mind; they even constituted what was the essential Baudelaire. They 
were his raison d'etat. . . . Baudelaire considered Victor Hugo; and it is not impos- 
sible to imagine what he thought of him. . . . Everything that might scandalize, and 
thereby instruct and guide a pitiless young observer in the way of his own future 
art, . . . Baudelaire must have recorded in his mind, distinguishing the admiration 
forced upon him by Hugo's wonderful gifts from the impurities, the impru- 
dences, . . . that is to say, the chances for life and fame that so great an artist left 
hehind him to he gleaned." Paul Valery, Introduction (Charles Baudelaire, Les 
Fleurs dumal, with an introduction by Paul Valery [Paris <1926>], pp. x, xii, xiv). 2 
Prohlem of the poncif. :i [ Jl , 1] 

"For a few years before the Revolution of 1848, everyone is hesitating between a 
pure art ani a social art, and it is only well after 1852 that I 'art pour Vart gains the 
upper hand." C. L. de Liefde, Le Saint-Simonisme dans la poesie franqaise entre 



Leconte de Lisle, in the preface to his Poemes et poesies of 1855: "The hymns and 
odes inspired by steam power and electric telegraphy leave me cold." Cited in 
C. L. de Liefde, Le Saint-Simonisme dans la poesie franqaise entre 1825 et 1865, 



1825 et 1865 (Haarlem, 1927>, p. 180. 



[J1.2] 



p. 179. 



[J1.3] 



Baudelaire's "Les Bonnes Soeurs" <The Kind Sisters> may be compared with the 
Saint-Simonian poem "La Rue" <The Street), by Savinien Lapointe, shoemaker. 



Charles Baudelaire, 1855. Photo by Nadar. Musee d'Orsay, Paris; photo copyright 
© RMN. 



The latter is concerned only with prostitution and, at the end, evokes memories 
the youth of the fallen young women: 

Oh! Do not seek to know all that debauchery does 

To wither the flowers and mow them down; 

In its working, it is premature as death 

And will make you old despite your eighteen years. 



Have pity on them! Pity! 

When on the corner you should knock against them, 
Their angelic f aces bathed in the glow of good recalled. 

Olinde Rodrigues, Poesies sociales des ouvriers (Paris, 1841), pp. 201, 203. 

[J1.4] 

Dates. Baudelaire's first letter to Wagner: February 17, 1 860. Wagner's concerts 
in Paris: February 1 and 8, 1860. Paris premiere of Tannhmuser: March 13, 1861. 
When was Baudelaire's article in La Revue europeenne? 4 [ Jl,5] 

Baudelaire planned "an enormous work on the peintres des moeurs (painters of 
manners)." Crepet, in this connection, cites his statement: "Images — my great, my 
primitive passion." 5 Jacques Crepet, "Miettes baudelairiennes," Mercure de 
France, 46th year, vol. 262, no. 894, pp. 531-532. [ Jl,6] 

"Baudelaire . . .can still write, in 1852, in the preface to Dupont's Chansons: 'Art 
was thereafter inseparable from morality and utility. ' And he speaks there of the 
'puerile Utopia of the school of art for art's safce.' 6 . . . Nevertheless, he changes 
his mind soon after 1852. This conception of social art may perhaps be explained 
by his youthful relations. Dupont was his friend at the moment when Baudelaire, 
'almost fanatically republican under the monarchy,' was meditating a realistic 
and communicatory poetry." C. L. de Liefde, he Saint-Simonisme dans la poesie 
franqaise entre 1825 et 1865 <Haarlem, 1927>, p. 115. [Jla,l] 

Baudelaire soon forgot the February Revolution. 7 Telling evidence of this fact has 
heen published hy Jacques Crepet, in "Miettes baudelairiennes" <Baudelairean 
Morsels) (Mercure de France, vol. 262, no. 894, p. 525), in the form of a review of 
the Histoire de Neuilly et de ses chateaux, by the abbe Bellanger, a review which 
Baudelaire probably composed at the recfuest of his friend the lawyer Ancelle, and 
which at the time presumably appeared in the press. There Baudelaire speaks of 
the history of the place "from Roman times to the terrible days of February, when 
the chateau was the theater and spoil of the most ignoble passions, of orgy and 
destruction." [Jla,2] 

Nadar describes the outfi t worn by Baudelaire, who is encountered in the vicinity 
of his residence <of 1843-1845), the Hotel Pimodan. "Black trousers drawn well 
above his polished hoots; a hlue workman's blouse, stiff in its new folds; his hlack 
hair, naturally curly, worn long — his only coiffure; bright linen, strictly without 
starch; a faint moustache under his nose and a bit of beard on his chin; rose-col- 
ored gloves, quite new. . . . Thus arrayed and hatless, Baudelaire walked ahout 
his quartier of the city at an uneven pace, hoth nervous and languid, like a cat, 
choosing each stone of the pavement as if he had to avoid crushing an egg." Cited 
in Firmin Maillard, La Cite des intellectueh (Paris <1905>), p. 362. [ Jla,3] 



Baudelaire — after his enforced sea voyage 8 — was a well-traveled man. [Jla,4] 



Baudelaire to Poulet-Malassis, on January 8, 1860, after a visit from Meryon: 
"After he left me, I wondered how it was that I, who have always had the mind and 
the nerves to go mad, have never actually gone mad. In all seriousness, I gave 
heaven a Pharisee's thanks for this." 9 Cited in Gustave Geffroy, Charles Meryon 
(Paris, 1926), p. 128. [ J la, 5] 

From the <eighth> section of Baudelaire's "Salon de 1859." There one fi nds, apro- 
pos of Meryon, this phrase: "the profound and complex charm of a capital city 
which has grown old and worn in the glories and tribulations of life." A little 
further on: "I have rarely seen the natural solemnity of an immense city more 
poetically reproduced. Those majestic accumulations of stone; those spires 'whose 
fingers point to heaven'; those obelisks of industry, spewing forth their conglom- 
erations of smoke against the firmament; those prodigies of scaffolding 'round 
buildings under repair, applying their openwork architecture, so paradoxically 
beautiful, upon architecture's solid body; that tumultuous sky, charged with an- 
ger and spite; those limitless perspectives, only increased by the thought of all the 
drama they contain; — he forgot not one of the complex elements which go to make 
up the painful and glorious decor of civiJization. . . . But a cruel demon has 
touched M. Meryon's brain. . . . And from that moment we have never ceased 
waiting anxiously for some consoling news of this singular naval officer who in one 
short day turned into a mighty artist, and who bade farewell to the ocean's solemn 
adventures in order to paint the gloomy majesty of this most disquieting of capi- 
tals." 10 Cited in Gustave Geffroy, Charles Meryon (Paris, 1926), pp. 125-126. 

[J2,H 

The editor Delatre conceived a plan to publish an album of Meryon's etchings with 
text by Baudelaire. The plan fell through; but it had already been ruined for 
Baudelaire when Meryon demanded, instead of a text suited to the poet, a pedan- 
tic explication of the pictured monuments. Baudelaire complains of the matter in 
his letter of February 16, 1860, to Poulet-Malassis. [J2,2] 

Meryon placed these lines under his etching Le Pont-ISeuf: 

Here lies the exact likeness 
Of the late Pont-Neuf, 
All newly refurbished 
Per recent ordinance. 
O learned doctors, 
Skillful surgeons, 
Why not do for us 

What's been done f or this stone bridge? 

According to Geffroy — who evidently takes them from another version of the etch- 
ing — the last two lines are: "Will tell why renovations / Have been forced on this 
stone bridge." Gustave Geffroy, Charles Meryon (Paris, 1926), p. 59. [J2,3] 



The Pont-Neuf. Etching by Charles Meryon, 1853-1854. SeeJ2,3. 



Bizarre features on plates hy Meryon. "The Rue cles Chantres": squarely in the 
foreground, affixed at eye-level on the wall of what would seem to be a nearly 
windowless house, is a poster hearing the words "Sea Baths." <See Geffroy, Char- 
les Meryon, p. 144. > — "The College Henry IV," about which Geffroy writes: "All 
around the school, the gardens, and neighboring houses, the space is empty, and 
suddenly Meryon hegins to fill it with a landscape of mountain and sea, replacing 
the ocean of Paris . The sails and masts of a ship appear, some flocks of sea birds 
are taking wing, and this phantasmagoria gathers around the most rigorous de- 
sign, the tall buildings of the school regularly pierced by windows, the courtyard 
planted with trees, . . . and the surrounding houses, with their dark rooftops, 
crowded chimneys, and blank facades" (Geffroy, Charles Meryon, p. 151). — "The 
Admiralty": in the clouds a troop of horses, chariots, and dolphins advances upon 
the ministry, ships and sea serpents are not lacking, and several human-shaped 
creatures are to he seen in the multitude. "This will be . . . the last view of Paris 
engraved hy Meryon. He bids adieu to the city where he suffered that onslaught of 
dreams at the house, stern as a fortress, in which he did service as a young ensign, 
in the springtime of his life, when he was just setting out for the distant isles" 
(Geffroy, Charles Meryon, p. 161). 0 Flaneur D [J2a,l] 

"Meryon 's execution is incomparable, Beraldi says. The most striking thing is the 
beauty and dignity of his firm, decisive line. Those line straight edges are said to be 



executed thus: the plate is set upright on an easel, the etching needle is held at 
arm's length (like a rapier), and the hand moves slowly from top to bottom." 
R. Castinelli, "Charles Meryon," Introduction to Charles Meryon, Eaux-fortes 
sur Paris, p. iii. [J2a,2] 

Meryon produced his twenty-two etchings of Paris between 1852 and 1854. 

tJ2a,3] 

When did the "Paris article" <article de Paris > first appear? [J2a,4] 

What Baudelaire says about a drawing by Daumier on the subject of cholera 
could also apply to certain engravings by Meryon: "True to its ironic custom in 
times of great calamity and political upheaval, the sky of Paris is superb; it is 
quite white and incandescent with heat." Charles Baudelaire, Les Dessins de 
Daumier (Paris <1924>), p. 13. <SeeJ52a,4.> D Dust, Boredom D [J2a,5] 

"The splenetic cupola of the sky" — a phrase from Charles Baudelaire, he Spleen 
de Paris, ed. Simon (Paris), p. 8 ("Chacun sa chimere"). 11 [J2a,6] 

"The philosophical and literary Catholicism ... of Baudelaire had need of an 
intermediate position . . . where it could take up its abode between God and the 
Devil. The title Les Limbes <Limbo> marked this geographic determination of 
Baudelaire's poems, making it possible to understand better the order Baudelaire 
wanted to establish among them, which is the order of a journey — more exactly, a 
fourth journey after Dante's three journeys in Inferno, Purgatorio, and Paradiso. 
The poet of Florence lived on in the poet of Paris." Albert Thibaudet, Histoire de 
la litteraturef rancaise de 1789 a nos jours (Paris <1936>), p. 325. 12 [ J3,l] 

On the allegorical element. "Dickens . . . mentions, among the coffee shops into 
which he crept in those wretched days, one in St. Martin's Lane, 'of which I only 
recollect that it stood near the church, and that in the door there was an oval glass 
plate with coffee room painted on it, addressed towards the street. If I ever find 
myself in a very different kind of coffee room now, but where there is such an 
inscription on glass, and read it backwards on the wrong side, MOOR eeffoc (as I 
often used to do then in a dismal reverie), a shock goes through my blood.' That 
wild word, 'Moor Eeffoc,' is the motto of all effective realism." G. K. Chesterton, 
Dickens (series entitled Vie des hommes illustres, no. 9), trans, from the English by 
Laurent and Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), p. 32. 13 [J3,2] 

Dickens and stenography: "He describes how, after he had learnt the whole exact 
alphabet, 'there then appeared a procession of new horrors, called arbitrary 
characters — the most despotic characters I have ever known; who insisted, for 
instance, that a thing like the beginning of a cobweb meant "expectation ," and that 
a pen-and-ink skyrocket stood for "disadvantageous."' He concludes, Tt was al- 
most hearthreaking.' But it is significant that somebody else, a colleague of his, 



concluded, 'There never ivas such a shorthand writer.'" G. K. Chesterton, Dick- 
ens (series entitled Vie des hommes illustres, no. 9), trans. Laurent and Martin- 
Dupont (Paris, 1927), pp. 40-41. 14 [J3,3] 



Valery (Introduction to Les Fleurs du mal [Paris, 1926], p. xxv) speaks of a com- 
bination of "eternity and intimacy" in Baudelaire. 13 [J3>4] 

From the article by Barbey d'Aurevilly in Articles justicatifs pour Charles Baude- 
laire, auteur des Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1857), a hooklet of thirty-three pages, with 
other contributions by Dulamon, Asselineau, and Thierry, which was printed at 
Baudelaire's expense for the trial: lf ' "The poet, terrifying and terrified, wanted us 
to inhale the abomination of that dread basket that he carries, pale canephore, on 
his head bristling with horror. . . . His talent ... is itself a flower of evil cultivated 
in the hothouses of Decadence. . . . There is something of Dante in the author of 
Les Fleurs du mal, but it is the Dante of an epoch in decline, an atheist and 
modernist Dante, a Dante come after Voltaire." Cited in W. T. Bandy, Baudelaire 
Judged by His Contemporaries (New York <1933>), pp. 167-168 <collection of 
texts in French) . [ J3a,l] 

Gautier's note on Baudelaire in Les Poetesfrancais: Recueil des chefs-d'oeuvre de 
la poesiefranqaise, eel. Eugene Crepet (Paris, 1862), vol. 4, Les Contemporains: 
"We never read Les Fleurs du mal . . . without thinking involuntarily of that tale 
by Hawthorne <entitled "Rappaccini's Daughter"). . . . His muse resembles the 
doctor's daughter whom no poison can harm, but whose pallid and anemic complex- 
ion betrays the influence of the milieu she inhabits." Cited in W. T. Bandy, Baude- 
laire Judged by His Contemporaries (New York), p. 174. <See J29a,3> . [J3a,2] 

Main themes of Poe's aesthetic, according to Valery: philosophy of composition, 
theory of the artificial, theory of modernity, theory of the strange and exceptional. 

[J3a,3] 

"Thus, Baudelaire's problem might have — indeed, must have — posed itself in 
these terms: 'How to he a great poet, but neither a Lamartine nor a Hugo nor a 
Musset.' I do not say that these words were consciously formulated, but they must 
have been latent in Baudelaire's mind; they even constituted what was the essen- 
tial Baudelaire. They were his raison d'etat. In the domain of creation, which is 
also the domain of pride, the need to come out and be distinct is part of life itself." 
Paul Valery, Introduction to Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1928), p. x. 17 

[J3a,4] 

Regis Messac (<Le '"Detective Novel" et V influence de la pensee scientifique [Paris, 
1929], > p. 421) points to the influence of the "Two Crepuscules" <"Le Crepuscule 
du matin" and "Le Crepuscule du soir," in Les Fleurs du mal>, first published 
February 1, 1852, in La Semaine thedtrale, on certain passages in Ponson du 
Terrail's Drames de Paris, which hegan to appear, in installments, in 1857. 

[J3a,5] 



The title originally planned for Spleen de Paris was he Promeneur solitaire. For 
he Fleurs du mal it was Les Limbes <Limbo>. [ J4,l] 



From "Conseils aux jeunes litterateurs": "If one is willing to live in stuhborn 
contemplation of tomorrow's work, daily perseverance will serve inspiration." 
Charles Baudelaire, L'Art romantique, ed. Hachette, vol. 3 (Paris), p. 286.'" 

[J4.2] 

Baudelaire confesses to having had, "in childhood, the good fortune — or the mis- 
fortune — of reading only books for adults." Charles Baudelaire, L'Art roman- 
tique (Paris), p. 298 ("Drames et romans honnetes"). 19 [J4,3] 

On Heine: "<his> works are corrupted by materialistic sentimentality." Baude- 
laire, L'Art rommntique, p. 303 ("L'Ecole paienne"). 20 [J4,4] 

A motif that wandered from Spleen de Paris to "L'Ecole paienne": "Why don't the 
poor wear gloves when they heg? They would make a fortune." Baudelaire, LArt 
romantique (Paris), p. 309. 21 [J4,5] 

"The time is notf ar off when it will he understood that every literature that refuses 
to walk hand in hand with science and philosophy is a homicidal and suicidal 
literature." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 309 (concluding sentence of 
"L'Ecole paienne"). 22 [J4.6] 

Baudelaire on the child raised in the company of the Pagan School: "His soul, 
constantly excited and unappeased, goes ahout the world, the busy, toiling world; 
it goes, I say, like a prostitute, crying: Plastique! Plastique! The plastic — that 
frightful word gives me goose flesh." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), 
p. 307. 21 Compare J22a,2. [J4,7] 

A passage from the portrait of Victor Hugo in which Baudelaire, like an engraver 
who sketches his own image in a remarque, has portrayed himself in a subordi- 
nate clause: "If he paints the sea, no seascape will equal his. The ships which 
furrow its surface or which cut through its foam will have, more than those of 
any other painter, the appearance of fierce combatants, the character of will and 
of animality which mysteriously emerges from a geometric and mechanical appa- 
ratus of wood, iron, ropes, and canvas; a monstrous animal created by man to 
which the wind and the waves add the beauty of movement." Baudelaire, L'Art 
romantique (Paris), p. 321 ("Victor Hugo"). 2 * [J4,8] 

A phrase apropos of Auguste Barbier: "the natural indolence of those who depend 
on inspiration." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 335. 25 [J4a,l] 

Baudelaire describes the poetry of the lyric poet — in the essay on Banville — in a 
way that, point for point, brings into view the exact opposite of his own poetry: 
"The word 'apotheosis' is one of those that unfailingly appear under the pen of 



the poet when he has to describe ... a mingling of glory and light. And if the lyric 
poet has occasion to speak of himself, he will not depict himself bent over a 
table, . . . wrestling with intractable phrases, . . . any more than he will show 
himself in a poor, wretched, or disorderly room; nor, if he wishes to appear dead, 
will he show himself rotting heneath a linen shroud in a wooden casket. That 
would be lying." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), pp. 370-371. 26 [J4a,2] 

In his essay on Banville, Baudelaire mentions mythology together with allegory, 
and then continues: "Mythology is a dictionary of living hieroglyphics." Baude- 
laire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 370. 27 [J4a,3] 

Conjunction of the modern and the demonic: "Modern poetry is related at one 
and the same time to painting, music, sculpture, decorative art, satiric philosophy, 
and the analytic spirit. . . . Some could perhaps see in this symptoms of depravity 
of taste. But that is a question which I do not wish to discuss here." Nevertheless, 
a page later, after a reference to Beethoven, Maturin, Byron, and Poe, one reads: 
"I mean that modern art has an essentially demoniacal tendency. And it seems 
that this satanic side of man . . . increases every day, as if the devil, like one who 
fattens geese, enjoyed enlarging it by artificial means, patiently force-feeding the 
human race in his poultry yard in order to prepare himself a more succulent 
dish." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), pp. 373-374. 28 The concept of the 
demonic comes into play where the concept of modernity converges with 
Catholicism. [J4a,4] 

Regarding Leconte de Lisle: "My natural predilection for Rome prevents me 
from feeling all the enjoyment that I should in the reading of bis Greek poems." 
Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), pp. 389-390. 29 Chthonic view of the world. 
Catholicism. [J4a,5] 

It is very important that the modern, with Baudelaire, appear not only as the 
signature of an epoch but as an energy by which this epoch immediately trans- 
forms and appropriates antiquity. Among all the relations into which modernity 
enters, its relation to antiquity is critical. Thus, Baudelaire sees confirmed in 
Hugo "the fatality which led him . . . partially to transform ancient ode and 
ancient tragedy into the poems and dramas that we know." Baudelaire, LArt 
romantique (Paris), p. 401 ("Les Miser able s"), m This is also, for Baudelaire, the 
function of Wagner. [ J 5 , 1 ] 

The gesture with which the angel chastises the miscreant: "Is it not useful for the 
poet, the philosopher, to take egoistic Happiness by the hair from time to time and 
say to it, while ruhhing its nose in blood and dung: 'See your handiwork and 
swallow it'?" Charles Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 406 ("Les 
Miser ables")* ! [J5,2] 



"The Church, . . . that Pharmacy where no one has the right to slumber!" Baude- 
laire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 420 ("Madame Bovary")J 12 [J5,3] 



"Madame Bovary, in what is most forceful, most ambitious, and also most contem- w 
plative in her nature, has remained a man. Just as Pallas Athena sprang fully 
armed from the head of Zeus, so this strange androgynous creature has kept all the ^ 
attraction of a virile soul in a charming feminine body." Further along, on W 
Flaubert: "All intellectual women will be grateful to him for having raised the a. 
female to so high a level . . . and for having made her share in that combination of gi. 
calculation and reverie which constitutes the perfect being." Baudelaire, L'Art 
romantique, pp. 415, 419. 33 [J5,4] 



"Hysteria! Why couldn't this physiological mystery be made the sum and sub- 
stance of a literary work — this mystery which the Academie de Medecine has not 
yet solved and which, manifesting itself in women by the sensation of a lump in the 
throat that seems to rise . . . , shows itself in excitable men by every kind of impo- 
tence as well as hy a tendency toward every kind of excess." Baudelaire, L'Art 
romantique (Paris), p. 418 ("Madame Bovary" J. 34 [J5,5] 



From "Pierre Dupont": "Whatever the party to which one belongs, . . . it is impos- 
sible not to be moved by the sight of that sickly throng breathing the dust of the 
workshops, . . . sleeping among vermin . . . — that sighing and languishing throng 
. . . which looks long and sadly at the sunshine and shadows of the great parks." 
Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), pp. 198-199. 35 [J5a,l] 



From "Pierre Dupont": "By excluding morality, and often even passion, the puer- 
ile Utopia of the school of art for art's sake was inevitably sterile. . . . When there 
appeared a poet, awkward at times, hut almost always great, who proclaimed in 
impassioned language the sacredness of the Revolution of 1830 and sang of the 
destitution of England and Ireland, despite his defective rhymes, despite his pleo- 
nasms, . . . the question was settled, and art was thereafter inseparable from mo- 
rality and utility." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 193. 3f ' The passage 
refers to Barbier. [J5a,2] 



"The optimism of Dupont, his unlimited trust in the natural goodness of man, his 
fanatical love of nature constitute the greatest share of his talent." Baudelaire, 
L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 201. 37 [J5a,3] 



"I was not at all surprised to find ... in Tannhiiuser, Lohengrin, and The Flying 
Dutchman, an excellent method of construction, a spirit of order and division that 
recalls the architecture of ancient tragedies." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique 
(Paris), p. 225 ("Richard Wagner et Tannhauser")™ [J5a,4] 



"If, in his choice of subjects and in his dramatic method, Wagner resembles antiq- 
uity, by the passionate energy of his expression he is today the truest repre- 
sentative of modern nature." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 250. :w 

[J5a,5] 



Baudelaire in "L'Art philosophique," an essay concerned mainly with Alfred Re- 
thel: "Here everything — place, decor, furnishings, accessories (see Hogarth, for 
example) — everything is allegory, allusion, hieroglyph, rebus." Baudelaire, L'Art 
romantique, p. 131. 10 There follows a reference to Michelet's interpretation of 
Diirer's Melancholia I. [J5a,6] 

Variant of the passage on Meryon cited by Gef'froy, in "Peintres et aqua-fortistes" 
(1862): "Just the other day a young American artist, M. Whistler, was showing . . . 
a set of etchings . . . representing the banks of the Thames; wonderful tangles of 
rigging, yardarms and rope; farragos of fog, furnaces, and corkscrews of smoke; 
the profound and intricate poetry of a vast capital. . . . M. Meryon, the true type 
of the consummate etcher, could not neglect the call. ... In the pungency, fi nesse, 
and sureness of his drawing, M. Meryon recalls all that was best in the old etchers. 
We have rarely seen the natural solemnity of a great capital more poetically de- 
picted. Those majestic accumulations of stone; those 'spires whose fingers point to 
heaven' ; those obelisks of industry, spewing forth their conglomerations of smoke 
against the firmament; those prodigies of scaffolding 'round buildings under re- 
pair, applying their openwork architecture, of such paradoxical and arachnean 
beauty, upon architecture's solid hody; that foggy sky, charged with anger and 
spite; those limitless perspectives, only increased by the thought of the dramas 
they contain — he forgot not one of the complex elements which go to make up the 
painful and glorious decor of civilization." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), 
pp. 119-121." [ J6,l] 

On Guys: "The festivals of the Bairam, ... in the midst of which, like a pale sun, 
can he discerned the endless ennui of the late sultan." Baudelaire, L'Art roman- 
tique (Paris), p. 83. 42 [J6,2] 

On Guys: "Wherever those deep, impetuous desires, war, love, and gaming, are in 
full fl ood, like Orinocos of the human heart . . . , our observer is always punctu- 
ally on the spot." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 87. 4:! [ J6,3] 

Baudelaire as antipode of Rousseau, in the maxim from his essay on Guys: "For 
no sooner do we take leave of the domain of needs and necessities to enter that of 
pleasures and luxury than we see that nature can counsel nothing but crime. It is 
this infallible Mother Nature who has created parricide and cannibalism." Baude- 
laire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 100."' [JM] 

"Very difficult to note down in shorthand" — this, from the essay on Guys, is 
Baudelaire's appreciation, obviously very modern, of the movement of carriages. 
Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 1 13. 45 [ J6,5] 

Closing sentences of the Guys essay: "He has gone everywhere in quest of the 
ephemeral, the fleeting forms of beauty in the life of our day, the characteristic 
traits of what, with the reader's permission, we have called 'modernity.' Often 
bizarre, violent, excessive, but always full of poetry, he has succeeded, in his 



drawings, in distilling the bitter or heady flavor of the wine of Life." Baudelaire, 
L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 114. 44 [J6a,l] 



The figure of the "modern" and that of "allegory" must he brought into relation 
with each other: "Woe unto him who seeks in antiquity anything other than pure 
art, logic, and general method! By plunging too deeply into the past, ... he 
renounces the . . . privileges provided by circumstances; for almost all our origi- 
nality comes from the stamp that time imprints upon our feelings <sensations>!' 
Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 72 ("Le Peintre de la vie moderne"). 47 But 
the privilege of which Baudelaire speaks also comes into force, in a mediated way, 
vis-a-vis antiquity: the stamp of time that imprints itself on antiquity presses out 
of it the allegorical configuration. [ J6a,2] 



Concerning "Spleen et ideal," these reflections from the Guys essay: "Modernity is 
the transitory, the fugitive, the contingent; it is one half of art, the other half being 
the eternal and immutable. ... If any particular modernity is to be worthy of 
becoming antiquity, one must extract from it the mysterious beauty that human 
life involuntarily gives it. It is to this task that Monsieur G. particularly addresses 
himself." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 70. In another place (p. 74), he 
speaks of "this legendary translation of external life."' 18 [J6a,3] 



Motifs of the poems in the theoretical prose. "Le Coucher du soleil romantique" 
(Romantic Sunset>: "Dandyism is a sunset; like the declining daystar, it is glori- 
ous, without heat and full of melancholy. But alas, the rising tide of democracy . . . 
is daily overwhelming these last representatives of human pride" (L 'Art roman- 
tique, p. 95). — "Le Soleil" <The Sun>: "At a time when others are asleep, Monsieur 
G. is bending over his tahle, darting onto a sheet of paper the same glance that a 
moment ago he was directing toward external things, skirmishing with his pencil, 
his pen, his hrush, splashing his glass of water up to the ceiling, wiping his pen on 
his shirt, in a ferment of violent activity, as though afraid that the images might 
escape him, cantankerous though alone, elbowing himself on" (L'Art romantique, 
p. 67) * [J6a,4] 

Nouveaute: "The child sees everything in a state of newness; he is always drunk. 
Nothing more resembles what we call inspiration than the delight with which a 
child absorbs form and color. ... It is by this deep and joyful curiosity that we 
may explain the fixed and animally ecstatic gaze of a child confronted wkh 
something new." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 62 ("Le Peintre de la vie 
moderne"). Perhaps this explains the dark saying in "L'Oeuvre et la vie d'Eugene 
Delacroix": "For it is true to say that, generally speaking, the child, in relation to 
the man, is much closer to original sin" (L'Art romantique, p. 41). 50 [ J7,l] 



The sun: "the boisterous sun heating a tattoo upon his windowpane" (L'Art ro- 
mantique, p. 65); "the landscapes of the great city . . . huf feted by the sun" (L'Art 
romantique, pp. 65-66). ;>l []7 ',2] 



In "L'Oeuvre et la vie d'Eugene Delacroix": "The whole visible universe is but a 
storehouse of images and signs." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique, p. 13. 02 [J7,3] 



From the Guys essay: "Beauty is made up of an eternal, invariable element . . . 
and of a relative, circumstantial element, which will be . . . the age — its fashions, 
its morals, its emotions. Without this second element, which might be described as 
the amusing, enticing, appetizing icing on the divine cake, the first element would 
be beyond our powers of digestion." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique, pp. 54-55. 5:i 

IF A] 

On nouveaute: "Night! you'd please me more without these stars / which speak a 
language I know all too well." Flews <du mal>, ed. Payot, p. 139 ("Obsession"). 0 ' 1 

[J7,5] 

The subsequent appearance of the flower injugendstil is not without significance 
for the title Les Flews du mcd. This work spans the arch that reaches from the 
taedium vitae of the Romans tojugendstil. [J7,6] 

It would be important to determine Poe's relation to Latinity. Baudelaire's inter- 
est in the technique of composition could have led him — in the end — as surely to 
Latin culture as his interest in the artificial led him to Anglo-Saxon culture. 
W>rking through Poe, tliis latter area of culture also conditions — at the outset — 
Baudelaire's theory of composition. Hence, it becomes more urgent to ask 
whether this doctrine does not, in the end, bear a Latin stamp. [J7,7] 

The Lesbians — a painting by Courbet. [J 7,8] 

Nature, according to Baudelaire, knows this one luxury: crime. Thus the sig- 
nificance of the artificial. Perhaps we may draw on this thought for the interpreta- 
tion of the idea that children stand nearest to original sin. Is it because, exuberant 
by nature, they oumot get out of harm's way? At bottom, Baudelaire is thinking 
of parricide. (Compare L'Art romantique [Paris], p. 100.) 55 [J7a.l] 

The key to the emancipation from antiquity — which (see in the Guys essay, L'Art 
romantique, p. 72) M can furnish only the canon of composition — is for Baudelaire 
allegorese. [J7a,2] 

Baudelaire's manner of reciting. He gathered his friends — Antonio Watripon, 
Gabriel Dantrague, Malassis, Delvau — "in a modest cafe on the Rue Dau- 
phine. . . . The poet began by ordering punch; then, when he saw us all disposed 
toward benevolence . . . , he would recite to us in a voice at once mincing, soft, 
fluty, oily, and yet mordant, some enormity or other — "Le Vin de l'assassin" <The 
Murderer's Wine> or "Une Charogne" <Carrion>. The contrast between the vio- 
lence of the images and the perfect placidity, the suave and emphatic accentuation, 



of the delivery was truly striking." Jules Levallois, Milieu de siecle: Memoires d'un 
critique (Paris <1895>), pp. 93-94. [J7a,3] 



"The famous phrase, 'I who am the son of a priest'; the glee he was said to feel in 
eating nuts, when he would imagine he was munching the brains of small children; 
the story of the glazier who, at liis request, climbed six flights of stairs under a 
heavy load of windowpanes in oppressive summer heat, only to be told he was not 
needed — all just so many insanities, and probably falsehoods, which he delighted 
in amassing." Jules Levallois, Milieu de siecle: Memoires d'un critique (Paris), 



A remarkable pronouncement by Baudelaire on Gautier (cited in Jules Levallois, 
Milieu de siecle: Memoires d'un critique [Paris], p. 97). It is recorded by Charles 
de Lovenjoul, "Un Dernier Chapitre de l'histoire des oeuvres de Balzac," in 
L'Echo des theatres of August 25, 1846, as follows: "Fat, lazy, sluggish, he has no 
ideas, and can only string words together as the Osage strings beads for a neck- 



Highly significant letter from Baudelaire to Toussenel: "Monday, January 21, 
1856. My dear Toussenel, I really want to thank you for your gift. I didn't know 
the value of your book — I admit it simply and baldly. . . . For a long time I've been 
rejecting almost all books with a feeling of disgust. It's been a long time, too, since 
I've read anything so absolutely instructive and amusing. The chapter on the 
falcon and the birds that hunt on man's behalf is a masterpiece in itself. / There 
are expressions in your book that recall those of the great masters and which are 
cries of truth — expressions whose tone is irresistibly philosophical, such as, 
'Every animal is a sphinx,' and, with regard to analogy, 'What repose the mind 
finds in gentle quietude, sheltered by so fertile and so simple a doctrine, for which 
none of God's works is a mystery!' . . . What is beyond doubt is that you are a 
poet. I've been saying for a very long time that the poet is supremely intelligent . . . 
and that imagination is the most scientific of faculties, for it alone can understand 
the universal analogy, or what a mystic religion calls correspondence. But when I 
try to publish such statements, I'm told I'm mad. . . . What is absolutely certain is 
that I have a philosophical cast of mind that allows me to see clearly what is true, 
even in zoology, although I'm neither a huntsman nor a naturalist. . . . One idea 
has been uppermost in my thoughts since I started reading your book — and this is 
that you're a true intelligence which has wandered into a sect. All things consid- 
ered, what do you owe to Fourier? Nothing, or very little. Without Fourier you 
would still be what you are. Rational men didn't await Fourier's arrival on earth 
to realize that nature is a language, an allegory, a mold, an embossing, if you 
like. . . . Your book arouses in me a great many dormant thoughts — and where 
original sin is concerned, as well as . . .form molded on an idea, I've often thought 
that noxious, disgusting animals were, perhaps, merely the coming to life in hodily 
form of man's evil thoughts. . . . Thus, the whole of nature participates in original 
sin. / Don't hold my boldness and straightforwardness against me, hut believe 



pp. 94-95. 



[J7a,4] 



lace." <See J36a,l.> 



[J7a,5] 



TheopbileGautier, 1854-1855. Photo by Nadar. Musee d'Orsay, 
Paris; photo copyright © RMN. SeeJ7a,5. 

that I am your devoted . . . Ch. Baudelaire.""' 7 Henri Cordier, Notules sur Baude- 
laire (Paris, 1900), pp. 5-7. The middle section of the letter polemicizes against 
Toussenel's faith in progress and liis denunciation of de Maistre. [ J8] 

"Origin of the name Baudelaire. Here is what M. Georges Barral has written on 
this subject in the La Revue des curiosites revolutionnaires: Baudelaire explained 
the etymology of his name, which, he said, came not from bel or beau hut from 
band or bald. 'My name is something terrible,' he declared. 'As a matter of fact, 
the badelaire was a saher with a short, broad blade and a convex cutting edge, 
hooked at the tip. ... It was introduced into France after the Crusades and used 
in Paris until around 1560 for executing criminals. Some years ago, in 1861, dur- 
ing excavations carried out near the Pont-au-Change, they recovered the bade- 
laire used by the executioner at the Grand Chatelet in the twelfth century. It was 
deposited in the Musee de Cluny. Go and have a look. It is frightening to see. I 
shudder to think how the profile of my face approximates the profile of this bade- 



/••lire.' — 'Bnt your name is Baudelaire,' I replied, 'not B&delaireJ' — 'Badelaire, 
Baudelaire by corruption. It's the same thing.' — 'Not at all,' I say. 'Your name 
comes from baud (merry), baudiment (merrily), s'ebaudir (to make merry). You 
are kind and cheerful.' — 'No, no, I am wicked and sad.'" Louis Thomas, Cu- 
riosites sir Baudelaire (Paris , 1912), pp. 23-24. [ J8a,l] 

Jnles Janin published an article in 1865, in L'Independanee beige, reproaching 
Heine for his melancholy; Baudelaire drafted a letter in response. "Baudelaire 
maintains that melancholy is the source of all sincere poetry." Louis Thomas, 
Curiosites sur Baudelaire (Paris, 1912), p. 17. [J8a,2] 

On a visit to an Academician, 511 Baudelaire refers to Les Fleurs du bien that ap- 
peared in 1858 and claims the name of the author — Henry (probably Henri) Bor- 
deaux — as his own pseudonym. See L. Thomas, Curiosites sur Baudelaire (Paris, 
1912), p. 4.3. [J8a,3] 

"On the lie Saint-Louis , Baudelaire felt at home everywhere; he was as perfectly at 
his ease in the street or on the quays as he would have been in his own room. To go 
out into the island was in no way to quit his domain. Thus, one met him in slippers, 
hareheaded, and dressed in the tunic that served as his work clothes." Louis 
Thomas, Curiosites sur Baudelaire(Paris, 1912), p. 27. [J8a,4] 

"'When I'm utterly alone,'' he wrote in 1864, 'I'll seek out a religion (Tihetan or 
Japanese), for I despise the Koran too much, and on my deathhed I'll forswear 
that last religion to show beyond douht my disgust with universal stupidity. 
Louis Thomas, Curiosites sur Baudelaire (Paris, 1912), pp. 57-58. [J8a,5] 

Baudelaire's production is masterly and assured from the beginning. [J 9 J] 

Dates. Hem s du ma/: 1857, 1861, 1866. Poe: 1809-1849. Baudelaire's discovery 
of Poe: around the end of 1846. [J9,2] 

Remy de Gourmont has drawn a parallel hetween Athalie's dream and "Les Meta- 
morphoses dn vampire"; Fontainas has endeavored to do likewise with Hugo's 
"Fantomes" (in Les Orientates) and "Les Petites Vieilles." Hugo: "How many 
maidens fair, alas! I've seen fade and die. . . . One form, above all . . ." f,u [ J9,3] 

Laforgue on Baudelaire: "After all the liherties of Romanticism, he was the first to 
discover these crude comparisons which suddenly, in the midst of a harmonious 
period, cause him to put his foot in his plate; palpahle, exaggerated comparisons 
which seem at times downright American; disconcerting purplish flash and dazzle: 
'Night was thickening . . . like a partition!' (Other examples abound.) <Her walk is 
like> a serpent at the end of a stick; her hair is an ocean; her head sways with the 
gentleness of a young elephant; her hody leans like a frail vessel pluuging its 
yardarms into the water; her saliva mounts to her mouth like a wave swollen by the 



melting of rumhling glaciers; her neck is a tower of ivory; her teeth are sheep 
perched on the hills ahove Hebron. — This is Americanism superimposed on the 
metaphorical language of the 'Song of Songs.'" Jules Laforgue, Melanges post- 
hiunes (Paris, 1903), pp. 113-114. ("Notes sur Baudelaire")."' Compare J86a,3. 

[J9.4] 

"In the fogs along the Seine, the storm of his youth and the marine suns of his 
memories have loosened the strings of an incurably plaintive and shrill Byzantine 
viol." Jules Laforgue, Melanges posthumes (Paris, 1903), p. 114. ("Notes sur 
Baudelaire")." 2 [J9,5] 

When the first edition of Les Fleurs du mal appeared, Baudelaire was thirty-six 
years old. [ J9,6] 

Le Vavasseur describes him around 1844: "Byron attired like Beau Brummell." 

[J9>7] 

The Petits Poemes en prose were first collected posthumously. [ J9,8] 

"He was the lirst to hreak with the public." Laforgue, Melanges posthumes (Paris, 
1903), p. 115* [ J9.9] 

"Baudelaire the cat, Hindu, Yankee, episcopal, alchemist. — Cat: his way of saying 
'my dear' in that solemn piece that opens with 'Behave, my Sorrow!' — Yankee: 
the use of 'very' hefore an adjective; his eurt descriptions of landscape, and the 
line 'Mount, my spirit, wander at your ease,' which the initiated recite in metallic 
tones; his hatred of eloquence and of poetic confidences; 'Vaporous pleasure will 
drift out of sight / As . . .' what then'.'' Hugo, Gautier, and others before him would 
have made a French, oratorical comparison; he makes a Yankee one and, without 
settled prejudice, remains in the air: 'As a sylphid pirouettes into the wings' (you 
can see the iron wires and stage machinery). — Hindu: his poetry is closer to the 
Indian than that of Leconte de Lisle with all his erudition and dazzling intricacy: 
'of sohhing fountains and of birds that sing / endless ohbligatos to my trysts.' 
Neither a great heart nor a great intellect, hut what plaintive nerves! What open 
senses! What a magical voice!" Jules Laforgue, Melanges posthumes (Paris, 1903), 
pp. 118-119 ("Notes sur Baudelaire")." 1 [ J9a,l] 

One of the few clearly articulated passages of the Argunmt du lhre stir la Bel- 
gique— in chapter 27, "Promenade a Malines": "Profane airs, adapted to peals of 
bells. Through the crossing and recrossing melodies, I seemed to hear notes from 
"La Marseillaise." The hymn of the rabble, as broadcast from the belfries, had 
lost a little of its harshness. Chopped into small pieces by the hammers, this was 
not the usual gloomy howling; rather, it had taken on, to my ears, a childish 
grace. It was as though the Revolution had learned to stutter in the language of 



heaven." Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, ed. Y<ves>-G<erard> Le Dantec <Paris, 1931— 
1932>, p. 725. [J9a,2] 



From the "Note detachee" in the book on Belgium: "I am no dupe, and I have 
never been a dupe! I say, 'Long live the Revolution!' as I would say, 'Long live 
Destruction! Long live Expiation! Long live Punishment! Long live Death!'" 
Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, ed. Y.-G. Le Dantec, pp. 727-728/' 5 [J9a,3] 

Argument du livre sur la Belgique, chapter 25, "Architecture — Churches — Relig- 
ions." "Brussels. Churches: Sainte-Gudule. Magnificent stained-glass windows. 
Beautiful intense colors, like those with which a profound soul invests all the 
objects of life." Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, ed. Y.-G. Le Dantec, p. 722. — "Mort 
dcs amants" — Jugendstil — Hashish. [ }9a,4] 

"I asked myself whether Baudelaire . . . had not sought, through histrionics and 
psychic transfer, to revive the adventures of the prince of Denmark. . . . There 
would have been nothing surprising in his having performed for himself the drama 
of Elsinore." Leon Daudet, Flambeaux (Paris <1929>), p. 210 ("Baudelaire"). 

[Jio.i] 

"The inner life . . . of Charles Baudelaire . . . seems to have passed . . . inconstant 
fluctuation between euphoria and aura. Hence the double character of his poems, 
which, on the one hand, represent a luminous beatitude and, on the other, a state 
of . . . taedium vitae." Leon Daudet, Flambeaux (Paris), p. 212 ("Baudelaire"). 

[J10.2] 

Jeanne Duval, Madame Sabatier, Marie Daubrun. [J10,3] 

"Baudelaire was out of place in the stupid nineteenth century. He belongs to the 
Renaissance. . . . This can be felt even in the beginnings of his poems, which recall 
those of Ronsard." Leon Daudet, Flambeaux (Paris), p. 216 ("Baudelaire: Le 
Malaise et i'aura'"). [ J10.4] 

Leon Daudet voices a very unfavorable judgment on Sainte-Beuve's Baudelaire. 

[J10.5] 

Among those who have pictured the city of Paris, Balzac is, so to speak, the 
primitive; his human figures are larger than the streets they move in. Baudelaire 
is the first to have conjured up the sea of houses, with its multistory waves. 
Perhaps in a context with Haussmann. [ J10,G] 

"The baudelaire ... is a kind of cutlass. . . . Broad and short and double- 
edged, . . . the baudelaire ensures a deadly thrust, for the hand that holds it is 
near the point." Victor-Emile Michelet, Figures d'evocateurs (Paris, 1913), p. 18 
("Baudelaire, ou Le Divinateur douloureux"). [J10,7] 



"The dandy, Baudelaire has said, 'should aspire to be sublime, continually. He 
should live and sleep in front of a mirror. " ,f>6 Louis Thomas, Curiosites sur Baude- 
laire (Paris, 1912), pp. 33-34. [J10,8] 



Two stanzas by Baudelaire, found on the page of an album: 

Noble strong-armed woman, who sleep and dream 

throughout long days with no thought of good or evil, 

who wear robes proudly slung in Grecian style; 

you whom for many years (which seem slow to me now) 

my lips, well versed in luscious kisses, 

cherished with all the devotion of a monk; 

priestess of debauch, my sister in lust, 
who disdained to carry and nourish 
a male child in your hallowed urn, 
hut fear and flee the appalling stigmata 
which virtue carved with its degrading blade 
in pregnant matrons' flanks/' 7 

Louis Thomas, Curiosites sur Baudelaire (Paris, 1912), p. 37. [ J10,9] 



"He was the^irst to write about himself in a moderate confessional manner, and to 
leave off the inspired tone. / He was the first to speak of Paris from the point of 
view of one of her daily damned (the lighted gas jets flickering with the wind of 
Prostitution, the restaurants and their air vents, the hospitals, the gambling, the 
logs resounding as they are sawn and then dropped on the paved courtyards, and 
the chimney corner, and the cats, beds, stockings, drunkards, and modern per- 
fumes) — all in a noble, remote, and superior fashion. . . . The first also who ac- 
cuses himself rather than appearing triumphant, who shows his wounds, his 
laziness, his bored uselessness at the heart of this dedicated, workaday century. / 
The first to bring to our literature the boredom implicit in sensuality, together with 
its strange decor: the sad alcove, . . . and to take pleasure in doing so. . . . The 
Painted Mask of Woman and its heavenly extension in sunset . . . Spleen and 
illness (not the poetic aspects of consumption but rather neurosis) without ever 
once using the word." Laforgue, Melanges posthumes (Paris, 1903), pp. 111- 
112. 68 [JlOa.l] 



"From the mysterious darkness in which they had germinated, sent out secret 
roots, and reared their fecund stalks, Les Fleurs du mal have gone on to blossom 
magnificently, opening up their somber jagged corollas veined with the colors of 
life and, under an endless sky of glory and scandal, scattering their heady per- 
fumes of love, of sorrow, and of death." Henri de Regnier, ("Baudelaire et Les 
Fleurs du mal," introductory essay> in Charles Baudelaire, "Les Fleurs du mal" et 
autres poemes (Paris <1930>), p. 18. [J10a,2] 



"He is always polite to what is ugly." Jules Laforgue, Melanges posthumes (Paris, 
1903), p. 114. M [J10a,3] 



Roger Allard — in Baudelaire et"V Esprit nouveau" (Paris, 1918), p. 8 — compares 
Baudelaire's poems to Madame Sabatier with Ronsard's poems to Helene. 

[J10a,4] 

"Two writers profoundly influenced Baudelaire, or rather two books. . . . One is 
the delicious Diable amoureux, by Cazotte; the other, Diderot's La Religieuse. To 
the first, many of the poems owe their restless frenzy . . . ; with Diderot, Baude- 
laire gathers the somber violets of Lesbos." At this point, in a note, a citation from 
Apollinaire's commentary to his edition of Baudelaire's Oeuvres poetiques: "One 
would probably not go wrong in taking Cazotte as the hyphen that had the 
honor of uniting, in . . . Baudelaire, the spirit of the Revolution's writers with that 
of Edgar Poe." Roger Allard, Baudelaire et "V Esprit nouveau" (Paris, 1918), 
pp. 9-10. <SeeJ20a,2.> [J10a,5] 

"The flavor of late autumn . . . which Baudelaire savored . . . in the literary de- 
composition of low Latin." Roger Allard, Baudelaire et "I'Esprit nouveau" (Paris, 
1918), p. 14. [J11.1] 

"Baudelaire ... is the most musical of French poets, along with Racine and Ver- 
laine. But whereas Racine plays only the violin, Baudelaire plays the whole or- 
chestra." Andre Suares, Preface to Charles Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mml (Paris, 
1933), pp. xxxiv-xxxv. [Jll,2] 

"If Baudelaire is supremely contained, as no one since Dante has been, it is be- 
cause he always concentrates on the inner life, as Dante focnsed on dogma." Andre 
Suares, Preface to Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1933), p. xxxviii. 

[JH,3] 

Les Fleurs du mal is the Inferno of the nineteenth century. But Baudelaire's de- 
spair carries him infinitely beyond the wrath of Dante." Andre Suares, Preface to 
Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1933), p. xiii. [ J 11, 4] 

"There is no artist in verse snperior to Baudelaire." Andre Suares, Preface to 
Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1933), p. xxiii. [ Jll,5] 

Apollinaire: "Baudelaire is the scion of Laclos and Edgar Poe." Cited in Roger 
Allard, Baudelaire et "VEsprit nouveau" (Paris, 1918), p. 8. [ Jll,6] 

The "Choix de maximes consolantes sur l'amour" <Selected Consolatory Maxims 
on Love> contains an excursus on ugliness (first published March 3, 1846, in Le 
Corsaire-Satan). The beloved has contracted smallpox and suffered scars, which 
from then on are the lover's delight: "You run a grave risk, if your pockmarked 



mistress betrays you, of being able to console yourself only with pockmarked 
women. For certain spirits, more precious and more jaded, delight in ugliness 
proceeds from an obscurer sentiment still — the thirst for the unknown and the 
taste for the horrible. It is this sentiment . . . which drives certain poets into the 
dissecting room or the clinic, and women to public executions. I am sincerely sorry 
for the man who cannot understand this — he is a harp who lacks a hass string!" 
Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, ed. Y.-G. Le Dantec, p. 621.™ [JH, 7 ] 

The idea of "correspondences" surfaces already in the "Salon de 1846," where a 
passage of Kreisleriana is cited. (See the note by Le Dantec, Oeuvres, vol. 1, 
p. 585.)" ' [Jll,8] 

In considering the aggressive Catholicism displayed in Baudelaire's later work, 
one must bear in mind that his writing had met with scant success during his 
lifetime. This could have led Baudelaire, in rather unusual fashion, to align 
himself or rather to identify himself with the completed works. His particular 
sensuality found its theoretical equivalents only in the process of poetic composi- 
tion; these equivalents, however, the poet appropriated to himself as such, uncon- 
ditionally and without any sort of revision. They bear the trace of this origin 
precisely in their aggressiveness. [ Jlla,l] 

"He has on a blood-red cravat and rose gloves. Yes, it is 1840. . . . Some years, 
even green gloves were worn. Color disappeared from outfits only reluctantly. For 
Baudelaire was not alone in sporting that purple or brick-colored cravat. Not 
alone in wearing pink gloves. His trademark is in the combination of the two 
effects with the black outfit." Eugene Marsan, Les Cannes de M. Paul Bourget et le 
bon choix de Phdinte (Paris, 1923), pp. 236-237. [Jlla,2] 

"His utterances, Gautier thought, were full of 'capital letters and italics.' He 
appeared . . . surprised at what he himself said, as if he heard in his own voice the 
words of a stranger. But it must be admitted that his women and his sky, his 
perfumes, his nostalgia, his Christianity and his demon, his oceans and his trop- 
ics, made for a suh ject matter of stunning novelty. ... I do not even criticize his 
jerky gait, . . . which made people compare lum to a spider. It was the beginning of 
that angular gesticulation which, little hy little, would displace the rounded graces 
of the old world. Here, too, he is a precursor." Eugene Marsan, Les Cannes de 
M. Paid Bourget et le bon choix de Phdinte (Paris, 1923), pp. 239-240. [ Jlla,3] 

"His gestures were nohle, slow, kept in close to the body. His politeness seemed 
affected hecause it was a legacy of the eighteenth century, Baudelaire being the son 
of an old man who had known the salons." Eugene Marsan, Les Cannes de M. Paul 
Bourget et le bon choix de Phdinte (Paris, 1923), p. 239. [Jlla,4] 



There are two different versions of Baudelaire's dehut in Brussels. 72 Georges 
Rency, who reproduces hoth, prefers the one hy the chronicler Tardieu. "In a 



horrible funk," writes the latter, "Baudelaire read and stammered and trembled, 
his teeth chattering, his nose huried in his manuscript. It was a disaster." Camille 
Lemonnier, on the other hand, came away with the "impression of a magnificent 
talker." Georges Rency, Physionomies litteraires (Brussels, 1907), pp. 267, 268 
("Charles Baudelaire"). [J12.1] 

"He . . . never made a serious effort to understand what was external to him." 
Georges Rency, Physionomies litteraires (Brussels, 1907), p. 274 ("Charles 
Baudelaire"). [J12,2] 

"Baudelaire is as incapahle of love as of labor. He loves as he writes, by lits and 
starts, and then relapses into the dissolute egoism of a flaneur. Never does he show 
the slightest curiosity about human affairs or the slightest consciousness of human 
evolution. . . . His art could therefore be said ... to sin by reason of its narrow- 
ness and singularity; these, indeed, are defects which put off sane and upright 
minds such as love clear works of universal import." Georges Rency, Physiono- 
mies litteraires (Brussels, 1907), p. 288 ("Charles Baudelaire"). [ J12,3] 

"Like many another author of his day, he was not a writer but a stylist. His images 
are almost always inappropriate. He will say of a look that it is 'gimlet-sharp.' . . . 
He will call repentance 'the last hostelry.' . . . Baudelaire is a still worse writer in 
prose than in verse. . . . He does not even know grammar. 'No French writer,' he 
says, 'ardent for the glory of the nation, can, without pride and without regrets, 
divert his gaze. . .' The solecism here is not only flagrant; it is foolish." Edmond 
Scherer, Etudes sur la litterature contemporaine, vol. 4 (Paris, 1886), pp. 288- 
289 ("Baudelaire"). [J12.4] 

"Baudelaire is a sign not of decadence in letters but of the general lowering of 
intelligence." Edmond Scherer, Etudes sur la litterature contemporaine, vol. 4 
(Paris, 1886), p. 291 ("Charles Baudelaire"). [J12.5] 

Brunetiere recognizes, with Gautier, that Baudelaire has opened new territory for 
poetry. Among the criticisms registered against him by the literary historian is 
this: "Moreover, he was a poet who lacked more than one element of his art — nota- 
bly (according to people who knew him) the gift of thinking directly in verse." 
F<erdinand> Brunetiere, L'Evolution de la poesie lyrique en France au XIX" 
siecle, vol. 2 (Paris, 1894), p. 232 ("Le Symbolisme"). [J12.6] 

Brunetiere (L'Evolution de la poesie lyrique en France au XIX" siecle, vol. 2 
[Paris, 1894]) distinguishes Baudelaire on one side from the school of Rusltin, and 
on the other from the Russian novelists. In both these movements he sees currents 
which, with good reason, resist the decadence proclaimed by Baudelaire, opposing 
to everything hypercultivated the primitive simplicity and innocence of natural 
man. A synthesis of these antithetical tendencies would he represented by Wag- 



ner. — Brunetiere arrived at this relatively positive estimation of Baudelaire only 
helatedly(1892). [J12a,l] 



On Baudelaire in relation to Hugo and Gautier: "He treats the great masters he 
learned from as he treats women: he adores and vilifies them." U.-V. Chatelain, 
Baudelaire, I'homme et le poete (Paris), p. 21. [J12a,2] 

Baudelaire on Hugo: "Not only does he express precisely and translate literally 
what is clearly and distinctly visible, but he expresses with indispensable obscu- 
rity what is obscure and vaguely revealed." Citing this sentence in Baudelaire, 
I'homme et le poete (Paris), p. 22, Chatelain rightly says that Baudelaire is perhaps 
the only man of his time to have understood the "secret Mallarmeism" of Hugo. 

[J12a,3] 

"Barely sixty people followed the hearse in the sweltering heat; Banville and 
Asselineau, under a gathering storm, made beautiful speeches that nobody could 
hear. With the exception of Veuillot in L'Univers, the press was cruel. Everything 
bore down on his remains. A gale dispersed his friends; his enemies . . . called 
him 'mad.'" U.-V. Chatelain, Baudelaire, I'homme et le poete (Paris), p. 16. 

[J12a,4] 

For the experience of the correspondances, Baudelaire refers occasionally to 
Swedenborg, and also to hashish. [J12a,5] 

Baudelaire at a concert: "Two piercing black eyes, gleaming with a peculiar vivid- 
ness, alone animated the figure that seemed frozen in its shell." Lorcdan Larchey, 
Fragments de souvenirs (Paris, 1901), p. 6 ("Le Boa de Baudelaire — L'lmpecca- 
hle Banville"). [J12a,6] 

Larchey is an eyewitness to Baudelaire's first visit to an Academician — a call paid 
to Jules Sandeau. Larchey finds himself in the entrance hall soon after Baudelaire. 
"When I arrived, ... at the appointed hour, a bizarre spectacle informed me I had 
been preceded. All around the hat-pegs of the antechamber was coiled a long 
scarlet hoa, one of those boas in chenille of which young working-class women are 
particularly fond." L. L<archey, Fragments de souvenirsy, p. 7. [ J12a,7] 

Tableau of decadence: "Behold our great cities under the fog of tobacco smoke 
that envelops them, thoroughly sodden by alcohol, infused with morphine: it is 
there that humanity comes unhinged. Rest assured that this source breeds more 
epileptics, idiots, and assassins than poets." Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles 
Baudelaire (Paris <1926>), pp. 104-105. [J13.1] 

"In conclusion, I would like to imagine that a government such as we conceive after 
the model of Hobbes would strive to arrest, by some vigorous therapeutic met hod, 
the spread of these doctrines, which are as productive of malingerers and trouhle- 



makers as they are useless for forming citizens. . . . But I think that the wise 
despot, after careful reflection, would refrain from intervening, faithful to the 
tradition of an agreeable philosophy: Apres nous le deluge.' 1 '' Maurice Barres, La 
Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), pp. 103-104. [J13.2] 

"Baudelaire was perhaps only a hard-working soul who felt and understood what 
was new through Poe, and who disciplined himself in the course of his life to 
become specialized." Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), 
p. 98. [J13.3] 

"Let us perhaps guard against taking these poets too quickly for Christians. The 
liturgical language, the angels, the Satans . . . are merely a mise en scene for the 
artist who judges that the picturesque is well worth a Mass." 73 Maurice Barres, La 
Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), pp. 44-45. [ J13,4] 

"His best pages are overwhelming. He rendered superb prose into difficult verse." 
Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), p. 54. [ J13,5] 

"Scattered across the sky like luminous seeds of gold and silver, radiatingoutfrom 
the deep darkness of night, the stars represent [for Baudelaire] the ardor and 
energy of the human imagination." Elisabeth Schinzel, ISatur und Natursymbolik 
bei Poe, Baudelaire und den franzdsischen Symbolisten (Diiren [Rhineland], 
1931), p. 32. [J13.6] 

"His voice . . . muffled like the nighttime rumble of vehicles, filtering into plushly 
upholstered bedrooms." Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), 
p. 20. [J13.7] 

"It might seem, at first, that Baudelaire's oeuvre was relatively infertile. Some wits 
compared it to a narrow basin dug with effort in a gloomy spot shrouded in 
haze. . . . The influence of Baudelaire was revealed in Le Parnasse contemporain 
... of 1865. . . . Three figures emerge: . . . Stephane Mallarme, Paul Verlaine, and 
Maurice Rollinat." Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), 
pp. 61, 63, 65. [J13.8] 

"And the place occupied hy racial epithets among the rabble at that time!" 
Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), p. 40. [ J13a,l] 

Flaubert to Baudelaire: "You praise the flesh without loving it, Lti a melancholy, 
detached way that I find sympathetic. Ah! how well you understand the boredom 
of existence!" 74 Cited in Maurice Barres, La Folie de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), 
p. 31. [J13a,2] 



Baudelaire's predilection for Juvenal may well have to do with the latter's being 
one of the first urban poets. Compare this observation by Thibaudet: "hi survey- 



ing the great epochs of urban life, we see that the more the city provides poets 
and other people with their intellectual and moral life, the more forcefully poetry 
is pushed outside the city. When, ... in the Greek world, that life was fostered 
within the great cosmopolitan centers of Alexandria and Syracuse, these cities 
gave birth to pastoral poetry. When the Rome of Augustus came to occupy a 
similar position of centrality, the same poetry of shepherds, ... of pristine nature, 
appeared with the Bucolics and the Georgics of Virgil. And in eighteenth-century 
France, at the most brilliant moment ... of Parisian existence, the pastoral re- 
appears as part of a return to antiquity. . . . The only poet in whom one might 
find a foretaste of Baudelairean urbanism (and of other things Baudelairean as 
well) would be perhaps, at certain moments, Saint-Amant." Albert Thibaudet, 
Interieurs (Paris <1924>), pp. 7-9. [J13a,3] 

"In passing from all these Romantic poets to Baudelaire, we pass from a landscape 
of nature to a landscape of stone and llesh. ... A religious awe of nature, which, 
for these . . . Romantics, was part of their familiarity with nature, has become 
with Baudelaire a hatred of nature." [?] [J13a,4] 

Baudelaire on Musset: "Except at the age of one's first Communion — in other 
words, at the age when everything having to do with prostitutes and silk stockings 
produces a religious effect — I have never been able to endure that paragon of 
lady-killers, his spoilecl-child's impudence, invoking heaven and hell in tales of 
dinner-table conversations, his muddy torrent of mistakes in grammar and pros- 
ody, and finally his utter incapacity to understand the process by which a reverie 
becomes a work of art." 75 Thibaudet, who quotes this remark in Interieurs (p. 15), 
juxtaposes it with one by Brunetiere on Baudelaire: "He's just a Satan with a 
furnished apartment, a Beelzehuh of the dinner table" (p. 16). [J13a,5] 

"A sonnet like 'A Une Passante' <To a Woman Passing By>, a stanza like the last 
stanza of that sonnet 76 . . . could blossom only in the milieu of a great capital, 
where human beings live together as strangers to one another and yet as travelers 
on the same journey. Among all the capitals, Paris alone produces such beings as a 
natural fruit." Albert Thihaudet, Interieurs (Paris), pp. 22 ("Baudelaire"). 

[J14.1] 

"He carried about him as sorrowful trophy ... a burden of memories, so that he 
seemed to live in a continual paramnesia. . . . The poet carries within himself a 
living duree <perduration> which odors call forth . . . and with which they min- 
gle. .. . This city is a duree, an inveterate life-form, a memory. ... If he loved in 
... a Jeanne Duval some immemorial stretch of night . . . , this will be only a 
symbol ... of that true duree . . . that is consubstantial with the life and being of 
Paris, the duree of those very old, rumpled creatures who (it seemed to him) ought 
to form, like the capital itself, massive blocks and unending embankments of 
memories." (Reference is to "Les Petites Vieilles.") Albert Thihaudet, Interieurs 
(Paris), pp. 24-27 ("Baudelaire"). [ J14,2] 



Thibauclet juxtaposes Baudelaire's "Une Charogne" <Carrion> with Gautier's "La 
Comedie de la mort" <The Comedy of Death) and Hugo's "L'Epopee du ver" <The 
Epic of the Wormxl nterieurs, p. 46>. [ J14,3] 

Thibaudet adverts very apdy to the connection between confession and mys- 
tification in Baudelaire. Through the latter, Baudelaire's pride compensates itself 
for the former. "Ever since Rousseau's Confessions, it seems that all our literature 
of the personal has taken its departure from the broken-down furniture of relig- 
ion, from a debunked confessional." Thibaudet, Interieurs (Paris), p. 47 ("Baude- 
laire"). Mystification a figure of original sin. [J14,4] 



Thibaudet (Interieurs, p. 34) cites a remark from 1887, in wliich Brunetiere calls 
Baudelaire "a species of oriental idol, monstrous and misshapen, whose natural 
deformity is heightened by strange colors." [ J14,5] 

In 1859 Mistral's Mireille appeared. Baudelaire was incensed at the book's suc- 
cess. [J14.6] 



Baudelaire to Vigny: "The only praise I ask for this book is that readers recognize 
it's not a mere album, but has a beginning and an end." 77 Cited in Thibaudet, 
Interieurs (Paris), p. 5. [ J14,7] 



Thibaudet concludes his essay on Baudelaire with the allegory of the sick muse, 
who, on Rastignac Hill on the Right Bank of the Seine, forms a pendant to the 
Montagne Sainte-Genevieve on the Left Bank (pp. 60-61). [ J14,8] 



Baudelaire: "of all our great poets, the one who writes worst — if Alfred de Vigny 
be excepted." Thibaudet, Interieurs (Paris), p. 58 ("Baudelaire"). [ J14,9] 



Poulet-Malassis had his "shop" in the Passage des Princes, called in those days the 
Passage Mires. [J14a,l] 

"Violet boa on which curled his long graying locks, carefully maintained, which 
gave him a somewhat clerical appearance." < Jules Husson> Champlleury, Souve- 
nirs et portraits de jeunesse (Paris, 1872), p. 144' ("Rencontre de Baudelaire"). 

[J14a,2] 



"He worked, not always consciously, at that misunderstanding which isolated him 
in his own time; he worked at it all the more as this misunderstanding was already 
taking shape in himself. His private notes, published posthumously, are painfully 
revealing in this respect. ... As soon as this artist of incomparable subtlety speaks 
of himself, he is astonishingly awkward. Irreparably he lacks pride — to the point 
where he reckons incessantly with fools, either to astound them, to shock them, or 
after all to inform them that he absolutely does not reckon with fools." Andre 



Gide, Preface to Charles Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Edouard Pelletan 
(Paris, 1917), pp. xiii-xiv. 78 [J14a,3] 

'"This hook has not been written for my wives, my daughters, or my sisters,' he 
says, speaking of Les Fleurs du mal. Why warn us? Why this sentence? Oh, simply 
for the pleasure of affronting bourgeois morals, with the words 'my wives' slipped 
in, as if carelessly. He values them, however, since we find in his private journal: 
'This cannot shock my wives, my daughters, or my sisters.'" Andre Gide, Preface 
to Charles Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Edouard Pelletan (Paris, 1917), 
p. xiv. 7 " [J14a,4] 

"Without doubt, Baudelaire is the artist about whom the most nonsense has been 
written." Andre Gide, Preface to Ch<arles> B<audelaire>, Les Fleurs du mal, ed. 
Edouard Pelletan (Paris, 1917), p. xii. l,u [J14a,5] 

"Les Fleurs du mal is dedicated to what Gautier claimed to be: magician of French 
letters, pure artist, impeccable writer — and this was a way of saying: Do not be 
deceived; what I venerate is the art and not the thought; my poems will have merit 
not because of their movement, passion, or thought, but because of their form." 
Andre Gide, Preface to Ch. B., Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Edouard Pelletan (Paris, 
1917), pp. xi-xii. m [J14a,6] 

"Now he quietly converses with each one of us." Andre Gide, Preface to Ch. B., 
Les Fleurs du mal, ed. E. Pelletan (Paris, 1917), p. xv. IB [ J14a,7] 

Lemaitrc in his article "Baudelaire," published originally in the "Feuilleton 
Dramatique" section of Le Journal des debuts, and written on the occasion of 
Crepet's edition of the Oeuvres posthumes et Correspondances inedites: "Worst of 
all, I sense that the unhappy man is perfectly incapable of developing these sibyl- 
line notes. The pensees of Baudelaire are most often only a sort of painful and 
pretentious stammering. . . . One cannot imagine a less philosophical mind." Jules 
Lemaitre, Les Contemporains, 4th series (Paris, 1895), p. 21 ("Baudelaire"). 
Brooding! <See J55a,l>. [ J15,l] 

After Calcutta. "On his return, he enters into possession of his patrimony, seventy 
thousand francs. Within two years, he has spent half of it. . . . For the next twenty 
years, he lives on the income provided by the remaining thirty-live thousand 
francs. . . . Now, during these twenty years, he runs up no more than ten thousand 
francs in new debts. Under these conditions, as you can imagine, he couldn't have 
indulged very often in Neronian orgies!" Jules Lemaitre, Les Contemporains, 4th 
series (Paris, 1895), p. 27. [J15.2] 



Bourget draws a comparison between Leonardo and Baudelaire: "We are drawn 
irresistibly to prolonged meditation on the enigma of this painter, of this poet. On 



being studiously contemplated, the enigma surrenders its secret." Paul Bourget, 
Essais de psychologie contemporaine, vol. 1 (Paris, 1901), p. 4 ("Baudelaire"). 

[J15.3] 

"He excels at beginning a poem with words of unforgettable solemnity, at once 
tragic and rueful: 'What does it matter to me that you are wise? / Be lovely — and 
be sad! . . . ' Elsewhere: "Sudden as a knife you thrust / into my sorry heart. . . . ' 
And elsewhere: "Pensive as cattle resting on the beach, / they are staring out to 
sea. . . ."' Paul Bourget, Essais de psychologie contemporaine, vol. 1 (Paris, 
1901), pp. 3-4. ra [J15.4] 

Bourget sees in Benjamin Constant, Amiel, and Baudelaire three kindred spirits, 
intellects stamped by the esprit d' analyse, types determined by decadence. The 
detailed appendix to "Baudelaire" is concerned with Constant's Adolphe. To- 
gether with the spirit of analysis, Bourget considers enmu an element of deca- 
dence. The third and last chapter of his essay on Baudelaire, "Theorie de la 
decadence," develops this idea with reference to the late Roman Empire. [ J15,5] 

1849 or 1850: Baudelaire draws from memory the head of Blanqui. See Philippe 
Soupault, Baudelaire (Paris <1931>), illustration on p. 15. [ J15,6] 

"It is all a harmony of artifices, of deliberate contradictions. Let us try to note 
some of these. Realism and idealism are mingled. Along with description that takes 
extravagant pleasure in the most dismal details of physical reality there is, at the 
same time, refined expression of ideas and beliefs that exceed the immediate im- 
pression made on us by bodies — There is a union of the most profound sensuality 
with Christian asceticism. 'A horror of life, and an ecstatic joy in life,' writes 
Baudelaire somewhere."' 1 . . . There is also, speaking of love, the combination of 
adoration and contempt for woman. . . . Woman is seen as a slave, as an ani- 
mal, . . . yet to her the same homage, the same prayers are addressed as to the 
immaculate Virgin. Or rather, she is seen as the universal trap . . . and worshipped 
for her deadly power. And that is not all: even as one seeks to render the most 
ardent passion, one also labors to find for it . . . the most unexpected form . . . — 
that is, what bespeaks the greatest sang-froid and even absence of passion. . . . 
One believes, or one pretends to believe, in the devil; he is envisaged by turns, or 
simultaneously, as the Father of Evil and as the great Loser and great Victim; and 
one delights in proclaiming one's impiety in the language of . . . the faithful. 'Pro- 
gress' is cursed; the industrial civilization of the century is execrated, . . . and, at 
the same time, the poet revels in the special color and brilliancy this civilization 
has brought to human life. . . . Such, I believe, is the basic intent of Baudelairism: 
always to unite two opposed orders of feeling . . . and, at bottom, two divergent 
conceptions of the world and of life — the Christian and the other, or, if you like, 
the past and the present. It is a masterpiece of the Will (like Baudelaire, I capital- 
ize), the last word in inventiveness in the realm of feeling." Jules Lemaitre, Les 
Contemporains, 4th series (Paris, 1895), pp. 28-31 ("Baudelaire"). [ J15a,l] 



Lemaitre observes that Baudelaire really did create a poncif, a cliche, as he set out 
to do. [J15a,2] 



"The bloody apparatus of destruction" — where is this phrase in Baudelaire? In 
"La Destruction." 115 [ J15a,3] 

"You could put him down as the perfect embodiment of the 'Parisian pessimist,' 
two words which earlier would have jarred on being coupled." Paul Bourget, 
Essais de psychologie contemporaine, vol. 1 (Paris, 1901), p. 14. [ J15a,4] 

Baudelaire had briefly considered reproducing, as the frontispiece to the second 
edition of Les Flews, a dance of death by H. Langlois. [J15a,5] 

"Three different men inhabit this man at one and the same time. . . . These three 
men are all quite modern, and more modern still is their synthesis. The crisis of 
religious faith, the city life of Paris, and the scientific spirit of the age . . . are so 
thoroughly allied here as to appear inseparable. . . . Faith has died out, whereas 
mysticism, though intellectually discredited, still permeates the sensibility. . . . We 
could note . . . the use of liturgical terminology to celebrate sensual pleasure ... or 
that curious work of 'prose' in decadent Latin style which he entitled 'Franciscae 
meae laudes.' . . . On the other hand, his libertine tastes came from Paris. Every- 
where in his . . . poems is a backdrop of Parisian vice, as well as a backdrop of 
Catholic ritual. He has obviously penetrated — and with hair-raising experiences, 
we may be sure — the most wretched strata of this unchaste city. He has eaten at 
common dinner tables beside painted women whose mouths drip blood through 
masks of ceruse. He has slept in brothels, and has known the rancor of broad 
daylight illuminating, along with the faded curtains , the still more faded face of the 
woman-for-hire. He has sought out . . . the unthinking spasm that . . . cures the 
mal de penser. And, at the same time, he has stopped and chatted at every street- 
corner in town. . . . He has led the life of the literary man, . . . and he has . . . 
whetted the blade of his spirit where that of others would have been dulled." Paul 
Bourget, Essais de psychologie contemporaine, vol. 1 (Paris, 1901), pp. 7-9 
("Baudelaire"). [J 16,1] 

Riviere provides a sequence of felicitous glosses on Baudelaire's poetic proce- 
dure: "Strange procession of words! Sometimes like a weariness of the voice, . . . 
an utterance full of frailty: 'I dream of new flowers, but who can tell / if this 
sordid swamp of mine affords / the mystic nourisliment on which they thrive [qui 
ferait leur vigueur].' Or: 'a favoring Goddess makes the desert bloom [Cybele, qui 
les aime, augmente ses verdures]. . . .' Like those who feel themselves completely 
in command of what they want to say, he seeks at first the most remote of terms; 
he then invites their approach, conciliates them, and infuses them with a quality 
you would not have thought could be theirs. . . . Such poetiy cannot be the 
product of inspiration. . . . And just as the unfolding thought . . . slowly breaks 
free of the obscurity in which it began, so the poetic trajectory retains a certain 



slowness from its long virtuality: 'How sweet the greenish light of your elongated 
eyes.' . . . Every one of Baudelaire's poems is a movement. . . . Each constitutes 
some particular phrase, question, reminder, invocation, or dedication, which has 
a specific direction." Jacques Riviere, Etudes (Paris), pp. 14-18. 80 [ J16.2] 

Frontispiece (by Rops) to the collection of Baudelaire's poems entitled Les Epaves 
<Wreckage>. It presents a multifaceted allegory. — Plan to use an etching by Brac- 
quemond as the frontispiece to the (second edition of> Les Fleurs du mal. Baude- 
laire describes it: "A skeleton turning into a tree, with legs and ribs forming the 
trunk, the arms stretched out to make a cross and bursting into leaves and buds, 
sheltering several rows of poisonous plants in little pots, lined up as if in a gar- 
dener's hothouse."" 7 [ J16,3] 

Curious notion of Soupault's: "Almost all of the poems are more or less directly 
inspired by a print or a painting. . . . Can it be said that he sacrificed to fashion? 
He dreaded being alone. . . . His weakness ohliged him to look for things to lean 
on." Philippe Soupault, Baudelaire (Paris <1931>), p. 64. [ J16a,l] 

"In the years of his maturity and resignation, he never spoke a word of regret or 
complaint about his childhood." Arthur Holitscher, "Charles Baudelaire," Die 
Literatur, vol. 12, pp. 14—15. [ J16a,2] 

"These images ... do not aim to caress our imagination; they are distant and 
studied, the way a voice sounds when it emphasizes something. . . . Like a word 
spoken in our ear when we least expected it, the poet is suddenly hard hy: 'You 
remember? You remember what I'm saying? Where did we see that together, we 
who don't even know each other?" Jacques Riviere, Etudes (Paris), pp. 18-19. 

[J16a,3] 

"Baudelaire understood the clairvoyance of the heart that does not acknowledge 
all it experiences. ... It is a hesitation, a holding back, a modest gaze." Jacques 
Riviere, Etudes (Paris), p. 21. [J16a,4] 

"Lines of verse so perfect, so measured, that at first one hesitates to grant them all 
their meaning. A hope stirs for a minute — douht as to their profundity. But one 
need only wait." Jacques Riviere, Etudes (Paris), p. 22. [J16a,5] 

On Baudelaire's "Crepuscule du matin" (Twilight of Daybreak): "Each line of 
"Crepuscule du matin" — without stridency, with devotion — evokes a misfortune." 
Jacques Riviere, Etudes (Paris), p. 29. [ J16a,6] 



"The devotion of a heart moved to ecstasy by weakness. . . . Though he speaks of 
the most horrible things, the fierceness of his respect lends him a subtle decency." 
Jacques Riviere, Etudes (Paris), pp. 27-28. [J16a,7] 



According to Champfleury, Baudelaire would have nought up all the unsold items 
from the Salon of 1845. [J16a,8] 



"Baudelaire knew the art of transforming his features as well as any escaped 
convict." <Jules> Champfleury, Souvenirs et portraits de jeunesse (Paris, 1872), 
p. 135 ("Rencontre de Baudelaire"). — Courhet complained of the trouble he had 
completing the portrait of Baudelaire ; the subject looked different from onedayto 
the next. [J16a,9] 

Baudelaire's liking for porter. [ J16a,10] 

"Baudelaire's favorite flowers were neither daisy, carnation, nor rose; he would 
break into raptures at the sight of those thick-leaved plants that look like vipers 
ahout to fall on their prey, or spiny hedgehogs. Tormented forms, bold forms — 
such was this poet's ideal." Champlleury, Souvenirs et portraits de jeunesse 
(Paris, 1872), p. 143. [J16a,ll] 

Gide, in his preface to Les Fleurs du mal, lays emphasis on the "centrifugal and 
disintegrating" force which Baudelaire, like Dostoevsky, recognized in himself and 
which he felt to he in opposition to his productive concentration (p. xvii). 8 " 

: J i7,i: 

"This taste for Boileau and Racine was not an affectation in Baudelaire. . . . There 
is sometliing more in Les Fleurs du mal than the 'thrill of the new'; there is a 
return to traditional French verse. . . . Even in his nervous malaise, Baudelaire 
retains a certain sanity. " Remy de Gourmont, Promenades litteraires, 2nd series 
(Paris, 1906), pp. 85-86 ("Baudelaire et le songe d'Athalie"). [ J17,2] 

Poe (as cited in Remy de Gourmont, Promenades litteraires [Paris, 1904.], p. 371: 
"Marginalia sur Edgar Poe et sur Baudelaire"): "The assurance of the wrong or 
error of any action is often the one unconquerahle force which impels us, and 
alone impels us, to its prosecution."" 9 [J17,3] 

Construction of "L'Echec de Baudelaire" (Baudelaire's defeat>, by Rene La- 
forgue. As a child, Baudelaire is supposed to have witnessed the coitus of his nurse 
or his mother with her (first or second?) husband; he would find himself in the 
position of third person in a love relationship and would settle down in that posi- 
tion; he would become a voyeur and frequent bordellos mainly as a voyeur; owing 
to this same fixation on the visual, he would hecome a critic and experience a need 
for ohjectivity, "so that nothing is 'lost to view.'" lie would helong to a clearly 
defined category of patients: "For them, to see means to soar above everything, 
like eagles, in complete security, and to realize a sort of omnipotence by identifica- 
tion at once with the man and with the woman. . . . These are the people who then 
develop that fatal taste for the ahsolute . . . , and who, taking refuge in the domain 



of pure imagination, lose the use of their hearts" (L'Echec de Baudelaire [Paris, 
1931], pp. 201, 204). 911 [J17.4] 



"Baudelaire loved Aupick without being aware of it, and . . . his reason for con- 
tinually provoking his stepfather was in order to be loved by him. ... If Jeanne 
Duval played a part in the poet's emotional life analogous to that played by 
Aupick, we can understand why Baudelaire was . . . sexually possessed by her. 
And so . . . this union stood, rather, for a homosexual union, in which Baudelaire 
chiefly played the passive role — that of the woman." Rene Laforgue, L'Echec de 
Baudelaire (Paris, 1931), pp. 175, 177. 91 [ J17,5] 

His friends sometimes called Baudelaire "Monseigneur Brummell." [J17,6] 

On the compulsion to lie, as seen in Baudelaire: "The direct and spontaneous 
expression of a truth becomes, for these subtle and tormented consciences, the 
ecpiiivalent of success ... in incest; success, that is to say, in a sphere in which it 
can be realized simply by 'good sense.' . . . For in those cases where normal sexu- 
ality is repressed, good sense is fated to lack an object." Rene Laforgue, L'Echec 
de Baudelaire (Paris, 1931), p. 87." 2 [J17.7] 

Anatole France — Lu Vie litteraire, vol. 3 (Paris, 1891) — on Baudelaire: "His leg- 
end, created by his friends and admirers, abounds in marks of bad taste" (p. 20). 
"The most wretched woman encountered at night in the shadows of a disreputahle 
alley takes on, in his mind, a tragic grandeur: seven demons are in them [ ! ] and the 
whole mystical sky looks down on this sinner whose soul is in peril. He tells himself 
that the vilest kisses resound through all eternity, and he hrings to hear on this 
momentary encounter eighteen centuries of devilishness" (p. 22). "He is attracted 
to women only to the point necessary for irrevocable loss of his soul. He is never a 
lover, and he would not even be a debauchee if debauchery were not superlatively 
impious. . . . He would have nothing to do with women if he were not hoping 
that, through them, he could offend God and make the angels weep" (p. 22). 

[J17a,l] 

"At hottom, he had but half a faith. Only his spirit was completely Christian. His 
heart and intellect remained empty. There is a story that one day a naval officer, 
one of his friends, showed him a manitou that he had brought hack from Africa, a 
monstrous little head carved from a piece of wood by a poor hlack man. — Tt is 
awfully ugly,' says the officer, and he threw it away disdainfully. — 'Take care,' 
Baudelaire said in an anxious tone, 'lest it prove the true god!' They were the most 
profound words he ever uttered. He helieved in unknown gods — not least for the 
pleasure of blaspheming." Anatole France, La Vie litteraire, vol. 3 (Paris, 1891), 
p. 23 ("Charles Baudelaire"). [J17a,2] 



Letter to Poulet-Malassis of Fehruary 18, 1860. 



[J17a,3] 



"The hypothesis of Baudelaire's P.G. <paralyse generaley has persisted for half a 
century and still reigns in certain quarters. Nevertheless, it is based on a gross and 
demonstrable error and is without any foundation in fact. . . . Baudelaire did not 
die from P.G. but from softening of the brain, the consequence of a stroke . . . and 
of a hardening of the cerebral arteries." Louis-Antoine-Justine Caubert, La 
Nevrose de Baudelaire (Bordeaux, 1930), pp. 42—43. The argument against gen- 
eral paralysis is made, likewise in a treatise, by Raymond Trial, La Maladie de 
Baudelaire (Paris, 1926), p. 69. But he sees the brain disorder as a consequence of 
syphilis, whereas Caubert believes that syphilis has not been conclusively estab- 
lished in Baudelaire's case (see p. 46); he cites Remond and Voivenel, Le Genie 
litteraire (Paris, 1912), p. 41: "Baudelaire was . . . the victim of sclerosis of the 
cerebral arteries." [ J17a,4] 

In his essay "Le Sadismechez Baudelaire," published in La Chronique medicale of 
November 15, 1902, Cabanes defends the thesis that Baudelaire was a "sadistic 
madman" (p. 727). [J18,l] 

Du Camp on Baudelaire's voyage "to the Indies": "He arranged supplies of live- 
stock for the English army . . . , and rode about on elephants while composing 
verse." Du Camp adds in a note: "I have been told that this anecdote is spurious; I 
have it from Baudelaire himself, and I have no reason to doubt its veracity, though 
it may perhaps be faulted for a surplus of imagination." Maxime Du Camp, Souve- 
nirs litteraires, vol. 2 (Paris, 1906), p. 60. [ J18,2] 

Indicative of the reputation that preceded Baudelaire before he had published 
anything of importance is this remark by Gautier: "I fear that with Baudelaire it 
will be as it once was with Petrus Borel. In our younger days, we used to say: Hugo 
has only to sit and wait; as soon as Petrus publishes something, he will disap- 
pear. . . . Today, the name of Baudelaire is brandished before us; we are told that 
when he publishes his poems, Musset, Laprade, and I will dissolve into thin air. I 
don't believe it for a moment. Baudelaire will burn out just as Petrus did." Cited 
in Maxime Du Camp, Souvenirs litteraires, vol. 2 (Paris, 1906), pp. 61-62. 

[J18.3] 

"As a writer, Baudelaire had one great defect, of which he had no inkling: he was 
ignorant. What he knew, he knew well; but he knew very little. History, physiol- 
ogy, archaeology, philosophy all eluded him. . . . The external world scarcely in- 
terested him; he saw it perhaps, but assuredly he never studied it." Maxime Du 
Camp, Souvenirs litteraires, vol. 2 (Paris, 1906), p. 65. ( J18,4] 

From the evaluations of Baudelaire by his teachers at the Lycee Louis-le-Grand: 
"Ready mind. A few lapses in taste" (in Rhetoric). "Conduct sometimes rather 
unruly. This student, as he himself admits, seems convinced that history is per- 
fectly useless" (in History). — Letter of August 11, 1839, to his stepfather, after 
earning his baccalaureate: "I did rather poorly in my examinations, except for 



Latin and Greek — in which I did very well. And this is what saved me."" Charles 
Baudelaire, Vers latins, ed. Jules Mouquet (Paris, 1933), pp. 17, 18, 26. [J18,5] 

According to <Josephin> Peladan, "Theorie plastique de l'androgyne" (Mercure 
de France, 21 [1910], p. 650), the androgyne appears in Rossetti and Burne- 
Jones. [J18,6] 

Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 1931), p. 262, on "the death of artists": "Re- 
reading his work, I tell myself that, were he making his debut as a writer now, not 
only would he not be singled out for distinction, hut he would be judged mal- 
adroit." [J18,7] 

Seilliere refers to the story "La Fanfarlo" as a document whose importance for 
Baudelaire's biography has not been sufficiently recognized <Baudelaire, p. 72>. 

[J18.8] 

"Baudelaire will keep to the end this intermittent awkwardness which was so 
foreign to the dazzling technique of a Hugo." Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire, p. 72. 

[J18a,l] 

Key passages on the unsuitability of passion in art: the second preface to Poe, the 
study of Gautier. 94 [J18a,2] 

The first lecture in Brussels was concerned with Gautier. Camdle Lemonnier com- 
pares it to a Mass celebrated in honor of the master. Baudelaire is said to have 
displayed, on this occasion, "the grave beauty of a cardinal of letters officiating at 
the altar of the Ideal." Cited in Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 1931), p. 123. 

[J18a,3] 

"In the drawing room on t he Place Royale, Baudelaire had himself introduced as 
a fervent disciple but . . . Hugo, ordinarily so skillful in sending away his visitors 
happy, did not understand the artificialiste character and t he exclusively Parisian 
predilections of the young man. . . . Their relations nonetheless remained cordial, 
Hugo having evidently not read the 'Salon de 1846'; and, in his 'Reflexions sur 
quelques-uns de mes contemporains' (Reflections on Some of My Contemporar- 
ies), Baudelaire showed himself very admiring, even rather perceptive, if without 
great profundity." Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 1931), p. 129. [J18a,4] 

Baudelaire, reports Seilliere (p. 129), is supposed to have enjoyed strolling often 
along the Canal de l'Ourcq. [ J18a,5] 

About the Dufays — Baudelaire's forehears on his mother's side — nothing is 
known. [J18a,6] 



"In 1876, in an article entitled 'Chez feu mon maitrc' <At the Home of My Late 
Mentor>, Cladel would evoke . . . the macabre trait in the physiognomy of the poet. 



Never, according to this witness, . . . was he more forbidding than when he wanted 
to appear jovial; his voice took on a disquieting edge, while his vis comica made 
one shudder. On the pretext of exorcizing the evil spirits of his auditors, and with 
bursts of laughter piercing as sobs, he told them outrageous tales of trysts beyond 
the grave which froze the blood in their veins." Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire 
(Paris, 1931), p. 150. [J18a,7] 

Where in Ovid is the passage in which it is said that the human face was made to 
mirror the stars? 35 [ J18a,8] 

Seilliere notes that the poems attributed apocryphally to Baudelaire were all 
necrophilic in character (p. 152). [ J18a,9] 

"Finally, as we know, the passional anomaly has a place in the art of Baudelaire, at 
least under one of its aspects, that of Lesbos; the other has not yet been made 
admissible by the progress of moral naturism." Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire 
(Paris, 1931), p. 154. [ J18a,10] 

The sonnet "Quant a moi, si j'avais un beau pare plante d'if s" <As for me, if only 
I had a fine park, planted with yews>, 96 which Baudelaire apparently addressed to 
a young lady of Lyons some time around 1839-1840, is reminiscent, in its closing 
line — "And you know that too, my beauty, whose eyes are too shrewd" — of the 
last line of "A Une Passante." [ J 1 9 , 1 ] 

The piece "Vocations," in Spleen de Paris, is of great interest — particularly the 
account of the third child, who "lowered his voice: 'It certainly gives you a funny 
feeling not to be sleeping aJone, and to be in bed with your nurse, and in the 
dark. ... If you ever get the chance, try to do the same — you'll see!' / While he 
was talking, the eyes of the young author of this revelation had widened with a 
sort of stupefaction at what he was still feeling, and the light of the setting sun 
playing in his untidy red curls seemed to be lighting up a sulfurous aureole of 
passion." 97 The passage is as notable for Baudelaire's conception of the sinful as 
for the aura of public confessio. [J19,2] 

Baudelaire to his mother on January 11, 1858 (cited in Charles Baudelaire, Vers 
latins, ed. Mouquet [Paris, 1933], p. 130): "You haven't noticed that in Les Fleurs 
du mal there are two poems concerning you, or at least alluding to intimate details 
of our former life, going back to that time of your widowhood which left me with 
such strange and sad memories — one: 'Je n'ai pas oublie, voisine de la ville' 
(Neuilly), and the other, which follows it: 'La servante au grand coeur dont 
v«us etiez jalouse' (Mariette)? I left these poems without titles and without any 
further clarification, because I have a horror of prostituting intimate family 
matters " ,J11 [J19.3] 



Leconte cle Lisle's opinion that Baudelaire must have composed his poems by 
versifying a prose draft is taken up by Pierre Louys, Oeuvres completes, vol. 12 
(Paris, 1930), p. liii ("Suite a poetique"). Jules Mouquet comments on this view in 
Charles Baudelaire, Vers latins, introduction and notes by Jules Mouquet (Paris, 
1933), p. 131: "Leconte de Lisle and Pierre Louys, carried away by their antipa- 
thy to the Christian poet of Les Fleurs du mal, deny that he had any poetic 
gift! — Now, according to the testimony of friends of his youth, Baudelaire had 
started out by writing thousands of lines of fluent verse 'on any and every subject,' 
which he could hardly have done without 'thinking in verse.' He deliberately 
reined in this facility when . . . , at about the age of twenty-two, he began to write 
the poems which he entitled first Les Lesbiennes, then Les Limbes .... The Petits 
Poemes en prose . . . , in which the poet returns to themes he had already treated 
in verse, were composed at least ten years after Les Fleurs du mal. That Baude- 
laire had difficulty fashioning verse is a legend which he himself perhaps . . . 
helped spread." [J19.4] 

According to Raymond Trial, in La Maladie de Baudelaire (Paris, 1926), p. 20, 
recent research has shown that hereditary syphilis and acquired syphilis are not 
mutually exclusive. Thus, in Baudelaire's case, acquired syphilis would have 
joined with the hereditary strain transmitted by the father and manifest through 
hemiplegia in hoth sons and in his wife. [ J19a,l] 

Baudelaire, 1846: "If ever your flaneur's curiosity has landed you in a street 
hrawl, perhaps you will have felt the same delight as I have often felt to see a 
protector of the public's slumbers — a policeman or a municipal guard (the real 
army) — thumping a republican. And if so, like me, you will have said in your 
heart: 'Thump on, thump a little harder. . . . The man whom thou thumpest is an 
enemy of roses and of perfumes, and a maniac for utensils. He is the enemy of 
Watteau, the enemy of Raphael. " <, ' f Cited in R. Trial, La Maladie de Baudelaire 
(Paris, 1926), p. 51. [J19a,2] 

"Speak neither of opium nor of Jeanne Duval if you would criticize Les Fleurs du 
mal." Gilhert Maire, "La Personnalite de Baudelaire," Mercure de France, 21 
(January 16, 1910), p. 244. [J19a,3] 

"To conceive Baudelaire without recourse t o his hiography — this is the fundamen- 
tal object and final goal of our undertaking." Gilbert Maire, "La Personnalite de 
Baudelaire," Mercure de France, 21 (January 16, 1910), p. 244. [ J19a,4] 

"Jacques Crepet would like us to look on Baudelaire in such a way that the sincer- 
ity of his life would assure us of the value of his work, and that, sympathizing with 
the man, we would learn to love hoth life and work." Gilbert Maire, "La Person- 
nalite de Baudelaire," Mercure de France, 21 (Fehruary 1, 1910), p. 414. 

[J19a,5] 



Maire writes (p. 417) that the "incomparable sensibility" of Barres was schooled 
on Baudelaire. [J19a,6] 



To Ancelle, 1865: "One can both possess a unique genius and be a fool. Victor 
Hugo has given us ample proof of that. . . . The Ocean itself tired of his com- 
pany." 1 " 1 [J19a,7] 

Poe: "T would not be able to love,' he will say quite clearly, 'did not death mix its 
breath with that of Beauty!" 101 Cited in Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 1931), 
p. 229. The author refers to the time when, after the death of Mrs. Jane Stanard, 
the iifteen-year-old Poe would spend long nights in the graveyard, often in the 
rain, at the site of her grave. [J19a,8] 

Baudelaire to his mother, concerning Les Fleurs du mal: "This book . . . possesses 
... a beauty that is sinister and cold: it was created with fury and patience." 1112 

[J19a,9] 

Letter from Ange Pechmeja to Baudelaire, February 1866. The writer expresses 
his admiration, in particular, for the sensuous interfusion in the poet's language. 
Sec Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 1933), pp. 254-255. [ J19a,10] 

Baudelaire ascribes to Hugo an "interrogative" poetic character. [J20,l] 

There is probably a connection between Baudelaire's weakness of will and the 
abundance of power with which certain drugs under certain conditions endow 
the will. "Architecte de mes feeries / Je faisais, a ma volonte, / Sous un tunnel de 
pierreries / Passer un ocean dompte." 103 [ J20.2] 

Baudelaire's inner experiences: "Commentators have somewhat falsified the situ- 
ation ... in insisting overmuch on the theory of universal analogy, as formulated 
in the sonnet 'Correspondances,' while ignoring the reverie to which Baudelaire 
was inclined. . . . There were moments of depersonalization in his existence, mo- 
ments of self -forgetting and of communication with 'revealed paradises.' ... At 
the end of his life . . . , he abjured the dream, . . . blaming his moral shipwreck on 
his 'penchant for reverie.'" Albert Beguin, L'Ame romantique et le rive (Mar- 
seilles, 1937), vol. 2, pp. 401, 405. [ J20,3] 

In his hook Le Parnasse, Therive points to the decisive influence of painting and 
the graphic arts on a great many of Baudelaire's poems. He sees in this a charac- 
teristic feature of the Parnassian school. Moreover, he sees Baudelaire's poetry as 
an interpenetration of Parnassian and Symbolist tendencies. [ J20,4] 

"A propensity to imagine even nature through the vision that others have had of it. 
'La Geante' comes out of Michelangelo; 'Reve parisien,' out of Simone Martini; 'A 



Une Madone' is a Baroque statue in a Spanish chapel." Andre Therive, Le Par- 
nasse (Paris, 1929), p. 101. [J20,5] 



Therive finds in Baudelaire "certain gaucheries, which, today, one can't help 
thinking might be traits of the sublime." Andre Therive, Le Parnasse (Paris, 
1929), p. 99. [J20.6] 

In an article entitled "Une Anecdote controuvee sur Baudelaire" <A Fabricated 
Anecdote about Baudelaire), in the Fortnightly Review section of the Mercure de 
France (May 15, 1921), Baudelaire's alleged sojourn and activity with a conserva- 
tive newspaper in Chateauroux is disputed by Ernest Gaubert, who examined all 
the periodicals from the town, and who traces the anecdote back to A. Ponroy (a 
friend of Baudelaire's who had family in Chateauroux), from whom Crepet got it. 
Mercure de France, 148, pp. 281-282. [ J20.7] 

Daudet, in an inspired phrase, speaks of Baudelaire's "trap-door disposition — 
which is also that of Prince Hamlet." Leon Daudet, Les Pelerins d 'Emrmils (Cour- 
rier des Pays-Bas, 4) (Paris <1928>), p. 101 ("Baudelaire: Le Malaise et l'aura'"). 

[J20,8] 

"Theme . . . of . . . the affirmation of a mysterious presence at the back of things, 
as in the depths of the soul — the presence of Eternity. Hence the obsession with 
timepieces, and the need to break out of the confines of one's own life through the 
immense prolongation of ancestral memory and of former lives." Albert Beguin, 
L'Ame romantique et le reve (Marseilles, 1937), vol. 2, p. 403. [J20a,l] 

Roger Allard in a polemic against the introduction to L'Oeuvre poetique de 
Charles Baudelaire-, edited by Guillaume Apollinaire (Paris: Bibliotheque des 
Curieux). In this introduction, Apollinaire advances the thesis that Baudelaire, 
while inaugurating the modern spirit, played little part in its development; his 
influence is nearly spent. Baudelaire is said to be a cross between Laclos and Poe. 
Allard replies: "In our view, two writers profoundly influenced Baudelaire, or 
rather two books. . . . One is . . . Le Diable amoureux <The Devil in Love>, hy 
Cazotte; the other, Diderot's La Religieuse <The Nun). Two notes at this point: 
"(1) M. Apollinaire could not do otherwise than name the author of Le Diable 
amoureux in a note concerning the last line of the sonnet 'Le Possede': 'One would 
prohably not go wrong in taking Cazotte as the hyphen that had the honor of 
uniting, in Baudelaire's mind, the spirit of the Revolution's writers with that of 
Edgar Poe.' (2) The poem accompanying a letter from Baudelaire to Sainte-Beuve 
can he found in the edition furnished by M. Apollinaire: '. . . with eyes darker and 
more hlue than the Nun whose / sad and ohscene story is known to all. . . . ,m A 
few lines later, we come upon the first draft of a stanza of 'Leshos. '" Roger Allard, 
Baudelaire et "V Esprit nou veau" (Paris, 1918), p. 10. [J20a,2] 



Leon Dauclet, in "Baudelaire: Le Malaise et Faura,'" asks whether Baudelaire did 
not in some degree play Hamlet opposite Aupick and his mother. [ J20a,3] 



Vigny wrote "Le Mont des oliviers" partly in order to refute de Maistre, by 
whom he was deeply influenced. [J20a,4] 

Jules Romains (Les Hommes de bonne volonte, book 2 , Crime de Quinette (Paris, 
1932>, p. 171) compares the flanenr to Baudelaire's "rugged swimmer reveling in 
the waves." 105 [J 20a, 5] 

Compare "the secret harvest of the heart" ("Le Soleil") with "Nothing ever 
grows, / once the heart is harvested" ("Semper eadem"). 106 These formulations 
have a bearing on Baudelaire's heightened artistic consciousness: the blossom 
makes the dilettante; the fruit, the master. [ J20a,6] 

The essay on Dupont was commissioned by Dupont's publisher. [J21 ,1] 

Poem to Sarah, around 1839. It contains this stanza: 

Though to get some shoes she sold her soul, 
The good Lord would laugh if with this wretch 
I struck a haughty pose like some Tartuffe, 

I who sell my thought and would he an author. 107 [J 21 ,2] 

"Le Mauvais Vitrier" — to be compared with Lafcadio's acte gratuit (gratuitous 
act>. 10S [J21,3] 

"When, your heart on fire with valor and with hope, 
you whipped the moneylenders out of that place — 
you were master then! But now, has not remorse 
pierced your side even deeper than the spear? 109 

That is, remorse at having let pass so fine an opportunity for proclaiming the 
dictatorship of the proletariat!" Thus inanely comments Seilliere {^Baudelaire 
[Paris, 1933],> p. 193) on "Le Reniement de Saint Pierre." [J2 1,4] 

Apropos these lines from "Lesbos" — "Of Sappho who died on the day of her 
blasphemy, / . . . insulting the rite and the designated worship" 110 — Seilliere 
(p. 216) remarks: "It is not hard to see that the 'god,' the object of this 'august' 
religion, whose practice consists in blaspheming and in insulting traditional rites, 
is none other than Satan." Isn't the blasphemy, in this case, the love for a young 
man? [J21,5] 

From the obituary notice, "Charles Baudelaire," by Jules Valles, which appeared 
September 7, 1867, in La Rue: "Will he have ten years of immortality?" (p. 190). 
"These are, moreover, bad times for the biblicists of the sacristy or of the cabaret! 



Ours is an age of gaiety and distrust, one that never long suspends the recital of 
nightmares or the spectacle of ecstasies. It has now become clear that no one else 
had enough foresight to undertake such a campaign at the period when Baude- 
laire began his" (pp. 190-191). "Why didn't he become a professor of rhetoric or 
a dealer in scapulars, this didactician who imitated the blasted and downtrodden, 
this classicist who wanted to shock Pradhomme, but who, as Dusolier has said, 
was only a hysterical Boileau who went to play Dante among the cafes" (p. 192). 
Notwithstanding the resounding error in its appreciation of the importance of 
Baudelaire's work, the obituary contains some perceptive passages, particularly 
those concerned with the habitus of Baudelaire: "He had in him something of the 
priest, the old lady, and the ham actor. Above all, the ham actor" (p. 189). The 
piece is reprinted in Andre Billy, Les Ecrivains de combat (Paris, 1931); originally 
appeared in La Situation. [ J21,6] 

Key passages on the stars in Baudelaire (ed. Le Dantec) : "Night! you'd please me 
more without these stars / which speak a language I know all too well — / 1 long 
for darkness, silence, nothing there . . ." ("Obsession," <vol. 1,> p. 88). — Ending of 
"Les Promesses d'un visage" (<vol. 1,> p. 170): the "enormous head of hair — / 
. . . which in darkness rivals you, O Night, / deep and spreading starless 
Night!" — "Yet neither sun nor moon appeared, / and no horizon paled" ("Reve 
parisien," <vol. 1,> p. 116). — "What if the waves and winds are black as ink" ("Le 
Voyage," <vol. 1,> p. 149). — Compare, however, "Les Yeux de Berthe," the only 
weighty exception (<vol. 1,> p. 169), and, in another perspective, the constellation 
of the stars with the aether, as it appears in "Delphine et Hippolyte" (<vol. 1,> 
p. 160) and in "Le Voyage" (<vol. 1,> p. 146 <sec. 3>). On the other hand, highly 
characteristic that "Le Crepuscule du soir" makes no mention of stars. 111 [J21a,l] 

"Le Mort joyeux" could represent a reply to Poe's fantasies of decomposition: 
"and let me know if one last twinge is left. . . ."" 2 [J21a,2] 

A sardonic accent marks the spot where it is said of the stars: "decent planets, at 
a time like this, / renounce their vigilance — " ("Sepulture")." 3 [J21a,3] 

Baudelaire introduces into the lyric the figure of sexual perversion that seeks its 
objects on the street. What is most characteristic, however, is that he does this 
with the phrase "trembling like a fool" in one of his most perfect love poems, "A 
Une Passante."" 1 [J21a,4] 

Figure of the big city whose inhabitants are frightened of cathedrals: "Vast 
woods, you terrify me like cathedrals" ("Obsession")." 5 [J21a,5] 



"Le Voyage" (sec. 7): "Come and revel in the sweet delight / of days where it is 
always afternoon!" 115 Is it too bold to see in the emphasis on this time of day 
something peculiar to the big city? [J21a,6] 



The hidden figure that is the key to "Le Balcon": the night which holds the lovers 
in its embrace as, after day's departure, they dream of the dawn, is starless — 
"The night solidified into a wall." 117 [J2 la, 7] 



To the glance that encounters the "Passante" contrast George's poem "Von einer 
Begegnung" <Encounter>: 

My glances drew me from the path I seek 

And crazed with magic, mad to clasp, they trailed 
The slender bow sweet limbs in walking curved, 
And wet with longing then, they fell and failed 
Before into your own they boldly swerved. 

Stefan George, Hymnen; Pilgerfkhrten; Algabal (Berlin, 1922), pp. 22-23. 118 

[J22.1] 



"'The unexampled ogle of a whore / glinting toward you like a silver ray / the 
wavering moon releases on the lake':" 9 so begins the last poem. And into this 
extraordinary stare, which brings uncontrollable tears to the eyes of him who 
meets it without defenses, Berg looked long and avidly. For him, however, as for 
Baudelaire, the mercenary eye became a legacy of the prehistoric world. The 
arc-light moon of the big city shines for him like something out of the age of 
hetaerism. He needs only to have it reflected, as on a lake, and the banal reveals 
itself as the distant past; the nineteenth-century commodity betrays its mythic 
taboo. It was in such a spirit that Berg composed Lulu." Wiesengrund-Adorno, 
"Konzertarie 'Der Wein,'" in Willi Reich, Alban Berg, with Berg's own writings 
and with contributions by Theodor Wiesengrund-Adorno and Ernst Krenek (Vi- 
enna, Leipzig, Zurich <1937>), p. 106. [J22,2] 

What's with the dilation of the sky in Meryon's engraving? [ J22,3] 

"Le Crepuscule du matin" occupies a crucial position in Le s Flews du mal. The 
morning wind disperses the clouds of myth. Human beings and their affairs are 
exposed to view. The prerevolutionary dawn glimmers in this poem. (In fact, it 
was probably composed after 1850.) [ J22,4] 

The antithesis between allegory and myth has to be clearly developed. It was 
owing to the genius of allegory that Baudelaire did not succumb to the abyss of 
myth that gaped beneath his feet at every step. [J22,5] 



'"The depths being the multitudes,' Victor Hugo's solitude becomes a solitude 
overrun, a swarming solitude." Gabriel Bounoure, "Abimes de Victor Hugo," 
Mesures, (July 15, 1936), p. 39. The author underscores the element of passivity 
in Hugo's experience of the crowd. [J22,6] 



"Nachtgedanken" <Night Thoughts>, by Goethe: "I pity you, unhappy stars, / who 
are so beautiful and shine so splendidly, / gladly guiding the struggling sailor with 
your light, / and yet have no reward from gods or men: / for you do not love, you 
have never known love! / Ceaselessly by everlasting hours / your dance is led 
across the wide heavens. / How vast a journey you have made already / since I, 
reposing in my sweetheart's arms, / forgot my thoughts of you and of the mid- 



The following argument — which dates from a period in which the decline of 
sculpture had become apparent, evidently prior to the decline of painting — is 
very instructive. Baudelaire makes exactly the same point about sculpture from 
the perspective of painting as is made today about painting from the perspective 
of film. "A picture, however, is only what it wants to be; there is no other way of 
looking at it than on its own terms. Painting has but one point of view; it is 
exclusive and absolute, and therefore the painter's expression is much more 
forceful." Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 128 ("Salon de 1846"). Just before this 
(pp. 127-128): "The spectator who moves around the figure can choose a hun- 
dred different points of view, except the right one." i2l <Compare> J4,7 [J22a,2] 

On Victor Hugo, around 1840: "At that same period, he began to realize that if 
man is the solitary animal, the solitary man is a man of the crowds [p. 39]. ... It 
was Victor Hugo who gave Baudelaire that sense of the irradiant life of the crowd, 
and who taught him that 'multitude and solitude [are] equal and interchangeable 
terms for the poet who is active and productive. . . .' l22 Nevertheless, what a dif- 
ference between the solitude which the great artist of spleen chose for himself in 
Brussels in order 'to gain an inalienable individual tranquillity' and the solitude of 
the magus of Jersey, haunted at that same moment by shadowy apparitions! . . . 
Hugo's solitude is not an envelope, a Noli me tangere, a concentration of the 
individual in his difference. It is, rather, a participation in the cosmic mystery, an 
entry into the realm of primitive forces" (pp. 40-41). Gabriel Bounoure, "Ahlmes 



From Le Collier des jours <The Necklace of Days>, vol. 1, cited hy Remy de Gour- 
mont in Judith Gautier (Paris, 1904), p. 15: "A ring of the hell interrupted us and 
then, without a sound, a very singular person entered the room and made a slight 
how of the head. I had the impression of a priest without his cassock. 'Ah, here's 
Baldelarius!' cried my father, extending his hand to the newcomer." Baudelaire 
of fers a gloomy jest on the subject of Judith's nickname, "Ouragan" <IIurricane>. 



"At the cafe called the Divan Le Peletier, Theodore de Banville would see Baude- 
laire sitting liercely, 'like an angry Goethe' (as he says in a poem), next to 'the 
gentle Asselineau.'" Leon Daudet, Le Stupide XIX' Siecle (Paris, 1922), pp. 139- 



night!" 120 



[J22a,l] 



de Victor Hugo," Mesures (July 15, 1936), pp. 39-41. 



[J22a,3] 



[J23,l] 



140. 



[J23.2] 



Apropos of "The greathearted servant ..." and the end of "Le Voyage" ("• 
Death, old captain . . ."), L. Daudet speaks of a Ronsardian flight (in Le Stupide 
XIX" Siecle, p. 140). [J23,3] 



"My father had caught a glimpse of Baudelaire, and he told me about his impres- 
sion: a bizarre and atrabilious prince among boors." Leon Daudet, Le Stupide 
XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1922), p. 141. [J23,4] 

Baudelaire calls Hugo a "genius without borders." 123 [J23,5] 

It is presumably no accident that, in searching for a poem by Hugo to provide 
with a pendant, Baudelaire fastened on one of the most banal of the banal — "Les 
Fantomes." In this sequence of six poems, the first begins: "How many maidens 
fair, alas! I've seen /Fade and die." The third: "One form above all, — 'twas a 
Spanish maid." And further on: "What caused her death? Balls, dances — daz- 
zling balls; / They filled her soul with ecstasy and joy." This is followed by the 
story of how she caught cold one morning, and eventually sank into the grave. 
The sixth poem resembles the close of a popular ballad: "O maidens, whom such 
festive fetes decay! / Ponder the story of this Spanish maid." 12 * [ J23,6] 

With Baudelaire's "La Voix" <The Voice> compare Victor Hugo's "Ce qu'on 
entend sur la montagne" <What Is Heard on the Mountain). The poet gives ear 
to the world storm: 

Soon with that voice confusedly combined, 
Two other voices, vague and veiled, I find. 

And seemed each voice, though mixed, distinct to be, 
As two cross-currents 'neath a stream you see. 

One from the seas — triumphant, blissful song! 
\foice of the waves, which talked themselves among; 
The other, which from the earth to heaven ran, 
Was full of sorrow — the complaint of man. 

The poem takes, as its object, the dissonance of the second voice, which is set off 
against the harmony of the first. Ending: 

Why God... 

Joins in the fatal hymn since earth began, 

The song of Nature, and the cries of man? 125 [ J23,7] 

Isolated observations from Barbey d'Aurevilly's "M. Charles Baudelaire": "I 
sometimes imagine . . . that, if Timon of Athens had had the genius of Archilochus, 
he would have been able to write in this manner on human nature and to insult it 
while rendering it!" (p. 381). "Conceive, if you will, a language more plastic than 
poetic, a language hewn and shaped like hronze and stone, in which each phrase 
has its volutes and fluting" (p. 378). "This profound dreamer . . . asked himself 



, . . what would become of poetry in passing through a head organized, for exam- 
ple, like that of Caligula or Heliogabalus" (p. 376). — "Thus, like the old Goethe 
who transformed himself into a seller of Turkish pastilles in his Divan . . . , the 
author of Les Fleurs du mal turned villainous, blasphemous, impious for the sake 
of his thought" (pp. 375-376). < Jules> Barbey cl'Aurevilly, XIX Siecle: Les Oeu- 
vres et les homines, vol. 3, Les Poetes (Paris, 1862). [ J23a,l] 



"A critic (M. Thierry, in Le Moniteur) made the point recently in a very fine 
appreciation: to discover the parentage of this implacable poetry . . . one must go 
back to Dante . . . !" (p. 379). This analogy Barbey makes emphatically his own: 
"Dante's muse looked dreamily on the Inferno; that of Les Fleurs du mal breathes 
it in through inflamed nostrils, as a horse inhales shrapnel" (p. 380). Barbey 
d'Aurevilly, XIX C Siecle: Les Oeuvres et les hommes, vol. 3, Les Poetes (Paris, 
1862). [J23a,2] 



Barbey d'Aurevilly on Dupont: "Cain triumphs over the gentle Abel in this man's 
talent and thinking — the Cain who is coarse, ravenous, envious, and fierce, and 
who has gone to the cities to consume the dregs of accumulated resentments and 
share in the false ideas that triumph there!" Barbey d'Aurevilly, Le XIX" Siecle: 
Les Oeuvres et les hmmmes, vol. 3, Les Poetes (Paris, 1862), p. 242 ("M. Pierre 
Dupont"). [J23a,3] 



A manuscript of Goethe's "Nachtgedanken" bears the notation, "Modeled on the 
Greek." [J23a,4] 

At the age of eleven, Baudelaire experienced first hand the workers' rebellion of 
1832 in Lyons. It appears that no trace remained in bim of any impressions that 
event might have left. [ J23a,5] 



"One of the arguments he makes to his guardian, Ancelle, is rather curious. It 
seems to him that 'the new Napoleonic regime, after illustrations depicting the 
battlefield, ought to seek illustrations depicting the arts and letters. "' Alphonse 
Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1928), p. 172. [ J23a,6] 

The sense of "the abyssal" is to be defined as "meaning." Such a sense is always 
allegorical. [J24,l] 

With Blanqui, the cosmos has become an abyss. Baudelaire's abyss is starless; it 
should not be defined as cosmic space. But even less is it the exotic space of 
theology. It is a secularized space: the abyss of knowledge and of meanings. 
What constitutes its historical index? In Blanqui, the abyss has the historical 
index of mechanistic natural science. In Baudelaire, doesn't it have the social 
index of nouveaute? Is not the arbitrariness of allegory a twin to that of fashion? 

[J24,2] 



Explore the question whether a connection exists between the works of the 
allegorical imagination and the correspondances. In any case, these are two wholly 
distinct sources for Baudelaire's production. That the first of them has a very 
considerable share in the specific qualities of his poetry caimot be doubted. The 
nexus of meanings might be akin to that of the fibers of spun yarn. If we can 
distinguish between spinning and weaving activity in poets, then the allegorical 
imagination must be classed with the former. — On the other hand, it is not 
impossible that the correspondences play at least some role here, insofar as a 
word, in its way, calls forth an image; thus, the image could determine the 
meaning of the word, or else the word that of the image. [ J24,3] 

Disappearance of allegory in Victor Hugo. [ J24,4] 

Do flowers lack souls? Is this an implication of the title LesFleurs du mal?ln other 
words, are flowers a symbol of the whore? Or is tliis title meant to recall flowers 
to their true place? Pertinent here is the letter accompanying the two crepuscule 
<twilight> poems wliich Baudelaire sent to Fernand Desnoyers for his Fontaine- 
bleau: Paysages, legendes, souvenirs, fantairies (1855). <See below, 24a, l.> [J24.5] 

Utter detachment of Poe from great poetry. For one Fouque, he would give fifty 
Molieres. The Iliad and Sophocles leave him cold. This perspective would accord 
perfectly with the theory oll'art pour I'art. What was Baudelaire's attitude? 

[J24.6] 

With the mailing of the "Crepuscules" to Fernand Desnoyers for his Fontaine- 
bleau (Paris, 1855): "My dear Desnoyers: You ask me for some verses for your 
little anthology, verses about Nature, I believe; about forests, great oak trees, 
verdure, insects — and perhaps even the sun? But you know perfectly well that I 
can't become sentimental about vegetation and that my soul rebels against this 
strange new religion. ... I shall never believe that the souls of the gods live in 
plants .... I have always thought, even, that there was something irritating and 
impudent about Nature in its fresh and rampant state." 126 Cited in A. Seche, La 
Vie des Fleurs du mal <Amiens, 1928>, pp. 109-110. [J24a,l] 

"Les Aveugles" <Blind Men>: Crepet gives as source for this poem of Baudelaire's 
a passage from "Des Vetters Eckfenster" <My Cousin's Corner Window> — a 
passage about the way blind people hold their heads. Hoffmann considers the 
heavenward gaze to be edifying. <See T4a,2.> [ J24a,2] 

Louis Goudall criticized Baudelaire on November 4, 1855, on the basis of poems 
published in La Revue des deux mondes. "Poetry that is . . . nauseating, glacial, 
straight from the charnel house and the slaughterhouse." Cited in Francois Por- 
che, La Vie doulou.reu.se de Charles Baudelaire (series entitled Le Roman des 
grandes existences, vol. 6) (Paris <1926>), p. 202. [J24a,3] 



The reviews by <Barbey> d' Aurevilly and Asselineau were turned down by Le Pays 
and La Revue frangaise, respectively. [J24a,4] 



The famous statement by Valery on Baudelaire <seejl,l> goes back, in essence, 
to the suggestions Sainte-Beuve sent to Baudelaire for his courtroom defense. "In 
the 6eld of poetry, everything was taken. Lamartine had taken the skies. Victor 
Hugo, the earth— and more than the earth. Laprade, the forests. Musset, the 
dazzling life of passion and orgy. Others, the hearth, rural life, and so on. Theo- 
phile Gautier, Spain and its vibrant colors. What then remained? What Baude- 
laire has taken. It was as though he had no choice in the matter. . . ." Cited in 
Porche, La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire <Paris, 1926>, p. 205. [ J24a,5] 

Very plausible indication in Porche to the effect that Baudelaire did not produce 
the many decisive variants to his poems while seated at his desk. (See Porche, 
p. 109.) [J24a,6] 

"Finding the poet one evening at a public ball, Charles Monselet accosted him: 
'What are you doing here?' — 'My dear fellow,' replied Baudelaire, 'I'm watching 
the death's heads pass!'" Alphonse Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (<Amiens,> 
1928), p. 32. [J25.1] 

' 4 IIis earnings have been reckoned: the total for his entire life does not exceed 
sixteen thousand francs. Catulle Mendes calculated that the author . . . would 
have received about one franc seventy centimes per day as payment for his literary 
labors." Alphonse Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (< Amiens,) 1928), p. 34. 

[J25.2] 

According to Seche, Baudelaire's aversion to a sky that was "much too blue" — or 
rather, much too bright — would have come from his stay on the island of Mauri- 
tius. (See Seche, p . 42.) [ J25.3] 

Seche speaks of a pronounced similarity between Baudelaire's letters to Mile. 
Daubrun and his letters to Mme. Sabatier. (See p. 53.) [J25,4] 

According to Seche (p. 65), Champfleury would have taken part with Baudelaire 
in the founding of Le Salut public. [ J25.5] 

Prarond on the period around 1845: ' l We understood little of the use of tables for 
working, thinking, composing. . . . For my part, I saw him composing verses on 
the run while he was out in the streets; I never saw him seated before a ream of 
paper." Cited in Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), p. 84. [J25,6] 



The way Baudelaire presented himself during his Brussels lecture on Gautier, as 
described by Camille Lemonnier in La Vie beige: "Baudelaire made one think of a 
man of the church, with those beautiful gestures of the pulpit. His soft linen cuffs 



fluttered like the sleeves of a clerical frock. He developed his subject with an 
almost evangelical unctuousness, proclaiming his veneration for a literary master 
in the liturgical tones of a bishop announcing a mandate. To himself, no doubt, he 
was celebrating a Mass full of glorious images; he had the grave beauty of a cardi- 
nal of letters officiating at the altar of the Ideal. His smooth, pale visage was 
shaded in the halftone of the lamplight. I watched his eyes move like black suns. 
His mouth had a life of its own within the life and expressions of his face; it was 
thin and quivering with a delicate vibrancy under the drawn bow of his words. 
And from its haughty height the head commanded the attention of the intimidated 
audience." Cited in Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), p. 68. [J25.7] 

Baudelaire transferred his application for the playwright Scribe's seat in the 
Academie Fran$aise to that of the Catholic priest Lacordaire. [J25a,l] 

Gautier: "Baudelaire loves ample polysyllabic words, and with three or four of 
these words he sometimes fashions lines of verse that seem immense, lines that 
resonate in such a way as to lengthen the meter." Cited in A. Seche, La Vie des 
Fleurs du mal (<Amiens,> 1928), p. 195. [J25a,2] 

Gautier: "To the extent that it was possihle, he banished eloquence in poetry." 
Cited in A. Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), p. 197. [ J25a,3] 

E. Faguet in an article in La Revue: "Since 1857, the neurasthenia among us has 
scarcely abated; one could even say that i t has been on the rise. Hence, 'there is no 
cause for wonder,' as Ronsard once said, that Baudelaire still has his follow- 
ers. ..." Cited in Alphonse Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), p. 207. 

[J25a,4] 

Le Figaro publishes (date?) an article by GustaveBourdin that was written at the 
instigation of Interior Minister Billaut. The latter had shortly before, as judge or 
public prosecutor, suffered a setback with the acquittal of Flaubert in the trial 
against Madame Bovary. A few days later came Thierry's article in Le Moniteur. 
"Why did Sainte-Beuve . . . leave it to Thierry to tell readers of Le Moniteur about 
Les Fleurs du mal? Sainte-Beuve doubtless refused to write about Baudelaire's 
book because he deemed it more prudent to efface the ill effect his article on 
Madame Bovary had had in the inner circles of the government." Alphonse Seche, 
La Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), pp. 156-157. 127 [ J25a,5] 

The denunciation in Bourdin's article is treacherously disguised as praise for 
precisely those poems singled out in the indictment. After a disgusted enumera- 
tion of Baudelaire's topics, he writes: "And in the middle of it all, four poems — 'Le 
Reniement de Saint Pierre,' then 'Lesbos,' and two entitled 'Fenunes danmees' — 
four masterpieces of passion, of art, and of poetry. It is understandable that a poet 
of twenty might be led by his imagination to treat these subjects, but nothing 



excuses a man over thirty who foists such monstrosities on the public by means 
of a book." Cited in Alphonse Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), p. 158. 

[J25a,6] 

From Edouard Thierry's review of Les Fleurs du mal in Le Moniteur (July 14, 
1857?): "The Florentine of old would surely recognize, in this French poet of 
today, the characteristic ardor, the terrifying utterance, the ruthless imagery, and 
the sonority of his brazen lines. ... I leave his book and his talent under Dante's 
stern warning." 128 Cited in Alphonse Seche, Le Vie des Fleurs du mal (1928), 
pp. 160-161. [J26.1] 

Baudelaire's great dissatisfaction with the frontispiece designed by Bracquemond 
according to specifications provided by the poet, who had conceived this idea 
while perusing Hyacinthe Langlois' Hutoire des danses macabre s. Baudelaire's 
instructions: "A skeleton turning into a tree, with legs and ribs forming the trunk, 
the arms stretched out to make a cross and bursting into leaves and buds, shelter- 
ing several rows of poisonous plants in little pots, lined up as if in a gardener's 
hothouse." <SeeJ16,3.> Bracquemond evidently runs into difficulties, and more- 
over misses the poet's intention when he masks the skeleton's pelvis with flowers 
and fails to give its arms the form of branches. From what Baudelaire has said, 
the artist simply does not know what a squelette arborescent is supposed to be, and 
he can't conceive how vices are supposed to be represented as flowers. (Cited in 
Alphonse Seche, La Vie des Fleurs du mal [<Amiens,> 1928], pp. 136-137, as 
drawn from letters.) In the end, a portrait of the poet by Bracquemond was 
substituted for this planned image. Something similar resurfaced around 1862, as 
Poulet-Malassis was planning a luxury edition of Les Fleurs du mal. He commis- 
sioned Bracquemond to do the graphic design, which apparently consisted of 
decorative borders and vignettes; emblematic devices played a major role on 
these. (See Seche, p. 138.) — The subject that Bracquemond had failed to render 
was taken up by Rops in the frontispiece to Les Epaves (1866). [J26.2] 

List of reviewers for Les Fleurs du mal, with the newspapers Baudelaire had in 
mind for them: Buloz, Lacaussade, Gustave Rouland (La Revue europeenne); 
Gozlan (Le Monde illustre); Sainte-Beuve (Le Moniteur); Deschanel (Le Journal 
des debuts); Aurevilly (Le Pays); Janin (Le ISord); Armand Fraisse (Le Salut 
public de Lyons); Guttinguer (La Gazette de France). (According to Seche, 
p. 140.) [J26.3] 

The publication rights for Baudelaire's entire oeuvre were auctioned after his 
death to Michel Levy for 1,750 francs. [J26.4] 



The "Tableaux Parisiens" appear only with the second edition of Le Fleurs du 
mal. [J26.5] 



The definitive title for the book was proposed by Hippolyte Babou in the Cafe 
Lamblin. [J26a,l] 



"L'Amour et le crane" <Eros and the Skulb. "This poem of Baudelaire's was 
inspired by two works of the engraver Henri Goltzius." Alphonse Seche, La Vie 
des Fleurs du mal (<Amiens,> 1928), p. 111. [J26a,2] 

"A line Passante." "M. Crepet mentions as possible source a passage from 'Dina, 
la belle Juive,' in Petrus Borel's Champavert . . . : 'For me, the thought that this 
lightning (lash that dazzled us will never be seen again . . . ; that two existences 
made . . . for happiness together, in this life and in eternity, are forever sun- 
dered . . . — forme, this thought is profoundly saddening.'" Cited in A. Seche, La 
Vie des Fleurs du mml, p. 108. [J26a,3] 

"Reve parisien." Like the speaker in the poem, Constantin Guys also rose at noon; 
hence, according to Baudelaire (letter of March 13, 1860, to Poulet-Malassis), the 
dedication. 129 [J26a,4] 

Baudelaire (where?) l:, ° points to the third book of the Aeneid as source for "Le 
Cygne." (See Seche, p. 104.) [J26a,5] 

To the right of the barricade; to the left of the barricade. It is very significant that, 
for large portions of the middle classes, there was only a shade of difference 
between these two positions. This changes only with Louis Napoleon. For 
Baudelaire it was possible (no easy trick!) to be friends with Pierre Dupont and to 
participate in the June Insurrection on the side of the proletariat, while avoiding 
any sort of run-in when he encountered his friends from the Ecole Norinande, 
Chennevieres and Le Vavasseur, in the company of a national guardsman. — It 
may be recalled, in this context, that the appointment of General Aupick as 
ambassador to Constantinople in 1848 goes back to Lamartine, who at that time 
was minister of foreign affairs. [ J26a,6] 

Work on Les Fleurs du malup through the first edition: fifteen years. [J26a,7] 

Proposal of a Brussels pharmacist to Poulet-Malassis: in exchange for a commit- 
ment to buy 200 copies, he would be allowed to advertise to readers, in the back 
pages of Les Paradis artificiels, a hashish extract prepared by his firm. Baude- 
laire's veto won out with difficulty. [ J26a,8] 

From <Barbey> d'Aurevilly's letter to Baudelaire of February 4, 1859: "Villain of 
genius! In poetry, I knew you to he a sacred viper spewing your venom in the faces 
of the g — s and the g — s. But now the viper has sprouted wings and is soaring 
through the clouds to shoot its poison into the very eyes of the Sun!" Cited in 
Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 1931). p. 157. [ J27,l] 



In Honfleur, he had hung two paintings over his bed. One of them, painted by his 
father as pendant to the other, showed an amorous scene; the other, dating from 
an earlier time, a Temptation of Saint Anthony. In the center of the first picture, a 
bacchante. [J27,2] 

"Sand is inferior to Sade!" i:u [J27,3] 

"We ensure that our confessions are well rewarded" 132 — this should be compared 
with the practice of his letters. [ J27,4] 

Seilliere (p. 234) cites <Barbey> d'Aurevilly: "Ibe's hidden objective was to con- 
found the imagination of his times. . . . Hoffmann did not have this terrible 
power." Such puissance terrible was surely Baudelaire's as well. [J27,5] 

On Delacroix (according to Seilliere, p. 114): "Delacroix is the artist best 
equipped to portray modern woman in her heroic manifestations, whether these 
be understood in the divine or the infernal sense. ... It seems that such color 
thinks for itself, independently of the objects it clothes. The effect of the whole is 
almost musical." 133 [J27,6] 

Fourier is said to have presented his "minute discoveries" too "pompously." 13 ' 1 

[J27,7] 

Seilliere represents as his particular object of study what in general determines 
the standard for the literature on Baudelaire: "It is, in effect, the theoretical 
conclusions imposed on Charles Baudelaire by his life experiences that I am 
particularly concerned with in these pages." Ernest Seilliere, Baudelaire (Paris, 
1931), p. 1. ' [J27,8] 

Eccentric hehavior in 1848: '"They've just arrested de Flotte,' he said. 'Is it 
because his hands smelled of gunpowder? Smell mine!'" Seilliere, Baudelaire 
(Paris, 1931), p. 51. [J27,9] 

Seilliere (p. 59) righdy contrasts Baudelaire's postulate, according to which the 
advent of Napoleon III is to be interpreted in de Maistre's sense as "providen- 
tial," with his comment: "My rage at the coup d'etat. How many bullets I braved! 
Another Bonaparte! What a disgrace!" Both in "Mon Coeur mis a nu." m 

[J27a,l] 

The bookby Seilliere is thoroughly imbued with the position of its author, who is 
president of the Academie des Sciences Morales et Politiques. A typical premise: 
"The social question is a question of morality" (p. 66). Individual sentences by 
Baudelaire are invariably accompanied by the author's marginal glosses. 

[J27a,2] 



Bourdin: son-in-law of Villemessant. Le Figaro in 1863 publishes a violent attack 
by Pontmartin on Baudelaire. In 1864., he halts publication of the Petits Poemes en 
prose after two installments. Villemessant: "Your poems bore everybody." See 
Frangois Porche, La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire (series entitled Le 
Roman des grandes existences, vol. 6) (Paris <1926>), p. 261. [ J27a,3] 

On Lamartine: "A bit of a strumpet, a bit of a whore." Cited in Francois Porche, 
La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire (series entitled Le Roman des grandes 
existences, vol. 6) (Paris), p. 248. [ J27a,4] 

Relation to Victor Hugo: "He had solicited from him a preface to the study on 
Gautier, and, with the aim of forcing Victor Hugo's hand, had even dedicated some 
poems to him." Francois Porche, La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire (se- 
ries entitled Le Roman des grandes existences, vol. 6) (Paris), p. 251. [ J27a,5] 

Title of the first publication of pieces from Les Paradis artijiciels in La Revue 
contemporaine, 1858: "De l'ldeal artificiel" <0n the Artificial Ideab. [ J27a,6] 

Sainte-Beuve's article in Le Constitutional of January 20, 1862. Subsequently, 
as early as February 9 — as Baudelaire is toying with the idea of declaring his 
candidacy for Lacordaire's seat instead of for Scribe's, which was liis original 
plan — the admonition: "Leave the Academic as it is, more surprised than 
shocked." Baudelaire withdraws his application. See Porche, La Vie douloureuse 
de Charles Baudelaire (Paris), p. 247. [J27a,7] 

"Note that this innovator has not a single new idea. After Vigny, one must wait 
until Sully-Prudhomme to find new ideas in a French poet. Baudelaire never 
entertains anything but the most threadbare platitudes. He is the poet of aridity 
and banality. "Benediction": the artist here below is a martyr. "L'Albatros": the 
artist flounders in reality. "Les Phares": artists are the beacons of humanity. . . . 
Brunetiere is surely right: there is nothing more in "Une Charogne" than the 
words of Ecclesiasticus, 'With all flesh, hoth man and beast, . . . are death and 
bloodshed.'"" 7 Emile Faguet, "Baudelaire," La Revue, 87 (1910), p. 619. 

[J28.1] 

"He has almost no imagination. His inspiration is amazingly meager." E. Faguet, 
"Baudelaire," La Revue, 87 (1910), p. 616. [J28,2] 

Faguet draws a comparison between Senancour and Baudelaire — what's more, in 
favor of the former. [J28,3] 

J. -J. Weiss (Revue contemporaine, January 1858): "This line of verse . . . resem- 
bles one of those spinning tops that would hum in the gutter." Cited in Camille 
Vergniol, "Cinquante ans apres Baudelaire," Revue de Paris, 24th year (1917), 
p. 687. [J28,4] 



Pontmartin in his critique of the portrait of Baudelaire by Nargeot: "This engrav- 
ing shows us a face that is haggard, sinister, ravaged, and malign; it is the face of a 
hero of the Court of Assizes, or of a pensioner from Bicetre." Compare B2a,6 
(Vischer: the "freshly beheaded" look). [J28,5] 

Adverse criticism from Brunetiere in 1887 and 1889. In 1892 and 1893 come the 
corrections. The sequence: Questions de critique (June 1887); Essai sur la littera- 
ture content por aine (1889); ISouveaux Essais sur la litterature contemporaine 
(1892); Evolution de la poesie lyrique en France (1893). 1311 [ J28,6] 

Physiognomy of Baudelaire in his last years: "He has an aridity in all his features, 
which contrasts sharply with the intensity of his look. Above all, he has that set to 
his lips which indicates a mouth long accustomed to chewing only ashes." Francois 
Porche, La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire (series entitled Le Roman des 
grandes existences, vol. 6) (Paris <1926>), p. 291. [J28,7] 

1861. Suicidal impulses. Arsene Houssaye of La Revue contemporain learns that 
some of the Petits Poemes en prose appearing in his journal have already appeared 
in the La Revue fantaisiste. Publication is suspended. — Lm, Revue des deux 
mondes rejects the essay on Guys. — Le Figaro brings it out with an "editorial 
note" by Bourdin. [ J28.8] 

First lectures in Belgium: Delacroix, Gautier. [ J28a,l] 

The Ministry of the Interior refuses to issue its stamp to Les Paradis artificiels. 
(See Porche, p. 226.) What does that signify? [J28a,2] 

Porche (p. 233) points out that Baudelaire throughout his life retained the mind- 
set of a young man of good family. — Very instructive in this regard: "In every 
change there is something at once vile and agreeable, some element of disloyalty 
and restlessness. This sufficiently explains the French Revolution.'"^ The senti- 
ment recalls Proust — who was also a Jib de famille. The historical projected into 
the intimate. [J28a,3] 

Meeting between Baudelaire and Proudhon in 1848 at the offices of Proudhon's 
daily newspaper, Le Representant du peuple. A chance encounter, it ends with 
their having dinner together on the Rue Neuve-Vivienne. [J28a,4] 

The hypothesis that Baudelaire, in 1848, helped to found the conservative news- 
paper Le Representant de I'Indre (later edited by Ponroy) comes from Renejohan- 
net. The newspaper supported the candidacy of Cavaignac. Baudelaire's 
collaboration at that moment, assuming it took place at all, may have involved a 
mystification. Without his knowledge, his trip to Chateauroux was subsidized, 
through Ancelle, by Aupick. [J28a,5] 



According to Le Dantec, the second tercet of "Sed Non Satiata" is in some degree 
linked to "Les Lesbiennes." [J28a,6] 



By 1843, according to Prarond, a great many poems from Le Fleurs du mal were 
already written. [ J28a,7] 

In 1845, "The Gold-Bug" is translated by Alphonse Borghers as "Le Scarabee 
d'or" in La Revue britannique. The next year, La Quotidienne publishes an adapta- 
tion, signed by initials only, of "The Murders in the Rue Morgue," wherein Poe's 
name goes unmentioned. Decisive for Baudelaire, according to Asselineau, was 
the translation of "The Black Cat" by Isabelle Meunier, in La Democratie pacifique 
(1847). Characteristically enough, the first of Baudelaire's translations fromPoe, 
to judge by the date of publication <July 15, 1848>, was of "Mesmeric Revela- 
tion." [J28a,8] 

1855: Baudelaire writes a letter to George Sand, interceding on behalf of Marie 
Daubrun. [J28a,9] 

"Always very polite, very haughty, and very unctuous at the same time, there was 
about him something reminiscent of the monk, of the soldier, and of the cosmopoli- 
tan." Judith Cladel, Bonshommes (Paris, 1879), cited in E. and J. Crepet, Charles 
Baudelaire (Paris, 1906), p. 237. [J29,l] 

In his "Notes et documents pourmon avocat," Baudelaire refers to the letters on 
art and morality which Balzac addressed to Hippolyte Castille in the newspaper 
La Semaine. 110 [ J29,2] 

Lyons is noted for its thick fog. [ J29,3] 

In 1845, apparent suicide attempt: knife wound in the chest. [J29,4] 

"It is partly a life of leisure that has enahled me to grow. — To my great detri- 
ment — for leisure without fortune breeds dehts. . . . But also to my great profit, as 
regards sensibility and meditation. . . . Other men of letters are, for the most part, 
hase ignorant drudges." 141 Cited in Porche, <La Vie douloureuse de Charles 
Baudelaire (Paris, 1926),> p. 116. [ J29,5] 

Louis Goudall's article in Le Figaro of November 4, 1855, which took aim at the 
publication of poems in La Revue des deux mondes, caused Michel Levy to give up 
the rights to Les Fleurs du mal to Poulet-Malassis. [ J29,6] 



1848: Le Salut public, with Champfleury and Toubin. First issue, February 27, 
written and edited in less than two hours. In that issue, presumably hy the hand 
of Baudelaire: "A few misguided hrethren have smashed some mechanical 



presses. . . . AH machinery is sacred, like a work of art" (cited in Porche, 
p. 129).— Compare "the bloody apparatus of Destruction." 1 12 [ J29.7] 



1849: Le Representant de I'Indre. Baudelaire's participation not established with 
certainty. If the article "Actuellement" <At the Present Time> is written by him, 
then a certain mystification at the expense of the conservative principals at the 
newspaper is not out of the question. [ J29.8] 

1851: with Dupont and La Chambaudie, La Republique du peuple, democratic 
almanac; "Editor, Baudelaire." Only "L'Ame du vin" <The Soul of the Wine> is 
puhlished there with his signature, [ J29,9] 

1852: with Champfleury and Monselet, La Semaine thedtrale. [ J29,10] 



Addresses: February 1854 

May 
1858 

Decemher 1858 
Summer 1859 



Hotel de York, Rue Sainte-Anne 
Hotel du Maroc, Rue de Seine 
Hotel Voltaire, Quai Voltaire 
22 Rue Beautreillis 

Hotel de Dieppe, Rue d'Amsterdam 

[J29.ll] 



At the age of twenty-seven, Baudelaire was gray at the temples. [J29,12] 

From Charles Asselineau, Baudelaire: Recueil d'Anecdotes (in Crepet, Charles 
Baudelaire [Paris, 1908], <pp. 279ff.> published in extenso): the story of 
Asselineau's handkerchief Baudelaire's obstinacy. Provocative effects of his 
"diplomacy." His mania for shocking people. [ J29a,l] 

From Gautier's obituary for Baudelaire, Le Moniteur, September 9, 1867: "Born 
in India, and possessing a thorough knowledge of the English language, he made 
his debut with his translations of Edgar Poe." Theopbile Gautier, Portraits con- 
temporains (Paris, 1874), p. 159. [J29a,2] 

A good half of Gautier's obituary notice is occupied with Poe. The part devoted to 
Les Fleurs du mal depends on metaphors which Gautier extracts from a story by 
Hawthorne: "We never read Les Fleurs du mal, by Baudelaire, without thinking 
involuntarily of that tale by Hawthorne <entitled "Rappaccini's Daughter"); it has 
those somber and metallic colors, those verdigris blossoms and heady perfumes. 
His muse resembles the doctor's daughter whom no poison can harm, but whose 
pallid and anemic complexion betrays the influence of the milieu she inhabits." 
Theophile Gautier, Portraits contemporains (Paris, 1874), p. 163. <See J3a,2.> 

[J29a,3] 

Gautier's characterization of Baudelaire, in his Hutoire du Romantume, is not 
much more than a succession of questionable metaphors. "This poet's talent for 



concentration has caused him to reduce each piece to a single drop of essence 
enclosed in a crystal flagon cut with many facets," and so on (p. 350). Banality 
pervades the entire analysis. "Although he loves Paris as Balzac loved it; al- 
though, in his search for rhymes, he wanders through its most sinister and 
mysterious lanes at the hour when the reflections of the lights change the pools of 
rainwater into pools of blood, and when the moon moves along the broken 
outline of the dark roofs like an old yellow ivory skull; although he stops at times 
by the smoke-dimmed windows of taverns, listening to the croaking song of the 
drunkard and the strident laugh of the prostitute, ... yet very often a suddenly 
recurring thought takes him back to India." Theophile Gautier, Histoire du Ro- 
mantume (Paris, 1874), p. 379 ("Le Progres de la poesie franchise depuis 1830").' u 
Compare Rollinat! [ J29a,4] 

Interior of the Hotel Pimodarr. no sideboard, no dining room table, frosted glass 
panes. At that point, Baudelaire had a servant. [ J29a,5] 

1851: new poems in he Messager de V ' Assemblee. The Saint-Simonian Revue poli- 
tique turns down his manuscripts. Porche remarks that it looks very much as 
though Baudelaire was not really able to choose where to publish. [ J30,l] 

The fortune Baudelaire inherited in 184.2 totaled 75,000 francs (in 1926, equiva- 
lent to 450,000 francs). To his colleagues — BanviJle — he passed for "very rich." 
He soon afterward discreetly left home. [J30,2] 

As Porche nicely puts it (<La Vie douloureuse de Charles Baudelaire [Paris, 
1926],> p. 98), Ancelle was the embodiment of the "legal world." [ J30,3] 

Journey to Bordeaux in 1841 by stagecoach, one of the last. — A very severe 
storm Baudelaire went through on board the ship commanded by Captain Saliz, 
the Paquebot des Men du Sud, appears to have left little trace in his work. [ J30,4] 

Baudelaire's mother was twenty-six and his father sixty when they married in 
1819. [J30.5] 

In the Hotel Pimodan, Baudelaire wrote with a red goose quill. [ J30,6] 

"Mesmeric Revelation," certainly not one of Poe's more distinguished works, is 
the only story to be translated by Baudelaire during the American author's life- 
time. 1852: Poe biography in La Revue de Paris. 1854: beginning of the translation 
work. [J30,7] 

It should be remembered that Jeanne Duval was Baudelaire's first love. [ J 3 0,8] 



Meetings with his mother in the Louvre during the years of dissension with Aupick. 

[J30.9] 



The banquets organized by Philoxene Boyer. Baudelaire gives readings of "Une 
Charogne," "Le Vin de l'assassin," "Delphine et Hippolyte" (Porche, <La Vie dou- 
loureuse de Charles Baudelaire [Paris, 1926], > p. 158). [ J30,10] 

Porche (p. 98) draws attention to the fact that, with Saliz, Ancelle, and Aupick, 
Baudelaire had relations of a typical sort. [J30.ll] 

Sexual preoccupations, as revealed by the titles of projected novels: "Les En- 
seignements d'un monstre" <Education of a Monsteo, "Une Infame adoree" 
<Beloved Slattern>, "La Maitresse de 1'idiot" <The Idiot's Mistress>, "Les 
Tribades" <The Dykes>, "L'Entreteneur" <The Keeper>. [ J30,12] 

Consider that Baudelaire not infrequently, it appears, loved to humble himself in 
long conversations with Ancelle. In this, too, he is a Jils de famille. More along 
these lines in his farewell letter: "I shall probably have to live a very hard life, but 
I shall be better off that way."" 5 [ J30.13] 

Cladel mentions a "noble and transcendent dissertation" by Baudelaire on the 
physiognomy of language, having to do with the colors of words, their peculiarities 
as sources of light, and finally their moral characteristics. [J30a,l] 

Indicative of a perhaps not uncommon tone in the exchanges between the two 
writers is Champfleury's letter of March 6, 1863. Baudelaire, in a letter now lost, 
had declined Champfleury's proposal to meet a female admirer of the Le Fleurs 
du mal and the writings of Poe, making a point of his dignity. Champfleury 
responds: "As for my compromised dignity, I refuse to hear of it. Stop frequenting 
places of far worse repute. Try to imitate my life of hard work; be as independent 
as I am; never have to depend on others — and then you can talk about dignity. / 
The word, in fact, means nothing to me, and I put it down to your peculiar ways, 
which are both affected and natural" (cited in E. and J. Crepet, <Charles Baude- 
laire [Paris, 1906],> appendix, p. 341). Baudelaire (Lettres, pp. 349ff.) writes back 
on the same day. 146 [J30a,2] 

Hugo to Baudelaire, August 30, 1857. He acknowledges receipt of Les Fleurs du 
mal. "Art is like the heavens; it is the infinite field. You have just proved that. Your 
Fleurs du mal are as radiant and dazzling as the stars." Cited in Crepet, p. 113. 
Compare the great letter of October 6, 1859, containing the formula and credo of 
progress. [J30a,3] 

Paul de Molenes to Baudelaire, May 14, 1860. "You have this gift for the new, 
something that has always seemed to me precious — indeed, almost sacred." Cited 
in Crepet, p. 413. [J30a,4] 



Ange Efechmeja, Bucharest, February 11-23, 1866. In this long letter full of great 
admiration, an exact outlook on la poesie pure: "I would say something more: I 



am convinced that, if the syllables that go to form verses of this kind were to be 
translated by the geometric forms and subtle colors which belong to them by 
analogy, they would possess the agreeable texture and beautiful tints of a Persian 
carpet or Indian shawl. / My idea will strike you as ridiculous; but I have often 
felt like drawing and coloring your verse." Cited in Crepet, p. 415. [J30a,5] 

Vigny to Baudelaire, January 27, 1862: "How . . . unjust you are, it seems to me, 
toward this lovely bouquet, so variously scented with odors of spring, for having 
given it a title it does not deserve, and how much I deplore that poisonous air 
which you sometimes pipe in from the murky bourne of Hamlet's graveyard." 
Cited in Crepet, p. 441. [J30a,6] 

From the letter that Baudelaire sent to Empress Eugenie, November 6, 1857: "But 
the fine, increased by costs that are unintelligible to me, exceeds the resources of 
the proverbial poverty of poets, and . . . , convinced that the heart of the Empress 
is open to pity for all tribulations, spiritual as well as material, I have conceived 
the idea, after a period of indecision and timidity that lasted ten days, of appealing 
to the gracious goodness of your Majesty and of entreating your intercession with 
the minister of justice." 1 ' 17 H. Patry, "L'Epilogue du proces des Fleurs du mal: Une 
Lettre inedite de Baudelaire a l'lmperatrice," Revue d'histoire litteraire de la 
France, 29th year (1922), p. 71. [J31.1] 

From Schaunard, Souvenirs (Paris, 1887): '"I detest the countryside,' says 
Baudelaire in explanation of his hasty departure from Honfleur, 'particularly in 
good weather. The persistent sunshine oppresses me. . . . Ah! speak to me of those 
everchanging Parisian skies that laugh or cry according to the wind, and that 
never, in their variable heat and humidity, have any effect on the stupid crops. . . . 
I am perhaps affronting your convictions as a landscape painter, but I must tell 
you further that an open body of water is a monstrous thing to me; I want it 
incarcerated, contained within the geometric walls of a quay. My favorite walking 
place is the emhankment along the Canal de l'Ourcq'" (cited in Crepet, p. 160). 

[J31.2] 

Crepet juxtaposes Schaunard's report with the letter to Desnoyers, and then re- 
marks in closing: "What can we conclude from all this? Perhaps simply that 
Baudelaire belonged to that family of unfortunates who desire only what they do 
not have and love only the place where they are not" (Crepet, p. 161). [J31,3] 

Baudelaire's sincerite was formerly much discussed. Traces of this debate are still 
to be found in Crepet (see p. 172). [ J31 ,4] 

"The laughter of children is like the blossoming of a flower. ... It is a plant-like 
joy. And so, in general, it is more like a smile — something analogous to the wagging 
of a dog's tail, or the purring of a cat. And if there still remains some distinction 
hetween the laughter of children and such expressions of animal contentment, . . . 
this is hecause their laughter is not entirely free of ambition, as is only proper to 



little scraps of men — that is, to budding Satans." "De l'Essence du rire," Oeuvres, 
ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 174. 14l! [J31.5] 



Christ knew anger, and also tears; he did not laugh. Virginie would not laugh at 
the sight of a caricature. The sage does not laugh, nor does innocence. "The 
comic element is a damnable thing, and one of diabolical origin." "De l'Essence 
du rire," Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 168. m [J31a,l] 

Baudelaire distinguishes the "significative comic" from the "absolute comic." The 
latter alone is a proper object of reflection: the grotesque. 130 [ J31a,2] 

Allegorical interpretation of modern clothing for men, in the "Salon de 1846": "As 
for the garb, the outer husk, of the modern hero, ... is it not the necessary garb of 
our suffering age, which wears the symbol of perpetual mourning even on its thin 
black shoulders? Notice how the black suit and the frock coat possess not only 
their political beauty, which is an expression of universal equality, but also their 
poetic beauty, which is an expression of the public soul — an endless procession of 
hired mourners, political mourners, amorous mourners, bourgeois mourners. We 
are all of us celebrating some funeral." Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 134. 151 

[J31a,3] 

The incomparable force of Poe's description of the crowd. One thinks of early- 
lithographs by Senef elder, like "Der Spielclub" <The Players' Club>, "Die Menge 
nach Einbruch der Dunkelheit" <The Crowd after Nightfallx "The rays of the 
gas lamps, feeble at first in their struggle with the dying day, had now at length 
gained ascendancy, and threw over everything a fitful and garish luster. All was 
dark yet splendid — as that ebony to which has been likened the style of Tertul- 
lian." 152 Edgar Poe, Nouvelles Hutoires extraordinaires, trans. Charles Baudelaire 
(Paris <1886>), p. 94. D Flaneur 0 [J31a,4] 

"Imagination is not fantasy. . . . Imagination is an almost divine faculty which 
perceives . . . the intimate and secret relations of things, the correspondences and 
the analogies." <Baudelaire,> "Notes nouvelles sur Edgar Poe," Nouvelles His- 
toires extraordinaires, pp. 13-14. 153 [J31a,5] 

Purely emblematic book illustration — ornamented with devices — which Brac- 
quemond had designed for the planned de luxe edition of Les Fleurs du mal 
around 1862. The only copy of the plate was sold by Champfleury, and later 
acquired by Avery (New York). [ J31a,6] 

Concerning the conception of the crowd in Victor Hugo, two very characteristic 
passages from "La Pente de la reverie" <The Propensity for Reverio: 

Crowd without name! Chaos! — Voices, eyes, footsteps. 
Those never seen, those never known. 
All the living! — cities buzzing in the ear 
More than any beehive or American woods. 



The following passage shows the crowd depicted by Hugo as though with the 
burin of an engraver: 

The night with its crowd, in this hideous dream, 
Came on — growing denser and darker together — 
And, in these regions which no gaze can fathom, 
The increase of men meant the deepening of shadow. 
All became vague and uncertain; only a breath 
That from moment to moment would pass, 
As though to grant me a view of the great anthill, 
Opened in the far-reaching shadow some valleys of light, 
As the wind that blows over the tossing waves 
Whitens the foam, or furrows the wheat in the fields. 

Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, Poesie, vol. 2 (Les Orientales, Feuilles d'automne) 
(Paris, 1880), pp. 363, 365-366. [J32.1] 

Jules Troubat — Sainte-Beuve's secretary — to Poulet-Malassis, April 10, 1866: 
"See, then, how poets always end! Though the social machine revolves, and regu- 
lates itself for the bourgeoisie, for professional men, for workers, ... no benevo- 
lent statute is being established to guarantee those unruly natures impatient of all 
restraint the possibility, at least, of dying in a bed of their own. — 'But the 
brandy?' someone will ask. What of it? You too drink, Mister Bourgeois, Mister 
Grocer; you have as many vices as — and even more than — the poet. . . . Balzac 
burns himself out with coffee; Musset besots himself with absinthe and still pro- 
duces his most beautiful stanzas; Murger dies alone in a nursing home, like Baude- 
laire at this very moment. And not one of these writers is a socialist!" (Cited in 
Crepet, <Baudelaire [Paris, 1906],) pp. 196-197.) The literary market. [J32,2] 

In a draft of the letter to Jules Janin (1865), Baudelaire plays Juvenal, Lucan, and 
Petronius off against Horace. [ J32,3] 

Letter to Jules Janin: "melancholy, always inseparable from the feeling for 
beauty." Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 610. [J32,4] 

"Every epic intention ... is the result of an imperfect sense of art." <Baudelaire,> 
"Notes nouvelles sur Edgar Poe" {Nouvelles Hutoires extraordinaires [Paris, 1886], 
p. 18). 131 This is, in embryo, the whole theory of "pure poetry." (Immobilization!) 

[J32,5] 

According to Crepet (<Baudelaire [Paris, 1906], > p. 155), most of the drawings left 
by Baudelaire portray "macabre scenes." [J32a,l] 

"Among all the books in the world today, the Bible being the sole exception, Les 
Fleurs du mml is the most widely published and the most often translated into other 
languages." Andre Suares, Trois Grands Vivants (Paris <1938>), p. 269 ("Baude- 
laire et Les Fleurs du maV). [ J32a,2] 



"The life of Baudelaire is a desert for anecdotes." Andre Suares, Trois Grands 
Vivants (Paris), p. 270 ("Baudelaire et Les Fleurs du mal"). [J32a,3] 



"Baudelaire does not describe." Andre Suares, Trois Grands Vivants (Paris), 
p. 294 ("Baudelaire et Les Fleurs du maV). [ J32a,4] 

In the "Salon de 1859," vehement invective against I'amour — apropos of a cri- 
tique of the Neo-Greek school: "Yet aren't we quite weary of seeing paint and 
marble squandered on behalf of this elderly scamp ...?... His hair is thickly 
curled like a coachman's wig; his fat wobbling cheeks press against his nostrils and 
his eyes; it is doubtless the elegiac sighs of the universe which distend his flesh, or 
perhaps I should say his meat, for it is stuffed, tubulous, and blown out like a bag 
of lard hanging on a butcher's hook; on his mountainous back is attached a pair of 
butterfly wings." Ch. B., Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec (Paris), vol. 2, p. 243. ir,f ' 

[J32a,5] 

"There is a worthy publication in which every contributor knows all and has a 
word to say about all, a journal in which every member of the staff . . . can instruct 
us, by turns, in politics, religion, economics, the fine arts, philosophy, and litera- 
ture. In this vast monument of fatuity, which leans toward the future like the 
Tower of Pisa, and in which nothing less than the happiness of humankind is being 
worked out . . ." Ch. B., Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec (Paris), vol. 2, p. 258 ("Salon de 
1859"). (Le Globe?) m [J32a,6] 

In defense of Ricard: "Imitation is the intoxication of supple and brilliant minds, 
and often even a proof their superiority." Ch. B., Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, 
p. 263 ("Salon de 1859"). Pro domo'. m [J32a,7] 

"That touch of slyness which is always mingled with innocence. " Ch. B., Oeuvres, 
ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 264 ("Salon de 1859"). On Ricard. 15 " [J32a,8] 

Vigny in "Le Mont des oliviers" (Mount of Olives), against de Maistre: 

He has been on this earth for many long ages, 
Born from harsh masters and false-speaking sages, 
Who still vex the spirit of each living nation 

With spurious conceptions of my true redemption. 159 [J33,l] 

"Perhaps only Leopardi, Edgar Poe, and Dostoevsky experienced such a dearth of 
happiness, such a power of desolation. Round ahout him, this century, which in 
other respects seems so flourishing and multifarious, takes on the terrrible aspect 
of a desert." Edmond Jaloux, "Le Centenaire de Baudelaire," La Revue hebdo- 
madaire, 30th year, no. 27 (July 2, 1921), p. 77. [J33.2] 

"All by himself, Baudelaire made poetry a method of analysis, a form of introspec- 
tion. In this, he is very much the contemporary of Flauhert or of Claude Ber- 



nard." Edmond Jaloux, "Le Centenaire de Baudelaire,' 1 La Revue hebdo- 
madaire, 30th year, no. 27 (July 2, 1921), p. 69. [J33.3] 



List of Baudelaire's topics, in Jaloux: "nervous irritability of the individual de- 
voted to solitude . . . ; abhorrence of the human condition and the need to confer 
dignity upon it through religion or through art ... ; love of debauchery in order to 
forget or punish oneself . . . ; passion for travel, for the unknown, for the 
new; . . . predilection for whatever gives rise to thoughts of death (twilight, 
autumn, dismal scenes) . . . ; adoration of the artificial; complacency in spleen." 
Edmond Jaloux, "Le Centenaire de Baudelaire," La Revue hebdomadaire, 30th 
year, no. 27 (July 2, 1921), p. 69. Here we see how an exclusive regard for 
psychological considerations blocks insight into Baudelaire's genuine originality. 

[J33.4] 

Influence of Les Fleurs du mat, around 1885, on Rops, Moreau, Rodin. [J33.5] 

Influence of "Les Correspondances" on Mallarme. [ J33,6] 

Baudelaire's influence on Realism, then on Symbolism. Moreas, in the Symbolist 
manifesto of September 18, 1886 (Le Figaro): "Baudelaire must be considered the 
true precursor of the present movement in poetry." [ J33,7] 

Claudel: "Baudelaire has celebrated the only passion which the nineteenth cen- 
tury could feel with sincerity: Remorse." Cited in Le Cinquantenaire de Charles 
Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 43. (Compare J53,l.> [J33,8] 

"A Dantesque nightmare." Leconte de Lisle, cited in Le Cinquantenaire de 
Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 17. [ J33a,l] 

Edouard Thierry compares Les Fleurs de mal to the ode written by Mirabeau 
during his imprisonment at Vincennes. Cited in Le Cinquantenaire de Charles 
Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 19. [J33a,2] 

Verlaine (where?): "The profound originality of Baudelaire is ... to have repre- 
sented, in a powerful and essential way, modern man. . . . By this, I mean only 
modern man in the physical sense . . . , modern man with his senses stirred up and 
vibrating, his spirit painfully subtle, his brains saturated with tobacco, and his 
blood on fire with alcohol. . . . Charles Baudelaire . . . may be said to personify the 
ideal type, the Hero if you will, of this individuality in sensitivity. Nowhere else, 
not even in Heinrich Heine, will you find it accentuated so strongly." Cited in Le 
Cinquantenaire de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 18. [ J33a,3] 

Lesbian motifs in Balzac (La Fille aux yeux d'or); Gautier (Mademoiselle de 
Maupin); Delatouche (Fragoletta). [J33a,4] 

Poems for Marie Daubrun: "Chant d'automne," "Sonnet d'automne." [J33a,5] 



Meryon and Baudelaire were born in the same year; Meryon died a year after 
Baudelaire. [J33a,6] 



In the years 1842-1845, according to Prarond, Baudelaire was fascinated with a 
portrait of a woman by Greco in the Louvre. Cited in Crepet, <Charles Baudelaire 
[Paris, 1906], > p. 70. [J33a,7] 

Project dated May 1846: "Les Amours et la mort de Lucain" <The Loves and the 
Death of Lucanx [J33a,8] 

"He was twenty-two years old, and he found himself immediately provided with 
employment at the town hall of the seventh arrondissement — -'in the Registry of 
Deaths,' he kept repeating with an air of satisfaction." Maurice Rollinat, Fin 
d'oeuvre; cited in Gustave Geffroy, Mauiice Rollinat, 1846-1903 (Paris, 1919), 
p. 5. [J33a,9] 

Barbey d' Aurevilly has placed Rollinat between Poe and Baudelaire; and he calls 
Rollinat "a poet of the tribe of Dante." Cited in Geffroy, Maurice Rollinat, p. 8. 

[J33a,10] 

Composition of Baudelairean poems by Rollinat. [ J33a,ll] 

"La Voix" <The Voice>: "in the pit's deepest dark, I distinctly see strange 
worlds." 1 " 0 [J33a,12] 

According to Charles Toubin, Baudelaire in 1847 had two domiciles, on the Rue de 
Seine and the Rue de Babylone. On days when the rent was due, he often spent the 
night with friends in a third. See Crepet, <Charles Baudelaire, (Paris, 1906), > 
p. 48. [J34.1] 

Crepet (p. 47) counts fourteen addresses for Baudelaire between 1842 and 1858, 
not including Honfleur and some temporary lodgings. He lived in the Quartier du 
Temple, the He Saint-Louis, the Quartier Saint-Germain, the Quartier Mont- 
martre, the Quartier de la Republique. [ J34,2] 

"You are passing through a great city that has grown old in civilization — one of 
those cities which harbor the most important archives of universal life — and your 
eyes are drawn upward, sursum, ad sidera; for in the public squares, at the corners 
of the crossways, stand motionless figures, larger than those who pass at their 
feet, repeating to you the solemn legends of Glory, War, Science, and Martyr- 
dom, in a mute language. Some are pointing to the sky, whither they ceaselessly 
aspired; others indicate the earth from which they sprang. They brandish, or 
they contemplate, what was the passion of their life and what has become its 
emblem: a tool, a sword, a book, a torch, vitai lampadafBe you the most heedless 
of men, the most unhappy or the vilest, a beggar or a banker, the stone phantom 
takes possession of you for a few minutes and commands you, in the name of the 



past, to think of things which are not of the earth. / Such is the divine role of 
sculpture." Ch. B., Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol, 2, pp. 274-275 ("Salon de 
1859"). 1(il Baudelaire speaks here of sculpture as though it were present only in 
the big city. It is a sculpture that stands in the way of the passerby. This depiction 
contains something in the highest degree prophetic, though sculpture plays only 
the smallest part in that which would fulfill the prophecy. Sculpture is found <?> 
only in the city. [J34.3] 

Baudelaire speaks of his partiality for "the landscape of romance," more and 
more avoided by painters. From his description, it becomes evident that he is 
thinking of structures essentially Baroque: "But surely our landscape painters are 
far too herbivorous in their diet? They never willingly take their nourishment 
from ruins. ... I feel a longing for . . . crenellated abbeys, reflected in gloomy 
pools; for gigantic bridges, towering Ninevite constructions, haunts of dizzi- 
ness — for everything, in short, which would have to be invented if it did not 
already exist!" Ch. B., Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 272 ("Salon de 1859")."' 2 

[J34.4] 

"Imagination . . . decomposes all creation; and with the raw materials accumu- 
lated and disposed in accordance with rules whose origins one cannot find except 
in the furthest depths of the soul, it creates a new world — it produces the sensation 
of newness." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 226 ("Salon de 1859"). lf " [J34a,l] 

On the ignorance of painters, with particular reference to Troyon: "He paints on 
and on; he stops up his soul and continues to paint, until at last he hecomes like the 
artist of the moment. . . . The imitator of the imitator finds his own imitators, and 
in this way each pursues his dream of greatness, stopping up his soul more and 
more thoroughly, and above all reading nothing, not even The Perfect Cook, 
which at any rate would have been able to open up for him a career of greater 
glory, if less profit." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 219 ("Salon de 1859"). 164 

[J34a,2] 

"The pleasure of being in a crowd is a mysterious expression of sensual joy in the 
multiplication of number. . . . Number is in all. . . . Ecstasy is a number. . . . Relig- 
ious intoxication of great cities." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, pp. 626-627 
("Fusees"). 165 Extract the root of the human being! [ J34a,3] 

"The arabesque is the most spiritualistic of designs." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 629 ("Fusees"). 166 [J34a,4] 

"For my part, I say: the sole and supreme pleasure of love lies in the absolute 
knowledge of doing evil. And man and woman know, from birth, that in evil is to be 
found all voluptuousness." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 628 ("Fusees"). lf ' 7 

[J34a,5] 



"Voltaire jests about our immortal soul, which has dwelt for nine months amid 
excrement and urine. . . . He might, at least, have traced, in this localization, a 
malicious gibe or satire directed by Providence against love, and, in the way 
humans procreate, a sign of original sin. After all, we can make love only with the 
organs of excretion." Ch. Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 651 ("Mon Coeur mis a 
nu")." ! At this point, Lawrence's defense of Lady Chatterley should be men- 
tioned. [J34a,6] 

Beginnings, with Baudelaire, of a devious rationalization of the charms exerted 
on him by prostitution: "Love may arise from a generous sentiment — namely, the 
liking for prostitution; but it soon becomes corrupted by the liking for owner- 
ship" ("Fusees") , "The human heart's ineradicable love of prostitution — source 
of man's horror of solitude. . . . The man of genius wants to be one — that is, 
solitary. / The glorious thing ... is to remain one by practicing your prostitution 
in your own company" ("Mon Coeur mis a nu"). Vol. 2, pp. 626, 661. 1 " 9 [J34a,7] 

In 1835 Cazotte's Le Diable amour eux is published, with a preface by Gerard de 
Nerval. Baudelaire's line in "Le Possede" — "Mon cher Belzebuth, je t' adore" — is 
an explicit citation of Cazotte. "Baudelaire's verse has a demoniacal sound much 
stranger than the diabolism of the age of Louis Philippe." Claudius Grillet, Le 
Diable dans la litterature an XIX" siecle (Lyons and Paris, 1935), pp. 95-96. 

[J35.1] 

Letter to his mother on December 26, 1853: "Besides, I am so accustomed to 
physical discomforts; I know so well how to put two shirts under a torn coat and 
trousers so threadbare that the wind cuts through them; I know so well how to put 
straw or even paper soles in worn-out shoes that I hardly feel anything except 
moral suffering. Nevertheless, I must confess that I have reached the point of 
being afraid to make brusque movements or to walk very much, for fear of tearing 
my clothes even more." Ch. B., Dernieres Lettres inedites a sa mere, introduction 
and notes by Jacques Crepet (Paris, 1926), pp. 44-45. 170 [J35,2] 

The Goncourts report in their journal on June 6, 1883, the visit of a young man 
from whom they learn that the budding scholars at the high school are divided into 
two camps. The future students of the Ecole Normale have taken About and Sar- 
cey as their models; the others, Edmond de Goncourt and Baudelaire. Journal des 
Goncourts, vol. 6 (Paris, 1892), p. 264. [J35,3] 

To his mother on March 4, 1860, concerning etchings by Meryon: "The hideous 
and colossal figure in the frontispiece is one of the figures decorating the exterior of 
Notre Dame. In the background is Paris, viewed from a height. How the devil this 
man manages to work so calmly over an abyss, I do not know." Ch. B., Dernieres 
Lettres a sa mere, introduction and notes by Jacques Crepet (Paris, 1926), 
pp. 132-133. [J35.4] 



In the Dernieres Lettres (p. 145), this phrase for Jeanne: "that aged beauty who 
has now become an invalid." 171 He wants to leave her an annuity after his death. 

[J35,5] 

Decisive for the confrontation between Baudelaire and Hugo is a passage from 
Hugo's letter of November 17, 1859, to Villemain: "Sometimes I spend the whole 
night meditating on my fate, before the great deep, and ... all I can do is exclaim: 
Stars! Stars! Stars!" Cited in Claudius Grillet, Victor Hugo spirite (Lyons and 
Paris, 1929), p. 100. 172 [J3 5,6] 

The multitudes in Hugo: "The prophet seeks out solitude. . . . He goes into the 
desert to think. Of what? Of the multitudes." Hugo, William Shakespeare, <part 2, 
book> 6. [J35,7] 

Allegory in the spiritualist protocols from Jersey: "Even pure abstractions fre- 
quented Marine-Terrace: Idea, Death, the Drama, the Novel, Poetry, Criticism, 
Humbug. They . . . preferred to make their appearance during the day, while the 
dead came at night." Claudius Grillet, Victor Hugo spirite (Lyons and Paris, 
1929), p. 27. [J35a,l] 

The "multitudes" in Hugo figure as the "depths of the shadow" in Les Chmtiments 
("La Caravane," part 4), Oeuvres completes, vol. 4, Poesie (Paris, 1882), p. 397: 
"The day when our plunderers, our tyrants beyond number, / Will know that 
someone stirs in the depths of the shadow." [J3 5a,2] 

On Les Fleurs du mal: "Nowhere does he make a direct allusion to hashish or to 
opium visions. In this we must admire the superior taste of the poet, completely 
taken up as he is with the philosophic construction of his poem." Georges Roden- 
bach, L'Elite (Paris, 1899), pp. 18-19. [J3 5a,3 ] 

Rodenbach (p. 19) emphasizes, like Beguin, the experience of the correspon- 
dances in Baudelaire. [J35a,4] 

Baudelaire to <Barbey> d'Aurevilly: "Should you take Communion with hands on 
hips?" Cited in Georges Rodenbach, L'Elite (Paris, 1899), p. 6. [J35a,5] 

Three generations (according to Georges Rodenbach, L'Elite [Paris, 1899], pp. 6- 
7) revolve about the "splendid restoration of Notre Dame." The first, forming as it 
were an outer circle, is represented by Victor Hugo. The second, represented by 
<Barbey> d'Aurevilly, Baudelaire, and Hello, forms an inner circle of devotion. 
The third is made up of the group of satanists: Huysmans, Guaita, Peladan. 

[J35a,6] 



"However beautiful a house may be, it is first of all — before we consider its 
beauty — so many feet high and so many feet wide. Likewise, literature, which is 



the most priceless material, is first of all the filling up of so many columns, and a 
literary architect whose name in itself is not a guarantee of profit has to sell at all 
kinds of prices." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 385 ("Conseils aux jeunes lit- 
terateurs"). 1 " [J35a,7] 

Note from "Fusees": "The portrait of Serenas by Seneca. That of Stagirus by 
Saint John Chrysostom. Acedia, the malady of monks. Taedium vitae . . ." 
Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 632. 17,1 [J35a,8] 

Charles-Henry Hirsch descrihes Baudelaire, in comparison to Hugo, as "more 
capable of adapting to widely varying temperaments, thanks to the keenness of his 
ideas, sensations, and words. . . . The lessons of Baudelaire endure by virtue of 
. . . the strict form which keeps them before our eyes." Citedin Le Cinquantenaire 
de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 41. [J36,l] 

A remark by Nadar in his memoirs: Around 1911, the director of an agency for 
newspaper clippings told him that Baudelaire's name used to show up in the news- 
papers as often as the names of Hugo, Musset, and Napoleon. See Le Cinquan- 
tenaire de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 43. [ J36,2] 

Passage from Le Salut publique attributed by Crepet to Baudelaire: "Citizens 
should not give heed ... to such as these — to Barthelemy, Jean Journet, and 
others who extol the republic in execrable verse. The emperor Nero had the laud- 
able habit of rounding up all the bad poets in an amphitheater and flogging them 
cruelly." Cited in Crepet, <Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1906), > p. 81. [ J36.3] 

Passage from Le Salut publique attributed by Crepet to Baudelaire: "Intellects 
have grown. No more tragedies, no more Roman history. Are we not greater today 
than Bintus?" Cited in Crepet, p. 81. [J36.4] 

Crepet (p. 82) quotes the Notes de M. Champjleury: "De Flotte perhaps belongs 
with Wronski, Blanqui, Swedenborg, and others, in that somewhat bizarre pan- 
theon which lately elevated Baudelaire, following upon the reading of his texts, the 
events of the day, and the notoriety attained overnight by certain figures." 

[J36,5] 

"The work of Edgar Poe — with the exception of few beautiful poems — is the body 
of an art from which Baudelaire has blasted the soul." Andre Suares, Sur la Vie 
(Paris, 1925), vol. 2, p. 99 ("Idees sur Edgar Poe"). [J36,6] 



Baudelaire's theory of imagination, as well as his doctrine of the short poem and 
the short story, are influenced by Poe. The theory of I' art pour I 'art, in Baude- 
laire's formulation, seems to be a plagiarism. [J36.7] 



In his commemorative address, Banville draws attention to Baudelaire's classical 



"Comment on paie ses dettes quand on a du genie" <How a Genius Pays His Debts) 
appeared in 1846 and contains, under the appellative "the second friend," the 
following portrait of Gautier: "The second friend was, and still is, fat, lazy, and 
sluggish; what is more, he has no ideas and can only string words together as the 
Osage strings beads for a necklace." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 393. 17:> [J36a,l] 

Hugo: "As for me, I am conscious of the starry gulf in my soul." "Ave, dea — mori- 
turus te salutat: A Judith Gautier," Victor Hugo, Oeuvres choisies: Poesies et 
drames en vers (Paris <1912>), p. 404. [J36a,2] 

In his famous description of the lecture Baudelaire gave on Gautier in Brussels, 
Camille Lemonnier represents in a fascinating way the mounting perplexity into 
which the lecturer's positive glorification of Gautier plunged the audience. They 
had got the impression, as the talk went on, that Baudelaire was going to turn 
with some inimitable sarcasm from all he had said, as from a kind of decoy, in 
order to develop a different conception of poetry. And this expectation paralyzed 
the listeners. [J36a,3] 

Baudelaire — Camille Pelletan's favorite poet. So says Robert de Bonnieres, 
Memoir es d'aujourd'hui, vol. 3 (Paris, 1888), p. 239. [J36a,4] 

Rohert de Bonnieres, Memoires d'uujourd'hui, vol. 3 (Paris, 1888), publishes, on 
pp. 287-288, an exasperated letter sent to Taine by the director of La Revue 
liberule on January 19, 1864 , in which he complains of the intransigence displayed 
by Baudelaire in the course of negotiations over cuts in the piece "Les Vocations" 
(S pleen de Paris). [J36a,5] 

A passage from Rodenbach that exemplifies something typical in the description 
of the city — namely, the forced metaphor: "hi these cities saddened by a choir 
of weathercocks, / Birds of iron dreaming [!] of flight to the skies." Cited in 
G. Tourquet-Milnes, The Influence of Baudelaire in France and England (London, 



In the "Salon de 1846" one sees how precise Baudelaire's concept of a politics of 
art already was at that time: section 12 ("De l'Eclectisme et du doute") and 
section 14 ("De Quelques Douteurs") show that Baudelaire was conscious early 
on of the need to bring artistic production into line with certain fixed points. In 
section 17 ("Des Ecoles et des ouvriers"), Baudelaire speaks of atomization as a 
symptom of weakness. He lauds the schools of old: " Then you had schools of 
painting; now you have emancipated journeymen . . . — a school, . . . that is, the 
impossibility of doubt." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 131. 176 Compare le poncif! 



technique. 



[J36.8] 



1913), p. 191. — Parisian modernity! 



[J36a,6] 



[J36a,7] 



On a sheet with the sketch of a female figure and two portraits of a male head, an 
inscription 177 dating back to the nineteenth century: "Portrait of Blanqui 
(Auguste), a good likeness drawn from memory by Baudelaire in 1850, perhaps 
1849?" Reproduction in Feli Gautier, Charles Baudelaire (Brussels, 1904), p. lii. 

[J37.1] 

"He would churn his brains in order to produce astonishment." This comment by 
Leconte de Lisle occurs in the untitled article by Jules Claretie that appears in Le 
Tombeau and that reprints substantial portions of Claretie's obituary notice. Le 
Tombeau de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1896), p. 91. Effect of the endings ofpoems! 

□37,2] 

"0 Poet, you who turned the work of Dante upside down, / Exalting Satan to the 
heights and descending to God." Closing lines of Verhaeren's "A Charles Baude- 
laire," in Le Tombeau de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1896), p. 84. [J37.3] 

In Le Tombeau de Charles Baudelaire (Paris, 1896), there is a text by Alexandre 
Ourousof, "L' Architecture secrete des Fleurs du mai." It represents an oft- 
repeated attempt to establish distinct cycles in the book, and consists essentially in 
the selection of the poems inspired by Jeanne Duval. It makes reference to the 
article published by <Barbey> d'Aurevilly in Le Pays on July 24, 1857, in which it 
was maintained for the first time that there is a "secret architecture" in the book. 

[J37.4] 

"The echoes of the unconscious are so strong in him — literary creation being, with 
him, so close to physical effort — the currents of passion are so strong, so drawn 
out, so slow and painful, that all his psychic being resides there with his physical 
being." Gustave Kahn, preface to Charles Baudelaire, "Mon Coeur mis a nu" et 
"Fusees" (Paris, 1909), p. 5. [J37.5] 

"If Poe had been a real influence on him, we would find some trace of this in 
Baudelaire's way of imagining . . . scenes of action. In fact, the greater his immer- 
sion in the work of the American writer, the more he avoids fantasies of action .... 
His projected works, his titles for novels ... all had to do with various . . . psychic 
crises. Not one suggests an adventure of any kind." Gustave Kahn, preface to 
Charles Baudelaire, "Mon Coeur mis a nu" et "Fusees" (Paris, 1909), pp. 12-13. 

□37,6] 

Kahn discerns in Baudelaire a "refusal to take the opportunity offered by the 
nature of the lyric pretext." Gustave Kahn, preface to Ch. B., "Mon Coeur mis a 
nu" et "Fusees" (Paris, 1909), p. 15. [J37.7] 

Of the Fleurs du mal illustrated by Rodin for Paul Gallimard, Mauclair writes: 
"You feel that Rodin has handled the book, taken it up and put it down a hundred 
times, that he has read it while out on walks, and at the end of a long evening has 



suddenly reopened it under the lamplight and, haunted by a verse, picked up his 
pen. One can tell where he paused, what page he creased [!], how unsparing he 
must have been of the volume; for he had not been given some de luxe copy needing 
to be protected from damage. It was very much, as he himself liked to describe it, 
'his' pocket Baudelaire." Charles Baudelaire, Vingt-Sept Poemes des Fleurs du 
mal, illustres par Rodin (Paris, 1918), p. 7 (preface by Camille Mauclair). 

[J37a,l] 

The penultimate paragraph in "Chacun sa chimere" <T6 Every Man His Chi- 
mera) is distinctly reminiscent of Blanqui: "And the procession passed by me and 
disappeared in the haze at the horizon, just where the rounded surface of the 
planet prevents the human gaze from following." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 1, p. 4 12. 178 

[J37a,2] 

On the painter Jules Noel: "He is doubtless one of those who impose a daily 
amount of progress upon themselves." "Salon de 1846," Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 12 6. 179 

[J37a,3] 

In the comment on Les Fleurs du mal that Sainte-Beuve sends to Baudelaire in a 
letter of <June> 20, 1857, he finds this to say about the style of the book: "a curious 
poetic gift and an almost precious lack of constraint in expression." Immediately 
following: "with your pearling of the detail, with your Petrarchism of the horri- 
ble." Cited in Etienne Charavay, A. de Vigny et Charles Baudelaire, candidats a 
VAcademief ranqaise (Paris, 187S), p. 134. [J37a,4] 

"It seems to me that in many things you do not take yourself seriously enough." 
Vigny to Baudelaire on January 27, 1862, apropos of Baudelaire's candidacy for 
the Academie. Cited in Etienne Charavay, A. de Vigny et Charles Baudelaire, 
candidats a I'Academiefrancaise (Paris, 1879), pp. 100-101. [ J37a,5] 

Jules Mouquet, in <the introduction to> his edition of Ch<arles> B<audelaire>, Vers 
retrouves: Manoel (Paris, 1929), looks into the relation between Baudelaire and the 
poems published by <G.> Le Vavasseur, E. Prarond, and A. Argonne in Vers 
(Paris, 1843). There turn out to be a number of filiations. Apart from actual 
contributions by Baudelaire that appear in the second section under the name of 
Prarond, there are important correspondences, in particular that of "Le Reve 
d'un curieux" 180 to "Le Reve," by Argonne (pseudonym of Auguste Dozon). 

[J37a,6] 

Among the twenty-three poems of Les Fleurs du mal known to have been composed 
by the summer of 1843: "Allegorie," "Je n'ai pas oublie," "La Servante au grand 
coeur," "Le Crepuscule du matin." [J38,l] 

"Baudelaire feels a certain reserve about showing his work to the public; he pub- 
lishes bis poems under successive pseudonyms: Prarond, Privat d'Anglemont, 



Pierre de Fayis. 'La Fanfarlo' appears . . . on January 1, 1847, signed by Charles 
Dufays." Ch. B., Vers retrouves, eel. Jules Mouquet (Paris, 1929), p. 47. [J38.2] 



The following sonnet from the body of work by Prarond is attributed by Mouquet 
to Baudelaire: 

Born in the mud to a nameless jade, 

The child grew up speaking argot; 

By the age often, he had graduated from the sewers; 

Grown, he would sell his sister — is a jack-of -all-trades. 

His hack has the curve of an old flying buttress; 
He can sniff out the way to every cheap bordello; 
His look is a mixture of arrogance and cunning; 
He's the one to serve as watchdog for rioters. 

Wax-coated string keeps his thin soles in place; 

On his uncovered pallet a dirty wench laughs 

To think of her husband deceived hy unchaste Paris. 

Plebeian orator of the stockroom, 

He talks politics with the corner grocer. 

Here is what's called an eitfant de Paris. 

Charles Baudelaire, Vers retrouves, ed. Jules Mouquet (Paris, 1929), pp. 103- 
104. [J38.3] 



Freund contends "that the musicality of the poem does not present itself as a 
specific . . . technical quality but is rather the authentic ethos of the poet. . . . 
Musicality is the form taken by I' art pour I'art in poetry." Cajetan Freund, Der 
Vers Baudelaires (Munich, 1927), p. 46. [J38.4] 



On the publication of poems under the title Les Limbes <Limbo> in Le Messager de 
V Assemblee, April 9, 1851: "A small booklet entitled La Presse de 1848 contains 
the following: 'Today we see announced in L'Echo des marchands de vin a collec- 
tion of poems called Les Limbes. These are ivithout doubt socialist poems and, 
consequently, bad poems. Yet another fellow has become a disciple of Proudhon 
through either too much or too little ignorance."' A. de la Fineliere and Georges 
Descaux, Charles Baudelaire (series entitled Essais de bibliographie contempo- 
raine, vol. 1) (Paris, 1868), p. 12. [J38,5] 

Modernity — anticlassical and classical. Anticlassical: as antithesis to the classical 
period. Classical: as heroic fulfillment of the epoch that puts its stamp on its 
expression. [J38a,l] 



There is evidently a connection between Baudelaire's unfavorable reception in 
Belgium, his reputation as a police spy there, and the letter to Le Figaro concern- 
ing the banquet for Victor Hugo. 181 [J38a,2] 



Note the rigor and elegance of the title Curiosites esthetiques. 



[J38a,3] 



The teachings of Fourier: "Although, in nature, there are certain plants which are 
more or less holy, certain . . . animals more or less sacred; and although ... we 
may rightly conclude that certain nations . . . have been prepared ... by Provi- 
dence for a determined goal . . . — nevertheless all I wish to do here is assert their 
equal utility in the eyes of Him who is undefinable." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 143 
("Exposition Universelle, 1855"). W:! [J38a,4] 

"One of those narroiv-minded modern professors of aesthetics (as they are called 
by Heinrich Heine), . . . whose stiffened fingers, paralyzed by the pen, can no 
longer run with agility over the immense keyboard of correspondences!'''' Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 145 ("Exposition Universelle, 1855"). 1114 [J38a,5] 

"In the manifold productions of art, there is something always new which will 
forever escape the rules and analyses of the school!" Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 146 ("Exposition Universelle, 1855")." 15 Analogy to fashion. [ J38a,6] 

To the notion of progress in the history of art, Baudelaire opposes a monadologi- 
cal conception. "Transferred into the sphere of the imagination . . . , the idea of 
progress looms up with gigantic absurdity. ... In the poetic and artistic order, 
inventors rarely have predecessors. Every flowering is spontaneous, individual. 
Was Signorelli really the begetter of Michelangelo? Did Perugino contain 
Raphael? The artist depends on himself alone. He can promise nothing to future 
centuries except his own works." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 149 ("Exposition 
Universelle, 1855"). 186 [J38a,7] 

Toward a critique of the concept of progress in general: "For this is how disciples 
of the philosophers of steam and sulfur matches understand it: progress appears 
to them only in the form of an indefinite series. Where is that guarantee?" Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 149 ("Exposition Universelle, 1855"). 11,7 [J38a,8] 

"The story is told of Balzac . . . that one day he found himself in front of a . . . 
melancholy winter scene, heavy with hoarfrost and thinly sprinkled with cottages 
and wretched-looking peasants; and that, after gazing at a little house from which 
a thin wisp of smoke was rising, he cried, 'How beautiful it is! But what are they 
doing in that cottage? What are their thoughts? What are their sorrows? Has it 
been a good harvest? No doubt they have bills to pay?' Laugh if you will at M. de 
Balzac. I do not know the name of the painter whose honor it was to set the great 
novelist's soul a-quiver with anxiety and conjecture; but I think that in this way 
... he has given us an excellent lesson in criticism. You will often find me apprais- 
ing a picture exclusively for the sum of ideas or of dreams that it suggests to my 
mind." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 147 ("Exposition Universelle, 1855"). 11,11 

[J39.1] 



Conclusion of the "Salon tie 1845": "The painter, the true painter for whom we are 
looking, will be he who can snatch its epic quality from the life of today and can 
make us see and understand, with brush or with pencil, how great and poetic we 
are in our cravats and our patent-leather boots. Next year let us hope that the true 
seekers may grant us the extraordinary delight of celebrating the advent of the 
new!" Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, pp. 54-55. 189 [J39,2] 

"As for the garb, the outer husk, of the modern hero . . . , has not this much- 
maligned garb its own native beauty and charm? Is it not the necessary garb of our 
suffering age, which wears the symbol of perpetual mourning even on its thin black 
shoulders? Notice how the black suit and the frock coat possess not only their 
political beauty, which is an expression of universal equality, hut also their poetic 
beauty, which is an expression of the public soul — an endless procession of hired 
mourners, political mourners, amorous mourners, bourgeois mourners. We are 
all of us celebrating some funeral. / A uniform livery of mourning hears witness to 
equality. . . . Don't these puckered creases, playing like serpents around the mor- 
tified flesh, have their own mysterious grace? / . . . For the heroes of the Iliad 
cannot compare with you, 0 Vautrin, 0 Rastignac, O Birotteau — nor with you, 0 
Fontanares, who dared not publicly recount your sorrows wearing the funereal 
and rumpled frock coat of today; nor with you, 0 Honore de Balzac, you the most 
heroic, the most amazing, the most romantic and the most poetic of all the charac- 
ters that you have drawn from your fertile bosom!" Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
pp. 134, 136 ("Salon de 1846: De l'Heroisme de la vie moderne"). 190 The last 
sentence concludes the section. [ J39,3] 

"For when I hear men like Raphael and Veronese being lauded to the skies, with 
the manifest intention of diminishing the merit of those who came after them, . . . 
I ask myself if a merit which is at least the equal of theirs (I will even admit for a 
moment, and out of pure compliance, that it may be inferior) is not infinitely 
more meritorious, since it has triumphantly evolved in an atmosphere and a 
territory which are hostile to it." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 239 ("Salon de 
1859"). m Lukacs says that to make a decent table today, a man needs all the 
genius once required of Michelangelo to complete the dome of St. Peter's. 

[J39a,l] 

Baudelaire's attitude toward progress was not always the same. Certain declara- 
tions in the "Salon de 1846" contrast clearly with remarks made later. In that 
essay we find, among other things: "ITiere are as many kinds of beauty as there 
are habitual ways of seeking happiness. This is clearly explained by the philoso- 
phy of progress. . . . Romanticism will not consist in a perfect execution, but in a 
conception analogous to the ethical disposition of the age" (p. 66). In the same 
text: "Delacroix is the latest expression of progress in art" (p. 85). Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 2. 192 [J39a,2] 



The importance of theory for artistic creation was not something about which 
Baudelaire was clear, initially. In the "Salon de 1845," discussing the painter 
Haussoullier, he asks: "Is M. Haussoullier perhaps one of those who know too 
much about their art? That is a truly dangerous scourge." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 23.™ [J39a,3] 

A critique of the idea of progress, such as may become necessary in connection 
with a presentation of Baudelaire, must take great care to differentiate itself from 
the latter's own critique of progress. This applies still more unconditionally to 
Baudelaire's critique of the nineteenth century and to that entailed by his biogra- 
phy. It is a mark of the warped and crassly ignorant portrait of Baudelaire drawn 
by Peter Klassen that the poet should appear against the background of a century 
painted in the colors of Geheima. The only thing in this century really worthy of 
praise, in the author's view, is a certain clerical practice — namely, that moment 
"when, in token of the reestablished kingdom of the grace of God, the Holy of 
Holies was carried through the streets of Paris in an entourage of shining arma- 
ments. This will have been an experience decisive, because fundamental, for his 
entire existence." So begins this presentation of the poet framed in the depraved 
categories of the George circle. Peter Klassen, Baudelaire (VNcimar <1931>), p. 9. 

[J39a,4] 

Gauloiserie in Baudelaire: "lb organize a grand conspiracy for the extermination 
of the Jewish race. / The Jews who are librarians and bear witness to the Redemp- 
tion." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 666 ("Mon Coeur mis a nu"). 1!M Celine has 
continued along these lines. (Cheerful assassins!) [J40,l] 

"More military metaphors: 'The poets of combat.' 'The vanguard of literatnre.' 
This weakness for military metaphors is a sign of natures that are not themselves 
militant, hut are made for discipline — that is to say, for conformity. Natures 
congenitally domestic, Belgian natures that can think only in unison." Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 654 ("Mon Coeur- mis a nu"). 1 ' 5 [J40.2] 

"If a poet demanded from the state the right to keep a few bourgeois in his stable, 
people would he very surprised; whereas if a bourgeois demanded a roast poet, 
people would find this quite natural." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 635 

("Fusees"). 1 '* [J40.3] 

"This hook is not made formy wives, my daughters, or my sisters. — I have little to 
do with snch things." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 635 ("Fusees"). 197 [J40.4] 

Baudelaire's estrangement from the age: "Tell me in what salon, in what tavern, 
in what social or intimate gathering you have heard a single witty remark uttered 
by a spoiled child [compare p. 217: "Tbe artist is today . . . but a spoiled child"] a 
profound remark, to make one ponder or dream . . . ? If such a remark has been 
tlirown out, it may indeed have been not by a politician or a philosopher, but by 



someone of an outlandish profession, like a hunter, a sailor, or a taxidermist. But 
by an artist . . . , never." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 217 ("Salon de 1859"). This is 
a sort of evocation of the "amazing travelers." 198 [ J40,5] 

Gauloiserie in Baudelaire: "In its most widely accepted sense, the word 'French- 
man' means vaudevilliste. . . . Everything that towers or plunges, above or below 
him, causes him prudently to take to his heels. The sublime always affects him like 
a riot, and he opens his Moliere only in fear and trembling — and because someone 
has persuaded him that Moliere is an amusing author." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. Ill ("Salon de 1846: DeM. Horace Vernet"). 199 [J40.6] 

Baudelaire knows, in the "Salon de 1846," "the fatal law of propensities." Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 2 , p . 114. 2 "" [ J40,7] 

Re the title Les Limbes <Limbo>, compare the passage f rom the "Salon de 1846" on 
Delacroix's painting Women of Algiers: "This little poem of an interior . . . seems 
somehow to exhale the heady scent of a house of ill repute, which quickly enough 
guides our thoughts toward the fathomless limbo of sadness." Ch. B., Oeuvres, 
vol. 2, p. 85. 2U1 [J40.8] 

Apropos a depiction of Samson by Decamps, in the "Salon de 1845": "Samson, 
that ancient cousin of Hercules and Baron von Miinchhausen." Ch. B., Oeuvres, 
vol. 2, p. 24. 2 " 2 [J40a,l] 

"Thus, France was diverted from its natural course, as Baudelaire has shown, to 
become a vehicle of the despiritualization — the 'bestialization' — of folk and 
state." Peter Klassen, Baudelaire (Weimar <1931>), p. 33. [J40a,2] 

Closing line of La Legende des siecles, part 3, section 38 ("Un Homme aux yeux 
profonds passait"): "0 scholar of abyssal things alone!" Victor Hugo, Oeuvres 
completes, Poesie, vol. 9 (Paris, 1883), p. 229. [J40a,3] 

"The boulder with the pensive profile." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, Poesie, 
vol. 9 (Paris, 1883), p. 191 (Le Groupe des idylles, no. 12, "Dante"). [J40a,4] 

Crouching on the summit, the grim sphinx Nature dreams, 
Petrifying with its abyss-gaze 

The magus used to wondrous flights, 
The studious group of pale Zoroastrians, 
Sun-gazers and scanners of the stars, 

The dazzled, the astounded. 



The night revolves in riot 'round the sphinx. 
If we could once lift up its monstrous paw, 
So fascinating to the mind of yesteryear 
(Newton just as much as ancient Hermes), 



Underneath that dark and fatal claw 
We'd find this one word: Love. 



"Man deceives himself! He sees how dark all is for him." Victor Hugo, La Legende 
des siecles, part 3 ("Tenebres"), in Oeuvres completes, Poesie, vol. 9 (Paris, 
1883), pp. 164-165. Ending of the poem. [J40a,5] 

Euding of "La nuit! La nuit! La nuit!" <Night! Night! Night!>: 

O sepulchers! I hear the fearful organ of the shadow, 
Formed from all the cries of somber nature 

And the crash of rocky reefs; 
Death plays the clavier resounding through the branches, 
And the keys, now black, now white, are all 

Your tombstones and your biers. 

Victor Hugo, La Legende des siecles, part 3 ("Tenebres"), in Oeuvres completes, 
Poesie, vol. 9 (Paris, 1883), p. 161. [J40a,6] 

In La Legende des siecles <The Legend of the Ages>, part 3, poems like "Les 
Chutes : Fleuves et poetes" <The Falls: Rivers and Poets> and "Desinteressement" 
<Disinterestedness> — the one devoted to the torrents of the Rhine, the other to 
Mont Blanc — provide an especially vigorous idea of the perception of nature in 
the nineteenth century. In these poems we find the allegorical mode of vision 
uniquely interfused with the spirit of the vignette. [ J40a,7] 

From Theodore de Banville, Mes Souvenirs (Paris, 1882), ch. 7 ("Charles Baude- 
laire"). Their first meeting: "Night had come — luminous soft enchantress. We had 
left the Luxembourg and were walking along the outer boulevards, through streets 
whose movement and mysterious tumult the poet of Les Fleurs du mal had always 
so attentively cherished. Privat d'Anglemont walked a little apart from us, in 
silence" (p. 77). [J41.1] 

From Theodore de Banville, Mes Souvenirs (Paris, 1882): "I no longer recall 
which African country it was in which he was put up by a family to whom his 
parents had sent him. At any rate, he quickly became bored with the conventional 
manners of his hosts, and took off hy himself for a mountain to live with a tall 
young woman of color who understood no French, and who cooked him strangely 
spiced ragouts in a burnished copper cauldron, around which some naked little 
black children were dancing and howling. Oh, hut those ragouts! How well he 
conjured them up, and how one would have loved to try them!" (p. 79). [J41,2] 

"In his lodgings at the Hotel Pimodan, when I went there for the first time to visit 
him, there were no dictionaries, no separate study — not even a table with ivriting 
materials; nor was there a sidehoard or a separate dining room, or anything else 
resemhling the decor of a bourgeois apartment." Theodore de Banville, Mes Son- 
vetiirs (Paris, 1882), pp. 81-82. [J41,3] 



On Joseph tie Maistre: "To the pretensions and the insolence of metaphysics, he 
responded with the historical." J. Barbey d'Aurevilly, Joseph de Maistre, Blanc 
de Saint-Bonnet, Lacordaire, Gratry, Caro (Paris, 1910), p. 9. [J41,4] 

"Some, like Baudelaire, . . . identified the demon, staggered but reoriented them- 
selves, and once more honored God. It would nonetheless be unjust to expect from 
these precursors a surrender of the human faculties as complete as that required, 
for example, in the sort of mysterious dawn it seems we have begun to live at 
present." Stanislas Fumet, Notre Baudelaire [series entitled he Roseau d'or, vol. 
8] (Paris, 1926), p. iii. [ J41,5] 

"This great poetic success thus represents — if we add to these 1,500 copies the 
print-run of 1,000, plus the overruns from the first edition — a sum total of 2,790 
copies maximum in circulation. What other poet of our day, except Victor Hugo, 
could boast of such a demand for his work?" A. de la Fineliere and Georges 
Descaux, Charles Baudelaire [series entitled Essais de bibliographic contempo- 
raine, vol. 1] (Paris, 1868). Note on the second edition of Les Fleurs du mal. 

[J41.6] 

Poe: "Cyrano de Bergerac become a pupil of the astronomer Arago" — Journal des 
Goncourt, July 16, 1856. 203 — "If Edgar Poe dethroned Walter Scott and Merimee, 
if realism and bohemianism triumphed all down the line, if certain poems about 
which I have nothing to say (for fairness bids me be silent) were taken seriously by 
. . . honest and well-intentioned men, then this would no longer he decadence but 
an orgy." Pontmartin, he Spectateur, September 19, 1857; cited in Leon Lemon- 
nier, Edgar Poe et la critique franqaise de 1845 a 1875 (Paris, 1928), pp. 187, 214. 

[J41a,l] 

On allegory: "Limp arms, like weapons dropped by one who flees." 20 ' [ J41a,2] 

Swinburne appropriates for himself the thesis that art has nothing to do with 
morality. [J41a,3] 

"Les Fleurs du mal are a cathedral." Ernest Raynaud, Ch. Baudelaire (Paris, 
1922), p. 305 (citing Gonzague de Reynold, Charles Baudelaire). [J41a,4] 

"Baudelaire frets and torments himself in producing the least word. . . . For him, 
art 'is a duel in which the artist shrieks with terror before being overcome.'" 2115 
Ernest Raynaud, Ch. Baudelaire (Paris, 1922), pp. 317-318. [ J41a,5] 

Raynaud recognizes the incompatibility of Baudelaire and Gautier. He devotes a 
long chapter to this (pp. 310-345). [J41a,6] 



"Baudelaire submitted to the requirements of . . . buccaneer editors who ex- 
ploited the vanity of socialites, amateurs, and novices, and accepted manuscripts 



only if one took out a subscription." Ernest Raynaud, Ch. Baudelaire (Paris, 
1922), p. 319. Baudelaire's own conduct is the complement of this state of affairs. 
He would offer the same manuscript to several different journals and authorize 
reprints without acknowledging them as such. [J41a,7] 

Baudelaire's essay of 1859 on Gautier: "Gautier . . . could not have misinterpreted 
the piece. This is made clear by the fact that, in writing the preface to the 1863 
edition of Les Fleurs du mal, he wittily repaid Baudelaire for his essay." Ernest 
Raynaud, Ch. Baudelaire (Paris, 1922), p. 323. [J41a,8] 

"In other respects, what witnesses most tellingly to the evil spell of those times is 
the story of Balzac, . . . who . . . all his life fairly cudgeled his brains to master a 
style, without ever attaining one. . . . [Note:] The discordancy of those times is 
underscored by the fact that the prisons of La Roquette and Mazas were built with 
the same gusto with which Liberty Trees were planted everywhere. Bonapartist 
propaganada was harshly suppressed, but the ashes of Napoleon were brought 
home. . . . The center of Paris was cleared and its streets were opened up, but the 
city was strangled with a belt of fortifications." Ernest Raynaud, Ch. Baudelaire 
(Paris, 1922), pp. 287-288. [J41a,9] 

After referring to the marriage of ancient Olympus with the wood sprites and 
fairies of Banville: "For his part, little wishing to join the ever-swelling procession 
of imitators on the high road of Romanticism, Charles Baudelaire looked about 
him for a path to originality. . . . Where to cast his lot? Great was his indeci- 
sion. . . . Then he noticed that Christ, Jehovah, Mary, Mary Magdalene, the an- 
gels, and 'their phalanxes' all occupied a place in this poetry, but that Satan never 
appeared in it. An error in logic; he resolved to correct this. . . . Victor Hugo had 
made la diablerie a fantastic setting for some ancient legends. Baudelaire, in con- 
trast, actually incarcerated modern man — the man of the nineteenth century — in 
the prison of hell." Alcide Dusolier, Nos Gens de lettres (Paris, 1864), pp. 105-106 
("M. Charles Baudelaire"). 

[J42.1] 

"He certainly would have made an excellent reporter for die witchcraft trials." 
Alcide Dusolier, Nos Gem de lettres (Paris, 1864), p. 109 ("M. Ch. B."). Baudelaire 
must have enjoyed reading that. [ J42,2] 

With Dusolier, considerable insight into details, but total absence of any perspec- 
tive on the whole: "Obscene mysticism, or, if you prefer, mystical obscenity — 
here, I have said and I repeat, is the double character of Les Fleurs du mal." Alcide 
Dusolier, Nos Gens de lettres (Paris, 1864), p. 1 12. [ J42,3] 

"We would reserve nothing, not even praise. I attest then to the presence, in 
M. Baudelaire's poetic gallery, of certain tableaux parisiens (I would have pre- 
ferred eaux-fortes <etchings> as a more accurate and more characteristic term) 



possessing great vigor and marvelous precision." Alcide Dusolier, ISos Gens de 
lettres (Paris, 1864), pp. 112-113 ("Meryon"). [ J42,4] 

There is a reference in Dusolier, apropos of "Femmes damnees," to La Religieuse 
<The Nun> — but Diderot is not mentioned. [J42,5] 

A further judgment from Dusolier (p. 114); "But can one say, 'Here is a poet'? 
^es, if a rhetor were an orator." The legend about the relation between verse and 
prose in Baudelaire goes back to Dusolier. Shock! [J42,6] 

Closing words: "If I had to sum up in a phrase what Baudelaire is by nature and 
what he would like to persuade us that he is, I would say without any hesitation: he 
is a hysterical Boileau. / May 6, 1863." Alcide Dusolier, Nos Gens de lettres 
(Paris, 1864), p. 119. [J42,7] 

Baudelaire's horoscope, prepared for Raynaud by Paul Flambart: "The psycho- 
logical enigma of Baudelaire is seen almost entirely in this alliance of two things 
ordinarily the least suited to being linked together: a wonderfully fluent poetic 
gift and a crushing pessimism." Ernest Raynaud, Ch. Baudelaire (Paris, 1922), 
p. 54. The Baudelairean psychological antinomy in its tritest formulation. 

[J42.8] 

"Is this to say that we must necessarily assimilate Baudelaire to Dante, as M. de 
Reynold, following the lead of Ernest Raynaud, has done? If it is a question of 
poetic genius, surely admiration . . . can go no further. If it is a question of philo- 
sophical tendency, I would merely remark that Dante . . . , well in advance of his 
time, introduces into his work ideas that are already quite modern, as Lamennais 
has nicely demonstrated, whereas Baudelaire . . . gives full expression to the spirit 
of the Middle Ages and is, accordingly, behind the times. Thus, if the truth be told, 
far from continuing Dante, he differs from him altogether." Paul Souday, "Gon- 
zague de Reynold's Charles Baudelaire'''' (Les Temps, April 21, 1921, "Les 
Livves"). [J42a,l] 

"New editions of Les Fleurs du mal have been announced or are starting to ap- 
pear. Up to now there have been only two on the market, one for six francs, the 
other for three francs fifty. And now one at twenty sous." Paul Souday, "Le Cin- 
quantenaire de Baudelaire" (Le Temps, June 4>, 1917). 2 " r ' [ J42a,2] 

According to Souday — in a review of Baudelaire's letters (Le Temps, August 17, 
1917) — Baudelaire earned a total of 15,000 francs in twenty-five years. [J42a,3] 

"These sturdy ships, with their air of idleness and nostalgia." 20 ' [J42a,4] 



Thesis of Paul Desjardins: "Baudelaire is lacking in verve — that is to say, he has 
no ideas hut only sensations." Paul Desjardins, "Charles Baudelaire," Revue 
bleue (Paris, 1887), p. 22. [J42a,5] 



"Baudelaire does not give us a lifelike representation of objects; he is more con- 
cerned to steep the image in memory than to embellish or portray it." Paul Des- 
jardins, "Charles Baudelaire," Revue bleue (Paris, 1887), p. 23. [J42a,6] 



Souday tries to dismiss the Christian velleities of Baudelaire with a reference to 
Pascal. [J42a,7] 

Kafka says: dependency keeps you young. [J42a,8] 

"Tliis sensation is then renewed ad infinitum through astonishment. . . . All of a 
sudden, Baudelaire draws hack from what is most familiar to him and eyes it in 
horror. . . . He draivs bach from himself; he looks upon himself as something quite 
new and prodigiously interesting, although a little unclean: 'Lord give me strength 
and courage to behold / My body and my heart without disgust!"' 208 Paul Des- 
jardins, "Charles Baudelaire," Revue bleue (Paris, 1887), p. 18. [J42a,9] 

Baudelaire's fatalism: "At the time of the coup d'etat in December, he felt a sense 
of outrage. 'What a disgrace!' he cried at first; then he came to see things 'from a 
providential perspective' and resigned himself like a monk." Desjardins, "Charles 
Baudelaire," Revue bleue (1887), p. 19. [J42a,10] 

Baudelaire — according to Desjardins — unites the sensibility of the Marquis de 
Sade with the doctrines of Jansenius. [ J43.1] 

"True civilization . . . has nothing to do with . . . table-turning" 209 — an allusion to 
Hugo. [J43.2] 

"Que diras-tu ce soir . . ." <What Will You Say Tonight . . .> invoked as the poem 
of a "man in whom a decided aptitude for the most arduous speculations did not 
exclude a poetry that was solid, warm, colorful, essentially original and humane." 
Charles Barhara, L'Assassinat du Pont-Rouge (Paris, 1859), p. 79 (the sonnet, 
pp. 82-83). [J43.3] 

Barres: "In him the simplest word betrays the effort by which he attained so high 
a level." Cited in Gide, "Baudelaire et M. Faguet," ISouvelle Revue franqaise 
(Novemher 1, 1910), p. 513. 210 [J43,4] 

"A phrase of Brunetiere's is even more to our purpose: '. . . He lacks animation 
and imagination.' . . . Agreed that he lacks animation and imagination. . . . The 
question arises (since, after all, we do have Les Fleurs du mal) whether it is indeed 
essentially the imagination which makes the poet; or, since MM. Faguet and 
Brunetiere certainly are in favor of giving the name of poetry to a kind of versified 
oratory, whether we would not do well to hail Baudelaire as something other and 
more than a poet: the first artist in poetry." Andre Gide, "Baudelaire et 
M. Faguet," Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 2 (Novemher 1, 1910), pp. 513-514. Gide 



quotes, in connection with this, Baudelaire's formula, "The imagination, that 
queen of the faculties," and concedes that the poet was unaware of the true state of 
affairs (p. 517). 2 " [J43.5] 



"The seeming inappropriateness of terms, which will irritate some critics so much, 
that skillful impreciseness of which Racine already made such masterly use, . . . 
that air-space, that interval, hetween image and idea, hetween the word and the 
thing, is just where there is room for the poetic emotion to come and dwell." 
A. Gide, "Baudelaire et M. Faguet," Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 2 (Novemher 1, 
1910), p. 512. 212 [J43,6] 



"Enduring fame is promised only to those writers who can offer to successive 
generations a nourishment constantly renewed; for every generation arrives on 
the scene with its own particular hunger." A. Gide, "Baudelaire et M. Faguet," 
Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 2 (November 1, 1910), p. 503. 213 [J43.7] 



Faguet complains of the lack of movement in Baudelaire, and Gide, making refer- 
ence to Baudelaire's "I hate all movement" and to the iterative poems, remarks: 
"As if the greatest novelty of his art had not heen to immobilize his poems, to 
develop them in depth!" Gide, "Baudelaire et M. Faguet," Nouvelle Revue 
franqaise, 2 (November 1, 1910), pp. 507, 508. 21 1 [J43.8] 

Of the line, "Limp arms ..." Proust says, in the preface to <Paul Morand,> 
Tendres Stocks <Paris, 1921>, p. 15, that it sounds like something from Racine's 
Britannicus™ — The heraldic character of the image! [J43a,l] 

Very astute judgment by Proust on Sainte-Beuve's behavior toward Baudelaire, 
in the preface to Tendres Stocks. 216 [J43a,2] 



Of those "tunes . . . granting a kind of glory to the crowd," Proust remarks (<"A 
Propos de Baudelaire," Nouvelle Revue franqaise [June 1, 1921], > p. 646): "It 
would seem impossible to better that." 217 [ J43a,3] 



"I have not had time to speak here of the part played in Baudelaire's work hy 
ancient cities, or of the scarlet note they strike, here and there, in the fabric of his 
poetry." Marcel Proust, "A Propos de Baudelaire," Nouvelle Revue franqaise 
(June 1, 1921), p. 656. 218 [J43a,4] 



Proust thinks that the concluding lines of both <Racine's> Andromache and 
<Baudelaire's> "Le Voyage" fall Hat. He is offended hy the extreme simplicity of 
these endings. 2W [J43a,5] 



"A capital is not wholly necessary to man." Senancour, Oberrnann, ed. Fasquelle 
(Paris <1901>), p. 248. 22 " [J43a,6] 



"He was the first ... to show the woman in her bedroom, in the midst not only of 
her jewels and perfumes, but of her makeup, her linens, her dresses, trying to 
decide if she prefers a scalloped hem or a straight hem. He compares her ... to 
animals — to the elephant, the monkey, and the snake." John Charpentier, "La 
Poesie britannique et Baudelaire," Mercure de France, 147 (May 1, 1921), p. 673. 

[J43a,7] 

On allegory: "His greatest glory, wrote Theophile Gautier [in the preface to the 
1863 edition of Les Fleurs du mal], 'will he to have introduced into the realm of 
stylistic possibilities whole classes of objects, sensations, and effects left unnamed 
by Adam, the great nomenclator.' He names . . . the hopes and regrets, the curiosi- 
ties and fears, that seethe in the darkness of the inner world." John Charpentier, 
"La Poesie britannique et Baudelaire," Mercure de France, 14 7 (May 1, 1921), 
p. 674. [J43a,8] 

"L'Invitation au voyage," translated into Russian by Merezhkovski, became a 
gypsy romance entitled "Holubka mo'ia." ( J43a,9] 

In connection with "L'Irremediable," Crepet (Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Jacques 
Crepet [Paris, 1931], p. 449) cites the following passage from Les Soirees de Saint- 
Petersbourg: "That river which one crosses but once; that pitcher of the 
Danaides, alivays full and ahvays empty; that liver of Tityus, always regenerated 
under the beak of the vulture that alivays devours it anew, . . . — these are so many 
speaking hieroglyphs, about which it is impossible to be mistaken." 221 [ J43a,10] 

Letter to Calonne, director of La Revue contemporaine, on February 11, 1859: 
"The dance of death is not a person but an allegory. It seems to me that it should 
not he capitalized. An extremely well-known allegory." Les Fleurs du mal, ed. 
Crepet (Paris, 1931), p. 459. 222 [ J44.1] 

Regarding "L' Amour dumensonge" <Love of Deceit). From a letter to Alphonse de 
Calonne: "The word 'royal' will help the reader understand the metaphor, which 
transforms memory into a crown of towers, like those that weigh down the brows 
of the goddesses of maturity, of fertility, of tuisdom." Fleurs du mal, ed. Jacques 
Crepet (Paris, 1931), p. 461. 22i [J44,2] 

Planned cycle of poems "Oneirocritie" <Dream Interpretation): "Symptoms of 
ruin. Vast Pelasgic huildings, one on top of the other. Apartments, rooms, temples, 
galleries, stairways, caeca, belvederes, lanterns, fountains, statues. — Fissures 
and cracks. Dampness resulting from a reservoir situated near the sky. — How to 
warn people and nations'? Let us whisper warnings into the ears of the most intelli- 
gent. / High up, a column cracks and its two ends shift. Nothing has collapsed as 
yet. I can no longer find the way out. I go down, then climb back up. A tower. — 
Labyrinth. I never succeeded in leaving. I live forever in a building on the point of 
collapsing, a building undermined by a secret malady. — I reckon up in my mind, 



to amuse myself, whether such a prodigious mass of stones, marble blocks, stat- 
ues, and walls, which are all about to collide with one another, will be greatly 
sullied by that multitude of brains, human flesh, and shattered bones. — I see such 
terrible things in my dreams that sometimes I wish I could sleep no more, if only I 
could he sure of not becoming too weary." Nadar, Charles Baudelaire intime 
(Paris, 1911), pp. 136-137 [<Baudelaire, Oeuvres,> ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, 
p. 696]. 22 ' 1 [J44,3] 

Proust on "Le Balcon": "Many of the lines in Baudelaire's 'Le Balcon' convey a 
similar impression of mystery" (p. 644). This in contrast to Hugo: "Victor Hugo 
always does wonderfully what he has to do. . . . But the fabricating — even when it 
is a fabricating of the impalpable — is always visible." Marcel Proust, "A Propos 
de Baudelaire," Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 16 (Paris, 1921), pp. 643-644. 225 

[J44,4] 

On the iterative poems: "The world of Baudelaire is a strange sectioning of time in 
which only the red-letter days can appear. This explains such frequent expressions 
as 'If some evening,' and so on." M. Pronst, "A Propos de Baudelaire," Nouvelle 
Revue franqaise, 16 (June 1, 1921), p. 652. 226 [J44,5] 

Meryon's letter of March 31, 1860, to Nadar: he does not wish to be photographed 
by him. [J44,6] 

"As to Baudelaire's 'stage properties' — . . . they might provide a useful lesson for 
those elegant ladies of the past twenty years, who . . . would do well to consider, 
when they contemplate the alleged purity of style which they have achieved with 
such infinite trouble, that a man may be the greatest and most artistic of writers, 
yet describe nothing but beds with 'adjustable curtains' ('Pieces condamnees'), 
halls like conservatories ('Une Martyre'), beds filled with subtle scents, sofas deep 
as tombs, whatnots loaded with flowers, lamps burning so briefly ('Pieces condam- 
nees') that the only light comes from the coal fire. Baudelaire's world is a place to 
which, at rare moments, a perfumed breeze from the outer air brings refreshment 
and a sense of magic, . . . thanks to those porticoes . . . 'open onto unknown skies' 
('La Mort'), or 'wliich the suns of the sea tinged with a thousand fires' ('La Vie 
anterieure')." M. Proust, "A Propos de Baudelaire," Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 
16 (June 1, 1921), p. 652. 227 [J44a,l] 

On the "Pieces condamnees": "They take their place once more among the grand- 
est poems in the book, like those crystal-clear waves that heave majestically after 
a night of storm, and, by interposing their crests between the spectator and the 
immense sweep of the ocean, give a sense of space and distance to the view." 
Proust, "A Propos de Baudelaire," Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 16 (June 1, 1921), 
p. 655. 22 " [J44a,2] 



"How did he come to be so interested in lesbians . . . ? When Vigny, raging against 
women, thought to lind the explanation of the mystciry of their sex in the fact that 



women give suck . . . , in their psychology ('Always the companion whose heart is 
untrue'), it is easy to see why, in his frustrated and jealous passion, he could write: 
'Woman will have Gomorrah, and Man will have Sodom . ' But he does, at least, see 
the two sexes at odds, facing each other as enemies across a great gulf. . . . But this 
did not hold true of Baudelaire. . . . This 'connection' between Sodom and Go- 
morrah is what, in the final section of my novel, . . . I have shown in the person of 
a brutish creature, Charles Morel (it is usually to brutish creatures that this part 
is allotted). But it would seem that Baudelaire cast himself for it, and looked on the 
role as a privilege. It would be intensely interesting to know why he chose to 
assume it, and how well he acquitted himself. What is comprehensible in a Charles 
Morel becomes profoundly mysterious in the author of Les Fleurs du mal. " Marcel 
Proust, "A Propos de Baudelaire," ISouvelle Revue frangaise, 16 (June 1, 1921), 
pp. 655-656. 22 '' [J44a,3] 

Louis Menard — who, under the pseudonym Louis de Senneville, had published 
Frometh.ee delivre <Prometheus Unbound) — in La Revue philosophique et re- 
ligieuse of September 1857 (cited in Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Crepet [Paris, 1930], 
pp. 362-363): "Though he talks incessantly of the vermin and scorpions in his soul 
and takes himself for the avatar of all vices, it is easy to see that his principal 
defect is an overly libertine imagination — a defect all too common among those 
erudite persons who have passed their youth in seclusion. . . . Let him enter into 
the community of human life, and he will be able to find a characteristically ele- 
vated form for vihrant, wholesome creations. He will he a paterfamilias and will 
publish books of the sort that could be read to his children. Until then, he will 
remain a schoolboy of 1828, suffering from what Geoffroy Saint-Hilaire calls ar- 
rested development." [J45,l] 

From the summation delivered by M. Pinard: "I portray evil with its intoxica- 
tions, you say, but also with its miseries and shames. So be it. But what of all those 
many readers for whom you write (for you publish thousands of copies of your 
book, and at a low price) those numerous readers of every class, age, and condi- 
tion? Will they take the antidote of which you speak with such complacency?" 
Cited in Les Fleurs du mal, cd. Crepet (Paris, 1930), p. 334. [J45,2] 

An article by Louis Goudall in Le Figaro of November 4, 1855, opens the way for 
criticisms of "university pedants." Goudall writes, after the publication of poems 
in La Revue des deux mondes: "After the fading of his surprise celebrity, Baudelaire 
will be associated exclusively with the withered fruits of contemporary poetry." 
Cited in Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Crepet (Paris, 1930), p. 306. [J45.3] 

In 1850, Asselineau saw Baudelaire with a copy of the poems inscribed by a callig- 
rapher and bound in two gilded quarto volumes. [J45,4] 



Crepet (Fleurs du mal, ed. Crepet, p. 300) says that, around 1846, many of 
Baudelaire's friends knew his poems by heart. Only three of the poems had been 
published at that point. [J45,5] 



May 1852: "Les Limbes <Limbo>: intimate poems of Georges Durant, collected and 
published by bis friend Th. Veron." [J45,6] 



Announcing Les Limbes in the second issue of L'Echo des marchands devin: "Les 
Limbes: poems by Charles Baudelaire. The book will be published on February 
24, 1849, in Paris and Leipzig." [J45.7] 

Leconte de Lisle in La Revue europeenne of December 1, 1861. Among other 
things, he speaks of "that strange mania for dressing up the discoveries of mod- 
ern industry in bad verse." He refers to Baudelaire's oeuvre as "stamped with the 
vigorous seal of long meditation. "The Inferno plays a big part in his review. Cited 
in Les Fleurs du mal, ed. Crepet, pp. 385, 386. [ J45a,l] 

Swinburne's article in The Spectator of September 6, 1862. The author was 
twenty-live years old at the time. [ J45a,2] 

Paris, for Gonzague de Reynold, as "antechamber to the Baudelairean Hell." 
Turn to the second chapter, "La Vision de Paris," in part 2 (entitled "L'Art et 
l'oeuvre") of his book Charles Baudelaire (Paris and Geneva, 1920), and you find 
nothing but a longwinded, subaltern paraphrase of certain poems. [ J45a,3] 

Villon and Baudelaire: "In the one, we find the mystical and macabre Christianity 
of an age in the process of losing its faith; in the other, the more or less secularized 
Christianity of an age seeking to recover its faith." Gonzague de Reynold, Charles 
Baudehire (Paris and Geneva, 1920), p. 220. [J45a,4] 

Reynold draws a schematic parallel between the fifteenth and the nineteenth cen- 
turies as periods of decadence, in which an extreme realism prevails alongside an 
extreme idealism, together with unrest, pessimism, and egoism. [ J45a,5] 

Imitatio Christi, book 1, paragraph 20, "De amore solitudinus et silentii": "Quid 
potes alibi videre, quod hie non vides? Ecce caelum et terra et omnia elemental 
nam ex istis omnia sunt facta." 230 [J45a,6] 

Mallarme, in the opening piece of Divagations, "Formerly, in the margins of a 
Baudelaire": "This torrent of tears illuminated by the bengal light of the artificer 
Satan, who comes from behind." Stephane Mallarme, Divagations (Paris, 1897), 
p. 60. [J45a,7] 

December 4, 1847: "After New Year's Day, I am starting a new kind of writing, . . . 
the Novel. It is not necessary for me to point out to you the gravity, the beauty, and 
the infinite possibilities of that art." Ch<arles> B<audelaire>, Lettres a sa mere 
(Paris, 1932), p. 26. 2:il [J45a,8] 



December 8, 1848: "Another reason I would be happy if you were able to comply 
with my request is that I very much fear a revolutionary uprising, and nothing is 



more deplorable than to be utterly without money at such a time." Ch. B., Lettres 
a sa mere (Paris, 1932), p. 33. 232 [J45a,9] 

"From the end of the Second Empire down to our own day, the evolution in 
philosophy and the blooming of Les Fleurs du mal have been concomitant. This 
explains the peculiar destiny of a work whose fundamental parts, though still 
enveloped in shadow, are becoming clearer with every passing day." Alfred Capus, 
Le Gaulois, 1921 (cited in Les Fleurs dumal, ed. Crepet [Paris, 1931], p. 50). 

[J46.1] 

On March 27, 1852, he mentions to his mother some "sickly articles, hastily writ- 
ten." (Charles Baudelaire,> Lettres a sa mere (Paris, 1932), p. 39. 233 [ J46.2] 

March 27, 1852: "To beget children is the only thing which gives moral intelligence 
to the female. As for young women without status and without children, they show 
nothing but coquetry, implacability, and elegant debauchery." Lettres m. sa mere 
(Paris, 1932), p. 43. 2:i ' 1 [J46,3] 

In a letter to his mother, Baudelaire refers to the reading room, in addition to the 
cafe, as a refuge in which to work. [ J46,4] 

December 4, 1854: "Should I resign myself to going to bed and staying there for 
lack of clothes?" Lettres a sa mere (Paris, 1932), p. 74. 235 (On p. 191, he asks for 
the loan of some handkerchiefs.) [J46,5] 

December 20, 1855, after toying with the idea of petitioning for a subvention: 
"Never will my name appear on filthy government paper." Lettres a sa mere, 
p. 83. 23f ' [J46.6] 

Problematic passage from a letter of July 9, 1857, concerning Les Fleurs du mal: 
"Moreover, alarmed myself by the horror I was going to inspire, I cut out a third of 
it at the proof stage." Lettres a sa mere, p. 110. 2 ' !7 [J46,7] 

Spleen de Paris appears for a time, in 1857 (see p. Ill, letter of July 9, 1857), to 
have had the title Poemes nocturnes. [J46,8] 

Planned essay (Lettres a. sa mere, p. 139) on Machiavelli and Condorcet. [ J46.9] 

May 6, 1861: '"And what about God!' you will say. I wish with all my heart (with 
what sincerity I alone can know) to believe that an exterior invisible being is 
concerned with my fate. But what can I do to make myself believe it?" Lettres a sa 
mere, p. 173. 2:i,i [J46.10] 



May 6, 1861: "I am forty years old and I cannot think of school without pain, any 
more than I can think of the fear which my stepfather inspired in me." Lettres a sa 
mere, p. 176. 2:w [J46a,l] 



July 10, 1861, on the planned cle luxe edition: "Where is the mama who will give 
Les Fleurs du mal as a present to her children? And where is the papa?" Lettres a 
sa mere, p. 186. [J46a,2] 

His eyes strained with working in the Louvre: "Two bloodshot goggle-eyes." Let- 
tres a sa mere, p. 191. [ J46a,3] 

On Les Miserables — August 11, 1862 : "The book is disgusting and clumsy. On this 
score, I've shown that I possess the art of lying." Lettres a sa mere, p. 212. 240 

[J46a,4] 

June 3, 1863. He speaks of Paris, "where I have been bored for months, as no one 
was ever bored before." Lettres a sa mere, p. 218. 241 [ J46a,5] 

Conclusion of "Crepuscule du soir": the muse herself, who turns away from the 
poet to whisper words of inspiration to the air. [ J46a,6] 

Baudelaire planned a "refutation of the preface to the life of Caesar hy Napo- 
leon III." [J46a,7] 

In a letter of May 4, 1865, Baudelaire mentions to his mother an "immensely long" 
article appearing in La Revue germanique. Lettres a sa mere, p. 260. 212 [J46a,8] 

March 5, 1866: "I like nothing so much as to be alone. But that is impossible; and 
it seems that the Baudelaire school exists." Lettres a sa mere, p. 301. 243 [J46a,9] 

December 23, 1865: "If I can ever regain the freshness and energy I've sometimes 
enjoyed, I'll assuage my wrath in horrible hooks. I'd like to set the entire human 
race against me. That offers a pleasure that could console me for everything." 
Lettres a sa mere, p. 278. 244 [ J46a,10] 

"As a man advances through life . . . , what the world has agreed to call 'beauty' 
loses much of its importance. . . . Henceforth beauty will be no more than the 
promise of happiness . . . . Beauty will he the form which promises the most kind- 
ness, the most loyalty to an oath, the most honesty in fulfilling a pledge, the most 
subtlety in understanding relationships" (p. 424). And a little further on, with 
reference to "L'Ecole paienne," to which these lines written in an album constitute 
a note: "How could I possihly succeed in convincing a young scatterhrain that no 
sensual desire is mingled with the irresistible sympathy I feel for old women — for 
those creatures who have suffered greatly through their lovers, their husbands, 
their children, and also through their own mistakes?" Ch. B., Oeuvres completes, 
ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, pp. 424-425. 2k '> [J47.1] 



"For some time, . . . it [has seemed] t o me that I am having a bad dream, that I am 
hurtling through space and that a multitude of wooden, golden, and silver idols 
are falling with me, tumbling after me, humping into me, and breaking my head 



and back." Ch. B., Oeuvres completes, vol. 2, pp. 420-421 ("L'Ecole 
pai'enne"). 240 Compare the anecdote about Baudelaire and the Mexican idol 
<J17a,2?>. [J47,2] 



Toward the end of the Second Empire, as the regime relaxes its pressure, the 
theory of / 'art pour I'art suffers a loss in prestige. [J47,3] 

From the argument of the Guys essay, it would appear that Baudelaire's fascina- 
tion with this artist was connected above all with his handling of backgrounds, 
which differs little from the handling of backgrounds in the theater. But because 
these pictures, unlike scenery on a stage, are to be viewed from close up, the 
magic of distance is canceled for the viewer without his having to renounce 
the judgment of distance. In the essay on Guys, Baudelaire has characterized the 
gaze which here and in other places he himself turns toward the distance. Baude- 
laire dwells on the expression of the oriental courtesan: "She directs her gaze at 
the horizon, like a beast of prey; the same wildness, the same indolent distrac- 
tion, and also at times the same fixity of attention." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 359. 247 [J47.4] 



In his poem L'Heautontimoroumenos" <The Self -Tormentor), Baudelaire himself 
speaks of his shrill voice. [J47,5] 

A decisive value is to be accorded Baudelaire's efforts to capture the gaze in 
which the magic of distance is extinguished. (Compare "L' Amour du men- 
songe.") Relevant here: my definition of the aura as the aura of distance opened 
up with the look that awakens in an object perceived. 248 [J47.6] 



The gaze in which the magic of distance is extinguished: "Let your eyes plunge 
into the fixed stare / of satyresses or water sprites" ("L'Avertisseur" <The Look- 
out)). 2 " [J47a,l] 



Among the prose poems planned but left unwritten is "La Fin du monde." Its basic 
theme is perhaps best indicated in the following passage from "Fusees," no. 22: 
"The world is about to come to an end. The only reason it should continue is that 
it exists. What a weak argument, compared with all the arguments to the contrary, 
and especially the following: 'What, in future, is the world to do in the sight of 
heaven?' For, supposing it continued to have material existence, would this exist- 
ence be worthy of the name, or of the Encyclopedia of History? . . . For my part, I 
who sometimes feel myself cast in the ridiculous role of prophet, I know that I shall 
never receive so much as a doctor's charity. Lost in this base world, jostled by the 
mob, I am like a weary man who sees behind him, in the depths of the years, only 
disillusionment and bitterness, and in front of him only a tempest that brings 
nothing new. ... I seem to have wandered off. . . . Nevertheless, I shall let these 
pages stand — because I wish to set an exact date to my anger." Ch. B., Oeuvres, 



vol. 2, pp. 639, 641-642. 25u — In the manuscript, there is a variant for the last 
word: "sadness." [J47a,2] 



The piece that begins, "The world is coming to an end" ("Fusees" no. 22), 
contains, interwoven with the apocalyptic reverie, a frightfully bitter critique of 
Second Empire society. (It reminds one here and there, perhaps, of Nietzsche's 
delineation of "the last man") This critique displays, in part, prophetic features. 
Of the coming society, it is said that "nothing in the sanguinary, blasphemous, or 
unnatural dreams of the Utopians can be compared to what will actually hap- 
pen. . . . Rulers will be compelled, in order to maintain their position and create a 
semblance of order, to resort to methods that would appall present-day mankind, 
hardened as it is. . . . Justice — if, in d)is fortunate epoch, any justice can still 
exist — will forbid the existence of citizens who are unable to make a fortune. . . . 
Those times are perhaps quite close at hand. Who knows whether they are not 
here already — whether it is not simply the coarsening of our natures that keeps 
us from noticing what sort of atmosphere we already breathe?" Ch. B., Oeuvres, 
vol. 2, pp. 640-641. 2r " [J47a,3] 

"The gist of it all, in the eyes of history and of the French people, is that Napo- 
leon Ill's great claim to renown will have been that he showed how anybody at all, 
if only he gets hold of the telegraph and the printing presses, can govern a great 
nation. Anyone who believes that such things can be done without the people's 
permission is an imbecile." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 655 ("Mon Coeur mis a nu," 
no. 44). 252 [J48.1] 

"A sense of solitude, since my childhood. Despite my family, and especially amid 
companions — a sense of an eternally lonely destiny." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 645 ("Mon Coeur mis a nu"). Mi [J48.2] 

"Truth, for all its multiplicity, is not two-faced." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 63 
("Salon de 1846: Aux Bourgeois"). 254 [ J48,3] 

"Allegory is one of the noblest genres of art." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 30 
("Salon de 1845"). 255 [J48.4] 

"The will must have become a highly developed and productive faculty to he able 
to give its stamp ... to works ... of the second rank. . . . The spectator enjoys the 
effort, and his eye drinks in the sweat." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, <p. 26> ("Salon de 
1845"). [J48.5] 

"The idea of progress. This dim heacon, an invention of contemporary philoso- 
phism, licensed without the sanction of Nature or God — this modern lantern casts 
dark shadows over every object of knowledge. Liberty vanishes; punishment dis- 
appears." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 148 ("Exposition Universale, 1855"). ' m 

[J48.6] 



"Stupidity is often the ornament of beauty. It is what gives to the eyes that gloomy 
limpidity of blackish pools and that oily calm of tropical seas." Ch. B., Oeuvres, 
vol. 2, p. 622 ("Choix de maximes consolantes sur l'amour"). 257 [ J48,7] 

"A last, general rule: in love, beware of the moon and the stars; beware of the 
Venus de Milo." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 624. ("Choix de maximes consolantes 
sur l'amour"). 258 [ J48.8] 

Baudelaire was always after the gist. His epoch forbade him to formulate it in 
such a way that its social bearing would become immediately intelligible. Where 
he sought in fact to make it comprehensible — in the essays on Dupont, as in the 
theoretical musings in a Christian vein — he instead lost sight of it. Nevertheless, 
the formulation he attains at one point in this context — "How much can you get 
for a lyre, at the pawnshop?" — gives apt expression to his insistence on an art 
that can prove itself before society. The sentence from Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 422 ("L'Ecole paienne"). 259 [J48,9] 

With regard to allegory: "What do you expect from heaven or from the stupidity of 
the public? Enough money to raise altars to Priapus and Bacchus in your attics? 
... I understand the rage of iconoclasts and of Muslims against images. I admit all 
the remorse of Saint Augustine for the too great pleasure of the eyes." Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 2, pp. 422, 423 ("L'Ecole paienne"). 2 "" [J48a,l] 

It belongs to the physiognomic profile of Baudelaire that he fosters the gestures of 
the poet at the expense of the professional insignia of the writer. In this, he is like 
the prostitute who cultivates her physiognomy as sexual object or as "beloved" in 
order to conceal her professional dealings. [J48a,2] 

If the poems of Les Epaves, in Proust's great image, 261 are the foamy wave crests in 
the ocean of Baudelairean poetry, then the poems of "Tableaux parisiens" are its 
safe harbor. In particular, these poems contain hardly any echo of the revolution- 
ary storms that were breaking over Paris. In this respect they resemble the poetry 
of Heym, composed forty years later, in which the corresponding state of affairs 
has now risen to consciousness while the "Marseillaise" has been interred. The 
last two tercets of the sonnet "Berlin III," which describes the sunset in Berlin in 
winter, read as follows: 

A paupers' graveyard upheaves black, stone after stone; 
The dead look out on the red sunset 
From their hole. It tastes like strong wine. 

They sit knitting all along the wall, 
Sooty caps on their naked temples, 
To the old attack song, the "Marseillaise." 



GeorgHeym, Dichtungen (Munich, 1922), p. 11. 



[J48a,3] 



A decisive line for the comparison with Blanqui: "When earth becomes a trick- 
ling dungeon" ("Spleen IV") , 262 [ J48a,4] 



The idea of the immobilization of nature appears, perhaps as refuge for the 
prescient imagination immediately before the war, in poems by Georg Heym, 
whose images the spleen of Baudelaire could not yet have touched: "But the seas 
congeal. On the waves / The ships hang rotting, morose." Georg Heym, Dich- 
tungen (Munich, 1922), p. 73 (collection entitled Umbra vitae). [J48a,5] 

It would be a big mistake to see in the theoretical positions on art taken by 
Baudelaire after 1852 — positions which differ so markedly from those of the 
period around 1848 — the fruits of a development. (There are not many artists 
whose work attests so little to a development as that of Baudelaire.) These 
positions represent theoretical extremes, of which the dialectical mediation is 
given by Baudelaire's whole oeuvre, without being entirely present to his con- 
scious reflection. The mediation resides in the destructive and purificatory char- 
acter of the work. This art is useful insofar as it destroys. Its destructive fury is 
directed not least at the fetishistic conception of art. Thus it serves "pure" art, in 
the sense of a purified art. [ J 4 9,1] 

The first poems of Les Flairs du mal are all devoted to the figure of the poet. From 
them it emerges, precisely insofar as the poet makes appeal to a station and a 
task, that society no longer has such things to confer. [ J49,2] 

An examination of those places where the "I" appears in the poems of Baudelaire 
might result in a possible classificatory grouping. In the first five poems of Les 
Flews du mal, it surfaces but a single time. And further on, it is not unusual to 
find poems in which the "I" does not occur. More essential — and, at the same 
time, more deliberate — is the way in other poems, like "Reversibilite" or "Har- 
monie du soir," it is kept in the background. [ J49,3] 

"La Belle Dorothee" — she must buy back her eleven-year-old sister. 263 [J49.4] 

"I assure you that the seconds are now strongly accented, and rush out of the clock 
crying, 'I am Life, unbearable and implacable Life!'" Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 1, 
p. 411 ("La Chambre double"). 251 [J49,5] 

From "Quelques mots d'introduction" to the "Salon de 1845": "And at the very 
outset, with reference to that impertinent designation, 'the bourgeois,' we beg to 
state that we in no way share the prejudices of our great confreres in the world of 
art, who for some years now have been striving their utmost to cast anathema upon 
that inoffensive being. . . . And, finally, the ranks of the artists themselves contain 
so many hourgeois that it is better, on the whole, to suppress a word which does not 
deline any particular vice of caste." Oeuvres, vol. 2, pp. 15-16. 2f,:j The same ten- 
dency in the preface, "Aux Bourgeois," of the "Salon de 1846." [J49,6] 



The figure of the lesbian woman belongs among Baudelaire's heroic exemplars. 
[He himself gives expression to this in the language of his satanism. It would be 
no less comprehensible in an unmetaphysical critical language.] The nineteenth 
century began openly and without reserve to include the woman in the process 
of commodity production. The theoreticians were united in their opinion that 
her specific femininity was thereby endangered; masculine traits must necessarily 
manifest themselves in women after a while. Baudelaire affirms these traits. At 
the same time, however, he seeks to free them from the domination of the 
economy. Hence the purely sexual accent which he comes to give this develop- 
mental tendency in woman. The paradigm of the lesbian woman bespeaks the 
ambivalent position of "modernity" vis-a-vis technological development. (What 
he could not forgive in George Sand, presumably, was her having profaned, 
through her humanitarian convictions, this image whose traits she bore. Baude- 
laire says that she was worse than Sade.) 26(i [ J49a,l] 

The concept of exclusive rights was not so widely accepted in Baudelaire's day as 
it is today. Baudelaire often republished his poems two or three times without 
having anyone take offense. He ran into difficulties with this only toward the end 
of his life, with the Petits Poemes en prose. [ J49a,2] 

From his seventeenth year, Baudelaire led the life of a <litterateur?>. One cannot 
say that he ever thought of himself as an "intellectual" or engaged himself on 
behalf of "the life of the mind." The registered trademark for artistic production 
had not yet been invented. (In this situation, moreover, his imperious need to 
distinguish himself and withdraw worked to his advantage.) He refused to go 
along with the defamation of the bourgeois, under the banner of which there was 
mobilized a solidarity of artists and men of letters that he considered suspect. 
Thus, in the "Musee classique du Bazar Bonne-Nouvelle" <Classical Museum of 
the Good-News Bazaao {Oeiwres, vol. 2, p. 61), he writes: "The bourgeois, who 
has few scientific notions, goes where the loud voice of the bourgeois artist 
directs him. — If this voice were suppressed, the grocer would carry E. Delacroix 
around in triumph. The grocer is a great thing, a divine being whom it is neces- 
sary to respect, homo bonae voluntatis!" 267 In more detail a year earlier, in the 
preface to the "Salon de 1845." [J49a,3] 

Baudelaire's eccentric individuality was a mask under which he tried to con- 
ceal — out of shame, you could say — the supra-individual necessity of his way of 
life and, to a certain extent, his life history. [J 50,1] 

To interrupt the course of the world — that was Baudelaire's deepest intention. 
The intention of Joshua. [Not so much the prophetic one: for he gave no thought 
to any sort of reform.] From this intention sprang his violence, his impatience, 
and his anger; from it, too, sprang the ever-renewed attempts to cut the world to 
the heart [or sing it to sleep]. In this intention he provided death with an accom- 
paniment: his encouragement of its work. [J50.2] 



Apropos of "Harmonie du soir" and other iterative poems: Baudelaire notes in 
Poe "repetitions of the same line or of several lines, insistent reiterations of 
phrases which simulate the obesssions of melancholy or of a fixed idea." "Notes 
nouvelles sur Edgar Poe," in ISouvelles Histoires extraordinaires (Paris <1886>), 
p. 22. 26 " Immobilization! [J50.3] 

"Lord give me strength and courage to behold / my body and my heart without 
disgust!" With this, juxtapose: "The dandy should aspire to be sublime, continu- 
ally. He should live and sleep in front of a mirror." Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 643 ("Mon 
Coenr mis a nn," no. 5). The lines of verse are from "Un Voyage a Cy there." 2 * 9 

[J50.4] 

The close of "La Destruction" (published in 1855 under the title "La Volupte"!) 
presents the image of petrified unrest. ("Was like a Medusa-shield, / image of 
petrified unrest" — Gottfried Keller, "Verlorenes Recht, verlorenes Gluck.") 

[J50.5] 

On "Le Voyage," opening stanza: the dream of distance belongs to childhood. 
The traveler has seen the far distant, but has lost the belief in distance. [ J50,6] 

Baudelaire — the melancholic, whose star pointed him into the distance. He didn't 
follow it, though. Images of distance appear [in his poems] only as islands loom- 
ing out of the sea of long ago, or the sea of Paris fog. These islands are seldom 
lacking in the Negress. And her violated body is the figure in which the distance 
lays itself at the feet of what Baudelaire found near: the Paris of the Second 
Empire. [J50.7] 

The eye growing dim at the moment of death is the 6V-phenomenon of expiring 
appearance <Schein>. [ J50,8] 

"Les Petites Vieilles" <The Little Old Women): "Their eyes . . . glint like holes 
where water sleeps at night." 27 ' [J50,9] 

Baudelaire's violent temper belongs together with his destructive animus. We get 
nearer the matter when we recognize here, too, in these bursts of anger, a 
"strange sectioning of time." 271 [J50a,l] 

Baudelaire, in his best passages, is occasionally coarse — never sonorous. His 
mode of expression at these points deviates as little from his experience as the 
gestures of a perfect prelate deviate from his person. [J50a,2] 

Although the general contours were by then already lost to view, the concept of 
allegory in the first third of the nineteenth century did not have the disconcerting 
quality that attaches to it today. In his review of Les Poesies de Joseph Delorme, in 
Le Globe of April 11, 1829, Charles Magnin brings together Victor Hugo and 



Sainte-Beuve with the words: "They both proceed almost continually by figures, 
allegories, symbols." <Cited in Charles Augustin Sainte-Beuve,> Vie, poesies et 
pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863), vol. 1, p. 295. [J50a,3] 

A comparison between Baudelaire and Sainte-Beuve can unfold only within the 
narrow confines of subject matter and poetic workmanship. For Sainte-Beuve 
was a genial and indeed cozy sort of author. Charles Magnin justly writes in Le 
Globe of April 11, 1829: "His spirit might cloud over for a while, but no sooner 
does it compose itself than a fund of natural benevolence rises to the surface." 
(Here, it is not the benevolence but the surface that is decisive.) "Without doubt, 
this is the source of that sympathy and indulgence which he inspires in us." 
<Cited in> Vie, poesies et pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863), vol. 1, p. 294. 

[J50a,4] 

Miserable sonnet by Sainte-Beuve (Les Consolations [Paris, 1863], pp. 262-263) : 
"I love Paris and its beautiful sunsets of autunm," with the closing lines : "And I 
depart, in my thoughts mingling / Paris with an Ithaca of beautiful sunsets." 

[J50a,5] 



Charles Magnin in his review of Les Poesies de Joseph Delorme, in Le Globe, April 
11, 1829: "Doubtless the alexandrine with a variable caesura calls for a stricter 
rhyme." <Cited in> Vie, poesies et pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863), vol. 1, 
p. 298. [J50a,6] 

Conception of the poet, according tojoseph Delorme: "The idea of consorting 
with elect beings who sing of their sorrows here below, the idea of groaning in 
harmony to their lead, came to him like a smile amid his suf ferings and lightened 
them a little." Vie, poesies et pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863), vol. 1, p. 16. 
The book has an epigraph from Obermann; this fact sets a limit to the influence 
which Obermann could have exercised on Baudelaire. [J51,l] 

Sainte-Beuve, notes Charles Magnin, half approving and half deploring, "de- 
lights in a certain crudity of expression, and abandons himself ... to a sort of 
linguistic shamelessness. . . . The harshest word, however shocking, is almost 
always the word he prefers." Le Globe, April 11, 1829, cited in Vie, poesies et 
pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863), vol. 1, p. 296. Close on this (p. 297), 
Magnin reproaches the poet for having presented the girl in the poem "Ma 
Muse" as a consumptive: "We would not mind if the poet showed us his muse 
poor, grieving, or ill-clad. But consumptive!" The consumptive Negress in 
Baudelaire. We get some idea of Sainte-Beuve 's innovations from lines like 
"nearby, the opening of a ravine: / A girl washes threadbare linen there day after 
day" ("Ma Muse," in vol. 1 , p. 93), or, from a suicide fantasy, "Some local fellows, 
I ... I Mixing jeers with their stupid stories, / Will chat idly over my blackened 
remains /Before packing them off to the graveyard in a wheelbarrow" ("Le 
Creux de la vallee," in vol. 1, p. 114). [J51,2] 



Sainte-Beuve's characterization of his own poetry: "I have endeavored ... to be 
original in my fashion, which is humble and bourgeois, . . . calling by their name 
the things of private life, hut preferring the thatched cottage to the boudoir." Vie, 
poesies et pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863), vol. 1, p. 170 ("Pensees," no. 
19). [J51.3] 

With Sainte-Beuve, a standard of sensibility: "Ever since our poets, . . . instead of 
saying 'a romantic grove,' a 'melancholy lake,' . . . started saying 'a green grove' 
and 'a blue lake,' alarm has been spreading among the disciples of Madame de 
Stael and the Genevan school; and already complaints can be heard about the 
invasion of a new materialism. . . . Above all, there is a dread of monotony, and it 
seems far too easy and far too simple to say that the leaves are green and the 
waves blue. On this point, perhaps, the adversaries of the picturesque deceive 
themselves. The leaves, in fact, are not always green; the waves not always blue. 
Or rather, we find in nature . . . neither green, nor blue, nor red, properly speak- 
ing; the natural colors of things are colors without names. . . . The picturesque is 
not a box of paints that can be emptied." <Sainte-Beuve, Vie, poesies et pensees de 
Joseph Delorme (Paris, 1863),) pp. 166-167 ("Pensees," no. 16). [J51,4] 

"The alexandrine . . . resembles somewhat a pair of tongs, gleaming and golden, if 
straight and rigid; it is not for rummaging about in nooks and crannies. — Our 
modern verse is to a degree partitioned and articulated in the manner of insects, 
but, like them, it has wings." Vie, poesies et pensees de Joseph Delorme (Paris, 
1863), vol. 1, p. 161 ("Pensees," no. 9). [J51a,l] 

The sixth of Joseph Delorme's pensees assembles a number of examples and 
prefigurations of the modern alexandrine, from Rotrou, Chenier, Lamartine, 
Hugo, and Vigny. It notes that they are all informed by "the full, the large, the 
copious." Typical is this verse by Rotrou: "I myself have seen them — [the Chris- 
tians] looking so serene — / Driving their hymns to the skies in bulls of bronze" 
(p. 154). [J51a,2] 

"The poetry of Andre Chenier ... is, as it were, the landscape for which La- 
martine has done the sky." Delorme, vol. 1, pp. 159-160 ("Pensees," no. 8). 

[J51a,3] 

In the preface of February 1829, Sainte-Beuve provides the poetry of Joseph 
Delorme with a more or less exact social index. He lays weight on the fact that 
Delorme comes from a good family, and even more on his poverty and the 
humiliations to which it has exposed him. [J51a,4] 

What I propose is to show how Baudelaire lies embedded in the nineteenth 
century. Trie imprint he has left behind there must stand out clear and intact, like 
that of a stone which, having lain in the ground for decades, is one day rolled 
from its place. [J51a,5] 



Hie unique importance of Baudelaire resides in his being the first and the most 
unflinching to have taken the measure of the self -estranged human being, in the 
double sense of acknowledging this being and fortifying it with armor against the 
reified world. 272 tJ51a,6] 

Nothing comes closer to the task of the ancient hero in Baudelaire's sense — and 
in his century — than to give a form to modernity. [ J51a,7] 

In the "Salon de 1846" {Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 134), Baudelaire has described his 
social class through the clothes they wear. From this description it emerges that 
heroism is a quality of the one who describes, and not at all a quality of his 
subject. The "heroism of modern life" is a subterfuge or, if you prefer, a euphe- 
mism. The idea of death, from which Baudelaire never broke loose, is the hollow 
matrix readied for a knowledge that was not his. Baudelaire's concept of heroic 
modernity, it would seem, was first of all this : a monstrous provocation. Analogy 
with Daumier. [ J 5 2 , 1 ] 

Baudelaire's truest posture is ultimately not that of Hercules at rest but that of the 
mime who has taken off his makeup. This gestus is found again in the "ebbings" 
of his prosodic construction — something that, for several commentators, is the 
most precious element of his ars poetica. [ J52,2] 



January 15, 1866, on he Spleen de Paris: "Finally, I am hopeful that one of these 
clays I'll he able to show a new Joseph Delorme linking his rhapsodic meditation to 
every chance event in his flanerie." Ch<arles> B<audelaire>, Lettres (Paris, 1915), 
p. 493. 2 " 3 [J52.3] 



January 15, 1866, to Sainte-Beuve: "In certain places in Joseph Delorme I find a 
few too many lutes, lyres, harps, and Jehovahs. This clashes with the Parisian 
poems. Moreover, you'd come with the aim of destroying all that." Ch. B., Lettres 
(Paris, 1915), p. 495."'» [J52,4] 

An image that Baudelaire summons to explain his theory of the short poem, 
particularly the sonnet, in a letter to Armand Fraisse of February 19, 1860, serves 
better than any other description to suggest the way the sky looks in Meryon: 
"Have you ever noticed that a section of the sky seen through a vent or between 
two chimneys or two rocks, or through an arcade, gives a more profound idea of 
the infinite than a great panorama seen from a mountaintop?" Ch. B., Lettres 
(Paris, 1915), pp. 238-239. 275 [J52.5] 



Apropos of Pinelli, in "Quelques caricaturistes etrangers": "I wish that someone 
would invent a neologism, that someone would manufacture a word destined to 
destroy once and for all this species ofponcif — the poncif in conduct and behavior, 



which creeps into the life of artists as into their works." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 211.™ [J52.6] 



Baudelaire's use of the concept "allegory" is not always entirely sure: "the . . . 
allegory of the spider weaving her web between the arm and the line of a fisher- 
man, whose impatience never causes him to stir." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 204 
("Quelques caricaturistes etrangers"). 277 [J52a,l] 

Against the proposition "The genius makes his way." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 203 ("Quelques caricaturistes etrangers"). [J52a,2] 

About Gavarni: "Like all men of letters — being a man of letters himself — he is 
slightly tainted with corruption." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 199 ("Quelques cari- 
caturistes francais"). 27 " [J52a,3] 

In "Quelques caricaturistes fran§ais," on a drawing by Daumier dealing with 
cholera: "True to its ironic custom in times of great calamity and political up- 
heaval, the sky of Paris is superb; it is quite white and incandescent with heat. . . . 
The square is deserted and like an oven — more desolate, even, than a populous 
square after a riot." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 193. 279 [J52a,4] 

In Le Globe of March 15, 1830, Duvergier de Hauranne writes of Les Consola- 
tions: "It is not at all certain that the Posillipo has not inspired M. Sainte-Beuve as 
much as his Boulevard d'Enf er" (<cited in Sainte-Beuve, Les Consolations [Paris, 
1863],> p. 114). [J52a,5] 

Critique of Joseph Delorme and Les Consolations by Farcy, a July insurgent who 
fell in battle shortly after composing these lines: "Lihertinism is poetic when it is a 
transport of impassioned principle in us, when it is audacious philosophy, but not 
when it is merely a furtive aberration, a shameful confession. This state of mind 
... ill accords . . . with the poet, who should always go along unaffected, with head 
held high, and who requires enthusiasm, or the bitter depths of passion." From 
the manuscript published by C. A. Sainte-Beuve in Les Consolations: Pensees 
d'aoilt (Paris, 1863), p. 125. [J52a,6] 

From the critique of Sainte-Beuve by Farcy: "If the crowd is intolerable to him, 
the vastness of space oppresses him even more, a situation that is less poetic. He 
has not shown the pride or the range to take command of all this nature, to listen 
to it, understand it, and render its grand spectacles." "He was right," comments 
Sainte-Beuve (p. 126). C. A. Sainte-Beuve, Les Consolations: Pensees d'aout 
[Poesies de Sainte-Beuve, part 2] (Paris, 1863), p. 125. [ J52a,7] 



Baudelaire's oeuvre has perhaps gained importance — moral as well as literary — 
through the fact that he left no novel. [ J52a,8] 



The mental capacities that matter in Baudelaire are "souvenirs" of the human 
being, somewhat the way medieval allegories are souvenirs of the gods. "Baude- 
laire," Claudel once wrote, "takes as his subject the only inner experience left to 
people of the nineteenth century — namely, remorse." Now, this very likely paints 
too rosy a picture: remorse was no less past its time than other inner experiences 
formerly canonized. Remorse in Baudelaire is merely a souvenir, like repentance, 
virtue, hope, and even anguish, which was overtaken the moment it relinquished 
its place to morne incuriosite <glum indifference)." 280 [J53.1] 

As Baudelaire, after 1850, took up the doctrine of I'art pour I'art, he explicitly 
carried through a renunciation which he had undertaken in sovereign spirit at the 
very instant he made allegory into the armature of his poetry: he gave up using 
art as category of the totality of existence. [ J53.2] 

The brooder, whose startled gaze falls on the fragment in his hand, becomes an 
allegorist. [J53.3] 

If we call to mind just how much Baudelaire as a poet had to respect his own 
precepts, his own insights, his own taboos, and how strictly circumscribed, on the 
other hand, the tasks of his poetic labor were, then we may come to see in him a 
heroic trait. There is no other book of poems in which the poet as such presents 
himself with so little vanity and so much force. This fact provides a basis for the 
frequent comparison with Dante. [ J53,4] 

What proved so fascinating to Baudelaire in late Latin literature, particularly in 
Lucan, may have been the use this literature made of the names of gods — a 
practice in which it prepared the way for allegory. Usener discusses this. 281 

[J53.5] 

Scenes of horror in Lucan: the Thessalian witch Erichtho, and the profanation of 
the dead (<Bellum civile,> book 5, lines 507-569); the desecration of the head of 
Pompey (hook 8, lines 663-691); Medusa (book 9, lines 624-653). [J53.6] 

"Le Coucher d u soleil romantique" 282 — landscape a s allegory. [ J 5 3 , 7 ] 

Antiquity and Christianity together determine the historical armature of the 
allegorical mode of perception; they provide the lasting rudiments of the first 
allegorical experience — that of the High Middle Ages. "The allegorical outlook 
has its origin in the conflict between the guilt-laden physis, held up as an example 
by Christianity, and a purer natura deorum [nature of the gods], embodied in the 
Pantheon. With the revival of paganism in the Renaissance, and of Christianity 
in the Counter-Reformation, allegory, the form of their conflict, also had to be 
renewed" (< Walter Benjamin,> Ursprung des deutschen Trauerspiels [Berlin, 1928], 
p. 226). 283 In Baudelaire's case, the matter is clarified if we reverse the formula. 
The allegorical experience was primary for him; one can say that he appropri- 



ated from the antique world, as from the Christian, no more dian he needed to 
set going in his poetry that primordial experience — which had a substrate en- 
tirely sui generis. [J53a,l] 



The passion for ships and for self-propelled toys is, widi Baudelaire, perhaps only 
another expression of the discredit into which, in his view, the world of the 
organic has fallen. A sadistic inspiration is palpable here. [J53a,2] 

"All the miscreants of melodrama — accursed, damned, and fatally marked with a 
grin which runs from ear to ear — are in the pure orthodoxy of laughter. . . . 
Laughter is satanic; it is thus profoundly human." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 171 
("De l'Essence du rire"). 2 '" [ J53a,3] 

It is a shock that brings someone engrossed in reverie up from the depths. 
Medieval legends invoke the state of shock peculiar to the researcher whose 
longing for more-than-human wisdom has led him to magic; the experience of 
shock is cited here as the "derisive laughter of hell." "Here . . . the muteness of 
matter is overcome. In laughter, above all, matter takes on an abundance of spirit, 
in highly eccentric disguise. Indeed, it becomes so spiritual that it far outstrips 
language. Aiming still higher, it ends in shrill laughter" {Ursprung des deutschen 
Trauerspiels, p. 227). 283 Not only was such strident laughter characteristic of 
Baudelaire; it reechoed in his ear and gave him much to think about. [J53a,4] 

Laughter is shattered articulation. [ J 5 4 , 1 ] 

On the flight of images and the theory of surprise, which Baudelaire shared with 
Poe: "Allegories become dated because it is part of their nature to shock." 280 The 
succession of allegorical publications in the Baroque represents a sort of flight of 
images. [J54,2] 

On petrified unrest and the flight of images: "The same tendency is characteristic 
of Baroque lyric. The poems have 'no forward movement, but they swell up from 
within.' If it is to hold its own against the tendency toward absorption, the 
allegorical must constantly unfold in new and surprising ways." Ursprung, p. 182 
(citing Fritz Strich) , 287 [ J54,3] 

Once the scheme of allegory has been metaphysically determined according to its 
threefold illusionary nature, as "illusion of freedom — in the exploration of what is 
forbidden; . . . illusion of independence — in the secession from the community of 
the pious; . . . illusion of infinity — in the empty abyss of evil" {Ursprung, p. 230), 288 
then nothing is easier than to assimilate whole groups of Baudelairean poems to 
diis design. The first part can be represented by the cycle "Fleurs du mal"; the 
second part, by the cycle "Revoke"; while the third could be elaborated without 
difficulty from "Spleen et ideal." [ J54,4] 



The image of petrified unrest, in the Baroque, is "the bleak confusion of Gol- 
gotha, which can be recognized as the schema underlying the allegorical figures 
in hundreds of the engravings and descriptions of the period" {Ur sprung, 
p. 232). 289 ' ' ' ' [J54.5] 

The extent of Baudelaire's impatience can be gauged from these lines in "Sonnet 
d'automne" : "My heart, on which everything jars / except the candor of the 
primitive animal." 290 [J54.6] 



Experiences emptied ont and deprived of their substance: "Last ... we / [of the] 
Muse's priesthood . . . I have drunk without thirst and eaten without hunger!" 
("L'Examen de minuit"). 291 [J54,7] 

Art appears truly bare and austere in the light of an allegorical consideration 1 . 
And on that last and terrible day, 

To escape the vengeance from above, 

He must show barns whose uttermost 

Recesses swell with ripened grain, 

And blooms whose shapes and hues will gain 

The suffrage of the Heavenly Host. 292 

"La Rancon." Compare "Le Squelette laboureur." [J54.8] 

Concerning the "strange sectioning of time," the final stanza of "L'Avertisseur": 

Despite what he may hope or plan, 
There is no moment lef t when man 
Is not subject to the constant 
Warnings of this odious Serpent. 293 

To be compared with "L'Horloge" and "Reve parisien." [J54a,l] 

About laughter: "Beguiled by ghostly laughter in the air / his reason falters, 
grasps at phantom straws." ("Sur Le Tasse en prison d'Eugene Delacroix.") 

His mirth is the reverse of Melmoth's sneer 
Or the snickering of Mephistopheles, 
licked by the lurid light of a Fury's torch 
that burns them to a crisp but leaves us cold. 

"Vers pour le portrait de M. Honore Daumier." 29 ' [J54a,2] 

The derisive laughter from the clouds in "La Beatrice." 

For I — am I not a dissonance 
in the divine accord, 



because of the greedy Irony 
which infiltrates my soul? 



"L'Heautontimoroumenos.' ,2<):> [J54a,3] 

"La Beaute" 256 — entails petrifaction, but not the unrest on which the gaze of the 
allegorist falls. [J54a,4] 

On the fetish: 

Precious minerals form her polished eyes, 
and in her strange symbolic nature where 
angel and sphinx unite, where diamond, 

gold, and steel dissolve into one light, 
shines forever, useless as a star, 
the sterile woman's icy majesty. 

"Avec ses vetements . . . " 2,J7 [J54a,5] 

"For hours? Forever! Into that splendid mane / let me braid rubies, ropes of 
pearls to bind / you indissolubly to my desire." ("La Chevelure.") 2 ' 8 [J54a,6] 

When he went to meet the consumptive Negress who lived in the city, Baudelaire 
saw a much truer aspect of the French colonial empire than did Dumas when he 
took a boat to Tunis on commission from Salvandy. [J54a,7] 

Society of the Second Empire: 

Victims in tears, the hangman glorified; 
the banquet seasoned and festooned with blood: 
the poison of power clogs the despot's veins, 
and the people kiss the knout that scourges them. 

"Le Voyage. " 2OT [J55,l] 

The clouds: "Le Voyage," section 4., stanza 3. [J55,2] 

Autumnal motif: "L'Ennemi," "L'Imprevu," "Semper Eadem." [ J55,3] 

Satan in "Les Litanies de Satan": "great king of subterranean things" — "You 
whose bright eye knows the deep arsenals / Where the huried race of metals slum- 
bers. " 300 [J55.4] 

Granier de Cassagnac's theory of the subhuman, with regard to "Abel et Cain." 

[J55.5] 



On the Christian determination of allegory: it has no place in the cycle 
"Revoke." [J55.6] 



On allegory: "L' Amour et le crane: Vieux Cul-de-lampe," "Allegorie," "Une Gra- 
vure fantastique." [J55.7] 

. . . The sky was suave, the sea serene; for me 
from now on everything was hloody and hlack 
— the worse for me — and as if in a shroud 
my heart lay buried in this allegory. 

"Un Voyage a Cythere." 3 " 1 [ J55.8] 

"Steeling my nerves to play a hero's part" ("Les Sept Vieillards"). 3112 [J55.9] 
"Les Sept Vieillards" on the subject of eternal sameness. Chorus girls. 

[J55.10] 

List of allegories: Art, Love, Pleasure, Repentance, Ennui, Destruction, the Now, 
Time, Death, Fear, Sorrow, Evil, Truth, Hope, Vengeance, Hate, Respect, Jeal- 
ousy, Thoughts. [J55.ll] 

"L' Irremediable" — catalogue of emblems. [J55,12] 

The allegories stand for that which the commodity makes of the experiences 
people have in this century. [ J55.13] 

The wish to sleep. "I hate all passion, and wit grates on me" ("Sonnet 
d'automne"). ;i0:! [J55,14] 

"A sinuous fleece ... I . . . which in darkness rivals you, 0 Night, / deep and 
spreading starless Night!" ("Les Promesses d'un visage"). m [J55,15] 

"The dizzying stairs that swallow up his soul" ("Sur Le Tasse en prison d'Eugene 
Delacroix").* 05 [J55.16] 

The affinity Baudelaire felt for late Latin literature is probably connected with his 
passion for the allegorical art that had its first flowering in the High Middle Ages. 

[J55,17] 

To attempt to judge Baudelaire's intellectual powers on the basis of his philo- 
sophical digressions, as Jules Lemaitre has done, 306 is ill-advised. Baudelaire was a 
bad philosopher, a better theorist in matters of art; but only as a brooder was he 
incomparable. He has the stereotypy in motif characteristic of the brooder, the 
imperturbability in warding off disturbance, the readiness each time to put the 
image at the beck and call of the thought. The brooder is at home among 
allegories. [J55a,l] 

The attraction which a few basic situations continually exerted on Baudelaire 
belongs to the complex of symptoms associated with melancholy. He appears to 



have been under the compulsion of returning at least once to each of his main 
motifs. [J55a,2] 



Baudelaire's allegory bears traces of the violence that was necessary to demolish 
the harmonious f acade of the world that surrounded him. [ J55a,3] 

In Blanqui's view of the world, petrified unrest becomes the status of the cosmos 
itself. The course of the world appears, accordingly, as one great allegory. 

[J55a,4] 

Petrified unrest is, moreover, the formula for Baudelaire's life history, which 
knows no development. [J55a,5] 

The state of tension subsisting between the most cultivated sensibility and the 
most intense contemplation is a mark of the Baudelairean. It is reflected theoreti- 
cally in the doctrine of correspondences and in the predilection for allegory. 
Baudelaire never attempted to establish any sort of relations between these. 
Nevertheless, such relations exist. [J55a,6] 

Misery and terror — which, in Baudelaire, have their armature in allegorical per- 
ception — have become, in Rollinat, the object of a genre. (This genre had its 
"artistic headquarters" at Le Chat Noir cafe. Its model, if you will, may be found 
in a poem like "Le Vin de l'assassin." Rollinat was one of the house poets at Le 
Chat Noir.) [ J55a,7] 

"De l'Essence du rire" contains the theory of satanic laughter, hi this essay, 
Baudelaire goes so far as to adjudge even smiling as fundamentally satanic. 
Contemporaries testified to something frightful in his own maimer of laughing. 

[J55a,8] 

That which the allegorical intention has ixed upon is sundered from the custom- 
ary contexts of life: it is at once shattered and preserved. Allegory holds fast to 
the ruins. Baudelaire's destructive impulse is nowhere concerned with the aboli- 
tion of what falls to it. (But compare "Revolte,"J55,<6>.) [J56,l] 

Baroque allegory sees the corpse only from the outside; Baudelaire evokes it 
from within. [ J56.2] 

Baudelaire's invectives against mythology recall those of the medieval clerics. He 
especially detests chubby-cheeked Cupid. His aversion to this figure has the same 
roots as his hatred for Beranger. [J56,3] 

Baudelaire regards art's workshop in itself [as a site of confusion,] as the "appara- 
tus of destruction" which the allegories so often represent. In the notes he left for 
a preface to a projected third edition of Les Fleurs du mal, he writes: "Do we show 



the public . . . the mechanism behind our effects? . . . Do we display all the rags, 
the paint, the pulleys, the chains, the alterations, the scribbled-over proof sheets — 
in short, all the horrors that make up the sanctuary of art?" Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 
l,p.582. M7 ' [J56.4] 

Baudelaire as mime: "Being as chaste as paper, as sober as water, as devout as a 
woman at Holy Communion, as harmless as a sacrificial lamb, I would not he 
displeased to be taken for a lecher, a drunkard, an infidel, a murderer." Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 1, p. 582 (Studies for a preface to Les Fleurs du mal). m [J56,5] 

Solely for the publication of Les Fleurs du mul and Petits Poemes en prose, Bau- 
delaire sent notices to more than twenty-five periodicals, not counting the news- 
papers. [J56,6] 

Baroque detailing of the female body: "Le Beau Navire" <The Fine Ship). To the 
contrary: "Tout entiere" <Altogether>. [ J56,7] 



Allegory: 



That it's foolish to build anything on human hearts — 
For everything cracks, yes, even love and beauty, 
Till Oblivion flings them into its hod 
And gives them over to Eternity! 



in his "Confession." 31 "' 



[J56.8] 



Fetish: "who now, from Pit to Empyrean scorned / by all hut me .../.../ my 
jet-eyed statue, angel with hrazen brows!" ("Je te donne ces vers.") 310 [J56,9] 

"Michelangelo / No man's land where every Hercules / becomes a Christ." ("Les 
Phares.")'" [J56a,l] 

"An echo repeated by a thousand labyrinths." ("Les Phares.")' 12 [J56a,2] 

"La Muse venal" shows to what degree Baudelaire occasionally saw the publica- 
tion of poems as a form of prostitution. [J56a,3] 

'"Your Christian bloodstream coursing strong / and steadfast as the copious Clas- 
sical vein." ("La Muse malade.") 3 " [J56a,4] 

In Baudelaire's case, the really decisive indication of class betrayal is not the 
integrity which forbade his applying for a govermnent grant but the incompati- 
bility he felt with the ethos of journalism. [ J56a,5] 



Allegory views existence, as it does art, under the sign of fragmentation and ruin. 
Hart pour I'art erects the kingdom of art outside profane existence. Common to 
both is the renunciation of the idea of harmonious totality in which — according 



to the doctrine of German Idealism no less than that of French eclecticism — art 
and profane existence are merged. [J56a,6] 



The portrayal of the crowd in Poe shows that the description of confusion is not 
the same as a confused description. [J56a,7] 

Rowers adorn the individual stations of this Calvary [of male sexuality]. They 
are flowers of evil. [J56a,8] 

Lcs Flairs Jii mnl is the last book of poems to have had a European-wide rever- 
beration. Before that: Ossian, and Heine's Buch der Lietler <Book of Songs>. 

[J56a,9] 

The dialectic of commodity production in advanced capitalism: the novelty of 
products — as a stimulus to demand — is accorded an unprecedented importance. 
At the same time, the eversame is manifest in mass production. 

[J56a,10] 

In Blanqui's cosmology, everything hinges on the stars, which Baudelaire ban- 
ishes from his world. [J56a,ll] 

The renunciation of the magic of distance is a decisive moment in the lyric poetry 
of Baudelaire. It has found its sovereign formulation in the first stanza of "Le 
Voyage." [J56a,12] 

It belongs to the Via Dolorosa of male sexuality that Baudelaire perceived preg- 
nancy, in some degree, as unfair competition. On the other hand, solidarity 
between impotence and sterility. [ J57.1] 

The passage in which Baudelaire speaks of his fascination with painted theatrical 
backdrops— Where? Q4a,4. [J57.2] 

Baudelaire's destructive impulse is nowhere concerned with the abolition of what 
falls to it. This is reflected in his allegory and is the condition of its regressive 
tendency. On the other hand, allegory has to do, precisely in its destructive furor, 
with dispelling the illusion that proceeds from all "given order," whether of art or 
of life: the illusion of totality or of organic wholeness which transfigures that 
order and makes it seem endurable. And this is the progressive tendency of 
allegory. [J57.3] 

Whenever humanity — aspiring af ter a purer, more innocent, more spiritual exist- 
ence than it has been granted — looked around for a token and pledge of this 
existence in nature, it generally found it in the plant or animal kingdom. Not so 
Baudelaire. His dream of such an existence disdains community with any terres- 
trial nature and holds to the clouds. Many of his poems contain cloud motifs [not 



to mention the transfiguration of Paris in "Paysage" <Landscape>]. What is most 
appalling is the defilement of the clouds ("La Beatrice"). [J57.4] 



From the perspective of spleen, the buried man is the "transcendental subject of 
history." 311 [J57,5] 

Baudelaire's financial misery is a moment of his personal Golgotha. It has Gar- 
nished, together with his erotic misery, the defining features of the image of the 
poet handed down by tradition. The Passion of Baudelaire: understood as a 
redemption. [J57.6] 

Let us emphasize the solitude of Baudelaire as a counterpart to that of Blanqui. 
The latter, too, had a "destiny eternally solitary" ("Mon Coeur mis a nu," no. 
12). su ' ' [J57,7] 

On the image of the crowd in Poe: How well can the image of the big city turn 
out when the register of its physical dangers — to say nothing of the danger to 
which it itself is exposed — is as incomplete as it is at the time of Poe or Baudelaire? 
In the crowd, we see a presentiment of these dangers. [J57.8] 

Baudelaire's readers are men. It is men who have made him famous; it is them he 
has redeemed. 11 " [J57.9] 

Baudelaire would never have written poems, if he had had merely the motives 
for doing so that poets usually have. [J57a,l] 

On impotence. Baudelaire is a "maniac, in revolt against his own impotence." 
Incapable of satisfying the sexual needs of a woman, he made a virtue of neces- 
sity in sabotaging the spiritual needs of his contemporaries. He himself did not 
fail to notice the connection, and his consciousness of this connection is seen 
most clearly in bis style of humor. It is the cheerless humor of the rebel, not for a 
moment to be confused with the geniality of scoundrels, which at that time was 
already on the rise. This type of reaction is something very French; its name, la 
rogne, is not easily rendered into other languages. 317 [J57a,2] 

It is in its transitoriness that modernity shows itself to be ultimately and most 
intimately akin to antiquity. The uninterrupted resonance which Les Flairs du 
mal has found up through the present day is linked to a certain aspect of the 
urban scene, one that came to light only with the city's entry into poetry. It is the 
aspect least of all expected. What makes itself felt through the evocation of Paris 
in Baudelaire's verse is the infirmity and decrepitude of a great city. Nowhere, 
perhaps, has this been given more perfect expression than in the poem "Crepus- 
cule du matin," which is the awakening sob of the sleeper, reproduced in the 
materials of urban life. This aspect, however, is more or less common to the 
whole cycle of "Tableaux parisiens;" it is present in the transparence of the city, as 



conjured by "Le Soleil," no less than in the allegorical evocation of the Louvre in 
"Le Cygne." [J57a,3] 



On the physiognomy of Baudelaire as that of the mime: Courbet reports that he 
looked different every day. [J57a,4] 

With the inhabitants of Romance-language nations, a refinement of the sen- 
sorium does not diminish the power of sensuous apprehension. With the Ger- 
mans, on the other hand, the refinement, the advancing cultivation of sensuous 
enjoyment is generally purchased with a decline in the art of apprehension; here, 
the capacity for pleasure loses in concentration what it gains in delicacy. (Com- 
pare the "reek of wine-casks" 318 in "Le Vm des chiffonniers.") [J57a,5] 

The eminent aptitude for pleasure on the part of a Baudelaire has nothing at all 
to do with any sort of coziness. The fundamental incompatibility of sensuous 
pleasure with what is called Gemiitlichkeit is the mark of an authentic culture of 
the senses. Baudelaire's snobbism is the eccentric repudiation of complacency, 
and his satanism is the readiness to subvert this habit of mind wherever and 
whenever it should arise. [ J 58, 1] 

The streets of Paris, in Meryon's rendering, are chasms, high above which float 
the clouds. [ J58.2] 

Baudelaire wanted to make room for his poems, and to this end he had to push 
aside others. He managed to devalue certain poetic liberties of the Romantics 
through his classical deployment of rhyme, as he devalued the traditional alexan- 
drine through his introduction of certain ebbings and points of rupture. In short, 
bis poems contained special provisions for the elimination of competitors. 

[J58.3] 

Baudelaire was perhaps the first to have had the idea of a market-oriented origi- 
nality, which just for that reason was more original in its day than any other. The 
creation of his poncif :m led him to adopt methods that were the stock in trade of 
the competition. His defamatory remarks about Musset or Beranger have just as 
much to do with this as his imitations of Victor Hugo. [ J58,4] 

The relation of the crowd to the individual comes, practically of itself, to unfold 
as a metaphor in which the differing inspirations of these two poets — Hugo and 
Baudelaire — can be grasped. Words, like images, present themselves to Hugo as 
a surging, relentless mass. With Baudelaire, in contrast, they take the side of the 
solitary who, to be sure, fades into the multitude, but not before appearing with 
singular physiognomy to one who allows her gaze to linger. [ J58,5] 

What good is talk of progress to a world sinking into rigor mortis? Baudelaire 
found the experience of such a world set down with incomparable power in the 



work of Poe, who thus became irreplaceable for him. Poe described the world in 
which Baudelaire's whole poetic enterprise had its prerogative. [J58.6] 



The idea of Baudelaire's aesthetic Passion has given to many parties in the critical 
literature on Baudelaire the character of an image d 'Epinal. These colored prints, 
as is well known, often showed scenes from the lives of saints. [ J58a,l] 

There are weighty historical circumstances making the Golgotha-way of impo- 
tence trod by Baudelaire into one marked out in advance by his society. Only this 
would explain how it was that he drew, as traveling expenses along the way, a 
precious old coin from among the accumulated treasures of this society. It was 
the coin of allegory, with the scythe-wielding skeleton on one side, and, on the 
obverse, the figure of Melancholy plunged in meditation. [ J58a,2] 

That the stars do not appear in Baudelaire is the surest indicator of that tendency 
of his poetry to dissolve illusory appearances. 320 [J58a,3] 

The key to Baudelaire's relationship with Gautier is to be sought in the more or 
less clear awareness of the younger man [?] that even in art his destructive 
impulse encounters no inviolable limit. In fact, such a limit carmot withstand the 
allegorical intention. Moreover, Baudelaire could hardly have written his essay 
on Dupont if the critique of the concept of art entailed by the latter's established 
practice had not corresponded to his own radical critique. In referring to Gautier, 
Baudelaire successfully undertook to cover up these tendencies. [J58a,4] 

In the flaneur, one might say, is reborn the sort of idler that Socrates picked out 
from the Athenian marketplace to be his interlocutor. Only, there is no longer a 
Socrates. And the slave labor that guaranteed him his leisure has likewise ceased 
to exist. [J58a,5] 

Streets of ill repute. Considering the importance of forbidden forms of sexuality 
in Baudelaire's life and work, it is remarkable that the bordello plays no role in 
either his private documents or his work. There is no counterpart, within this 
sphere, to a poem such as "Lejeu." The brothel is named but once: in "Les Deux 
Bonnes Soeurs." [J58a,6] 

For the flaneur, the "crowd" is a veil hiding the "masses." 321 [J59,2] 

That Hugo's poetry takes up the motif of table-turning is perhaps less notewor- 
thy than the fact that it was regularly composed in the presence of such phenom- 
ena. For Hugo in exile, the unfathomable, insistent swarm of the spirit world 
takes the place of the public. [ J59,3] 

The primary interest of allegory is not linguistic but optical. "Images — my great, 
my primitive passion." 322 [J59,4] 



The elaborate theorems with which the principle of "art for art's sake" was 
enunciated by its original proponents, as by subsequent literary history, ulti- 
mately come down to a specific thesis: that sensibility is the true subject of poetry. 
Sensibility is, by its nature, involved in suffering. If it experiences its highest 
concretization, its richest determination, in the sphere of the erotic, then it must 
find its absolute consummation, which coincides with its transfiguration, in the 
Passion. It will define the idea of an "aesthetic Passion." The concept of the 
aesthetic appears here with precisely the signification that Kierkegaard gives it in 
his erotology. [J59.5] 

The poetics of I' art pour I art blends seamlessly into the aesthetic Passion of Les 
Fleurs du mal. [J59.6] 

The "loss of a halo" 323 concerns the poet first of all. He is obliged to exhibit 
himself in his own person on the market. Baudelaire played this role to the hilt. His 
famous mythomania was a publicity stunt. [ J59.7] 

The new dreariness and desolation of Paris, as it is described by Veuillot, comes 
on the scene, together with the dreariness of men's attire, as an essential moment 
in the image of modernity. [J59,8] 

Mystification, with Baudelaire, is an apotropaic magic, similar to the lie among 
prostitutes. [J59.9] 

The commodity form emerges in Baudelaire as the social content of the allegori- 
cal form of perception. Form and content are united in the prostitute, as in their 
synthesis. [J59.10] 

Baudelaire perceived the significance of the mass-produced article as clearly as 
did Balzac. In this, his "Americanism," of which Laforgue speaks, has its firmest 
foundation. He wanted to create a poncif, a cliche. Lemaitre assures him that he 
succeeded. [J59a,l] 

Apropos of Valery's reflections on the situation of Baudelaire. It is important that 
Baudelaire met with competitive relations in the production of poetry. Of course, 
rivalry between poets is as old as the hills. But in the period around 1830, these 
rivalries began to be decided on the open market. It was victory in that fi eld — cind 
not the patronage of the gentry, princes, or the clergy — that was to be won. This 
condition weighed more heavily on the lyric than on other forms of poetry. The 
disorganization of styles and of poetic schools is the complement of that market, 
which reveals itself to the poet as the "public." Baudelaire was not based in any 
style, and he had no school. It was a real discovery for him that he was compet- 
ing against individuals. [J59a,2] 



Les Fleurs du mal may be considered an arsenal. Baudelaire wrote certain of his 
poems in order to destroy others written before him. [ J59a,3] 



No one ever felt less at home in Paris than Baudelaire. Every intimacy with things 
is alien to the allegorical intention. To touch on things means, for it, to violate 
them. To recognize things means, for it, to see through them. Wherever the 
allegorical intention prevails, no habits of any kind can be formed. Hardly has a 
thing been taken up than allegory has dispensed with the situation. Thing and 
situation become obsolete for allegory more quickly than a new pattern for the 
milliner. But to become obsolete means: to grow strange. Spleen lays down 
centuries between the present moment and the one just lived. It is spleen that 
tirelessly generates "antiquity." And in fact, with Baudelaire, modernity is noth- 
ing other than the "newest antiquity." Modernity, for Baudelaire, is not solely 
and not primarily the object of his sensibility; it is the object of a conquest. 
Modernity has, for its armature, the allegorical mode of vision. [J59a,4] 

The correspondence between antiquity and modernity is the sole constructive 
conception of history in Baudelaire. With its rigid armature, it excludes every 
dialectical conception. [J59a,5] 

On the phrase, "I have little to do with such things," 324 in the draft of a preface to 
Les Fleurs du mal. Baudelaire, who never founded a family, has given the word 
"familiar" in his poetry an inflection filled with meaning and with promise such 
as it never before possessed. It is like a slow, heavily laden hay wagon in which the 
poet carts to the barn everything which throughout his life he had to renounce. 
Compare "Correspondances," "Bohemiens en voyage," "Obsession." [J60,l] 

The passage "where everything, even horror, turns to magic" 325 could hardly be 
better exemplified than by Poe's description of the crowd. [ J60,2] 

Concerning the opening line from "La Servante au grand coeur": on the words 
"of whom you were so jealous"™ falls an accent that one would not necessarily 
expect. The voice, as it were, draws back from "jealous." Therein lies the frailty 
of this already long-past situation. [ J60,3] 

On "Spleen I": through the word "mortality," the city with its offices and its 
statistical registers lies embedded in spleen, as in a picture puzzle <Vexierbild>. 

[J60.4] 

The whore is the most precious booty in the triumph of allegory — the life which 
signifies death. This quality is the only thing about her that cannot be bought, 
and for Baudelaire it is the only thing that matters. [ J60,5] 

Around the middle of the century, the conditions of artistic production under- 
went a change. This change consisted in the fact that for the first time the form of 
the commodity imposed itself decisively on the work of art, and the form of the 



masses on its public. Particularly vulnerable to these developments, as can be 
seen now unmistakably in our century, was the lyric. It is the unique distinction 
of Les Fleurs du mal that Baudelaire responded to precisely these altered condi- 
tions with a book of poems. It is the best example of heroic conduct to be found 
in his life. [J60.6] 

The heroic bearing of Baudelaire is akin to that of Nietzsche. Though Baudelaire 
likes to appeal to Catholicism, his historical experience is nonetheless that which 
Nietzsche fixed in the phrase "God is dead." hi Nietzsche's case, this experience 
is projected cosmologically in the thesis that nothing new occurs any more, hi 
Nietzsche, the accent lies on eternal recurrence, which the human being has to 
face with heroic composure. For Baudelaire, it is more a matter of "the new," 
which must be wrested heroically from what is always again the same. [J60.7] 

The historical experiences which Baudelaire was one of the first to undergo (it is 
no accident that he belongs to the generation of Marx, whose principal work 
appeared in the year of his death) have become, in our day, only more wide- 
spread and persistent. The traits displayed by capital in June 1848 have, since 
then, been engraved still more sharply in the ruling classes. And the particular 
difficulties involved in mastering the poetry of Baudelaire are the obverse of the 
ease with which one can give oneself up to it. In a word, there is nothing yet 
obsolete about this poetry. This fact has determined the character of most of the 
books concerned with Baudelaire: they are feuilletons on an expanded scale. 

[J60a,l] 

Particularly toward the end of his life, and in view of the limited success of his 
work, Baudelaire more and more threw himself into the bargain. He flung him- 
self after his work, and thus, to the end, confirmed in his own person what he had 
said about the unavoidable necessity of prostitution for the poet. [J60a,2] 

One encounters an abundance of stereotypes in Baudelaire, as in the Baroque 
poets. [J60a,3] 

For the decline of the aura, one thing within the realm of mass production is of 
overriding importance: the massive reproduction of the image. [J60a,4] 

Impotence is the key figure of Baudelaire's solitude. 327 An abyss divides him from 
his fellow men. It is this abyss of which his poetry speaks. [J60a,5] 

We may assume that the crowd as it appears in Poe, with its abrupt and intermit- 
tent movements, is described quite realistically, hi itself, the description has a 
higher truth. These are less the movements of people going about their business 
than the movements of the machines they operate. With uncanny foresight, Poe 
seems to have modeled the gestures and reactions of the crowd on the rhythm of 
these machines. The flaneur, at any rate, has no part in such behavior. Instead, he 



forms an obstacle in its path. His nonchalance would therefore be nothing other 
than an unconscious protest against the tempo of the production process. (Com- 
pare D2a,l.) [J60a,6] 



Fog appears as a consolation of the solitary man. It fills the abyss surrounding 
him. [J60a,7] 

Baudelaire's candidacy for the Academie was a sociological experiment. [ J 6 1,1] 

Series of types — from the national guardsman Mayeux, through Gavroche, to 
the ragpicker, to Vireloque, to Ratapoil. 32 " [ J 6 1,2] 

Baudelaire's allegorical mode of vision was not understood by any of his contem- 
poraries and was thus, in the end, completely overlooked. [ J61,3] 

Surprising proclamations and mysteiy-mongering, sudden attacks and impene- 
trable irony, belong to the raison d'etat of the Second Empire and were charac- 
teristic of Napoleon III. They are no less characteristic of the theoretical writings 
of Baudelaire. [J61.4] 

The cosmic shudder in Victor Hugo has little in common with the naked terror 
that seized Baudelaire in his spleen. Hugo felt perfectly at home in the world of 
the spirits. It is the complement of his domestic existence, which was itself not 
without horror. [ J61.5] 

The veiled import of the first section of "Chant d'automne": the season is named 
only in the tiny phrase "autumn is here!" 329 and the following line says that, for 
the poet, it has no other meaning than as a foreboding of death. To him, it has 
brought no harvest. [ J 6 1 , 6 ] 

In the guise of a beggar, Baudelaire continually put the model of bourgeois 
society to the test. His willfully induced, if not deliberately maintained, depend- 
ence on his mother not only has a psychoanalytically identifiable cause; it also 
has a social cause. [J61,7] 

The labyrinth is the right path for him who always arrives early enough at his 
destination. For the flaneur, this destination is the marketplace. [J 61, 8] 

The path of one who shrinks from arriving at his goal will easily take the form of 
a labyrinth. [For the flaneur, this goal is the marketplace.] The same holds for the 
social class that does not want to know where it is heading. Moreover, nothing 
prevents it from reveling in this roundahout way and hence substituting the 
shudder of pleasure for the shudder of death. This was the case for the society of 
the Second Empire. [ J 6 1 , 9 ] 



What concerned Baudelaire was not manifest and short-term demand, but latent 
and long-term demand. Les Flews du mal demonstrates not only that he correctly 
assessed such a demand but, in addition, that this sureness in evaluation is 
inseparable f rom his significance asapoet. [ J 6 1 , 1 0 ] 

One of the most powerful attractions of prostitution appears only with the rise of 
the metropolis — namely, its operation in the mass and through the masses. It was 
the existence of the masses that first enabled prostitution to overspread large 
areas of the city, whereas earlier it had been confined, if not to houses, at least to 
the streets. The masses first made it possible for the sexual object to be reflected 
simultaneously in a hundred different forms of allurement — forms which the 
object itself produced. Beyond this, salability itself can become a sexual stimulus; 
and this attraction increases wherever an abundant supply of women under- 
scores their character as commodity. With the exhibition of girls ;!:(0 in rigidly 
uniform dress at a later period, the music hall review explicitly introduced the 
mass-produced article into the libidinal life of the big-city dweller. [ J61a,l] 

As a matter of fact, if the rule of the bourgeoisie were one day to be stabilized 
(which never before has happened, and never can), then the vicissitudes of 
history would in actuality have no more claim on the attention of thinkers than a 
child's kaleidoscope, which with every turn of the hand dissolves the established 
order into a new array. As a matter of fact, the concepts of the ruling class have in 
every age been the mirrors that enabled an image of "order" to prevail. [ J61a,2] 

In L'Eternite par les astres, Blanqui displayed no antipathy to the belief in prog- 
ress; between the lines, however, he heaped scorn on the idea. One should not 
necessarily conclude from this that he was untrue to his political credo. The 
activity of a professional revolutionary such as Blanqui does not presuppose any 
faith in progress; it presupposes only the determination to do away with present 
injustice. The irreplaceable political value of class hatred consists precisely in its 
affording the revolutionary class a healthy indifference toward speculations con- 
cerning progress. Indeed, it is just as worthy of humane ends to rise up out of 
indignation at prevailing injustice as to seek through revolution to better the 
existence of future generations. It is just as worthy of the human being; it is also 
more like the human being. Hand in hand with such indignation goes the firm 
resolve to snatch humanity at the last moment from the catastrophe looming at 
every turn. That was the case with Blanqui. He always refused to develop plans 
for what comes "later." [J61a,3] 

Baudelaire was obliged to lay claim to the dignity of the poet in a society that had 
no more dignity of any kind to confer. Hence the bouffonnerie of his public 
appearances. [ J62,l] 

The figure of Baudelaire has passed into his fame. For the petty-bourgeois mass 
of readers, his story is an image d'Epinal, an illustrated "life history of a libertine." 



This image has contributed greatly to Baudelaire's reputation — little though its 
purveyors may have numbered among his friends. Over this image another 
imposes itself, one that has had a less widespread but more lasting effect: it shows 
Baudelaire as exemplar of an aesthetic Passion. [J62,2] 

The aesthete in Kierkegaard is predestined to the Passion. See "The Unhappiest 
Man" in Eilha/Q: [ J62.3] 

The grave as the secret chamber in which Eros and Sexus settle their ancient 
quarrel. [J62.4] 

The stars in Baudelaire represent a picture puzzle <\hderbiltb of the commodity. 
They are the eversame in great masses. [J62,5] 

Baudelaire did not have the humanitaiian idealism of a Victor Hugo or a La- 
martine. The emotional buoyancy of a Musset was not at his disposal. He did 
not, like Gautier, take pleasure in his times, nor could he deceive himself about 
them like Leconte de Lisle. It was not given him to find a ref uge in devotions, like 
Verlaine, nor to heighten the youthful vigor of his lyric elan through the betrayal 
of his adulthood, like Rimbaud. As rich as Baudelaire is in knowledge of his craft, 
he is relatively unprovided with stratagems to face the times. And even the grand 
tragic part he had composed for the arena of his day — the role of the "mod- 
ern" — could be filled in the end only by himself. All this Baudelaire no doubt 
recognized. The eccentricities in which he took such pleasure were those of the 
mime who has to perform before a public incapable of following the action on the 
stage — a mime, furthermore, who knows this about his audience and, in his 
performance, allows that knowledge its rightful due. [J62,6] 

In the psychic economy, the mass-produced article appears as obsessional idea. [It 
answers to no natural need.] The neurotic is compelled to channel it violently 
among the ideas within the natural circulation process. [J62a,l] 

The idea of eternal recurrence transforms the historical event itself into a mass- 
produced article. But this conception also displays, in another respect — on its 
obverse side, one could say — a trace of the economic circumstances to which it 
owes its sudden topicality. This was manifest at the moment the security of the 
conditions of life was considerably diminished through an accelerated succession 
of crises. The idea of eternal recurrence derived its luster from the fact that it was 
no longer possible, in all circumstances, to expect a recurrence of conditions 
across any interval of time shorter than that provided by eternity. The quotidian 
constellations very gradually began to be less quotidian. Very gradually their 
recurrence became a little less frequent, and there could arise, in consequence, 
the obscure presentiment that henceforth one must rest content with cosmic 
constellations. Habit, in short, made ready to surrender some of its prerogatives. 
Nietzsche says, "I love short-lived habits ," 331 and Baudelaire already, throughout 



his life, was incapable of developing regular habits. Habits are the armature of 
long experience iErfthrunp, whereas they are decomposed by individual experi- 
ences <Erlebnisse>. [J62a,2] 



A paragraph of the "Diapsalmata ad se ipsum" deals with boredom. It closes with 
the sentence: "My soul is like the Dead Sea, over which no bird can fly; when it has 
flown midway, then it sinks down to death and destruction." Soren Kierkegaard, 
Entiveder-Oder (Jena, 1911), vol. 1, p. 33. Compare "I am a graveyard that the 
moon abhors" ("Spleen II"). 332 [J62a,3] 

Melancholy, pride, and images. "Carking care is my feudal castle. It is built like an 
eagle's nest upon the peak of a mountain lost in the clouds. No one can take it by 
storm. From this abode I dart down into the world of reality to seize my prey; hut 
I do not remain down there, I bear my quarry aloft to my stronghold. What I 
capture are images." Soren Kierkegaard, Entiveder-Oder (Jena, 1911), vol. 1, 
p. 38 ("Diapsalmata ad se ipsum"). 333 [J62a,4] 

On the use of the term "aesthetic" in Kierkegaard. In choosing a governess, one 
takes into account "also her aesthetic qualifications for amusing the children." 
Soren Kierkegaard, Entiveder-Oder (Jena, 1911), vol. 1, p. 255 ("The Rotation 
Method"). 33 ' 1 [J63,l] 

Blanqui's journey: "One tires of living in the country, and moves to the city; one 
tires of one's native land, and travels abroad; one is europamiide <tired of 
Europe), and goes to America; and so on. Finally one indulges in a sentimental 
hope of endless journeyings from star to star." Soren Kierkegaard, Entiveder- 
Oder (Jena, 1911), vol. 1, p. 260 ("The Rotation Method"). 1135 [ J63.2] 

Boredom: "it causes a dizziness like that produced hy looking down into a yawning 
chasm, and this dizziness is infinite." Kierkegaard, Entiveder-Oder, vol. 1, p. 260 
("The Rotation Method"). 336 [J63,3] 

On the Passion of the aesthetic man in Kierkegaard and its foundation in memory: 
"Memory is emphatically the real element of the unhappy man. ... If I imagine a 
man who himself had had no childhood, . . . but who now . . . discovered all the 
beauty that there is in childhood, and who would now remember his own child- 
hood, constantly staring back into that emptiness of the past, then I would have an 
excellent illustration of the truly unhappy man. " Soren Kierkegaard, Entiveder- 
Oder (Jena, 1911), vol. 1 pp. 203-204 ("The Unhappiest Man").' 137 [J63.4] 

Baudelaire's desire to write a book in which he would spew his disgust with 
humanity into its face recalls the passage in which Kierkegaard confesses to using 
the either-or as "an interjection" which he would "shout at mankind, just as boys 
shout 'Yah! Yah!' after a Jew." Kierkegaard, Entweder-Oder (Jena, 1913), vol. 2, 



p. 133 ("Equilibrium between the Aesthetical and the Ethical in the Composition 
of Personality"). 338 [J63.5] 



On the "sectioning of time." "This ... is the most adequate expression for the 
aesthetic existence: it is in the moment. Hence the prodigious oscillations to which 
the man who lives aesthetically is exposed." Kierkegaard, Entiveder-Oder, vol. 2, 
p. 196 ("Equilibrium between the Aesthetical and the Ethical in the Composition 
of Personality"). 339 [J63.6] 

On impotence. Around the middle of the century, the bourgeois class ceases to 
be occupied with the future of the productive forces it has unleashed. (Now 
appear those counterparts to the great Utopias of a More or Campanella, who 
had welcomed the accession of this class and affirmed the identity of its interests 
with the demands of freedom and justice — now appear, that is to say, the Utopias 
of a Bellamy or a Moilin, which are mainly concerned with touching up the 
notion of economic consumption and its incentives.) In order to concern itself 
further with the future of the productive forces which it had set going, the 
bourgeoisie would first of all have had to renounce the idea of private income. 
That the habit of "coziness" so typical of bourgeois comfort around midcentury 
goes together with this lassitude of the bourgeois imagination, that it is one with 
the luxury of "never having to think about how the forces of production must 
develop in their hands" — these things admit of very little doubt. The dream of 
having children is merely a beggarly stimulus when it is not imbued with the 
dream of a new nature of things in which these children might one day live, or for 
which they can struggle. Even the dream of a "better humanity" in which our 
children would "have a better life" is only a sentimental fantasy reminiscent of 
Spitzweg when it is not, at bottom, the dream of a better nature in which they 
would live. (Herein lies the inextinguishable claim of the Fourierist Utopia, a 
claim which Marx had recognized [and which Russia had begun to act on].) The 
latter dream is the living source of the biological energy of humanity, whereas the 
former is only the muddy pond from which the stork draws children. Baude- 
laire's desperate thesis concerning children as the creatures closest to original sin 
is not a bad complement to this image. [ J63a,l] 

Re the dances of death: "Modern artists are far too neglectful of those magnificent 
allegories of the Middle Ages." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 257 ("Salon de 
1859"). 340 [J63a,2] 

It is impotence that makes for the bitter cup of male sexuality. From this impo- 
tence springs Baudelaire's attachment to the seraphic image of woman, as well as 
his fetishism. It follows that Keller's "sin of the poet" — namely, "to invent sweet 
images of women, / such as bitter earth never harbors" 3 " — is certainly not his. 
Keller's women have the sweetness of chimeras. Baudelaire, in his female figures, 
remains precise, and therefore French, because with him the fetishistic and the 
seraphic elements do not coincide, as they always do in Keller. [ J64,l] 



"Of course, Marx antl Engels ironizecl an absolute idealist faith in progress. 
(Engels commends Fourier for having introduced the future disappearance of 
humanity into his reflections on history, as Kant introduced the future disappear- 
ance of the solar system.) In this connection, Engels also makes fun of 'the talk 
about illimitable human perfectibility.'" 3 ' 12 Letter of (Hermann) Duncker to Grete 
Steffin, July 18, 1938. [J64,2] 

The mythic concept of the task of the poet ought to be defined through the 
profane concept of the instrument. — The great poet never confronts his work 
simply as the producer; he is also, at the same time, its consumer. Naturally, in 
contrast to the public, he consumes it not as entertainment but as tool. This 
instrumental character represents a use value that does not readily enter into the 
exchange value. [J64.3] 

On Baudelaire's "Crepuscule du soir": the big city knows no true evening twi- 
light. In any case, the artificial lighting does away with all transition to night. The 
same state of affairs is responsible for the fact that the stars disappear from the 
sky over the metropolis. Who ever notices when they come out? Kant's tran- 
scription of the sublime through "the starry heavens above me and the moral law 
within me" 3 * 3 could never have been conceived in these terms by an inhabitant of 
the big city. [J64.4] 

Baudelaire's spleen is the suffering entailed by the decline of the aura. "Adorable 
Spring has lost its perfume." 3 " [J64,5] 

Mass production is the principal economic cause — and class warfare the principal 
social cause — of the decline of the aura. [ J64a,l] 

De Maistre on the "savage" — a reflection directed against Rousseau: "One need 
only glance at the savage to see the curse written ... on the external form of his 
body. ... A formidable hand weighing on these doomed races wipes out in them 
the two distinctive characteristics of our grandeur: foresight and perfectibility. 
The savage cuts the tree down to gather the fruit; he unyokes the ox that the 
missionary has just entrusted to him, and cooks it with wood from the plow." 
Joseph de Maistre, Les Soirees de Saint-Peter sbour g, ed. Hattier (Paris <1922>), 
p. 23 (second dialogue). 34 "' [J64a,2] 

The Knight in the third dialogue: "I would very much like, though it cost me 
dearly, to discover a truth capable of shocking the whole human race. I would 
state it plainly to everyone's face." Joseph de Maistre, Les Soirees de Saint-Peter s- 
bourg, ed. Hattier, p. 29. [J64a,3] 



"Beware, ahove all, one very common prejudice . . . — namely, the belief that the 
great reputation of a book presupposes an extensive and reasoned knowledge of 
that hook. Such is not the case, I assure you. The great majority are capable of 



judging solely by the lights of a rather small number of men who first deliver an 
opinion. They pass on, and this opinion survives them. The new hooks arriving on 
the scene leave no time for reading any others; and soon these others are judged 
only according to a vague reputation." Joseph de Maistre, Les Soirees de Saint- 
Petersbourg, ed. Hattier (Paris), p. 44 (sixth dialogue). [J64a,4] 

"The whole earth, continually steeped in hlood, is nothing but an immense altar on 
which every living thing must be sacrificed without end, without restraint, without 
respite, until the consummation of the world, the extinction of evil, the death of 
death." De Maistre, Soirees, ed. Hattier, p. 61 (seventh dialogue: "La Guerre"). 346 

[J64a,5] 

The characters in Les Soirees de Saint-Petersbourg: the Knight has felt the influence 
of Voltaire, and the Senator is a mystic, while the Count expounds the doctrine of 
the author himself. [ J64a,6] 

"But do you realize, gentlemen, the source of this fl ood of insolent doctrines which 
unceremoniously judge God and call him to account for his orders? They come to 
us from that great phalanx we call savants dntellectuals> and whom we have not 
been ahle in this age to keep in their place, which is a secondary one. At other 
times, there were very few savants, and a very small minority of this very small 
minority were ungodly; today one sees nothing but savants. It is a profession, a 
crowd, a nation, and among them the already unfortunate exception has become 
the rule. On every side they have usurped a limitless influence; yet if there is one 
thing certain in this world, it is, to my mind, that it is not for science to guide men. 
Nothing necessary for this is entrusted to science. One would have to he out of 
one's mind to believe that God has charged the academies with teaching us what he 
is and what we owe to him. It rests with the prelates, the nobles, the great officers 
of state to be the repositories and guardians of the saving truths, to teach nations 
what is had and what good, what true and what false, in the moral and spiritual 
order. Others have no right to reason on this kind of matter. They have the natural 
sciences to amuse them. What are they complaining ahout?" De Maistre, Les 
Soirees de Saint-Petersbourg, ed. Hattier (Paris), p. 72 (eighth dialogue).''' 7 

[165,1] 

On judicial procedures: "Under the rule of Muslim law, authority punishes, even 
with death, the man it thinks deserves it, at the very moment and place it seizes 
him; this brusque enforcement of the law, which has not lacked blind admirers, is 
nevertheless one of the many proofs of the brutalization and divine censure of 
these peoples. Among us, things are quite different. The culprit must be arrested; 
he must be charged; he must defend himself; he must above all settle his conscience 
and his worldly affairs; practical arrangements for his punishment must be made. 
Finally, to take everything into account, a certain time must he left to take him to 
the appointed place of punishment. The scaffold is an altar; it cannot therefore he 
either set up in a certain place or moved, except by authority. These delays, 



praiseworthy in their very excessiveness, yet still not lacking their hlincl detrac- 
tors, are no less a proof of our superiority." De Maistre, Les Soirees de Saint- 
Petersbourg, ed. Hattier (Paris), p. 78 (tenth dialogue). 3 " 1 [J65,2] 

God appears in de Maistre as mysterium tremendum. 3 ' 15 [ J65,3] 

In the seventh dialogue ("La Guerre"), a series of sentences beginning with the 
formula "War is divine." Among these, one of the most extravagant: "War is 
divine in the protection granted to the great leaders, even the most daring, who 
are rarely struck down in battle." Soirees de Saint-Petersbourg, pp. 61-62, 35 * 

[J65a,l] 

There is, in Baudelaire a latent tension between the destructive and the idyllic 
aspects of death — between its bloody and its palliative nature. [J65a,2] 

Jugendsal phraseology should still be considered progressive in Baudelaire. 

[J65a,3] 

"Destruction's bloody retinue" 351 is the court of allegory. [ J65a,4] 

The historicism of the nineteenth century is the background against which 
Baudelaire's "pursuit of modernity" stands out. (Villemain, Cousin.) [J65a,5] 

So long as there is semblance in history, it will find in nature its ultimate refuge. 
The commodity, which is the last burning-glass of historical semblance <Schein\ 
celebrates its triumph in the fact that nature itself takes on a commodity charac- 
ter. It is this commodity appearance < Warenscheim of nature that is embodied in 
the whore. "Money feeds sensuality," it is said, and this formula in itself affords 
only the barest outline of a state of affairs that reaches well beyond prostitution. 
Under the dominion of the commodity fetish, the sex appeal of the woman is 
more or less tinged with the appeal of the connnodity. It is no accident that the 
relations of the pimp to his girlfriend, whom he sells as an "article" on the 
market, have so inflamed the sexual fantasies of the bourgeoisie. The modem 
advertisement shows, from another angle, to what extent the attractions of the 
woman and those of the commodity can be merged. The sexuality that in former 
times — on a social level — was stimulated through imagining the future of the 
productive forces is mobilized now through imagining the power of capital. 

[J65a,6] 

The circumstance of the new is perhaps nowhere better illuminated than in the 
figure of the flaneur. His thirst for the new is quenched by the crowd, which 
appears self -impelled and endowed with a soul of its own. In fact, this collective is 
nothing but appearance. This "crowd," in which the flaneur takes delight, is just 
the empty mold with which, seventy years later, the Volksgemeinschmft <People's 
Community^ 52 was cast. The flaneur who so prides himself on his alertness, on 



his nonconformity, was in this respect also ahead of his contemporaries', he was 
the first to fall victim to an ignis f atuus which since that time has blinded many 
millions. [ J66,l] 



Baudelaire idealizes the experience of the commodity, in that he ascribes to it, as 
canon, the experience of allegory. [J66,2] 

If it is imagination that presents correspondences to the memory, it is thinking 
that consecrates allegory to it. Memory brings about the convergence of imagina- 
tion and thinking. [J66.3] 

With the new manufacturing processes that lead to imitations, semblance is 
consolidated in the commodity. [J66,4] 

Between the theory of natural correspondences and the repudiation of nature 
exists a contradiction. It is resolved insofar as within the memory impressions 
become detached from individual experiences, so that the long experience stored 
up in those impressions is released and can be fed into the allegorical fundus. <See 
J62a,2.> [J66.5] 

<Stefan> George translated "Spleen et Ideal" by "Triibsinn und Vergeistigung" 
<Melancholy and Spiritualizatiom, thus hitting upon the essential meaning of the 
ideal in Baudelaire. [J66,6] 

With Meryon, die majesty and decrepitude of Paris come into their own. 

[J66.7] 

In the form taken by prostitution in the big cities, the woman appears not only as 
commodity but, in a precise sense, as mass-produced article. This is indicated by 
the masking of individual expression in favor of a professional appearance, such 
as makeup provides. The point is made still more emphatically, later on, by the 
uniformed girls of the music-hall review. [ J66,8] 

Baudelaire's opposition to progress was the indispensable condition for his suc- 
cess at capturing Paris in his poetry. Compared with this poetry, all later big-city 
lyric must be accounted feeble. What it lacks is precisely that reserve toward its 
subject matter which Baudelaire owed to his frenetic hatred of progress. 

[J66a,l] 

In Baudelaire, Paris as an emblem of antiquity contrasts with its masses as an 
emblem of modernity. [ J66a,2] 

On Le Spleen de Paris: news items are the leaven that allows the urban masses to 
rise in Baudelaire's imagination. [ J66a,3] 

Spleen is the feeling that corresponds to catastrophe in permanence. [ J66a,4] 



Itis a very specific experience that the proletariat has in the big city — one in many 
respects similar to that which the immigrant has there. [ J66a,5] 



To the flaneur, his city is — even if, like Baudelaire, he happened to be bom 
there — no longer native ground. It represents for him a theatrical display, an 



arena. [J66a,6] 

Baudelaire never wrote a whore-poem from the point of view of the whore. (But 
compare Brecht, Lesebuch Jur Stadtebewohner, no. 5.) 353 [ J66a,7] 

Preface to Dupont's poems in 1851; essay on Dupont in 1861. [ J66a,8] 



In the erotology of the damned — as that of Baudelaire might be called — infertility 
and impotence are the decisive factors. They alone are what give to the ciuel and 
ill-famed moments of desire in sexual life a purely negative character — something 
that is lost, it goes without saying, in the act of procreation, as in relations de- 
signed to last an entire lifetime (that is, in marriage) . These realities instituted for 
the long term — children, marriage — would lack all assurance of longevity, had 
not the most destructive energies of the human being entered into their creation, 
contributing to their stability not less but more than many another energy. But 
these relations are legitimated, through this contribution, only to the extent that 
this is really possible for decisive libidinal movements in present-day society. 

[J66a,9] 

The social value of marriage rests decidedly on its longevity, insofar as this latter 
holds within it the idea of an ultimate and definitive — if continually deferred — 
"confrontation" of the spouses. From this confrontation the couple are preserved 
so long as the marriage itself lasts — which is to say, in principle, for the rest of 
their lives. [J67,l] 

Relation between commodity and allegory: "value," as the natural burning-glass 
of semblance in history, outshines "meaning." Its luster <Schein> is more difficult 
to dispel. It is, moreover, the very newest. In the Baroque age, the fetish character 
of the commodity was still relatively undeveloped. And the commodity had not 
yet so deeply engraved its stigma — the proletarianization of the producers — on the 
process of production. Allegorical perception could thus constitute a style in the 
seventeenth century, in a way that it no longer could in the nineteenth. Baude- 
laire as allegorist was entirely isolated. He sought to recall the experience of the 
commodity to an allegorical experience. In this, he was doomed to founder, and 
it became clear that the relentlessness of his initiative was exceeded by the relent- 
lessness of reality. Hence a strain in his work that feels pathological or sadistic 
only because it missed out on reality — though just by a hair. [J67,2] 

It is one and the same historical night at the onset of which the owl of Minerva 
(with Hegel) begins its flight and Eros (with Baudelaire) lingers before the empty 
pallet, torch extinguished, dreaming of bygone embraces. [J67,3] 



The experience of allegory, which holds fast to ruins, is properly the experience 
of eternal transience. [ J67,4] 



Prostitution can lay claim to being considered "work" the moment work be- 
comes prostitution. In fact, the lorette 35 ' 1 was the first to carry out a radical renun- 
ciation of the costume of lover. She already arranges to be paid for her time; from 
there, it is only a short distance to those who demand "wages." [ J67,5] 



Already at work in Jugendstil is the bourgeois tendency to set nature and technol- 
ogy in mutual opposition, as absolute antitheses. Thus, Futurism will later give 
to technology a destructive antinatural accent; in Jugendstil, the energies des- 
tined to operate in this direction are beginning to unfold. The idea of a world 
bewitched and, as it were, denatured by technological development informs a 
good many of its creations. [ J67,6] 

The prostitute does not sell her labor power; her job, however, entails the fiction 
that she sells her powers of pleasure. Insofar as this represents the utmost exten- 
sion attainable by the sphere of the commodity, the prostitute may be considered, 
from early on, a precursor of commodity capitalism. But precisely because the 
commodity character was in other respects undeveloped, this aspect did not need 
to stand out so glaringly as would subsequently be the case. As a matter of fact, 
prostitution in the Middle Ages does not, for example, display the crudeness that 
in the nineteenth century would become the rule. [J67a,l] 

The tension between emblem and commercial logo makes it possible to measure 
the changes that have taken place in the world of things since the seventeenth 
century. [J67a,2] 

Strong fixations of die sense of smell, such as Baudelaire seems to have known, 
could make fetishism likely. [J67a,3] 

The new ferment that enters into the taedium vitae and turns it to spleen is 
self -estrangement. [J67a,4] 

Hollowing out of the inner life. Of the infinite regress of reflection that, in Ro- 
manticism, in a spirit of play, both expanded the space of life in ever-widening 
circles and reduced it within ever narrower frames, there remained to Baudelaire 
only the "somber and lucid exchange" with himself, as he represents it in the 
image of a conversation between the jack of hearts and the queen of spades in an 
old pack of cards. Later, Jules Renard will say: "His heart . . . more alone than 
an ace of hearts in the middle of a deck of cards ." 3r ' r> [J67a,5] 



There may well be die closest connection between the allegorical imagination 
and the imagination put in thrall to thinking during hashish intoxication. At 



work in the latter are different sorts of powers: a genius of melancholy gravity, 
another of Ariel-like spirituality. [J67a,6] 



In view of its position immediately after "La Destruction," <in Les Flews du mal,> 
"Une Martyre" is rich in associations. The allegorical intention has done its work 
on this martyr: she is in pieces. [J67a,7] 

In "La Mort des amants," correspondences weave away without any hint of al- 
legorical intention. Sob and smile — as cloud formations of the human face — min- 
gle in the tercets. Villiers de l'lsle-Adam saw in this poem, according to a letter he 
wrote to Baudelaire, the application of the latter's "musical theories." [ J67a,8] 

"La Destruction" on the demon: "he fills my burning lungs / with sinful cravings 
never satisfied." 356 The lung as the seat of desire is the boldest intimation of 
desire's unrealizability that can be imagined. Compare the invisible stream in 
"Benediction." [J68.1] 

Of all the Baudelairean poems, "La Destruction" comprises the most relentless 
elaboration of the allegorical intention. The "bloody retinue," which the poet is 
forced by the demon to contemplate, is the court of allegory — the scattered 
apparatus by dint of which allegory has so disfigured and so unsettled the world 
of things that only the fragments of that world are left to it now, as object of its 
brooding. The poem breaks off abruptly; it itself gives the impression — doubly 
surprising in a sonnet — of something fragmentary. [ J68,2] 

Compare "Le Vin des chiffonniers" with "Dans ce Cabriolet," by Sainte-Beuve 
(<Les Consolations,) vol. 2 [Paris, 1863], p. 193): 

Seated in this cabriolet, I examine the man 

Who drives me, the man who's little more than machine, 

Hideous with his thick beard, his long matted hair: 

Vice and wine and sleep weigh down his sottish eyes. 

How far then, I thought, can humanity sink? 

And I draw hack to the other corner of the seat. 

The poet goes on to ask himself whether his own soul is not just as unkempt as the 
soul of the coachman. Baudelaire mentions this poem in his letter of January 15, 
1866, to Sainte-Beuve. 3 " [J68.3] 

The ragpicker is the most provocative figure of human misery. "Ragtag" <Lump- 
enproletarien in a double sense: clothed in rags and occupied with rags. "Here 
we have a man whose job it is to pick up the day's rubbish in the capital. He 
collects and catalogues everything that the great city has cast off, everything it 
has lost, and discarded, and broken. He goes through the archives of debauchery, 
and the jumbled array of refuse. He makes a selection, an intelligent choice; like 
a miser hoarding treasure, he collects the garbage that will become objects of 
utility or pleasure when refurbished by Industrial magic" ("Du Vin et du 



haschisch," Oeuvres, vol. 1, pp. 249-250). As may be gathered from this prose 
description of 1851, Baudelaire recognizes himself in the figure of the ragman. 
The poem presents a further affinity with the poet, immediately noted as such: "a 
ragpicker stumbles past, wagging his head / and bumping into walls with a poet's 
grace, / pouring out his heartfelt schemes to one / and all, including spies of the 
police." 358 [J68.4] 

Much can be said on behalf of the supposition that "Le Vin des chiffonniers" was 
written around the time of Baudelaire's espousal of "beautiful utility." (The 
question cannot be settled with any certainty, because the poem first appeared in 
the book edition of Le s Fleurs du mal. — "Le Vin de l'assassin" was published for 
the first time in 1848 — in L'Echo des marchands de vins!) The ragpicker poem 
strenuously disavows the reactionary pronouncements of its author. The criti- 
cism on Baudelaire has overlooked this poem. [J68a,l] 

"Believe me, the wine of the barrieres has effectively preserved the shocks to 
which governmental structures have been subject." Edouard Foucaud, Paris in- 
venteur: Physiologie del'industrief ranqaise (Paris, 1844), p. 10. [J68a,2] 

Apropos of "Le Vin des chiffonniers": "There's brass in our pockets, / Pierre, 
let's go on a hinge; / On Mondays, you know, / I love to knock ahout. / I know of a 
wine for two sous / That's not half bad, / And so, let's go have some fun, / Let's 
walk up to the barriered H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Les Refrains de la rue, de 
1830 a 1870 (Paris, 1879), p. 56. [J68a,3] 

Travies often drew the type of the ragpicker. [ J68a,4] 

The son of the proletarian figures in "L'Ame du vin" with the words, "this frail 
athlete of life"' 59 — an infinitely sad correspondence of modernity and antiquity. 

[J68a,5] 

With regard to the "sectioning of time": the hidden construction of "Le Vin des 
amants" is grounded in the fact that only rather far along does the now surpris- 
ing light fall on the situation at hand: the ecstatic drunkenness which the lovers 
owe to the wine is a morning drunkenness. "Into the blue crystal of the morn- 
ing" 360 — this is the seventh line of this f ourteen-line poem. [ J68a,6] 

In the situation of the lovers "cradled gently on the wing / of the conniving 
whirlwind," 361 it is not far-fetched to hear a reminiscence of Fourier. "The whirl- 
winds of planetary spheres," we read in Silberling's Dictionnaire de sociologie pha- 
lansterienne (Paris, 1911), p. 433, "so measured in their motion that at any one 
moment they pass over billions of places — are, in our eyes, the seal of divine 
justice on the fluctuations of matter" (Fourier, Themie en concret ou positive, 
p. 320). [J68a,7] 



Baudelaire builds stanzas where it would seem almost impossible to construct 
them. Thus, in the sixth stanza of "Lesbos:" "ambitious hearts / that yearn, far 
from us, for a radiant smile / they dimly glimpse on the rim of other skies!" 362 

[J68a,8] 

On the desecration of the clouds : "Wandering a wasteland at high noon / . . . I 
saw a dismal stormcloud bearing down / upon my head, bristling with vicious 
imps" 363 — this is a conception that could stem directly from a print by Meryon. 

[J69.1] 

It is rare in French poetry that the big city is evoked through nothing but the 
immediate presentation of its inhabitants. This occurs with unsurpassable power 
in Shelley's poem on London <cited in M18>. (Wasn't Shelley's London more 
populous than the Paris of Baudelaire?) In Baudelaire, one encounters merely 
traces of a similar perception — though a good many traces. In few of his poems, 
however, is the metropolis portrayed so exclusively in terms of what it makes of 
its inhabitants as in "Spleen I." This poem shows in a veiled way how the soulless 
masses of the big city and the hopelessly depleted existence of individuals come 
to complement one another. The first is represented by the cemetery and the 
suburbs — mass assemblages of citizens ; the second, by the jack of hearts and the 
queen of spades. [J69.2] 

The hopeless decrepitude of the big city is felt particularly keenly in the first 
stanza of "Spleen I." [ J69.3] 

In the opening poem of Les Flews du mat, Baudelaire accosts the public in a most 
unusual fashion. He cozies up to them, if not exactly in a cozy vein. You could say 
he gathers his readers about him like a camarilla. [J69,4] 

The awareness of time's empty passage and the taedium vitae are the two weights 
that keep the wheels of melancholy going. In this regard, the last poem of the 
"Spleen et ideal" sequence corresponds exactly to the sequence "La Mort." 

[J69.5] 

The poem "L'Horloge" <The Clock> takes the allegorical treatment quite far. 
Grouped about the clock, which occupies a special position in the hierarchy of 
emblems, are Pleasure, the Now, Time, Chance, Virtue, and Repentance. (On 
the sylphid, compare the "wretched theater" in "L'Irreparable," 301 and on the inn, 
the auberge in the same poem.) [J69,6] 

Tiie "grotesque and livid sky" of "Horreur sympathique" 365 is the sky of Meryon. 

[J69,7] 



On the "sectioning of time," and on "L'Horloge" in particular, Poe's "Colloquy of 
Monos and Una": "There seemed to have sprung up in the brain that of which 



no words could convey to the merely human intelligence even an indistinct 
conception. Let me term it a mental pendulous pulsation. It was the moral 
embodiment of man's abstract idea of Time. ... By its aid I measured the irregu- 
larities of the clock upon the mantel, and of the watches of the attendants. Their 
tickings came sonorously to my ears. The slightest deviation from the true pro- 
portion . . . affected me just as violations of abstract truth are wont, on earth, to 
affect the moral sense" (Edgar Allan Poe, Nouvett.es Histoires extraordinaires <Paris, 
1886>, pp. 336-337). 366 This description is nothing but one great euphemism for 
the utter void of time to which man is surrendered in spleen. [J69a,l] 

". . . until night / voluptuously reaches for / the horizon, consoling all — / even 
hunger, concealing all — / even shame" ("La Fin de la journee") 367 — this is the 
summer lightning of social conflicts in the night sky of the metropolis. [ J69a,2] 

"You seem, for setting off my darkness, more / mockingly to magnify the space / 
which bars me from those blue immensities" (" l Je t'adore a l'egal . . ."). Juxta- 
pose: "And the human face — which Ovid thought was made to mirror the stars — 
see it now, no longer expressing anything but a crazy ferocity, or rigid in a kind of 
death!" {Oeu.vres, vol. 2, p. 628 ["Fusees," no. 3]). 3 «" [J69a,3] 

In studying the allegorical in the work of Baudelaire, it would be a mistake to 
undervalue the medieval element in relation to the Baroque. It is something 
difficult to describe, but may be grasped most readily if we recall how very much 
certain passages, certain poems ("Vers pour le portrait de M. Honore Daumier," 
"LAvertisseur," "Le Squelette Laboureur"), in their pregnant simplicity, contrast 
with others that are overburdened with meanings. This bareness gives them the 
sort of expression one finds in portraits by Fouquet. [J69a,4] 

A Blanquist look at the terrestrial globe: "I contemplate from on high the globe in 
its rondure, / and I no longer seek there the shelter of a hut" ("Le G«ut du 
neant"). WJ The poet has made his dwelling in space itself, one could say — or in the 
abyss. [J69a,5] 

Representations pass before the melancholic slowly, as in a procession. This 
image, typical in this complex of symptoms, is rare in Baudelaire. It occurs in 
"Horreur sympathique": "your vast mourning clouds / are the hearses of my 
dreams." 37 ' [J70,l] 

"Then all at once the raging bells break loose, / hurling to heaven their awful 
caterwaul" ("Spleen IV"). 371 The sky that is assailed by the bells is the same in 
which Blanqui's speculations move. [J70,2] 



"Behind the scenes, the frivolous decors / of all existence, deep in the abyss, / 
I see distinctly other, brighter worlds" ("La Voix"). Tbese are the worlds of 



L'Eternite par les astres. Compare "Le Gouffre" <The Abyss>: "my windows open 
on Infinity." 372 [J70.3] 



If we bring together "L'Irremediable" with the poem Mouquet attributed to 
Baudelaire, "Un Jour de pluie" <A Rainy Day>, then it becomes quite clear that 
what inspires Baudelaire is the state of surrender to the abyss, and we see also just 
where this abyss actually opens. The Seine localizes "Un Jour de pluie" in Paris. 
Of this locale we read: "In a fog heavy with poisonous vapors, / men are buried 
like sneaking reptiles; / though proud of their strength, they stumble blindly 
along /more painfully with each step" (vol. 1, p. 212). In "L'Irremediable," this 
image of the Parisian streets has become one of the allegorical visions of the abyss 
which the conclusion of the poem describes as "apt emblems": "A soul in torment 
descending / . . . into an echoing cavern / ... of vigilant slimy monsters / whose 
luminous eyes enforce / the gloom" (vol. 1, pp. 92-93). 373 [J70.4] 

Apropos of the catalogue of emblems presented by the poem "L'Irremediable," 
Crepet cites a passage fromcle Maistre's Soirees de Saint-Peter sbour g: "That river 
which one crosses hut once; that pitcher of the Danaid es, ahvays full and always 
empty; that liver of Tityus, ahvays regenerated under the beak of the vulture that 
ahvays devours it anew, . . . — these are so many speaking hieroglyphs, about 
which it is impossible to he mistaken." 374 [J70,5] 

The gesture of benediction, with outstretched arms, in Fidus (also in J?arat/ius- 
&*.*) — the gesture of someone carrying something. [J70,6] 

From the draft of an epilogue to the second edition of Les Fleurs du mal: "your 
magic cobbles piled for harricadcs, / your cheap orators' baroque rhetoric, / 
ranting of love while your sewers run with blood, / swirling to hell like mighty 
rivers" (vol. 1, p. 229). 3 " [J70a,l] 

"Benediction" presents the poet's path in life as Passion: "he sings the very 
stations of his cross." In places, the poem distantly recalls the fantasy in which 
Apollinaire, in Le Poete assassine (ch. 16), has imagined the extermination of poets 
by unbridled philistines: "and blinding flashes of his intellect / keep him from 
noticing the angry mob." 370 [J70a,2] 

A Blanquist look at humanity (and, at the same time, one of the few verses by 
Baudelaire that unveils a cosmic aspect) : "the Sky! black lid of that enormous pot 
/ in which innumerable generations boil" ("Le Couvercle"). 3 " [J70a,3] 

It is, above all, the "recollections" to which the "familiar eye" 37 " appertains. (This 
gaze, which is none other than the gaze of certain portraits, brings Poe to mind.) 

[J70a,4] 



"On solemn eves of Heavenly harvesting" ("L'lmprevu") 379 — an autumnal Ascen- 
sion. [J70a,5] 



"Cybele, qui les aime, augmente ses verdures" 380 — in Brecht's beautiful transla- 
tion: "Cybele, die sie liebt, legt mehr Grim vor" ("Cybele, who loves them, 
shows more green"). A mutation of the organic is implicit here. [J70a,6] 

"Le Gouffre" is the Baudelairean equivalent of Blanqui's "vision." [J70a,7] 

"O worms, black cronies without eyes or ears" 381 — here is something like sympa- 
thy for parasites. [J70a,8] 



Comparison of eyes to illuminated shopwindows: "Your eyes, lit up like shops to 
lure their trade / or fireworks in the park on holidays, / insolently make use of 
borrowed power" ("Tu mettrais l'univers"). 382 [J70a,9] 



Concerning "La Servante au grand coeur": the words, "of whom you were so 
jealous,™' 1 in the first line, do not bear precisely the accent one would expect. The 
voice, as it were, draws back from jalouse. Tliis ebbing of the voice is something 
extremely characteristic. (Remark of Pierre Leyris.) [ J70a,10] 

The sadistic imagination tends toward mechanical constructions. It may be that, 
when he speaks of the "nameless elegance of the human armature ," Baudelaire 
sees in the skeleton a kind of machinery. The point is made more clearly in "Le 
Vin de F assassin": "That bunch! They feel about as much / as plowshares break- 
ing ground — / plow or harrow! Which of them / has ever known True Love." 
And, unequivocally: "Blind and deaf machine, fertile in cruelties" ("Tu mettrais 
l'univers"). 31 " [J71.1] 



"Old-fashioned" and "immemorial" are still united in Baudelaire. The <things> 
that have gone out of fashion have become inexhaustible containers of memo- 
ries. It is thus the old women appear in Baudelaire's poetry ("Les Petites 
Vieilles"); thus the departed years ("Recueillement") ; it is thus the poet compares 
himself to a "stale boudoir where old-fashioned clothes / lie scattered among 
wilted fern and rose" ("Spleen II"). 385 [J71.2] 



Sadism and fetishism intertwine in those imaginations that seek to annex all 
organic life to the sphere of the inorganic. "O living matter, henceforth you're no 
more / Than a cold stone encompassed by vague fear / And by the desert, and 
the mist and sun" ("Spleen II"). 386 The assimilation of the living to dead matter 
was likewise a preoccupation of Flaubert's. The visions of his Saint Anthony are 
a triumph of fetishism, and worthy of those celebrated by Bosch on the Lisbon 
altar. [J71.3] 



If "Le Crepuscule du matin" opens with the sound of reveille in the barrack 
squares, one must remember that under Napoleon III, for reasons easy to under- 
stand, the interior of the city was filled with barracks. [ J71,4] 



Smile and sob, as cloud formation of the human face, are an unsuipassable 
manifestation of its spirituality. [ J71,5] 

In "Reve parisien," the forces of production are seemingly brought to a standstill, 
put out of commission. The landscape of this dream is the dazzling mirage of the 
leaden and desolate terrain that in "De Profundis clamavi" becomes the universe. 
"A frozen sun hangs overhead six months; / the other six, the earth is in its 
shroud — / no trees, no water, not one creature here, / a wasteland naked as the 
polar north!" 387 [J71,6] 

The phantasmagoria of "Reve parisien" recalls that of the world exhibitions, 
where the bourgeoisie cried out to the order of property and production their 
"Abide, you are so fair!" 3 * 8 [J71.7] 

Proust on "granting a kind of glory to the crowd": "It would seem impossible to 
better that." 389 [J71a,l] 

"And which, on those golden evenings when you feel yourself revive" 3 ™ — the second 
half of the line collapses on itself. Prosodically, it works to contradict what it 
affirms. This is, for Baudelaire, a characteristic procedure. [J71a,2] 

"Whose name is known only to the buried prompter" 391 — this comes from the 
world of Poe (compare "Remords posthume," "Le Mort joyeux"). [J71a,3] 

The only place in Le Flews du mal where the Baudelairean view of children is 
contravened is the fifth stanza of the first section of "Les Petites Vieilles": "the 
eyes of a child, a little girl who laughs / in sacred wonder at whatever shines!" 395 
To arrive at this outlook on childhood, the poet takes the longest way — the way 
leading through old age. [J71a,4] 

In Baudelaire's work, poems 99 and 100 of Les Fleurs du mal stand apart — as 
strange and solitary as the great stone gods of Easter Island. We know that they 
belong to the oldest parts of the text; Baudelaire himself pointed them out to his 
mother as poems referring to her, poems to which he had given no title because 
any advertisement of this secret connection was odious to him. What these 
poems mark out is a death-tranced idyll. Both, but especially the first, breathe an 
air of peace such as rarely obtains in Baudelaire. Both present the image of the 
fatherless family; the son, however, far from occupying the place of the father, 
leaves it empty. The distant sun that is setting in the first poem is the symbol of 
the father, of him whose gaze — "huge open eye in the curious sky" :i ' ):i — lingers 



without jealousy, sympathetic and remote, on the meal shared by mother and 
son. The second poem evokes the image of the fatherless family situated not 
around a table but around a grave. The sultriness of life pregnant with possibili- 
ties has entirely yielded to the cool night air of death. [J71a,5] 

The 'Tableaux parisiens" begin with a transfiguration of the city. The first, 
second, and, if you like, third poem of the cycle work together in this. "Paysage" 
is the city 5 s tete-a-tete with the sky. The only elements of the city to appear on the 
poet's horizon are the "workshop full of singing and gossip, and the chinmey- 
pots and steeples." 39 ' 1 Then "Le Soleil" adds the suburbs; nothing of the urban 
masses enters into the first three poems of "Tableaux parisiens." The fourth 
begins with an evocation of the Louvre, but it passes immediately, in the middle 
of the second stanza, into lamentation over the perishability of the great city. 

[J72,l] 

"Drawings to which the gravity/ and learning of some forgotten artist/. . . / 
have communicated beauty" 395 — la Beaute appears here, thanks to the definite 
article, as sober and "impassive." It has become the allegory of itself. [J72,2] 

On "Brumes et pluies" <Mists and Rains>: the city has become strange to the 
flaneur, and every bed "hazardous." 3 ™ (Multitude of night lodgings for Baude- 
laire.) [J72,3] 

We may be surprised to find the poem "Brumes et pluies" among "Tableaux 
parisiens." It verges on imagery of the country. But already Sainte-Beuve had 
written: "Oh, how sad the plain around the boulevard!" ("La Plaine, octobre," 
mentioned by Baudelaire centre Sainte-Beuve on January 15, 1866}. 397 The land- 
scape of Baudelaire's poem is, in fact, that of the city plunged in fog. It is the 
preferred canvas for the embroideries of boredom. [ J72,4] 

"Le Cygne" <The Swam has the movement of a cradle rocking back and forth 
between modernity and antiquity. In his notes, Baudelaire writes: "Conceive a 
sketch for a lyrical or fairy boitffbnnerie, a pantomime. . . . Steep the whole in an 
abnormal, dreamy atmosphere — the atmosphere of great days. Let there be some- 
thing lulling about it" ("Fusees," no. 22). 398 These great days are the days of 
recurrence. [J72,5] 

On the "foul demons in the atmosphere" : 389 they return as the "demons of the 
cities" in Georg Heym. They are grown more violent but, because they disclaim 
their resemblance to the "businessmen," they mean less. [ J72,6] 

Closing stanza of "Die Diimonen der Stiidte" <Demons of the Cities), hy Heym: 



But the demons are growing colossal. 

The horns on their heads draw hlood from the sky. 



Earthquakes ruinhle in the belly of the cities 
Beneath their hooves, lire in their wake. 



GeorgHeym, Dichtungen (Munich, 1922), p. 19. [J72a,l] 

"Je t'adore a l'egal de la voute nocturne" <I adore you no less than the vault of 
Nighty 100 — nowhere more clearly than in this poem is Sexus played off against 
Eros. One must turn from this poem to Goethe's "Selige Sehnsucht" <Blessed 
Longingy 101 to see, by comparison, what powers are conferred on the imagination 
when the sexual is joined with the erotic. [J72a,2] 

"Sonnet d'automne" describes, in a reserved but scrupulous way, the state of 
being that conditions Baudelaire's erode experiences: "My heart, on which 
everything jars, / . . . /is unwilling to disclose its hellish secret, / . . . /I hate all 
passion . . . / Let us love each other gently." This is like a distant reprise of the 
stanza in the West-Ostlicher Divan where Goethe conjures out of the houris and 
their poet an image of the erotic as a sort of paradisal variant of sexuality: "Their 
friendship reward his endeavor, / Compliant with sweet devotions, / Let him live 
with them forever: / All the good have modest notions." 402 [J72a,3] 

Marx on the Second Repuhlic: "Passions without truth, truths without passion; 
heroes without heroic deeds, history without events; development, whose sole 
driving force seems to he the calendar, wearying with constant repetition of the 
same tensions and relaxations. ... If any section of history has been painted gray 
on gray, it is this." Karl Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire des Louis Bonaparte, ed. 
Rjazanov (Vienna and Berlin <1927>), pp. 45-46. 403 [J72a,4] 

The opposite poles of the Baudelairean sensibility find their symbols equally in 
the skies. The leaden, cloudless sky symbolizes sensuality in thrall to the fetish; 
cloud formations are the symbol of sensuality spiritualized. [ J72a,5] 

Engels to Marx on Decemher 3, 1851: "For today, at any rate, the ass is as free . . . 
as the old man on the evening of the Eighteenth Brumaire, so completely unre- 
strained that he can't help exposing his asinine self in all directions. Appalling 
perspective of no resistance!" 101 (Karl Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire des Louis 
Bonaparte, ed. Rjazanov [Vienna and Berlin], p. 9). [ J73,l] 

Engels to Marx on December 1 1, 1851: "If, this time, the proletariat failed to fight 
en masse, it was because it was fully aware of its own . . . impotence and was 
prepared to suhmit with fatalistic resignation to a renewed cycle of Republic, 
Empire, restoration, and fresh revolution, until ... it regained fresh strength"' 105 
(Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, p. 10). [J73,2] 

"As is known, May 15 [1848] had no other result save that of removing Blanqui 
and his comrades — that is, the real leaders of the proletarian party, the revolu- 



tionary communists — from the public stage for the entire duration of the cycle." 
Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, ed. Rjazanov, p. 28.' lur, [ J73,3] 



America's spirit world enters into the description of the crowd in Poe. Marx 
speaks of the republic which in Europe "signifies, in general, only the political 
form of revolution of bourgeois society and not its conservative form of life — as, 
for example, in the United States of North America, where . . . classes . . . have 
not yet become fixed, . . . where the modern means of production . . . compen- 
sate for the relative deficiency of heads and hands, and where, finally, the fever- 
ish, youthful movement of material production . . . has left neither time nor 
opportunity for abolishing the old spirit world." Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, 
p. 30. iW It is remarkable that Marx invokes the world of spirits to help explain the 
American republic. [J73,4] 

If the crowd is a veil, then the journalist draws it about him, exploiting his 
numerous connections like so many seductive arrangements of the cloth. 

[J73.5] 

The revolutionary by-elections of March 10, 1850, sent to the parliament in Paris 
an exclusively social-democratic mandate. But these elections would find "a senti- 
mental commentary in the April by-election, the election of Eugene Sue." Marx, 
Der achtzehnte Brumaire, p. 68.*°" [ J73,6] 

Apropos of "Le Crepuscule du matin." Marx sees in Napoleon III "a man who does 
not decide by night in order to execute by day, but who decides by day and exe- 
cutes by night." Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, ed. Rjazanov, p. 79. 409 [J73a,l] 

Apropos of "Le Crepuscule du matin": "Paris is full of rumors of a coup d'etat. 
The capital is to be filled with troops during the night; the nextmorningis to bring 
decrees." Quoted from the European daily press of September and October 1851. 
Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, p. 105. 110 [J73a,2] 

Marx calls the leaders of the Paris proletariat the "barricade commanders." Der 
achtzehnte Brumaire, p. 113. 111 [J73a,3] 

Sainte-Beuve's remark about Lamartine, whose poems represented the sky over 
Andre Chenier's landscapes (J51a,3), should be compared with the words of 
Marx: "While, in its accord with society, in its dependence on natural forces and 
its submission to the authority which protected it from above, the small holding 
that had newly come into being was naturally religious, the small holding that is 
ruined by debts, at odds with society and authority, and driven beyond its own 
limitations naturally becomes irreligious. Heaven was quite a pleasing accession 
to the narrow strip of land just won, more particularly as it makes the weather; it 
becomes an insult as soon as it is thrust forward as substitute for the small 
holding." Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, p. 122. 112 Sainte-Beuve's analogy, com- 



bined with this passage from Marx, provides the key to the character and dura- 
tion of the political influence which Lamartine derived from his poetry. Com- 
pare, in this connection, his negotiations with the Russian ambassador, as 
reported by Pokrovski <cited in dl2,2>. [J73a,4] 

Ambiguity of the heroic in the figure of the poet: the poet has about him some- 
thing of the destitute soldier, something of the marauder. His fencing <Fechten> 
often recalls the meaning of this word 413 in the argot of vagabonds. [J73a,5] 

Marx on the parasitic creatures of the Second Empire: "Lest they make a mistake 
in the years, they count the minutes." Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, p. 126. 114 

[J73a,6] 

Ambiguity of that conception of the heroic which is hidden in the Baudelairean 
image of the poet. "The culminating point of the idees napoleoniennes is the pre- 
ponderance of the army. The army was the point d'honneur of the small-holding 
peasants; it was they themselves transformed into heroes. . . . But the enemies 
against whom the French peasant has now to defend his property are . . . the tax 
collectors. The small holding lies no longer in the so-called fatherland, but in the 
register of mortgages. The army itself is no longer the flower of the peasant 
youth; it is the swamp-flower of the peasant lumpenproletariat. It consists in large 
measure of remplacants, of substitutes, just as the second Bonaparte is himself 
only a remplagant, the substitute for Napoleon. . . . One see that ALL idees 
napoleoniennes are ideas of the undeveloped small holding in the freshness of its 
youth; for the small holding that has outlived its day, they are an absurdity." 
Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, ed. Rjazanov, pp. 122-123." 5 [J74,l] 

On Satanism: "When the puritans at the Council of Constance complained of the 
dissolute lives of the popes . . ., Cardinal Pierre d'Ailly thundered at them: 'Only 
the devil in person can still save the Catholic church, and you ask for angels.' In 
like manner, after the coup d'etat, the French bourgeoisie cried: Only the chief of 
the Society of December 10 can still save bourgeois society! Only theft can still save 
property! Only perjury can save religion! Only bastardy can save the family! Only 
disorder can save order!" Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, ed. Rjazanov, 
p. 124. 415 [J74,2] 

"One can visualize clearly this upper stratum of the Society of December 10, if one 
reflects that Veron-Crevel is its preacher of morals and Granier de Cassagnac its 
thinker." Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire, ed. Rjazanov, p. 127. 1,7 [J74,3] 

The "magic cobbles piled for barricades," in Baudelaire's draft of an epilogue," 8 
define the limit which his poetry encounters in its immediate confrontation with 
social subjects. The poet says nothing of the hands which move these cobble- 
stones. In "Le Vin des chiffonniers," he was able to pass beyond this limit. 

[J74,4] 



Closing lines of "Le Vin des chiffonniers," in the version of 1852: "Already God 
had given them sweet sleep; / He added wine, divine son of the sun." The distinc- 
tion between God and man ("Man added wine . . .") dates from 1857. [J74a,l] 

In the last section of "Salon de 1846" (section 18, "De 1'Heroisme de la vie 
moderne"), suicide appears, characteristically, as a "particular passion" — the 
only one, among those mentioned, of any real significance. It represents the great 
conquest of modernity in the realm of passion: "Except for Hercules on Mount 
Oeta, Cato of Utica, and Cleopatra, . . . what suicides do you see in the paintings 
of the old masters?" Ch. B., Oeuures, vol. 2, pp. 133-134. 119 Suicide appears, then, 
as the quintessence of modernity. [ J74a,2] 

In section 17 of "Salon de 1846," Baudelaire speaks of "the funereal and rumpled 
frock coat of today" (p. 136); and, before that, of this "uniform livery of mourn- 
ing": "Do not these puckered creases, playing like serpents around the mortified 
flesh, have their own mysterious grace?" (p. 134). Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2.' B0 

[J74a,3] 



Nietzsche on the winter of 1882-1883, on the Bay of Bapallo: "Mornings, I would 
walk in a southerly direction on the splendid road to Zoagli, going up past pines 
with a magnificent view of the sea; in the afternoon, ... I walked around the whole 
bay ... all the way to Portofino. This place and this scenery came even closer to 
my heart because of the great love that Emperor Frederick III felt for them. ... It 
was on these two walks that the whole of Zarathustra I occurred to me, and 
especially Zarathustra himself as a type. Rather, he overtook me." Friedrich 
Nietzsche, Also Sprach Zarathustra, ed. Kroner (Leipzig), pp. xx-xxi. Compare 
this with a description of the Fort du Taureau. ' 21 [J74a,4] 

Against the background of his "philosophy of the noontide" — the doctrine of 
eternal recurrence — Nietzsche defines the earlier stages of his thinking as philoso- 
phy of the dawn and philosophy of the morning. He, too, knows the "sectioning 
of time" and its great divisions. It is certainly legitimate to ask whether this 
apperception of time was not an element of Jugendstil. If in fact it was, then we 
would perhaps better understand how, in Ibsen, Jugendstil produced one of the 
greatest technicians of the drama. [J74a,5] 

The closer work comes to prostitution, the more tempting it is to conceive of 
prostitution as work — something that has been customaiy in the argot of whores 
for a long time now. Tliis rapprochement has advanced by giant steps in the 
wake of unemployment; the "Keep smiling" '" maintains, on the job market, the 
practice of the prostitute who, on the love market, flashes a smile at tire customer. 

[J75.1] 



The description of the labor process in its relation to nature will necessarily bear 
the imprint of its social structure as well. If the human being were not authentically 



exploited, we would be spared the inauthentic talk of an exploitation of nature. 
This talk reinforces the semblance of "value," which accrues to raw materials 
only by virtue of an order of production founded on the exploitation of human 
labor. Wfere this exploitation to come to a halt, work, in turn, could no longer be 
characterized as the exploitation of nature by man. It would henceforth be con- 
ducted on the model of children's play, which in Fourier forms the basis of the 
"impassioned work" of the Harmonians. To have instituted play as the canon of 
a labor no longer rooted in exploitation is one of the great merits of Fourier. Such 
work inspirited by play aims not at the propagation of values but at the ameliora- 
tion of nature. For it, too, the Fourierist Utopia furnishes a model, of a sort to be 
found realized in the games of children. It is the image of an earth on which every 
place has become an inn. The double meaning of the word <Wirtschifi> blossoms 
here: all places are worked by human hands, made useful and beautiful thereby; 
all, however, stand, like a roadside inn, open to all. An earth that was cultivated 
according to such an image would cease to be part of "a world where action is 
never the sister of dream." 123 On that earth, the act would be kin to the dream. 

[J75.2] 

Fashion determines, in each case, the acceptable limit of empathy. [ J75,3] 

The unfolding of work in play presupposes highly developed forces of produc- 
tion, such as only today stand at the disposal of humanity, and stand mobilized in 
a direction contrary to their possibilities — that is, they are poised for an emer- 
gency. Nevertheless, even in times of relatively undeveloped productivity, the 
murderous idea of the exploitation of nature, which has ruled over things since 
the nineteenth century, was in no sense determinative. Certainly tliis idea could 
have no place so long as the prevailing image of nature was that of the minister- 
ing mother, as reflected in Bachofen's conception of matriarchal societies. In the 
figure of the mother, tliis image has survived the inconstancies of history, though 
it obviously has grown more blurred during those periods in which mothers 
themselves become agents of the class that risks the life of their sons for its 
commercial interests. There is much to suggest that the second marriage of 
Baudelaire's mother was not made any more bearable for him by the fact that she 
elected to marry a general. This marriage evidently has a share in the evolution 
of the poet's libido; if the whore became the mastering image of the latter, this 
marriage plays its part. Of course, the whore is, fundamentally, the incarnation of 
a nature suffused with commodity appearance. She has even intensified its power 
of delusion insofar as, in commerce with her, an always fictive pleasure arises, 
one that is supposed to corresond to the pleasure of her partner. In other words, 
the capacity for pleasure itself now figures as a value in tliis commerce — as the 
object of an exploitation perpetrated no less by her than by her partner. On the 
other hand, one sees here the distorted, more than life-size image of an availabil- 
ity that holds for everyone and is discouraged by none. The unworldly ecstatic 
lasciviousness of the Baroque poet Lohenstein has stamped tliis image in a man- 
ner that is highly reminiscent of Baudelaire: "A beautiful woman, yes, arrayed in 



a thousand splendors, / Is a sumptuous table where the many sup and take their 
fill, / An inexhaustible wellspring of never failing waters, / Yes, of love's sweet 
milk; and from a hundred conduits / The luscious nectar runs" (Daniel Caspers 
von Lohenstein, Agrippina [Leipzig, 1724], p. 33). The "beyond" of the choice 
governing relations between mother and child, and the here and now of the 
choice governing relations between prostitute and client, make contact at a single 
point. This point defines the situation of Baudelaire's libido. (Compare X2,l: 
Marx on prostitution.) [ J75a] 



The lines from "Selige Sehnsucht" — "No distance can weigh you down, / You 
come flying, fascinated" 424 — describe the experience of the aura. The distance that 
is there in the eyes of the beloved and that draws the lover after it is the dream of 
a better nature. The decline of the aura and the waning of the dream of a better 
nature — this latter conditioned on its defensive position in the class struggle — are 
one and the same. It follows that the decline of the aura and the decline of sexual 
potency are also, at bottom, one. [J76,l] 



Hie formula of LEternite par les astres — "The new is always old, and the old 
always new" 42 '' — corresponds most rigorously to the experience of spleen regis- 
tered by Baudelaire. [ J76,2] 



A passage from LEternite par les astres — "The number of our doubles is infinite 
in time and space. . . . These doubles exist in flesh and bone — indeed, in trousers 
and jacket, in crinoline and chignon" — may be compared with "Les Sept Vieil- 
lards": 

Doubtless to you my dread seems ludicrous, 
unless a brotherly shudder lets you see: 
for all their imminent decrepitude, 
these seven monsters had eternal life! 

I doubt if I could have survived an eighth 
such apparition, father and son of himself, 
inexorable Phoenix, loathsome avatar! 
— I turned my back on the whole danmed parade. 

The "monstrous shoreless sea," 126 which the poem evokes in the closing line, is 
the agitated universe of LEternite par les astres. [J76,3] 



"The houses seemed to be stretched upward by the mist / and looked like the two 
quays of some swollen river." 427 An image reminiscent of Meryon. There is some- 
thing similar in Brecht. [ J76.4] 



With gloomy irony, Blanqui demonstrates what a "better humanity" would be 
worth in a nature which can never be better. [ J76,5] 



Lamartine's industrial Christ reappears at the end of the century. Thus Ver- 
haeren, in "Le Depart": 

And what would evils matter, and demented hours, 

And vats of vice in which the city ferments, 

If one day, from the depths of fogs and shadows, 

A new Christ rises, sculpted in light, 

Who lifts humanity toward him 

And baptizes it in the fire of newborn stars.* 28 

Baudelaire was not possessed of any such optimism — and that was the great 
chance for his presentation of Paris. Cited in Jules Destree, "Der Zug nach der 
Stadt" Die neue Zpit, 21, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1903) <p. 571 >. [J76.6] 

In the historical action which the proletariat brings against the bourgeois class, 
Baudelaire is a witness; but Blanqui is an expert witness. [J76a, 1] 

If Baudelaire is summoned before the tribunal of history, he will have to put up 
with a great many interruptions; an interest that is in many respects foreign to 
him, and in many respects incomprehensible to him, conditions the line of ques- 
tioning. Blanqui, on the other hand, has long since made the question on which 
he speaks entirely his own; hence, he appears as an expert where this question is 
tried. It is therefore not exactly in the same capacity that Baudelaire and Blanqui 
are cited to appear before the tribunal of history. (Compare Nll,3.) [J76a,2] 

Abandonment of the epic moment: a tribunal is no sewing circle. Or better: the 
proceedings are instituted, not reported. [J76a,3] 

The interest which the materialist historian takes in the past is always, in part, a 
vital interest in its being past — in its having ceased to exist, its being essentially 
dead. To have certified this condition with respect to the whole is the indispensa- 
ble prerequisite for any citation (any calling to life) of particular parts of this 
phenomenon of what-has-been. In a word: for the specific historical interest 
whose legitimacy it is up to the materialist historian to establish, it must be shown 
that one is dealing with an object which in its entirety, actually and irrevocably, 
"belongs to history." [J76a,4] 

The comparison with Dante can serve both as an example of the perplexity of 
the early reception of Baudelaire and as an illustration of Joseph de Maistre's 
remark that the earliest judgments concerning an author are bequeathed to the 
subsequent criticism. <SeeJ64a,4.> [J76a,5] 



In addition to the Dante comparison, the concept of decadence figures as a key- 
word in the reception. It is there in Barbey d'Aurevilly, Pontinartin, Brunetiere, 
Bourget. [J76a,6] 



For the materialist dialectician, discontinuity is the regulative idea of the tradition 
of the ruling classes (and therefore, primarily, of the bourgeoisie) ; continuity, the 
regulative idea of the tradition of the oppressed (and therefore, primarily, of the 
proletariat). The proletariat lives more slowly than the bourgeois class. The 
examples of its champions, the perceptions of its leaders, do not grow old, or, at 
any rate, they grow old much more slowly than the epochs and great personages 
of the bourgeois class. The waves of fashion break against the compact mass of 
the downtrodden. The movements of the ruling class, by contrast, having once 
come into their ascendancy, maintain in themselves a reference to fashion. In 
particular, the ideologies of the rulers are by their nature more changeable than 
the ideas of the oppressed. For not only must they, like the ideas of the latter, 
adapt each time to the situation of social conflict, but they must glorify that 
situation as fundamentally harmonious. Such a business is managed only eccen- 
trically and desultorily; it is modish in the fullest sense of the word. To undertake 
to "salvage" the great figures of the bourgeoisie means, not least, to conceive 
them in this most unstable dimension of their operation, and precisely from out 
of that to extract, to cite, what has remained inconspicuously buried beneath — 
being, as it was, of so little help to the powerful. To bring together Baudelaire and 
Blanqui means removing the bushel that is covering the light.' 120 [J77, 1] 

Baudelaire's reception by poets can be easily distinguished from his reception by 
theorists. The latter adhere to the comparison with Dante and the concept of 
decadence; the former, to the maxim of art for art's sake and the theory of 
correspondences. (J77,2] 

Faguet (where?) sees the secret of Baudelaire's influence in the extremely wide- 
spread chronic nervousness. [J77,3] 

Tiie "jerky gait" of the ragpicker <see ]79a,5> is not necessarily due to the effect of 
alcohol. Every few moments, he must stop to gather refuse, which he throws into 
his wicker basket. [ J77,4] 

For Blanqui, history is the straw with which infinite time is stuffed. [J77a, 1] 

"I come to a stop, for I am suddenly exhausted. Up ahead, it appears, the path 
descends without warning, precipitously: On all sides, ahyss — I dare not look." 
Nietzsche, <Werke: Gross- unci Kleinoktavausgabe,> vol. 12, p. 223 (cited in Karl 
Lowith, Nietzsches Philosophie der eivigen Wiederkunft des Gleichen [Berlin, 
1935], p. 33). [J77a,2] 



The hero who asserts himself on the stage of modernity is, in fact, an actor first of 
all. He clearly appears as such in "Les Sept Vieillards," in a "scene to match the 
actor's plight," "steeling" his "nerves to play a hero's part." 430 [J77a,3] 



The figure of the poet in "Benediction" is a figure from Jugendstil. The poet 
appears, so to speak, in the nude. He displays the physiognomy of Joseph 
Delorme. [J77a,4] 



The "natural benevolence" which Magnin (J50a,4) celebrates in Sainte-Beuve — 
his coziness, in short — is the complement of the hieratic bearing of Joseph 
Delorme. [J 77a, 5] 

It can be seen from the portraits that Baudelaire's physiognomy very early 
showed the marks of old age. Among other things, this accounts for the oft-noted 
resemblance between his features and those of prelates. [J77a,6] 

Valles was perhaps the first to complain insistently (as Souday would do later) 
about Baudelaire's "backwardness" (J21,6). [J77a,7] 

Allegory recognizes many enigmas, but it knows no mystery. An enigma is a 
fragment that, together with another, matching fragment, makes up a whole. 
Mystery, on the other hand, was invoked from time immemorial in the image of 
the veil, which is an old accomplice of distance. Distance appears veiled. Now, 
the painting of the Baroque — unlike that of the Renaissance, for example — has 
nothing at all to do with this veil. Indeed, it ostentatiously rends the veil and, as 
its ceiling frescoes in particular demonstrate, brings even the distance of the skies 
into a nearness, one that seeks to startle and confound. Tliis suggests that the 
degree of auratic saturation of human perception has fluctuated widely in the 
course of history. (In the Baroque, one might say, the conflict between cult value 
and exhibition value was variously played out within the confines of sacred art 
itself.) While these fluctuations await further clarification, the supposition arises 
that epochs which tend toward allegorical expression will have experienced a 
crisis of the aura. [J77a,8] 

Baudelaire mentions, among the "lyric subjects proposed by the Academie," 
"Algeria, or the conquering civilization." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 593 ("L'Esprit 
de M. Villemain"). Desecration of distance. [ J78, 1] 

On the "abyss": "depths of space, allegorical of the depths of time." Ch. B., 
Oeuvres, vol. 1, p. 306 (Les Paradis artificiels, "L'Homme-dieu").' 1 '" [J78,2] 

Allegorical dismemberment. The music to which one listens under the influence 
of hashish appears, in Baudelaire, as "the entire poem entering your brain, like a 
dictionary that has come alive." Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 1, p. 3#7- W2 [J78,3] 

During the Baroque, a formerly incidental component of allegory, the emblem, 
undergoes extravagant development. If, for die materialist historian, the medie- 
val origin of allegory still needs elucidation, Marx himself furnishes a clue for 



understanding its Baroque form. He writes in Das Kapital (Hamburg, 1922), vol. 
1, p. 344: "The collective machine . . . becomes more and more perfect, the more 
the process as a whole becomes a continuous one — that is, the less the raw 
material is interrupted in its passage from its first phase to its last; in other words, 
the more its passage from one phase to another is effected not only by the hand 
of man but by the machinery itself. In manufacture, the isolation of each detail 
process is a condition imposed by the nature of division of labor, but in the fully 
developed factory the continuity of those processes is, on the contrary, impera- 
tive." 133 Here may be found the key to the Baroque procedure whereby meanings 
are conferred on the set of fragments, on the pieces into which not so much the 
whole as the process of its production has disintegrated. Baroque emblems may 
be conceived as half finished products which, from the phases of a production 
process, have been converted into monuments to the process of destruction. 
During the Thirty "fears' War, which, now at one point and now at another, 
immobilized production, the "interruption" that, according to Marx, charac- 
terizes each particular stage of this labor process could be protracted almost 
indefinitely. But the real triumph of the Baroque emblematic, the chief exhibit of 
which becomes the death's head, is the integration of man himself into the 
operation. The death's head of Baroque allegory is a half-finished product of 
the history of salvation, that process interrupted — so far as this is given him to 
realize — by Satan. [J78,4] 

The financial min of Baudelaire is the consequence of a quixotic struggle against 
the circumstances that, in his day, determined consumption. The individual con- 
sumer, who vis-a-vis the artisan commissions work, figures in the marketplace as 
customer. There he does his part in the clearance of a stock of commodities 
which his particular wishes have had no influence whatsoever in producing. 
Baudelaire wanted to have such particular wishes reflected not only in his choice 
of clothing — the tailor's was, of all the branches of business, the one that had to 
reckon longest with the consumer who commissions work — but also in his furni- 
ture and in other objects of his daily use. He thus became dependent on an 
antiquary who was less than honest, and who procured for him paintings and 
antique furniture that in some cases proved to be lakes. The debts which he 
incurred through these dealings weighed on him for the rest of his life. [J78a, 1] 

In the final analysis, the image of petrified unrest called up by allegory is a 
historical image. It shows the forces of antiquity and of Christianity suddenly 
arrested in their contest, turned to stone amid unallayed hostilities. In his poem 
on the sick muse, with its masterful verse that hetrays nothing of the chimerical 
nature of the poet's wish, Baudelaire has devised, as ideal image of the muse's 
health, what is really a formula for her distress: "I'd wish . . . / Your Christian 
blood to flow in waves that scan / With varied sounds of ancient syllables." 434 

[J78a,2] 



In the poetry of Baudelaire, notwithstanding the new and original signature 
which allegory inscribes there, a medieval substrate makes itself felt beneath the 
Baroque element. This involves what Bezold calls "the survival of the ancient 
gods in medieval humanism."* 35 Allegory is the vehicle for this survival. [J79,l] 

At the moment when the production process closes itself off to people, the stock 
in trade becomes accessible to them — in the form of the department store. 

[J79,2] 

On the theory of dandyism. The tailor's is the last line of business in which the 
customer is still catered to on an individual basis. Story of the twelve frock 
coats. ' 36 More and more, the person commissioning work plays a heroic role. 

[J79.3] 

Insofar as the flaneur presents himself in the marketplace, his flanerie reflects the 
fluctuations of commodities. Grandville, in his drawings, has often depicted the 
adventures of the strolling commodity. [ J79,4] 

On the phrase "racked by their labors":' 13 ' with the Saint-Simonians, industrial 
labor is seen in the light of sexual intercourse; the idea of the joy of working is 
patterned after an image of the pleasure of procreation. Two decades later, the 
relation has been reversed: the sex act itself is marked by the joylessness which 
oppresses the industrial worker. [J79.5] 

It would be an error to think of the experience contained in the correspondances as 
a simple counterpart to certain experiments with synesthesia (with hearing colors 
or seeing sounds) that have been conducted in psychologists' laboratories. In 
Baudelaire's case, it is a matter less of the well-known reactions, about which 
effete or snobbish art criticism has made such a fuss, than of the medium in 
which such reactions occur. This medium is the memory, and with Baudelaire it 
was possessed of unusual density. The corresponding sensory data correspond in 
it; they are teeming with memories, which run so thick that they seem to have 
arisen not from this life at all but from some more spacious vie anterieure. It is this 
prior existence that is intimated by the "familiar eyes" 438 with which such experi- 
ences scrutinize the one who has them. [J79,6] 

What fundamentally distinguishes the brooder from the thinker is that the for- 
mer not only meditates a thing but also meditates his meditation of the thing. 
The case of the brooder is that of the man who has arrived at the solution of a 
great problem but then has forgotten it. And now he broods — not so much over 
the matter itself as over his past reflections on it. The brooder's thinking, there- 
fore, bears the imprint of memory. Brooder and allegorist are cut from the same 
cloth. [J79a,l] 



"While the parliamentary party of Order . . . destroy[ed] with its own hands, in 
the struggle against the other classes of society, all the conditions for its own 
regime, the parliamentary regime, the extraparliamentary mass of the bourgeoi- 
sie, on the other hand, ... by its brutal maltreatment of its own press, invited 
Bonaparte to suppress and annihilate its speaking and writing section, its politi- 
cians and its literati, ... in order that it might then be able to pursue its private 
affairs with full confidence in the protection of a strong and unrestricted govern- 
ment." Karl Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire des Louis Bonaparte, ed. Rjazanov 



Baudelaire is quite as isolated in the literary world of his day as Blanqui is in the 



With the increase in displays of merchandise and with the rise, in particular, of 
magasins de nouveautes, the physiognomy of the commodity emerged more and 
more distinctly. Of course, even with his sensitive receptivity, Baudelaire never 
would have registered this development had it not passed like a magnet over the 
"precious metal of our will,"'" 0 over the iron ore of his imagination. In fact, the 
ruling figure of that imagination — allegory — corresponded perfectly to the com- 
modity fetish. [J79a,4] 

The bearing of the modern hero, as modeled on the ragpicker: his "jerky gait," 
the necessary isolation in which he goes about his business, the interest he takes 
in the refuse and detritus of the great city. (Compare Baudelaire, "De l'Heroisme 
de la vie moderne," in vol. 2, p. 135: "The pageant of . . . life . . .")' M1 [J79a,5] 

The uncovering of the mechanical aspects of the organism is a persistent ten- 
dency of the sadist. One can say that the sadist is bent on replacing the human 
organism with the image of machinery. Sade is the offspring of an age that was 
enraptured by automatons. And La Mettrie's "man machine" alluded to the 
guillotine, which furnished rudimentary proof of its truths. In his bloody-minded 
fantasies, Joseph de Maistre — Baudelaire's authority on matters political — is 
cousin to the marquis de Sade. [J80, 1] 

The brooder's memory ranges over the indiscriminate mass of dead lore. Human 
knowledge, within this memory, is something piecemeal — in an especially preg- 
nant sense: it is like the jumble of arbitrarily cut pieces from which a puzzle is 
assembled. An epoch fundamentally averse to brooding has nonetheless pre- 
served its outward gesture in the puzzle. It is the gesture, in particular, of the 
allegorist. Through the disorderly fund which his knowledge places at his dis- 
posal, the allegorist rummages here and there for a particular piece, holds it next 
to some other piece, and tests to see if they fit together — that meaning with this 
image or this image with that meaning. The result can never be known before- 
hand, for there is no natural mediation between the two. But this is just how 
matters stand with commodity and price. The "metaphysical subtleties" in which 



(Vienna and Berlin <1927>), p. 100. 4 



[J79a,2] 



world of conspiracies. 



[J79a,3] 



the commodity delights, according to Marx, 112 are, above all, the subtleties of 
price formation. How the price of goods in each case is arrived at can never quite 
be foreseen, neither in the course of their production nor later when they enter 
the market. It is exactly the same with the object in its allegorical existence. At no 
point is it written in the stars that the allegoiist's profundity will lead it to one 
meaning rather than another. And though it once may have acquired such a 
meaning, this can always be withdrawn in favor of a different meaning. The 
modes of meaning fluctuate almost as rapidly as the price of commodities. In fact, 
the meaning of the commodity is its price; it has, as commodity, no other mean- 
ing. Hence, the allegorist is in his element with commercial wares. As flaneur, he 
has empathized with the soul of the commodity; as allegorist, he recognizes in the 
"price tag," with which the merchandise comes on the market, the object of his 
broodings — the meaning. The world in which this newest meaning lets him settle 
has grown no friendlier. An inferno rages in the soul of the commodity, for all the 
seeming tranquillity lent it by the price. [J80,2; J80a, 1] 

On fetishism: "It may be that, in the emblem of the stone, only the most obvious 
features of the cold, dry earth are to he seen. But it is quite conceivable and ... by 
no means improbable that the inert mass contains a reference to the genuinely 
theological conception of the melancholic which is found in one of the seven deadly 
sins. This is acedia." < Walter Benjainin,> Ur sprung des deutschen Trailer spiels 
<Berlin, 1928>,p. 151. 443 [J80a,2] 

On "the exploitation of nature" (J75,2): such exploitation was not always re- 
garded as the basis of human labor. To Nietzsche, it quite rightly seemed worthy 
of remark that Descartes was the first philosophical physicist who "compared the 
discoveries of the scientist to a military campaign waged against nature." Cited in 
Karl Lowith, Nietzsches Phibsophie der ewigen Wiederkunft des Gleichen (Berlin, 
1935), p. 121 (<Nietzsche, Werke, Gross- und Klein oktavausgabe ,> vol. 13, p. 55). 

[J80a,3] 

Nietzsche calls Heraclitus "a star devoid of atmosphere. "* M Cited in Lowith, 
Nietzsches Philosophie, p. 110 (vol. 1«, pp. 45ff.). [J80a,4] 

The great physiognomic similarity between Guys and Nietzsche is worth empha- 
sizing. Nietzsche ascribes to the pessimism of India "that tremendous, yearning 
rigidity of expression in which die Nothing is reflected" (cited in Lowith, 
Nietzsches Philosophie, p. 108 [vol. 15, p. 162]). 4 ' 15 Compare this to the way Baude- 
laire describes the gaze of the oriental courtesan in Guys (J47,4): it is a gaze 
directed toward the horizon, one in which rigid attentiveness and profound 
distraction are united. [ J80 a, 5] 



On suicide as signature of modernity. "One cannot sufficiently condemn Christian- 
ity for having devalued the value of such a great purifying nihilistic movement, as 
was perhaps already being formed, . . . through continual deterrence from the 



deed of nihilism, which is suicide" (cited in Lowith, Nietzsches Philosophic, p. 108 
<vol. 15, pp. 325, 186>). w < [J81, 1] 



On the ahyss, and on the phrase "I balk at sleep as if it were a hole": "Do you know 
the terror which assails him who is falling asleep? — He is terrified down to his toes, 
because the ground seems to give way, and the dream begins" (<Nietzsche,> 
Zarathustra, ed. Kroner [Leipzig], p. 215). 417 [ J8 1,2] 

Comparison of the "sinuous lleece" with the "deep and spreading starless Night!" 
(final lines of "Les Promesses d'nn visage"). 1,8 [J8 1,3] 

The particulars of the boulevard press are, later, the sum and substance of the 
stock market reports. Through the role that it gives to the talk of the town, the 
petite presse paves the way for this stock market information. [J8 1,4] 

His confederates obstruct reality for the conspirator as the masses do for the 
flaneur. [J81.5] 

On the flight of images in allegory. It often cheated Baudelaire out of part of the 
returns on his allegorical imagery. One thing in particular is missing in Baude- 
laire's employment of allegory. This we can recognize if we call to mind Shelley's 
great allegory on the city of London: the third part of "Peter Bell the Third," in 
which London is presented to the reader as hell. <See M18.> The incisive effect of 
this poem depends, for the most part, on the fact that Shelley's grasp of allegory 
makes itself felt. It is this grasp that is missing in Baudelaire. This grasp, which 
makes palpable the distance of the modern poet from allegory, is precisely what 
enables allegory to incorporate into itself the most immediate realities. With what 
directness that can happen is best shown by Shelley's poem, in which bailiffs, 
parliamentarians, stock-jobbers, and many other types figure. The allegory, in its 
emphatically antique character, gives them all a sure footing, such as, for exam- 
ple, the businessmen in Baudelaire's "Crepuscule du soir" do not have. — Shelley 
rules over the allegory, whereas Baudelaire is ruled by it. [ J8 1,6] 

Individuality, as such, takes on heroic outlines as the masses step more decisively 
into the picture. This is the origin of the conception of the hero in Baudelaire. In 
Hugo, it is a matter not of the isolated individual as such but of the democratic 
citizen. That implies a fundamental difference between the two poets. The resolu- 
tion of this discord would have, as precondition, the dispelling of the illusion 
<Schein> which it reflects. This illusory appearance comes from the concept of the 
masses. Considered apart from the various classes which join in its formation, 
the mass as such has no primary social significance. Its secondary significance 
depends on the ensemble of relations through which it is constituted at any one 
time and place. A theater audience, an army, the population of a city comprise 
masses which in themselves helong to no particular class. The free market multi- 
plies these masses, rapidly and on a colossal scale, insofar as each piece of 



merchandise now gathers around it the mass of its potential buyers. Hie totalitar- 
ian states have taken this mass as their model. The Volksgemeinschaft <People's 
Community) aims to root out from single individuals everything that stands in 
the way of their wholesale fusion into a mass of consumers. The one implacable 
adversary still confronting the state, which in this ravenous action becomes the 
agent of monopoly capital, is the revolutionary proletariat. This latter dispels the 
illusion of the mass through the reality of class. Neither Hugo nor Baudelaire 
could be directly at its side for that. [J81a,l] 

On the inauguration of the heroine: Baudelaire's antiquity is Roman antiquity. At 
only one point — and it is, of course, irreplaceable — does Greek antiquity break 
into his world. Greece presents him with that image of the heroine which ap- 
peared to him worthy and capable of being carried over into modernity. Greek 
names stand at the head <?> of one of his greatest poems: "Femmes danmees: 
Delphine et Hippolyte." The heroine <is endowed> with the features of lesbian 
dove >. [J81a,2] 

"Thus, the poet's thought, after meandering capriciously, opens onto the vast 
perspectives of the past or future; but these skies are too vast to he everywhere 
pure, and the temperature of the climate too warm not to brew storms. The idle 
passerby, who contemplates these areas veiled in mourning, feels tears of hysteria 
come to his eyes." Ch. B., vol. 2, p. 536 ("Marceline Desbordes-Valmore"). +w 

[J82.1] 

On "Le Vm des chiffonniers": the reference to "police spies" suggests that the 
ragman dreams of returning to combat on the barricades. [ J82,2] 

" City. I am an ephemeral and not-too-discontented citizen of a metropolis obvi- 
ously modern because every known taste has been avoided in the furnishings 
and in the outsides of the houses, as well as in the layout of the city. Here you 
would not discover the least sign of any monument of superstition. In short, 
morals and speech are reduced to their simplest expression. These millions of 
people, who have no need of knowing one another, conduct their education, 
their trade, and their old age with such similarity that the duration of their lives 
must be several times shorter than is the case, according to some insane statistics, 
with people on the continent." Arthur Rimbaud, Oeuvres (Paris, 1924), pp. 229- 
230 (illuminations):^ Disenchantment of "modernity" ! [ J82,3] 

"Criminals disgust me as if they were castrates." Arthur Rimbaud, Oeuvres 
(Paris, 1924), p. 258 (Une Saison en enfer, "Mauvais Sang").' 151 [J82,4] 



One could try to show, using the example of Baudelaire, that Jugendstil arises out 
of weariness — a weariness that manifests itself, in his case, as that of the mime 
who has taken off his makeup. [ J82,5] 



Modernity, in this work, is what a trademark is on a piece of cutlery or an optical 
instrument. It may be as durable as one could wish; if the company which 
produced it at some point goes under, it will come to seem obsolete. But to 
impress a trademark on his work was Baudelaire's avowed intention, "To create a 
poncif."' ioi And perhaps, for Baudelaire, there is no higher honor than to have 
imitated, to have reproduced, with his work this state of affairs, one of the most 
profane of all in the commodity economy. Perhaps this is Baudelaire's greatest 
achievement, and certainly it is one of which he is conscious: to have become so 
quickly obsolete while remaining so durable. [ J82, 6; J82a, 1] 

The activity of the conspirator can be considered a sort of uprooting, comparable 
to that occasioned by the monotony and terror of the Second Empire. [ J82a,2] 

The physiologies 153 were the 6rst booty taken from the marketplace by the 
flaneur — who, so to speak, went botanizing on the asphalt. [J82a,3] 

Modernity has its antiquity, like a nightmare that has come to it in its sleep. 13 '' 

[J82a,4] 

England remained, until late in the previous century, the graduate school of 
social consciousness. From there, Barbier brought back his cycle of poems enti- 
tled Laiare <Lazarus> and Gavarni his sequence Ce qu'an voit gratis a Londres 
<What Can Be Seen for Free in London>, together with his character Thomas 
Vireloque, the figure of hopeless destitution. [J82a,5] 

Between Augustus, calm of eye, and Trajan, pure of brow, 
Resplendent and umnoving in the great azure, 
On you, O pantheons, on you, O portals, 
Robert Macaire with his worn-out boots! 

Victor Hugo, Les Chatiments, ed. Charpentier (Paris), p. 107 ("Apotheose"). 

[J82a,6] 

"He has against him . . . the title of Les Fleurs du mal, which is a sham title, 
disagreeably anecdotal, and which particularizes to excess the universality of his 
impulse." Henry Bataille, "Baudelaire," Comoedia (January 7, 1921). [J82a,7] 

Apropos of "the nearly deafening street'" 55 and other similar expressions, it 
should not be forgotten that the roads in those days were generally paved in 
cobblestone. [J82a,8] 

Nisard in the foreword to the first edition of Le Poetes latins de la decadence 
(1834): "I endeavor to explain by what necessities . . . the human spirit arrives at 
this singular state of exhaustion, in which the most bountiful imaginations are no 
longer capable of true poetry and can manage only to debase their languages with 
scandal. ... In conclusion, I touch on certain resemblances between the poetry of 



our time and that of the time of Lucan. ... In a country where literature governs 
the minds of men, and even politics . . . lends its voice to everything progres- 
sive, . . . criticism ... is ... a task at once literary and moral." D. Nisard, Etudes 
de moeurs et de critique sur les poetes latins de la decadence (Paris, 1849), vol. 1, 
pp.x, xiv. [J83.1] 

On the feminine ideal — "ghastly thin" — of Baudelaire: "But it is essentially the 
modern woman here, the French woman of the period preceding the invention of 
the hicycle." Pierre Caume, "Causeries sur Baudelaire, La Nouvelle Revue 
(Paris, 1899), vol. 119, p. 669. [J83,2] 

Nisard denounces, as a sign of decadence in Phaedrus, "a continual, affected 
employment of the abstract for the concrete. . . . Thus, instead of a long neck, he 
says: 'length of neck,' colli longitude-." D. Nisard, Etudes de moeurs et de critique 
sur les poetes latins de la decadence (Paris, 1849), vol. 1, pp. 45. [ J83,3] 

On the question of the declining birthrate and of harrenness: "There is no hopeful 
expectation of the future, nor any elan, without some guiding idea, some goal." 
Jules Romaiiis, Cela depend devous (Paris <1939>), p. 104. [ J83,4] 

"Into the depths of the Unknown" — with this, compare the great passage by 
Turgot on the known: "I cannot admire Columbus for having said, 'The earth is 
round, and therefore by traveling westward I shall meet the land again,' because 
the simplest things are often the most difficult to find. — But what distinguishes a 
hardy soul is the confidence with which it abandons itself to unknown waters on 
the faith of a deduction. What would genius and enthusiasm for truth be in a 
man to whom a known truth had given such courage!" Turgot, Oeuures (Paris, 
1844), vol. 2, p. 675 ("Pensees et fragments"). 456 [J83,5] 

Being reduced to rags is a specific form of poverty — by no means the superlative 
form. "Poverty takes on the peculiar character of raggedness when it occurs 
amidst a society whose existence is founded on an intricate and richly articulated 
system for the satisfaction of needs. Insofar as poverty borrows bits and pieces 
from this system, fragments isolated from all context, it becomes subject to needs 
from wliich it can find no . . . lasting and decent deliverance." Hermann Lotze, 
Mikrokosmos, vol 3 (Leipzig, 1864), pp. 271-272. 457 [J83a,l] 

Lotze's reflections on the worker who no longer handles a tool but operates a 
macliine aptly illuminate the attitude of the consumer toward the commodity 
produced under these conditions. "I Ie could still recognize in every contour of 
the finished product the power and precision of liis own formative touch. The 
participation of the individual in the work of the macliine, by contrast, is limited 
to . . . manual operations wliich bring forth nothing directly but merely supply to 
an inscrutable mechanism the obscure occasion for invisible accomplishments." 
Hermann Lotze, Mikrokosmos, vol. 3 (Leipzig, 1864), pp. 272-273. [J83a,2] 



Allegory, as the sign that is pointedly set off against its meaning, has its place in 
art as the antithesis to the beautiful appearance <Schein> in which signifier and 
signified flow into each other. Dissolve this brittleness of allegory, and it forfeits 
all authority. That, in fact, is what happens with genre. It introduces "life" into 
allegories, which in turn suddenly wither like flowers. Sternberger has touched 
on this state of affairs [Panorama <Hamburg, 1938>, p. 66): "the allegory that has 
become a semblance of life, that has given up its lastingness and its rigorous 
validity for the red pottage" of life, 458 justly appears as a creation of the genre. In 
Jugendstil, a retrogressive process seems to set in. Allegory regains its brittleness. 

[J83a,3] 

On the foregoing remarks by Lotze: the idler, the flaneur, who no longer has any 
understanding of production, seeks to become an expert on the market (on 
prices). [J83a,4] 

"The chapters 'Persecution' and 'Murder' in Apollinaire's Poete assassine con- 
tain the famous description of a pogrom against poets. Publishing houses are 
stormed, books of poems thrown on the fire, poets beaten to death. And the same 
scenes are taking place at the same time all over the world. In Aragon, 'Imagina- 
tion,' in anticipation of such horrors, marshals its forces for a last crusade." 
Walter Benjamin, "Der Surrealismus," Die literarische Welt, 5, no. 7 (February 
15, 1929).' 159 [J84.1] 

"It is hardly a coincidence that the century which has long been that of the 
strongest poetic language, the nineteenth century, has also been that of decisive 
progress in the sciences." Jean-Richard Bloch, "Langage d'utilite, langage 
poetique" [Encyclopedic francaue, vol. 16 [16-50], p. 13). Indicate how the forces 
of poetic inspiration, having been driven from their earlier positions by science, 
were compelled to make inroads into the commodity world. [ J84,2] 

On the question raised by J.-R. Bloch, the question of the development of science 
and of poetic language, Chenier's "Invention": 

All the arts conjoin, and human science 
Could not extend the bounds of its alliance 
Without enlarging thus the scope for verse. 
What long travail to win the universe! 



A new Cybele and a hundred different worlds befall 
Our Jasons first delivered from the ocean's thrall: 
What a wealth of worthy scenes, of images sublime, 

Born of those great subjects reserved for our time! [ J84,3] 

On "Les Sept Vieillards." The very fact that this poem stands isolated within 
Baudelaire's oeuvre fortifies the assumption that it occupies a key position there. 
If this position has remained unnoticed until now, this may have to do with the 



fact that a purely philological commentary has missed the mark with this poem. 
Yet the relevant datum is not so far afield. The piece corresponds with a particu- 
lar passage from Les Paradis artifiaels. It is this passage, however, that can shed 
light on the philosophical import of the poem. [ J84,4] 

The following passage from Les Paradis artifiaels is decisive for "Les Sept Vieil- 
lards." It makes it possible to trace the inspiration for this poem back to hashish: 
"The word 'rhapsodic,' which so well portrays a train of thought suggested and 
dictated by the outer world and the hazard of circumstance, has a great and more 
terrible truth in relation to hashish. Here, human reason becomes mere flotsam, 
at the mercy of all currents, and the train of thought is infinitely more accelerated 
and 'rhapsodic.'" Vol. 1 , p. 303. 460 [ J84a,l] 

Comparison between Blanqui and Baudelaire, in part deriving from Brecht's 
formulations: the defeat of Blanqui was the victory of Baudelaire — of the petty 
bourgeoisie. Blanqui succumbed; Baudelaire succeeded. Blanqui appears as a 
tragic figure; his betrayal has tragic greatness; he was brought down by the 
enemy within. Baudelaire appears as a comic figure — as the cock whose triumphal 
crowing announces the hour of betrayal. 461 [J84a,2] 

If Napoleon III was Caesar, then Baudelaire was the Catilinarian existence. 

[J84a,3] 

Baudelaire unites the poverty of the ragpicker with the scorn of the cadger and 
the despair of the parasite. [J84a,4] 

The significance of the prose poem "Perte d'aureole" cannot be overestimated. 
First of all, there is the remarkable pertinence of the fact that it spotlights the 
threat to the aura posed by the experience of shock. (Perhaps this relation can be 
clarified by reference to metaphors of epilepsy.) Extraordinarily decisive, more- 
over, is the ending, which makes the exhibition of the aura from now on an affair 
of fif th-rate poets. — Finally, this piece is important because in it the inhabitant of 
the big city appears menaced more by the traffic of coaches than he is nowadays 
by automobiles. [ J84a,5] 

Catiline figures in Baudelaire among the dandies.' 152 [J85,l] 
Love for the prostitute is the apotheosis of empathy with the commodity. 

[J85,2] 

"Recueillement" should be presented as Jugendstil poetry. The defuntes annees 
<dead years>' l<B as allegories in the style of Fritz Erler. [ J85,3] 



The hatred for genre painting that can be discerned in Baudelaire's "Salons" is a 
sentiment typical of Jugendstil. [J85,4] 



Among the legends which circulated about Baudelaire is the following: he is sup- 
posed to have read Balzac while crossing the Ganges. In Henri Grappin, "Le 
Mysticisme poetique de Gustave Flauhert," Revue de Paris (December 1 and 15, 
1912), p. 852. [J85,5] 

"Life has only one real charm — the charm of gambling. But what if we do not care 
whether we win or lose?" Oeuvres completes, vol. 2, p. 630 ("Fusees"). 464 [ J85,6] 

"Commerce is essentially satanic. . . . Commerce is satanic because it is one of the 
forms of egoism — the lowest and vilest." Oeuvres completes, vol. 2, p. 664 ("Mon 
Coeur mis a nu"). w [J85,7] 

"What is love? The need to escape from oneself. . . .Themoreaman cultivates the 
arts, the less often he gets an erection. ... To copulate is to aspire to enter into 
another — and the artist never emerges from himself." Oeuvres completes, <vol. 2,> 
pp.655,663. 4r ' fl [J85,8] 

"It is partly a life of leisure that has enabled me to grow. To my great detriment — 
for leisure without fortune breeds dehts. . . . But also to my great profit, as re- 
gards sensibility and meditation and the faculty of dandyism and dilletantism. 
Other men of letters are, for the most part, base ignorant drudges." Oeuvres 
completes, vol. 2, p. 659 ("Mon Coeur . . ."). 4f ' 7 [J85,9] 

"As I have fully proved, to work is less wearisome than to amuse oneself." Oeuvres 
completes, vol. 2, p. 647 ("Mon Coeur . . ."). 46S [J85,10] 

On the dance of death (compare K7a,3, the passage from Huxley): "The woodcuts 
with which the Parisian printer Guyot Marchant ornamented the lirst edition of 
the Danse Macabre in 1485 were, very probably, imitated from the most cele- 
brated of these painted death dances — namely, that which, since 1424, covered the 
walls of the cloister of the cemetery of the Innocents in Paris. . . . The dancing 
person whom we see coming back forty times to lead away the living originally 
represents not Death itself but a corpse: the living man such as he will presently 
be. In the stanzas, the dancer is called "the dead man" or "the dead woman." It is 
a dance of the dead and not of Death. ... It is only toward the end of the century 
that the figure of the great dancer, of a corpse with hollow and fleshless hody, 
becomes a skeleton, as Holbein depicts it." J. Huizinga, Herbst des Mittelalters 
(Munich, 1928), pp. 204-205. 4W [J85a,l] 

On allegory. "The characters in Le Roman de la Rose — Bel-Accueil, Doulce 
Mercy, Faux Semblant, Humhle Requeste, Danger, Honte, Peur — are on a level 
with the authentic medieval representations of virtues and vices in human form: 
allegories or, something more than this, half -believed mythologems." J. Huizinga, 
Herbst des Mittelalters (Munich, 1928), p. 162. 47(1 [J85a,2] 



On "the metaphysics of the agent provocateur": "Without being too prejudiced in 
the matter, one may still feel a little uneasy in reading Les Mysteres galans [Les 
Mysteres galans des theatres de Paris]* 11 to think that Baudelaire had a hand in 
this. If he himself has disowned this piece of youthful extravagance, there are 
nonetheless good reasons for believing, with M. Crepet, that he is in fact one of the 
authors. Here then is a Baudelaire on the brink of blackmail, spiteful toward all 
success? This would suggest that throughout his career, from these Mysteres to the 
Amoenitates Belgicae, the great poet had need, from time to time, of voiding a sac 
of venom." Jean Prevost, review of the work mentioned, La Nouvelle Revue 
franqaise, 27, no. 308 (May 1, 1939), p. 888. [J85a,3] 

Apropos of Baudelaire's "Au Lecteur." "The first six books of the Confessions 
have ... a certain advantage built into their very subject: each reader, insofar as 
he is not the slave of literary or mundane prejudices, becomes an accomplice." 
Andre Monglond, he Preromantisme franqm.is, vol. 2, he Maitre des antes sensi- 
bles (Grenoble, 1930), p. 295. [J86.1] 

In an important passage by de Maistre, we not only encounter allegory in its 
satanic provenance, and in the very perspective that would later be that of Baude- 
laire; we also discover — here invested with the mysticism of Saint-Martin or 
Swedenborg — the correspondances. And these latter constitute, revealingly, the 
antidote to allegory. The passage is found in the eighth of Les Soirees de Saint- 
Petersbourg, and reads: "One can form a perfectly adequate idea of the universe 
by considering it under the aspect of a vast museum of natural history exposed to 
the shock of an earthquake. The door to the collection rooms is open and 
broken; there are no more windows. Whole drawers have fallen out, while others 
hang by their hinges, ready to drop. Some shells have rolled out into the hall of 
minerals, and a hummingbird's nest is resting on the head of a crocodile. What 
madman, though, could have any doubt of the original intention, or believe that 
the edifice was built to look this way? . . . The order is as visible as the disorder; 
and the eye that ranges over this mighty temple of nature reestablishes without 
difficulty all that a fatal agency has shattered, warped, soiled, and displaced. And 
there is more: look closely and you can recognize already the effects of a restoring 
hand. Some beams have been shored up, some paths cut through the rubble; 
and, in the general confusion, a multitude of analogues have already taken their 
place once again and come into contact." 172 [J86.2] 

On Baudelaire's prosody. A phrase has been applied to it that originally referred 
to Racine: "graze the prose, but with wings." [J86,3] 

Concerning Baudelaire's "Voyage a Cythere": 

Cythera is there, depleted and lugubrious, 
Absurd death's head of the dream of love, 
And gleaming skull of pleasure . . . 



No more bees sipping dewdrop and thyme, 
But always the blue sky above. 



Victor Hugo, Les Contemplations ("Cerigo"). [J86a,l] 

The theory of poetry as faculty of expression — "Where other men must suffer 
grief in silence, / A god gave me the power to speak my pain" 473 — is formulated 
with particular decisiveness by Lamartine in the "first" (it is actually the second) 
preface to his Meditations of 1849. The "striving for originality at all costs," to say 
nothing of an authentic reflection on original possibilities, preserves the poet — 
Baudelaire above all — from a poetics of mere expression. Lamartine writes: "I 
imitated no one; I expressed myself for myself. There was no art in this, but only 
an easing of my own heart. ... I took no thought of anyone in putting down 
these lines here and there, unless it was of a ghost and of God." Les Grands 
Ecrivains de la France, vol. 2, "Lamartine" (Paris, 1915), p. 365. [J86a,2] 

Apropos of Laforgue's remark about the "crude comparisons" in Baudelaire 
(J9,4), Ruff observes : "The originality of these comparisons is not so much in 
their 'crudity' as in the artificial character — which is to say, human character — of 
die images: wall, lid, the wings of a stage. The 'correspondence' is understood in 
a sense opposite to that customarily proposed by the poets, who lead us back to 
nature. Baudelaire, by an invincible propensity, recalls us to the idea of the 
human. Even on the human plane, if he wishes to magnify his description by an 
image, he will often look for some other manifestation of humanity rather than 
having recourse to nature: 'the chimney-pots and steeples, the city's masts."'' 17 ' 1 
Marcel A. Ruff, "Sur 1! Architecture des Fleurs du mal," Revue d'hutoire litter aire 
de la France, 37, no. 3 (July-September 1930), p. 398. Compare the phrase 
"whose fingers point to heaven," in the paragraph on Meryon <J2,1>. — The same 
motif, rendered innocuous and put into psychological terms, in Rattier's conver- 
sion of the flaneur to industrial activity. [ J86a,3] 

In Barbier's poem "Les Mineurs de Newcastle," the eighth stanza concludes this 
way: "And many a one who dreams, within his secret soul, / Of domestic comiarts, 
and his wife's hlue eyes, / Discovers in the pit's emhrace an everlasting tomb." 
Auguste Barhier, lambes etpoemes (Paris, 1841), pp. 240-241; from the collection 
Luzare, which is dated 1837, and which records his impressions of England. Com- 
pare these lines to the last two lines of "Le Crepuscule du soir." [J87, 1] 

Professional conspirator and dandy meet in the concept of the modern hero. 
This hero represents for himself, in his own person, a whole secret society. 

[J87.2] 

On the generation of Valles: "It is that generation which, under the starless sky of 
the Second Empire, grew up in the face of a . . . future without faith or greatness." 



Hermann Wendel, "Jules Valles," Die neue Zeit, 31, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1912), 
p. 105. [J8?;3] 



"When is a courtier . . . not idle and contemplative?" La Bruyere. [ J87,4] 

Regarding "study": "Thefleshis sad, alas! and all the books are read." Mallarme, 
"Brise marine," Poesies (Paris, 1917), p. 43. 175 [J87,5] 

On idleness: "Imagine a perpetual idleness, . . . with a profound hatred of that 
idleness." <Baudelaire,> letter to his mother of Saturday, December 4, 1847. Let- 
tres m sa mere (Paris <1932>), p. 22.' t7r > [J87,6] 

Baudelaire speaks [where?] of the "habit of putting off until the next day ... so 
many important things for so many years."' 177 [J87,7] 

Early high capitalism, defined by Wiesengrund (letter of June 5, 1935) as "mod- 
ernity in the strict sense." [J87.8] 

On idleness: Baudelaire's satanism — of which so much has been made — is noth- 
ing more than his way of taking up the challenge which bourgeois society flings 
at the idle poet. This satanism is only a reasoned reprise of the cynical and 
destructive velleities — delusions, in the main — that emanate from the lower 
depths of society." 8 [J87,9] 

On idleness. "Hercules . . . labored too, . . . but the goal of his career was really 
always a sublime leisure, and for that reason he became one of the Olympians. Not 
so this Prometheus, the inventor of education and enlightenment. . . . Because he 
seduced mankind into working, [he] now has to work himself, whether he wants to 
or not. He'll have plenty of opportunity to be bored, and will never be free of his 
chains." Friedrich Schlegel, Lucinde (Leipzig), pp. 34—35 ("Idylle iiber den Miis- 
siggang" <An Idyll of Idleness)). 479 [J87a, 1] 

"And so this is what I said to myself . . . : '0 Idleness, Idleness! You are the life 
breath of innocence and inspiration. The blessed breathe you, and blessed is he 
who has you and cherishes you, you holy jewel, you sole fragment of godlikeness 
come down to us from Paradise!"' Schlegel, Lucinde p. 29 ("Idylle iiber den Miis- 
siggang")."™ [J87a,2] 

"Industry and utility are the angels of death who, with fiery swords, prevent man's 
return to Paradise. . . . And in all parts of the world, it is the right to idleness that 
distinguishes the superior from the inferior classes. It is the intrinsic principle of 
aristocracy." Schlegel, Lucinde (Leipzig), p. 32. ' m [J87a,3] 



"Baudelaire's weighty phrasing, charged as though with lluid electricity." Jules 
Renard, Journal <inedit, 1887-1895>, ed. Gallimard (Paris <I925>), p. 7. 

[J87a,4] 

"Meanwhile darkness dawns, filled with demon familiars / Who rouse, reluctant 
as businessmen, to their affairs." 182 — It may not be out of place to find here a 
reminiscence of Poe's description of the crowd. [ J87a,5] 

Just as in "A Une Passante" the crowd is neither named nor described, so the 
paraphernalia of gambling make no appearance in "Le Jeu." [J87a,6] 

In contrast to Cabet, to Fourier, and to the roving Saint-Simonian Utopians, 
Blanqui can be imagined only in Paris. Moreover, he represents himself and his 
work as belonging only in Paris. At the opposite pole is Proudhon's conception 
of great cities (Alla,2)! [J87a,7] 

Extracts from the preface which Pyat wrote for the 1884 edition of Le Chiffonnier 
de Paris <The Ragpicker of Paris>. These statements are important as indirect 
evidence of the connections that exist between Baudelaire's oeuvre and radical 
socialism. "This painful but salubrious drama . . , has merely carried through the 
logical evolution of my thinking, in advance of . . . the same evolution in the 
people. ... It is republican thinking in my first play, Une Revolution d'nutrefou <A 
Revolution of 01d>; republican-democratic in Ango, le marin <Ango, the Sailoo; 
democratic and social in Les Deux Serruriers <The Two Locksmiths), Diogenes, 
and Le Chiffbnnier; but it is always a progressivist thinking tending toward the 
ideal, toward . . . completion of the work of '89. . . . There is no doubt that 
national unity has been attained . . . and political unity as well . . . ! But social 
unity remains unachieved. There are still two classes having little in common but 
the air they breathe . . . ; nothing can unite them but mutual respect and love. 
How many wealthy French men many poor French women? The crux lies 
there. . . . Let us come back to Jean. ... I conceived this drama in prison, to 
which I had been condemned in 1844 for having avenged the republic on die 
monarchy. Yes, it is a product of imprisomnent, like those other popular protesta- 
tions Don Quixote and Robinson Crusoe; Jean has at least that in common with 
these immortal masteipieces. I conceived it the evening of the performance of its 
elder sibling Diogenes, which was produced while I was behind bars. By a very 
direct filiation of ideas, die Cynic suggested to me the Ragpicker; the lantern of 
philosophy suggested the candle of the pariah; the tub suggested the wicker 
basket; the disinterestedness of Athens suggested the zeal of Paris. Jean was the 
Diogenes of Paris, as Diogenes was the Jean of Athens. The natural inclination of 
my mind and spirit led me to the people; I am drawn to the cause of the masses. 
My poetic practice, ever in harmony with my politics, has not once separated die 
author from the citizen. Art, in my opinion, . . . — not art for art's sake, but art for 
the sake of humanity — should . . . gravitate toward the people. In fact, art follows 
what is sovereign, commencing with the gods, continuing with kings, nobles, and 



bourgeoisie, and ending with the people. And the initiative for that end, in Les 
Serniriers, had to reach its basic principle, its very center of gravity, in Le Chiffon- 
nier. For while bourgeois art . . . displayed its radiance in Hernani, Ruy Bias, and 
odier lovers of queens, . . . republican art . . . was announcing another dynasty, 
that of the ragpickers. . . . On February 24, 1848, at noon, after the victory over 
the monarchy of Louis Philippe, the drama of 'rags and tatters' was performed 
gratis before the armed and triumphant populace. It was during this memorable 
performance that the actor . . . recovered the crown in the basket. What a historic 
day! What an indescribable effect! Author, actors, director, and spectators, all 
standing together and clapping their hands to the singing of La Marseillaise, to 
the sound of cannon. ... I have spoken of the birth and the life of Jean. As for his 
death Jean was crushed, like the Republic, beneath the landslide of December. 48 ' 
The play had the honor of being condemned together with its author, who had 
seen it applauded in London, in Brussels, everywhere except Paris. Thus, in a 
society based on the family — and at a time when . . . the rights of incest, in Rene, 
the rights of adultery, in Antony, the rights of the brothel, in Rolh, all enjoyed an 
open field — Jean, representing the rights of the family, was proscribed by the 
saviors of family and society." Felix Pyat, Le Chiffbnnier de Paris, drama in five 
acts (Paris, 1884), pp. iv-viii. [J88;J88a,l] 

It would appear that Baudelaire has given no thought to the classical cor so of 
flanerie — the arcade. But in the lyric design of "Le Crepuscule du matin," which 
concludes "Tableaux parisiens," the canon of the arcade can be recognized. The 
central portion of this poem is composed of nine couplets which, while chiming 
one with another, remain well sealed off from the preceding as well as the follow- 
ing pairs of lines. The reader moves through this poem as through a gallery lined 
with showcases. In each one, the immaculate image of naked misery is on display. 
The poem closes with two quatrains that, in their presentation of things earthly 
and celestial, match each other like pilasters. [ J88a,2] 

The infernal time of gaming is something Baudelaire got to know less through 
die actual practice of gambling than through those seasons when he was prey to 
spleen. [J88a,3] 

"Paris, when seen in a ragpicker's hamper, is nothing much. ... To think that I 
have all Paris here in this wicker basket . . . !" From Pyat, Le Chiffonnier, cited in 
<Jean> Cassou, Quarante-huit (Paris <1939>), p. 13. [J88a,4] 

The Cite Dorr.e 4 " 4 was the ragpickers' metropolis. [ J88a,5] 

Portrait of Blanqui by Cassou: "Blanqui was formed to act — to act without osten- 
tation or sentimentality; he could grasp whatever was strictly real and authentic in 
the situation at hand. But the poverty, obscurity, and feebleness of the situation 
restricted his action to a series of fruitless sorties and to an acceptance of long 
imprisonment. He knew himself condemned to a purely preparatory and symbolic 



existence, to an attitude of patience with the gloom and fetters. And his whole life 
was spent in this state of mind. He became, in time, a wan and emaciated old man. 
But he will never be conquered. He cannot be conquered." Jean Cassou, Qumr- 
ante-huit (Paris), p. 24. [ J89,l] 

Concerning Hugo, but also Baudelaire's "Les Petites Vieilles" (neither men- 
tioned here by Cassou) : "For such, indeed, is the novelty of the Romantic cen- 
tury: it is the scandalous presence of the satyr at the table of the gods, the public 
manifestation of beings without name, beings without any possibility of exist- 
ence — slaves, Negroes, monsters, the spider, the nettle." Jean Cassou, Quarante- 
huit (Paris), p. 27. (One tliinks here of Marx's description of child labor in 
England.) 485 [J89,2] 

It would perhaps not be impossible to find in Baudelaire's poem "Paysage" an 
echo of '48 and of the mysticism of work characteristic of that time. And it might 
not be inappropriate to think, in this connection, of the formula coined by Cas- 
sou with reference to Jean Reynaud's Terre et del: "The ^Workshop expands all 
the way to the stars and invades eternity." Jean Cassou, Quarante-huit (Paris), 
p. 47. [J89.3] 

Fregier, Des Classes dangereuses de la population dans les grandes villes <et des 
moyens de les rendre meilleures) (Paris, 1840), vol. 2, p. 347: "The wages of the 
ragpicker, like those of the worker, are inseparable from the prosperity of indus- 
try. The latter has, like nature itself, the sublime privilege of breeding with its own 
debris. This privilege is the more precious for humanity as it propagates life within 
the lower levels of society, while making the intermediate and highest levels the 
ornament of wealth." Cited in Cassou, Quarante-huit, p. 73. [J89,4] 

"For Dante is the constant model of these men of '48. They are imbued with his 
language and his tales, and, like, him, are committed to proscription; they are 
hearers of a vagabond homeland, charged with prophetic tidings, accompanied by 
shadows and voices." Jean Cassou, Quarante-huit (Paris), p. 111. [J89a,l] 

Cassou, describing Daumier's models: "the hunched silhouettes of men in long 
shabby frock coats who are looking at engravings, and all those Baudelairean 
characters, descendants of Jean- Jacques' solitary walker." Jean Cassou, Quar- 
ante-huit (Paris), p. 149. [J89a,2] 

Regarding a connection that may be felt between Baudelaire's "generosity of 
heart" and his sadism, one should refer to Proust's portrait of Mile. Vmteuil 
(which, by the way, was probably conceived as a self -portrait) : "'Sadists' of Mile. 
Vinteuil's sort are creatures so purely sentimental, so virtuous by nature, that 
even sensual pleasure appears to them as something bad, a privilege reserved for 
the wicked. And when they allow themselves for a moment to enjoy it, they 
endeavor to impersonate, to assume all the outward appearance of wicked peo- 



pie, for themselves and their partners in guilt, so as to gain the momentary 
illusion of having escaped beyond the control of their own gentle and scrupulous 
natures into the inhuman world of pleasure." Marcel Proust, Du Cote de chez 
Swam, vol. 1, p. 236. 4,f> — One might also think here of Anatole France's note on 
the Baudelairean erotic, ^et one is justified in asking whether every sadism is 
structured like this one, since the concept of evil to which Proust relates it seems 
to exclude awareness. Sexual intercourse between human partners (in contrast to 
that between animals) includes awareness, and would thus perhaps also include a 
more or less high degree of sadism. Baudelaire's reflections on the sexual act 
would therefore carry more weight than this Proustian apologetic. [ J89a,3] 

On the subject of the ragpicker, compare the conditions in England described by 
Marx in the section "Die moderne Manufaktur," in Das Kmpital (<vol. 1,> ed. 
Korsch <Berlin, 1932>, p. 438). [ J89a,4] 

Proust on the allegories by Giotto in Santa Maria dell 1 Arena: "In later years I 
understood that the arresting strangeness ... of these frescoes lay in the great part 
played in each of them by its symbols, while the fact that these were depicted not as 
symbols (for the thought symbolized was nowhere expressed) but as real things, 
actually felt or materially handled, added something more precise and more literal 
to their meaning, something more concrete and more striking to the lesson they 
imparted. And even in the case of the poor kitchen-maid, was not our attention 
incessantly drawn to her helly by the load which filled it . . . ?" Marcel Proust, Du 
Cote de chez Sicann (Paris), vol. 1, pp. 121-122. 4117 [J90,l] 

In Baudelaire's theory of art, the motif of shock comes into play not only as 
prosodic principle. Rather, this same motif is operative wherever Baudelaire 
appropriates Poe's theory concerning the importance of surprise in the work of 
art. — From another perspective, the motif of shock emerges in the "scornful 
laughter of hell'""" which rouses the startled allegorist from his brooding. 

[J90.2] 

On information, advertisements, and feuilletons: the idler 189 must be furnished 
with sensations, the merchant with customers, and the man in the street with a 
worldview. [J90,3] 

Apropos of "Reve parisien," Crepet (<in Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du. mal, Oeuvres 
completes,> Conard edition [Paris, 1930], p. 463) cites a passage from a letter to 
Alphonse de Calonne: "Movement generally implies noise, to the extent that 
Pythagoras attributed music to the moving spheres. But dream, which separates 
things and breaks them down, creates the new." >m) Crepet further cites an article 
which Ernest Hello published in La Revue francaise of November 1858, under the 
title "Du genre fantastique" <The Genre of the Fantastic), and which Baudelaire 
would have seen. Hello writes: "In the symbolic order, beauty stands in inverse 
proportion to life. The naturalist thus classifies nature as follows: animal kingdom 



fi rst, vegetable kingdom next, mineral kingdom last. He is guided by the order of 
life. The poet will say: mineral kingdom first, vegetable kingdom after that, and 
animal kingdom last. He will be guided by the order of beauty." [ J90,4] 

Apropos of "L'Horloge," Crepet (Conard, p. 450): "A correspondent for L'lnter- 
mediaire des chercheurs et curieux <The Organ of the Inquisitive and the Curi- 
ous), M. Ch. Ad. C. (September 30, 1905), reported that Baudelaire had removed 
the hands from his clock and written on the face: 'It's later than you think!'" 

[J90a,l] 

On novelty and the familiar: "One of my dreams was the synthesis ... of a certain 
seagirt place and its medieval past. . . . This dream in which . . . the sea had 
turned gothic, this dream in which ... I believed that I was attaining to the impos- 
sible — it seemed to me that I had often dreamed it before. But as it is the property 
of what we imagine in our sleep to multiply itself in the past, and to appear, even 
when novel, familiar, I supposed that I was mistaken." Marcel Proust, La Cote de 
Guermantes (Paris, 1920), vol. 1, p. 131.* 9 ' [J90a,2] 

A rigorously Baudelairean reminiscence in Proust, to which, above all, the com- 
ments on Meryon <in "Salon de 1859"> should be compared. Proust speaks of 
railroad stations as "those vast, glass-roofed sheds, like that of Saint-Lazare into 
which I must go to find the train for Balbec, and which extended over the rent 
bowels of the city one of those bleak and boundless skies, heavy with an accumu- 
lation of dramatic menaces, like certain skies painted with an almost Parisian 
modernity by Mantegna or Veronese, beneath which could be accomplished 
only some solemn and tremendous act, such as a departure by train or the 
Elevation of the Cross." Marcel Proust, A I' Ombre des jeunes Jilles en jieurs (Paris), 
vol. 2, p. 63. 492 [J90a,3] 

The stanza beginning "If rape and arson," from "Au Lecteur," is cited by Proust 
(<La Prisonniere (Paris, 1923), vol. 2> p. 241) with this characteristic addition: 
"But I can at least assume that Baudelaire is not sincere. Whereas Dosto- 
evsky . . ."At issue is the latter's "preoccupation with murder." This all in a 
conversation with Albertine. 4M [ J90a,4] 

Apropos of "A Une Passante": "When Albertine returned to my room, she was 
wearing a garment of black satin which had the effect of making her seem paler, of 
turning her into the pallid, ardent Parisian, etiolated by want of fresh air, by the 
atmosphere of crowds and perhaps by habitual vice, whose eyes seemed more 
restless because they were not brightened by any color in her cheeks." Marcel 
Proust, La Prisonniere (Paris, 1923), vol. 1, p. 138. m [J90a,5] 

Meryon shows himself equal to the competition provided by photography. It was 
probably the last time this was possible for a graphic artist, as far as the image of 
the city is concerned. Writing about medieval Paris, Stahl says that on the site of 
the ancient curia "arose buildings that were much too large, against which the 



houses abutted with one yard after another, . . . and with blind alleys. Photogra- 
phy is useless here. Hence, we turn to the engravings of the great draftsman 
Meryon." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), p. 97. [J91,l] 



Insight into the physiognomy of "overpopulated Paris" is afforded by the back- 
ground — empty of human beings — in Meryon's Pont au change. On this back- 
ground we meet with one or two very narrow (window-wide) and, as it were, 
spindly houses. Their window openings strike the viewer like gazes; they bring 
to mind the gazes of those spindly, hollow-eyed children who appear — often 
gathered together in great numbers — in pictures of poor people from that era, 
and who stand there abashed and close-packed in a corner like the tenements in 
Meryon's engraving. [ J 9 1 ,2] 

Concerning Meryon's verses on the Pont Neuf <J2,3>, compare the old Parisian 
expression, "II se porte comme le pont neuf' ("he is hale and hearty"). [ J91.3] 

Baudelaire, great despiser of the countryside, of greenery and fields, nevertheless 
has this peculiarity: No one could be less inclined to view the big city as some- 
thing ordinary, natural, acceptable.' 195 [ J91,4] 

Baudelaire had the good fortune to be the contemporary of a bourgeoisie that 
could not yet employ, as accomplice of its domination, such an asocial type as he 
represented. The incorporation of a nihilism into its hegemonic apparatus was 
reserved for die bourgeoisie of the twentieth century. [ J 9 1 , 5 ] 

"I can understand how it is that city dwellers, who see only walls and streets and 
crimes, have so little religion." Jean-Jacques Rousseau, Les Confessions, ed. Hil- 
sum (Paris <1931>), vol. 4, p. 175.'" 6 [J91.6] 

A criterion for deciding whether or not a city is modern: the absence of monu- 
ments. "New York is a city without monuments" (Doblin) . — Meryon turned the 
tenements of Paris into monuments of modernity. [J91a,l] 

In the introduction to his published translation of one of Poe's tales in L' Illustra- 
tion (April 17, 1852), Baudelaire characterizes the American author's field of 
interests, and mentions, among other things, Poe's "analysis of the eccentrics and 
pariahs of this world" (Ch<arles> B<audelaire>, Oeuvres completes, ed. Crepet, Tra- 
ductions: Nouvelles Histoires extraordinaires [Paris, 1933], p. 378).' 197 The phrase 
corresponds, in the most striking manner, to the self-portrait which Blanqui 
introduced — as rebus image, so to speak — into L'Eternite par les astres: "Blanqui 
. . . recognized himself to be 'the pariah' of an epoch." Maurice Dommanget, 
Auguste Blanqui a Belle-Ile (Paris, 1935), pp. 140-141. [J91a,2] 

Re Meryon's Pont au change: "The hlock-tenements of Rome, such as the famous 
Insula Feliculae, rose, with a street breadth of only three to five meters, to heights 
that have never heen seen in Western Europe and are seen in only a few cities in 



America. Near the Capitol, the roofs already reached to the level of the hill-saddle. 
But always the splendid mass-cities harhor lamentahle poverty and degraded hah- 
its, and the attics and mansards, the cellars and back courts are breeding a new 
type of raw man. . . . Diodorus tells of a deposed Egyptian king who was reduced 
to living in one of these wretched upper-floor tenements of Rome." Oswald 
Spengler, Le Declin de VOccident <trans. M. Tazerout>, vol. 2 (Paris, 1933), 
p. 143. m [J91a,3] 



On the decline in the birthrate: "When the ordinary thinking of a highly cultivated 
people begins to regard 'having children' as a question of pro's and con's, the 
great turning point has come. ... At that point begins prudent limitation of the 
number of births. ... In subsequent Roman times, it became appallingly general. 
At first explained by the economic misery of the times, very soon it ceased to 
explain itself at all." Oswald Spengler, Le Declin de VOccident, vol. 2 (Paris), 
p. 147. Compare p. 146: the peasant feels himself to be a link in the chain of 
forebears and descendants. 499 [J91a,4] 



Concerning the title, Les Fleurs du mal: "During naive epochs, and as late as 1824, 
the title of a volume of poetry simply indicated the genre taken up by the author. 
There were odes, epistles, light verse, heroic verse, satires. Today, the title is a 
symhol. Nothing is more refined. When the author harbors lyric intentions, he 
gives his collection a sonorous and musical label: Melodies, Preludes . . . Tender- 
hearted friends of nature prefer to take their titles from The Good Gardener's 
Almanac. Thus, w e have Dead Leaves, . . . Branches of Almond. . . . We have 
Palms and Cypresses. . . . And then the flowers: Flowers of Noon, Flowers of 
Provence, Flowers of the Alps, Floivers of the Fields.'''' Charles Louandre, "Statis- 
tique litteraire: La Poesie depuis 1830," Revue des deux mondes, 30 (Paris, June 
15, 1842), p. 979. [J92,l] 



The original title of "Les Sept Vieillards": "Fantomes parisiens."™ 0 [J92,2] 

"From the beginning, the proclamation of Equality as a constitutional principle 
was not only an advance for thought, but a danger as well." (Max Horkheimer, 
"Materialismus und Moral," Z^hrift fur SoiUlforschung [1933], no. 2, p. 188.) r,0] 
Within the zone of this danger lie the absurd uniformities in Poe's description of 
the crowd. The hallucination of the seven identical old men is in the same mold. 

[J92.3] 



It is only as commodity that the thing has the effect of alienating human beings 
from one another. It produces this effect through its price. What is decisive is the 
empathy with the exchange value of the commodity, with its equalizing sub- 
strate. (The absolute qualitative invariance of the time in which labor that gener- 
ates exchange value runs its course — such absolute equality is the grayish 
background against which the gaudy colors of sensation stand out.) [J92,4] 



Regarding spleen. Blanqui to Lacambre, September 16, 1853: "Even the news 
from the true Empire of the Dead must he more interesting than the news from this 
dismal hall in the Kingdom of the Shades where we are being quarantined. Nothing 
more wretched than this shut-away existence, this tossing and turning at the bot- 
tom of a jar, like spiders trying to find the way out." Maurice Dommanget, Blanqui 



After a vain attempt at flight from Belle-Isle, Blanqui was thrown for a month into 
the dungeon known as "Chateau Fouquet." Dommanget refers to "the dreary and 
oppressive succession of hours and minutes that hammer the skull." Maurice 



The following lines from Barbier should be compared with parts of Baudelaire's 
poem "Paysage." Cited in Sainte-Beuve, Portraits contemporains, vol. 2 (Paris, 
1882), p. 234 ("Briseux et Auguste Barbier"). 



What inexpressible happiness, what ecstasy, 

To he a living ray of divinity; 

To look down from the orbed canopy of heaven 

On the dust of worlds glistening below, 

To hear, at every instant of their bright awakening, 

A thousand suns at their song like the birds! 

Oh, what felicity to live among things of heauty, 

And to savor the sweetness without needing reasons! 

How lovely to he well without wishing to be better, 

And without ever having to tire of the skies! [ J92a,2] 



a. Belle-Ile <Paris, 1935>, p. 250. 



[J92.5] 



Dommanget, Blanqui a. Belle-lle, p. 238. 



[J92a,l] 



14 

[Dream City and Dream House, Dreams of the 
Future, Anthropological Nihilism, Jung] 

My good father had been in Paris. 

— Karl Gutzkow, Bnefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, p. 58 

Library where the books have melted into one another and 
the titles have faded away. 

— Dr. Pierre Mabille, "Preface a YEloge des prejuges populaires," 
Minotaurc, 2, no. 6 (Winter 1935), p. 2 

The Pantheon raising its somber dome toward the somber 
dome of the sky. 

— Ponson du Terrail, Les Drames de Paris, vol. 1, p. 9 1 



Awakening as a graduated process that goes on in the life of the individual as in 
the life of generations. Sleep its initial stage. A generation's experience of youth 
has much in common with the experience of dreams. Its historical configuration 
is a dream configuration. Every epoch has such a side turned toward dreams, the 
child's side For the previous century, this appears very clearly in the arcades. But 
whereas the education of earlier generations explained these dreams for them in 
terms of tradition, of religious doctrine, present-day education simply amounts to 
the distraction of children. Proust could emerge as an unprecedented phenome- 
non only in a generation that had lost all bodily and natural aids to remem- 
brance 2 and that, poorer than before, was left to itself to take possession of the 
worlds of childhood in merely an isolated, scattered, and pathological way. What 
follows here is an experiment in the technique of awakening. An attempt to be- 
come aware of the dialectical — the Copernican — turn of remembrance. [Kl, 1 ] 

The Copernican revolution in historical perception is as follows. Formerly it was 
thought that a fixed point had been found in "what has been," and one saw the 
present engaged in tentatively concentrating the forces of knowledge on this 
ground. Now this relation is to be overturned, and what has been is to become 
the dialectical reversal — the flash of awakened consciousness. Politics attains 



primacy over history. The facts become something that just now first happened 
to us, first struck us; to establish them is the affair of memory. Indeed, awaken- 
ing is the great exemplar of memory: the occasion on which it is given us to 
remember what is closest, tritest, most obvious. What Proust intends with the 
experimental rearrangement of furniture in matinal half -slumber, what Bloch 
recognizes as the darkness of the lived moment, 3 is nothing other than what here 
is to be secured on the level of the historical, and collectively. There is a not-yet- 
conscious knowledge of what has been: its advancement 1 has the structure of 
awakening. [Kl,2] 

There is a wholly unique experience of dialectic. The compelling — the drastic — 
experience, which refutes everything "gradual" about becoming and shows all 
seeming "development" to be dialectical reversal, eminently and thoroughly 
composed, is the awakening from dream. For the dialectical schematism at the 
core of this process, the Chinese have often found, in their fairy tales and novel- 
las, a highly pregnant expression. The new, dialectical method of doing history 
presents itself as the art of experiencing the present as waking world, a world to 
which that dream we name the past refers in truth. To pass through and carry out 
what has been in remembering the dream! — Therefore: remembering and awak- 
ing are most intimately related. Awakening is namely the dialectical, Copernican 
turn of remembrance. [K.1,3] 

The nineteenth century a spacetime <£eitraum> (a dreamtime <2jit-traum>) in 
which the individual consciousness more and more secures itself in reflecting, 
while the collective consciousness sinks into ever deeper sleep. But just as the 
sleeper — in this respect like the madman — sets out on the macrocosmic journey 
through his own body, and the noises and feelings of his insides, such as blood 
pressure, intestinal churn, heartbeat, and muscle sensation (which for the waking 
and salubrious individual converge in a steady surge of health) generate, in the 
extravagantly heightened iimer awareness of the sleeper, illusion or dream im- 
agery which translates and accounts for them, so likewise for the dreaming col- 
lective, which, through the arcades, conmiunes with its own insides. We must fol- 
low in its wake so as to expound the nineteenth century — in fashion and advertis- 
ing, in buildings and politics — as the outcome of its dream visions. [K.1,4] 

It is one of the tacit suppositions of psychoanalysis that the clear-cut antithesis of 
sleeping and waking has no value for determining the empirical form of con- 
sciousness of the human being, but instead yields before an unending variety of 
concrete states of consciousness conditioned by every conceivable level of wake- 
fulness within all possible centers. The situation of consciousness as patterned 
and checkered by sleep and waking need only be transferred from the individual 
to the collective. Of course, much that is external to the former is internal to the 
latter: architecture, fashion — yes, even the weather — are, in the interior of the 
collective, what the sensoria of organs, the feeling of sickness or health, are inside 
the individual. And so long as they preserve this unconscious, amorphous dream 



configuration, they are as much natural processes as digestion, breathing, and the 
like. They stand in the cycle of the eternally selfsame, until the collective seizes 
upon them in politics and history emerges. [K.1,5] 



"Who will inhabit the paternal home? Who will pray in the church where he was 
baptized? Who will still know the room where he raised his first cry, where he 
witnessed a last breath? Who will be able to rest his brow above the sill of a window 
where, as a youth, he would have formed those waking dreams which are the grace 
of dawn within the long and somber servitude of life? 0 roots of joy torn from the 
human soul!' 1 Louis Veuillot, Les Odeurs de Paris (Paris, 1914), p. 11. [Kla,l] 



The fact that we were children during this time belongs together with its objec- 
tive image. It had to be this way in order to produce this generation. That is to 
say: we seek a teleological moment in the context of dreams. Which is the 
moment of waiting. The dream waits secretly for the awakening; the sleeper 
surrenders himself to death only provisionally, waits for the second when he will 
cunningly wrest himself from its clutches. So, too, the dreaming collective, whose 
children provide the happy occasion for its own awakening. D Method D 

[Kla,2] 



Task of childhood: to bring the new world into symbolic space. The child, in fact, 
can do what the grownup absolutely cannot: recognize the new once again. For 
us, locomotives already have symbolic character because we met with them in 
childhood. Our children, however, will find this in automobiles, of which we 
ourselves see only the new, elegant, modern, cheeky side. There is no more 
insipid and shabby antithesis than that which reactionary thinkers like Klages try 
to set up between the symbol-space of nature and that of technology. To each 
truly new configuration of nature — and, at bottom, technology is just such a 
configuration — there correspond new "images." Every childhood discovers these 
new images in order to incorporate them into the image stock of humanity. 
D Method D [Kla,3] 



It is remarkable that constructions in which the expert recognizes anticipations of 
contemporary building fashions impress the alert but architecturally unschooled 
sense not at all as anticipatory but as distinctly old-fashioned and dreamlike. (Old 
railroad stations, gasworks, bridges.) [Kla,4] 



"The nineteenth century, singular fusion of individualistic and collectivist tenden- 
cies. Unlike virtually every previous age, it labels all actions 'individualistic' (ego, 
nation, art) while subterraneanly, in despised everyday domains, it necessarily 
furnishes, as in a delirium, the elements for a collective formation. . . . With this 
raw material, we must occupy ourselves — with gray buildings, market halls, de- 
partment stores, exhibitions." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig 
and Berlin), p. 15. [Kla,5] 



It is not only that the forms of appearance taken by the dream collective in the §■> 
nineteenth century cannot be thought away, and not only that these forms char- 

acterize this collective much more decisively than any other — they are also, j, 

rightly interpreted, of the highest practical import, for they allow us to recognize q 

the sea on which we navigate and the shore from which we push off. It is here, p 

therefore, that the "critique" of the nineteenth century — to say it in one word— ^ 

ought to begin. Hie critique not of its mechanism and cult of machinery but of its J? 

narcotic historicism, its passion for masks, in which nevertheless lurks a signal of g 
true historical existence, one which the Surrealists were the first to pick up. To 

decipher this signal is the concern of the present undertaking. And the revolu- | 

tionary materialist basis of Surrealism is sufficient warrant for the fact that, in this . 

signal of true historical existence, the nineteenth century gave supreme expres- o 

sion to its economic basis. [Kla,6] j? 

Attempt to develop Giedion's thesis. "In the nineteenth century," he writes, | 

"construction plays the role of the subconscious." 5 Wouldn't it be better to say 0 

"the role of bodily processes" — around which "artistic" architectures gather, like fj. 

dreams around the framework of physiological processes? [Kla,7] gj 

Capitalism was a natural phenomenon with which a new dream-filled sleep came . 
over Europe, and, through it, a reactivation of mythic forces. [Kla,8] '. 

J 

The fir st tremors of awakening serve to deepen sleep. [Kla,9] 

"Strange, by the way, that when we survey this whole intellectual movement, 
Scribe appears as the only one to occupy himself directly and thoroughly with the 
present. Everyone else busies himself more with the past than with the powers and 
interests that set their own time in motion. ... It was the past, moreover — it was 
the history of philosophy — that fueled eclectic doctrine; and, finally, it was the 
history of literature whose treasures were disclosed, in Villemain, by a criticism 
incapable of entering more deeply into the literary life of its own period." Julius 
Meyer, Geschichte tier modernen franzdsischen Malerei. (Leipzig, 1867), pp. 415- 
416. [K2,l] 

What the child (and, through faint reminiscence, the man) discovers in the pleats 
of the old material to which it clings while trailing at its mother's skirts — that's 
what these pages should contain. D Fashion D [K2,2] 

It is said that the dialectical method consists in doing justice each time to the 
concrete historical situation of its object. But that is not enough. For it is just as 
much a matter of doing justice to the concrete historical situation of the interest 
taken in the object. And this situation is always so constituted that the interest is 
itself preformed in that object and, above all, feels this object concretized in itself 
and upraised from its former being into the higher concretion of now-being 
<Jetztsein> (waking being!). In what way this now-being (which is something other 



than the now-being of "the present time" <Jetztzeit>, since it is a being punctuated 
and intermittent) already signifies, in itself, a higher concretion — this question, of 
course, can be entertained by the dialectical method only within the purview of a 
historical perception that at all points has overcome the ideology of progress. In 
regard to such a perception, one could speak of the increasing concentration 
(integration) of reality, such that everything past (in its time) can acquire a higher 
grade of actuality than it had in the moment of its existing. How it marks itself as 
higher actuality is determined by the image as which and in which it is compre- 
hended. And this dialectical penetration and actualization of former contexts 
puts the truth of all present action to the test. Or rather, it serves to ignite the 
explosive materials that are latent in what has been (the authentic figure of which 
is Jkshion) . To approach, in this way, "what has been" means to treat it not histo- 
riographically, as heretofore, but politically, in political categories. D Fashion □ 

[K2,3] 

Ihe imminent awakening is poised, like the wooden horse of the Greeks, in the 
Troy of dreams. [K2,4] 

On the doctrine of the ideological superstructure. It seems, at first sight, that 
Marx wanted to establish here only a causal relation between superstructure and 
infrastructure. But already the observation that ideologies of the superstructure 
reflect conditions falsely and invidiously goes beyond this. The question, in 
effect, is the following: if the infrastructure in a certain way (in the materials of 
thought and experience) determines the superstructure, but if such determina- 
tion is not reducible to simple reflection, how is it then — entirely apart from any 
question about the originating cause — to be characterized? As its expression. The 
superstructure is the expression of the infrastructure. The economic conditions 
under which society exists are expressed in the superstructure — precisely as, with 
the sleeper, an overfiill stomach finds not its reflection but its expression in the 
contents of dreams, which, from a causal point of view, it may be said to "condi- 
tion." The collective, from the first, expresses the conditions of its life. These find 
their expression in the dream and their interpretation in the awakening. [K2,5] 

Jugendstil — a first attempt to reckon with the open air. It finds a distinctive 
embodiment, for example, in the drawings of Simplicissimus, which clearly show 
how, in order to get a little air, one must become satirical. From another per- 
spective, Jugendstil could blossom in the artificial light and isolation in which 
advertising presents its objects. This birth of plein air from the spirit of the 
interior is the sensuous expression of the situation of Jugendstil from the view- 
point of the philosophy of history: Jugendstil is the dream that one has come 
awake. <See S4a,L> D Advertising D [K2,6] 

Just as technology is always revealing nature from a new perspective, so also, as it 
impinges on human beings, it constantly makes for variations in their most 



primordial passions, fears, and images of longing. In this work I mean to wrest 
from primal history <Urgeschichte> a portion of the nineteenth century. The 
alluring and threatening face of primal history is clearly manifest to us in the 
beginnings of technology, in the living arrangements of the nineteenth century; it 
has not yet shown itself in what lies nearer to us in time But it is also more 
intense in technology (on account of the latter's natural origin) than in other 
domains. That is the reason old photographs — but not old drawings — have a 
ghosdy effect. [K2a,l] 

On Wiertz's picture Thoughts and Vinous of a Severed Head, and its explicadon. 
The first thing that strikes one about this magnetopathic experience is the grandi- 
ose sleight of hand which the consciousness executes in death. "What a singular 
thing! The head is here under the scaffold, and it believes that it still exists above, 
forming part of the body and continuing to wait for the blow that will separate it 
from the trunk." A. Wiertz, Oeuvres litteraires (Paris, 1870), p. 492. The same 
inspiration at work here in Wiertz animates Bierce in his extraordinary short 
story about the rebel who is hanged, and who experiences, at the moment of his 
death, the flight that frees him from the hangman. 6 [K2a,2] 

Every current of fashion or of worldview derives its force from what is forgotten. 
This downstream flow is ordinarily so strong that only the group can give itself 
up to it; the individual — the precursor — is liable to collapse in the face of such 
violence, as happened with Proust. In other words: what Proust, as an individual, 
directly experienced in the phenomenon of remembrance, we have to experience 
indirectly (with regard to the nineteenth century) in studying "current," "fash- 
ion," "tendency" — as punishment, if you will, for the sluggishness which keeps 
us from taking it up ourselves. 7 [K2a,3] 

Fashion, like architecture, inheres in the darkness of the lived moment, belongs 
to the dream consciousness of the collective. The latter awakes, for example, in 
advertising. [K2a,4] 

"Very interesting . . . how the fascistization of science had to alter precisely those 
elements in Freud which still stem from the enlightened, materialistic period ol the 
bourgeoisie. ... In Jung, . . . the unconscious ... is no longer individual — that is, 
not an acquired condition in the single . . . human being, but a stock of primal 
humanity renewing itself in the present; it is not repression hut fruitful return." 
Ernst Bloch, Erbschaft dieser Zeit (Zurich, 1935), p. 254." [K2a,5] 

Historical index of childhood according to Marx. In his derivation of the norma- 
tive character of Greek art (as an art springing from the childhood of the human 
race), Marx says: "Doesn't the child in every epoch represent the character of the 
period in its natural veracity?" 9 Cited in Max Raphael, Proudhon, Marx, Picasso 
(Paris, 1933), p. 175. [K2a,6] 



More than a hundred years before it was fully manifest, the colossal acceleration 
of the tempo of living was heralded in the tempo of production. And, indeed, in 
the form of the machine. "The number of implements that he himself [that is, the 
human being] can use simultaneously is limited by the number of his own natural 
instruments of production, by the number of his bodily organs. . . . The jenny, on 
the other hand, even at its very birth, spun with twelve to eighteen spindles, and 
the stocking loom knits with many thousands of needles at once. The number of 
tools that a machine can bring into play simultaneously is, from the very first, 
emancipated from the organic limits that hedge in the tools of a handicraftsman." 
Karl Marx, Das Kapital, vol. 1 (Hamburg, 1922), p. 337.'°The tempo of machine 
operation effects changes in the economic tempo. "In this country, the main thing 
is to reap a huge fortune with as little delay as possible. It used to be that the 
fortune resulting from a commercial house begun by the grandfather was 
scarcely run through by the time the grandson died. Things don't happen that 
way any more; people want to enjoy without waiting, without having to be 
patient." Louis Rainier Lanfranchi, Voyage a Paris, ou Esquisses des homines et des 
choses dans cette capitale (Paris, 1830), p. 110. [K3,l] 

Simultaneity, the basis of the new style of living, likewise comes from mechanical 
production: "Each detail machine supplies raw material to the machine next in 
order; and since they are all working at the same time, the product is always 
going through the various stages of its fabrication, and is also constantly in a state 
of transition from one phase to another. . . . The collective machine, now an 
organized system of various kinds of single machines, and of groups of single 
machines, becomes more and more perfect, the more the process as a whole 
becomes a continuous one — that is, the less the raw material is interrupted in its 
passage from its first phase to its last; in other words, the more its passage from 
one phase to another is effected not by the hand of man but by the machinery 
itself. In manufacture the isolation of each detail process is a condition imposed 
by the nature of division of labor, but in the fully developed factory the continu- 
ity of those processes is, on the contrary, imperative." Karl Marx, Das Kapital, 
vol. 1 (Hamburg, 1922), p. 344." [K3,2] 

Film: unfolding <result?> 12 of all the forms of perception, the tempos and rhythms, 
which lie preformed in today's machines, such that all problems of contemporary 
art find their definitive formulation only in the context of film. □ Precursors D 

[K3.3] 

A small piece of materialist analysis, more valuable than most of what exists in 
this field: "Wfe love these hard, solid blocks of material which Flaubert raises and 
lets fall with the intermittent thud of a steam shovel. For if, as I found recounted 
in some book or other, sailors at sea used to catch the glow of Flaubert's lamp as 
he worked through the night, and take their bearings from it, as if from a light- 
house beam, so too it might be said that when he 'unloaded' a good round 
phrase, it had the regular rhythm of one of those machines used in excavating. 



Happy are they who can feel the beat of this obsessive rhythm." Marcel Proust, 
Chroniques (Paris, 1927), p. 204 ("A Propos du 'style' de Flaubert"). 13 [K3.4] 

In his chapter on the fetish character of the commodity, Marx has shown how 
ambiguous the economic world of capitalism seems. It is an ambiguity consider- 
ably heightened by the intensification of capital management — as we see exem- 
plified quite clearly in the machines which aggravate exploitation rather than 
alleviate the human lot. Isn't there implicit here a general connection to the 
equivocalness of the phenomena we are dealing with in the nineteenth century? 
The significance of intoxication for perception, of fiction for thinking, such as 
was never before recognized? "One thing has disappeared in the general up- 
heaval, and it was a great loss for art: the naive and therefore dependable accord 
of life and appearance" — so we read, characteristically, in Julius Meyer's Geschichte 
der modernen franzosischen Malerei seit 1789 (Leipzig, 1867), p. 31. [K3,5] 

On the political significance of film. Socialism would never have entered the 
world if its proponents had sought only to excite the enthusiasm of the working 
classes for a better order of things. "What made for the power and authority of the 
movement was that Marx understood how to interest the workers in a social 
order which would both benefit them and appear to them as just. It is exactly the 
same with art. At no point in time, no matter how Utopian, will anyone win the 
masses over to a higher art; they can be won over only to one nearer to them. 
And the difficulty consists precisely in finding a form for art such that, with the 
best conscience in the world, one could hold that it is a higher art. This will never 
happen with most of what is propagated by the avant-garde of the bourgeoisie. 
Here, Berl's argument is perfectly correct: "The confusion over the word 'revolu- 
tion' — a word which, for a Leninist, signifies the acquisition of power by the 
proletariat, and which elsewhere signifies the overturning of recognized spiritual 
values — is sufficiently attested by the Surrealists in their desire to establish Pi- 
casso as a revolutionary. . . . Picasso deceives them. ... A painter is not more 
revolutionary for having 'revolutionized' painting than a tailor like Poiret is for 
having 'revolutionized' fashion, or than a doctor is for having 'revolutionized' 
medicine." Emmanuel Berl, "Premier pamphlet," Europe, 75 (1929), p. 401. The 
masses positively require from the work of art (which, for them, has its place in 
the circle of consumer items) something that is warming. Here the flame most 
readily kindled is that of hatred. Its heat, however, burns or sears without provid- 
ing the "heart's ease" which qualifies art for consumption. Kitsch, on the other 
hand, is nothing more than art with a 100 percent, absolute and instantaneous 
availability for consumption. Precisely within the consecrated forms of expres- 
sion, therefore, kitsch and art stand irreconcilably opposed. But for developing, 
living forms, what matters is that they have within them something stirring, 
useful, ultimately heartening — that they take "kitsch" dialecticaJly up into them- 
selves, and hence bring themselves near to the masses while yet surmounting the 
kitsch. Today, perhaps, film alone is equal to this task — or, at any rate, more ready 
for it than any other art form. And whoever has recognized this will be inclined 



to disallow the pretentions of abstract film, as important as its experiments may 
be. He will call for a closed season on — a natural preserve for — the sort of kitsch 
whose providential site is the cinema. Only film can detonate the explosive stuff 
which the nineteenth century has accumulated in that strange and perhaps for- 
merly unknown material which is kitsch. But just as with the political structure of 
film, so also with other distinctively modern means of expression (such as light- 
ing or plastic design) : abstraction can be dangerous. [K3a, 1] 

One can characterize the problem of the form of the new art straight on: When 
and how will the worlds of form which, without our assistance, have arisen, for 
example, in mechanics, in film, in machine construction, in the new physics, and 
which have subjugated us, make it clear for us what mariner of nature they 
contain? When will we reach a state of society in which these forms, or those 
arising from them, reveal themselves to us as natural forms? Of course, this 
brings to light only one moment in the dialectical essence of technology. ( Which 
moment, is hard to say: antithesis if not synthesis.) In any case, there lives in 
technology another impulse as well: to bring about objectives strange to nature, 
along with means that are alien and inimical to nature — measures that emanci- 
pate themselves from nature and master it. [K3a,2] 

On Grandville: "Between an uninformed vision of the streets and a knowledge of 
the occult derived from cartomancy or astrology, a knowledge openly tormented 
hy flora and fauna and by a dream-humanity, he managed to lead a boundless 
imaginary life within a fabulous realm of primal poetry. . . . Grandville was per- 
haps the first draftsman ever to give the larval life of dreams a rational plastic 
form. Evident beneath this poised appearance, however, is that flebile nescio 
quid 1 ' 1 which disconcerts and provokes disquietude — sometimes troubling 
enough." MacOrlan, "Grandville le precurseur," Arts et metiers graphiques, 44 
(December 15, 1934.), pp. 20-21. The essay presents <Grandville> as a forerunner 
of Surrealism, particularly of surrealist film (Melies, Walt Disney). [K.4,1] 

Confrontation hetween the "visceral unconscious" and the "unconscious of obliv- 
ion" — the first of which is predominantly individual, the second predominantly 
collective: "The other part of the unconscious is made up of the mass of things 
learned in the course of the centuries and in the course of a life, things which were 
conscious once and which, by diffusion, have entered oblivion. . . . Vast subma- 
rine fund, in which all cultures, all studies, all proceedings of mind and will, all 
social uprisings, all struggles are collected in a formless mire. . . . The passional 
elements of individuals have receded, dimmed. All that remain are the givens of 
the external world, more or less transformed and digested. It is of the external 
world that this unconscious is made. . . . Born of social life, this humus belongs to 
societies . The species and the individual count for little in it; only the races and the 
ages leave their mark. This enormous labor undertaken in the shadows comes to 
light in dreams, thoughts, decisions, and above all at moments of crisis or of social 
upheaval; it forms the great common ground, the reserve of peoples and individu- 



als. Revolution and war, like a fever, are hest suited to get it moving. . . . Seeing 
that the psychology of the individual is now outmoded, let us call upon a sort of 
natural history of volcanic rhythms and suhterranean streams. There is nothing 
on the surface of the earth that was not once suhterranean (water, earth, fire). 
Nothing in the intellect that has not been digested and circulated in the depths." 
Dr. Pierre Mabille, "Preface a VEloge des prejuges populaires" Minotaure, 2, 
no. 6 (Winter 1935), p. 2. [K4,2] 

"The recent past always presents itself as though annihilated by catastrophes." 
Wiesengrund, in a letter <of June 5, 1935>. 15 [K4,3] 

Apropos of Henry Bordeaux's recollections of his youth: "In sum, the nineteenth 
century ran its course without in the least appearing to announce the twentieth." 
Andre Therive, "Les Livres," Le Temps (June 27, 1935). [K4,4] 

The embers blaze in your eyes, 
And you flash like a mirror. 
Have you hooves, have you wings, 
My black-flanked locomotive? 
See its mane ripple, 
Listen to that whinny; 
Its gallop is a rumble 
Of artillery and thunder. 

Refrain: 

Feed your horse its oats! 

Saddled, bridled — whistle and we're off! Ride 
At a gallop across the bridge, under the arch, 
Plow your way through hill and dale — 
No mount can rival yours. 

Pierre Dupont, "Le Chauffeur de locomotive" (Paris) ("Passage du Caire"). 

[K4 a ,l] 

"Yesterday, looking down from the tower of Notre Dame, I was aide to take in this 
gigantic city. Who huilt the first house, and when will the last one collapse? When 
will the ground of Paris look like that of Thebes or Bahylon?" Friedrich von 
Raumer, Brief e aits Paris und Frankreich im Jahre 1830 (Leipzig, 1831), vol. 2, 
p. 127. [K4 a ,2] 

D'Eichthal's additions to Duveyrier's plan of the "new city." They have to do with 
the temple. Significant that Duveyrier himself says, "My temple is a woman!" 
Counters d'Eichthal: "I think that the temple will contain the palace of man and 
the palace of woman; the man will go to pass the night with the woman, and the 
woman will come to work during the day with the man. Between the two palaces 
will be the temple proper, the place of communion, where the man and the woman 
join with all women and all men; and there the couple will neither rest nor lahor in 



isolation. . . . The temple ought to represent an androgyne, a man and a 
woman. . . . The same method of division should be employed throughout the city, 
throughout the realm, throughout the world: there will he the hemisphere of man 
and the hemisphere of woman." Henry-Rene d'Allemagne, Les Saint-Simoniens , 
1827-1837 (Paris, 1930), p. 310. [K4a,3] 

The Paris of the Saint-Simonians. From the draft plan sent hy Charles Duveyrier 
to L'Advocmt, with the expectation of having it incorporated into Le Livre des 
cent-et-iui (which, evidently, it was not): "We wanted to give a human form to the 
lirst city inspired by our faith." "The Lord, in his goodness, has spoken through 
the mouth of man: he sends . . . Paris! It is on the banks of your river and within 
your walls that I shall impress the seal of my new bounty. . . . Your kings and your 
peoples have marched with the slowness of centuries, and they have finally arrived 
at a magnificent place. It is there that the head of my city will repose. . . . The 
palaces of your kings will be its brow, . . . and I shall tend to its heard of mighty 
chestnut trees. . . . From the top of that head I will sweep away the old Christian 
temple, . . . and in this clearing I will arrange a headdress of trees. . . . Above the 
hreast of my city, in that sympathetic foyer where the passions all diverge and 
come together, where sorrows and joys vibrate, I will huild my temple, . . . solar 
plexus of the giant. . . . The hills of Roule and Chaillot will form its Hanks; there I 
will estahlish hank and university, marketplaces and publishing houses. ... I will 
extend the left arm of the colossus along the bank of the Seine; it will run . . . 
opposite . . . Passy. The corps of engineers . . . will constitute the upper portion, 
which will stretch toward Vaugirard, and I will make the forearm from the union 
of all the specialized schools of physical science. ... In hetween, ... I will assem- 
hie all the grammar schools and high schools for my city to press to its hreast, there 
on the left where the university is lodged. I will extend the right arm of the giant, as 
a show of force, all the way to the Gare de Saint-Ouen. ... I will load this arm with 
workshops of small industry, arcades, galleries, bazaars. ... I will form the right 
thigh and leg from all the large manufacturing establishments. The right foot will 
touch Neuilly. The left thigh will offer foreigners a long row of hotels. The left leg 
will reach to the Bois de Boulogne. . . . My city is in the posture of a man ahout to 
set off. His feet are hronze; they are resting on a double road of stone and iron. 
Here . . . vehicles of transport and instruments of communication are manufac- 
tured; here carriages race ahout. . . . Between its knees is an equestrian arena; 
hetween its legs, an immense hippodrome." Henry-Rene d'Allemagne, Les Saint- 
Simoniens, 1827-1837 (Paris, 1930), pp. 309-310. The idea for this proposal goes 
hack to Enfantin, who developed plans for the city of the future with the aid of 
anatomical charts. [K5] 

But no, the Orient summons you 
To go irrigate its deserts; 
Raise high into the air 
The towers of the ville ntuvelle. 



F. Maynard, "L'Avenir est beau," in Foi nouvelle: Chants et chansons de Bar- 
rault, Vinqard . . . , 1831 d 1834 (Paris, January 1, 1835), hook 1, p. 81. Regard- 
ing the motif of the desert, compare Rouget de Lisle's "Chant des industriels" and 
"Le Desert" by Felicien David. [K5a,l] 

Paris in the year 2855: "The city is 75 miles in circumference. Versailles and 
Fontainebleau — neighborhoods lost among so many others — send into less tran- 
quil boroughs refreshing perfumes from trees that are twenty centuries old. 
Sevres, which has become the regular market for the Chinese (French citizens 
since the war of 2850), displays ... its pagodas with their echoing little bells; in its 
midst can still he found the factories of an earlier age, reconstructed in porcelain d 
la rei/ie." Arsene Houssaye, "Le Paris futur," in Paris et les Parisiens au XIX- 
siecle (Paris, 1856), p. 459. [K5a,2] 

Chateaubriand on the Obelisk de la Concorde: "The hour will come when the 
obelisk of the desert will find once again, on Murderers' Square, the silence and 
solitude of Luxor." 16 Cited in Louis Bertrand, "Discours sur Chateaubriand," Le 
Temps (September 18, 1935). [K5a,3] 

Saint-Simon once proposed "turning a mountain in Switzerland into a statue of 
Napoleon. In one hand, it would hold an occupied city; in the other, a lake. " Count 
Gustav von Schlabrendorf, in Paris, on events and persons of his day [in Carl 
Gustav Jochmann, Reliquien: Aus seinen nachgelassenen Papieren, ed. Heinrich 
Zschokke, vol. 1 (Hechingen, 1836), p. 146]. [K5a,4] 

Nocturnal Paris in L'Homme qui rit: "The little wanderer was suffering the in- 
definable depression made by a sleeping town. Its silence, as of a paralyzed ants' 
nest, makes the head swim. All its lethargies mingle their nightmares, its slumbers 
are a crowd." 17 Cited in R. Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle Revue 
franqaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), p. 691. [K5a,5] 

"Because the collective unconscious is ... a deposit of world-processes embedded 
in the structure of the brain and the sympathetic nervous system, it constitutes . . . 
a sort of timeless and eternal world-image which counterbalances our conscious, 
momentary picture of the world." C. G. Jung, Seelenprobleme der Gegemvart 
(Zurich, Leipzig, and Stuttgart, 1932), p. 326 ("Analytische Psychologie und Welt- 
anschauung"). 1 " [K6,l] 

Jung calls the consciousness — on occasion! — "our Promethean conquest." C. G. 
Jung, Seelenprobleme der Gegemvart (Zurich, Leipzig, and Stuttgart, 1932), 
p. 249 ("Die Lehenswende"). And in another context: "To be 'unhistorical' is the 
Promethean sin. In this sense, modern man lives in sin. Higher consciousness is 
thus guilt." Ihid., p. 404 ("Das Seelenproblem des modernen Menschen").' 9 

[K6.2] 



"There can be no doubt that from . . . the memorable years of the French Revo- 
lution onward, man has given a more and more prominent place to the psyche, 
his increasing attentiveness to it being the measure of its growing attraction for 
him. The enthronement of the Goddess of Reason in Notre Dame seems to have 
been a symbolic gesture of great significance to the Western world — rather like 
the hewing down of Wotan's oak by the Christian missionaries. For then, as at 
the Revolution, no avenging bolt from heaven struck the blasphemer down." 
G. G.Jung, Seelenprobleme der Gegenwart (Zurich, Leipzig, and Stuttgart, 1932), 
p. 419 ("Das Seelenproblem des modernen Menschen"). 2 ' The "vengeance" for 
these two historical points of departure is being exacted today, it would seem, 
simultaneously. National Socialism takes the one affair in hand; Jung, the other. 

[K6.3] 

As long as there is still one beggar around, there will still be myth. [K6,4] 

"Moreover, an ingenious improvement had been introduced into the construction 
of squares. The administration bought them prefabricated, made to order. Trees 
of colored cardboard and taffeta flowers contributed greatly to these oases, and 
care had even been taken to conceal in the leaves some artificial birds that sang the 
whole day long. Thus, what is pleasant in nature had been preserved, while every- 
thing unfit and unworthy in nature had been eliminated." Victor Fournel, Paris 
nouveau et Paris futur (Paris, 1868), p. 252 ("Paris futur"). [K6,5] 

"The works of M. Haussmann gave rise, at least in the beginning, to a host of 
rather strange or grandiose projects. . . . For example, the architect M. Herard 
published, in 1855, a proposal for building footbridges at the intersection of the 
Boulevard Saint-Denis and the Boulevard de Sebastopol; these footbridges, incor- 
porating galleries, would make for a continuous square, each side of which would 
be defined by the angfe formed at the crossing of the two boufevards. M. J. Brame, 
in 1856, exhibited a series of lithographs detailing bis plan for a metropolitan 
railway line — in Paris, specificaffy — with a system of arches supporting the rails, 
with wafkways on the side for pedestrians, and with elevated crossovers to connect 
these sidewafks. ... At around the same time, in a "Letter to the Minister of 
Commerce," a lawyer calfed for the estabfishment of a series of awnings running 
the length of the streets to shefter the pedestrian, . . . who would have no further 
need of a carriage or umbrella. Not long after this, an architect . . . proposed to 
reconstruct the entire historic city center in Gothic style, so as to bring it into 
harmony with Notre Dame." Victor Fournel, Paris nouveau et Paris futur (Paris, 
1868), pp. 384-386. [K6a,l] 

From Fournel's chapter "Paris futur": "There were first-, second-, and third- 
cfass cafes, . . . and, for each category, the number of rooms, tables, billiard ta- 
bles, mirrors, ornaments, and gildings was carefully regulated. . . . There were 
master streets and service streets, just as there are master stairways and service 



stairways in well-organized houses. . . . On the facade of the har racks, a has-relief 
. . . depicted, in an ethereal nimbus, Puhlic Order dressed as an infantryman: an 
aureole ahove his brow, he was busy laying low the hundred-headed Hydra of 
Decentralization. . . . Fifty sentinels, posted at the fifty windows of the barracks 
opposite the fifty boulevards, were ahle to see, through field glasses, at a distance 
of fifteen or twenty kilometers, the fifty sentinels at the fifty gates. . . . Crowning 
Montmartre was a dome decorated with a giant electric clock, which could he 
viewed from two sides and heard from four, and which served to regulate all the 
clocks in the city. The great goal so long sought had finally been achieved: that of 
making Paris an ohject of luxury and curiosity, rather than of use — a ville d" expo- 
sition, a display city placed under glass, ... an ohject of admiration and envy to 
foreigners, unhearahle for its inhabitants. "V. Fournel, pp. 235-237, 240-241. 

[K6a,2] 

Critique by Fournel of Ch. Duveyrier's Saint-Simonian city: "We cannot continue 
with the exposition of this rash metaphor of M. Duveyrier's, which he develops . . . 
with a truly stupefying single-mindedness, and without any sense of the way in 
which his ingenious distribution would return the city of Paris, in the name of 
progress, to that period of the Middle Ages when each hranch of industry or trade 
was confined to its own quartier.'''' Victor Fournel, Paris nouveau et Paris futur 
(Paris, 1868), pp. 374-375 ("Les Precurseuis de M. Haussmann"). [K7,l] 

"We shall speak of a monument especially dear to our heart, one which has come to 
seem, with a climate such as ours, a virtual necessity: . . . the winter garden 1 . . . . 
Near the center of the city, a vast piece of ground capable of holding, like the 
Colosseum in Rome, a large part of the population, would be enclosed by a great 
lighted vault, a little like the Crystal Palace in London, or like our market halls of 
today; the columns would he of cast iron, with only a hit of stone to strengthen the 
foundations. ... 0, my winter garden, what use I would make of you for my 
Novutopians! In the great city of Paris, hy contrast, they have built a heavy, 
clumsy, ugly monument of stone, which no one knows what to do with. Here, in 
recent months, the paintings of our artists have heen displayed, facing away from 
the light, baking at only a slightly greater remove from the blazing sun." F. A. 
Couturier de Vienne, Paris moderne: Plan d'une ville modele que Vautew a ap- 
pelee Novutopie (Paris, 1860), pp. 263-265. [K7,2] 

On the dream house: "In all southern countries, where the popular conception of 
the street requires that the exteriors of houses appear more 'lived in' than their 
interiors, this exhihition of the private life of the residents confers on their dwell- 
ings the quality of a secret place, which piques the curiosity of foreigners. The 
impression made is the same in fairs: everything there is consigned to the street 
with such abandon that whatever is not there takes on the power of a mystery." 
Adrien Dupassage, "Peintures foraines," Arts et metiers graphiques (1939). 

[K7,3] 



Couldn't one compare the social differentiation present in architecture (see 
FournePs description of cafes in K6a,2; or front stairs versus back stairs) with the 
social differentiation at work in fashion? [K7a,l] 



On anthropological nihilism, compare N8a,l : Celine, Benn. [K7a,2] 

"The fifteenth century . . . was a time when corpses, skulls and skeletons were 
extravagantly popular. Painted, sculpted, written about and dramatically repre- 
sented, the Danse Macabre was everywhere. To the fifteenth-century artist, a good 
death-appeal was as sure a key to popularity as a good sex-appeal is at the present 
time." Aldous Huxley, Croisiere d'hiver: <Voyage> en Amerique centrale (Paris 
<1935>), p. 58. 21 [K7a,3] 

Concerning the interior of the body: "The motif and its elaboration go back to 
John Chrysostom's 'On Women and Beauty' (Opera, ed. B. de Montfaucon 
[Paris, 1735], vol. 12, p. 523). ,1 "The beauty of the body is merely skin-deep. For 
if, like the legendary lynx of Boeotia, men were to see what lies beneath the skin, 
they would recoil in disgust at the sight of a woman. That well-known charm is 
nothing but mucus and blood, humors and bile. Just stop to consider what is 
hidden away in the nostrils, the throat, or the belly: everywhere filth. And if, in 
fact, we shrink from touching mucus or dung with even the tip of our finger, how 
could we ever wish to embrace the sack of excrements itself?" Odon of Cluny, 
Collationum, hook 3 (Migne), vol. 133, p. 556; cited in J. Huizinga, Herbst des 
Mittelalters (Munich, 1928), p. 197. 22 [K7a,4] 

Re the psychoanalytic theory of memory: "Freud's later researches made it clear 
that this view [the concept of repression] must he enlarged. . . . The macliinery of 
repression ... is ... a special case of the . . . significant process which occurs 
when the ego is unequal to meeting certain demands made upon the mental mecha- 
nism. The more general process of defense does not cancel the strong impressions; 
it only lays them aside. ... It will he in the interest of clarity for me to state the 
contrast between memory and reminiscence with deliberate bluntness: the func- 
tion of memory [the author identifies the sphere of "forgetfulness" with "uncon- 
scious memory" (p. 130)] is to protect our impressions; reminiscence aims at their 
dissolution. Essentially memory is conservative; reminiscence, destructive. " 
Theodor Reik, Der iiberraschte Psychologe (Leiden, 1935), pp. 130-132. 23 

[K8.1] 

"For instance, we experience the death of a near relative . . . and believe that we 
feel our grief in all its depth . . . , but our grief reveals its depths only long after we 
think that we have got the better of it." The "forgotten" grief persists and gains 
ground; compare the death of the grandmother in Proust. "To experience means 
to master an impression inwardly that was so strong we could not grasp it at 
once." This definition of experience in Freud's sense is something very different 



from what is meant by those who speak of having "had an experience." Theodor o 
Reik, Der iiberraschte Psyc/wloge (Leiden, 1935), p. 131. 24 [K8,2] 

T- 

What is laid aside in the unconscious as content of memory. Proust speaks of the q 

"thoroughly alive and creative sleep of the unconscious ... in which the things | 

that barely touch us succeed in carving an impression, in which our hands take " 

hold of the key that turns the lock, the key for which we have sought in vain." ft" 

Marcel Proust, La Prisonniere (Paris, 1923), vol. 2, p. 189. 25 [K8,3] g 

The classic passage on "involuntary memory" in Proust — prelude to the moment | 
in which the effect of the madeleine on the narrator is described: "And so it was 

that, for a long time afterward, when I lay awake at night and revived old g 

memories of Gombray, I saw no more of it than this sort of luminous panel. ... I « 

must own that I could have assured any questioner that Gombray did include !? 
other scenes. . . . But since the facts which I should then have recalled would 

have been prompted only by the voluntary memory, the intellectual memory, 0 

and since the information which that kind of memory gives us about the past cj- 

preserves nothing of the past itself, I should never have had any wish to ponder >n 

over this residue of Gombray. . . . And so it is with our own past. It is a labor in | 

vain to attempt to recapture it: all the efforts of our intellect must prove futile. f 

The past is hidden somewhere outside the realm, beyond the reach, of intellect, '. 

in some material object . . . which we do not suspect. And as for that object, it | 
depends on chance whether we come upon it or not before we ourselves must 
die." Marcel Proust, Du Cote de chez Swann, vol. 1, pp. 67-69. 2fi [K8a,l] 

The classic passage on awakening at night in a dark room and the ensuing 
orientation: "When I awoke like this, and my mind struggled in an unsuccessful 
attempt to discover where I was, everything would be moving round me through 
the darkness: things, places, years. My body, still too heavy with sleep to move, 
would make an effort to construe the form which its tiredness took as an orienta- 
tion of its various members, so as to deduce from that where the wall lay and the 
furniture stood, to piece together and to give a name to the house in which it 
must be living. Its memory, the composite memory of its ribs, knees, and shoul- 
der-blades, offered it a whole series of rooms in which it had at one time or 
another slept, while the unseen walls kept changing, adapting themselves to the 
shape of each successive room that it remembered, whirling madly through the 
darkness. And even before my brain . . . had collected sufficient impressions . . . 
to identify the room, it, my body, would recall from each room in succession 
what the bed was like, where the doors were, how daylight came in at the 
windows, whether there was a passage outside, what I had in my mind when I 
went to sleep, and had found there when I awoke." Marcel Proust, Du Cote de 
chez Swann, vol. 1, p. 15. 27 [K8a,2] 



Proust on nights of deep sleep after great exhaustion: "Good nights . . . turn so 
effectively the soil and break through the surface stone of our body that we 



bp 



discover there, where our muscles dive down and throw out their twisted roots 
and breathe the air of the new life, the garden in which as a child we used to play. 
There is no need to travel in order to see it again; we must dig down inwardly to 
discover it. What once covered the earth is no longer upon it but beneath; a mere 
excursion does not suffice for a visit to the dead city — excavation is necessary 
also." These words run counter to the injunction to revisit the sites of one's 
childhood. And they lose not a whit of their sense when taken as a critique of the 
memoir e volontaire. Marcel Proust, Le Cote de Gueimantes (Paris, 1920), vol. 1, 
p. 82. 28 [K9.1] 



Linking of Proust's oeuvre to the work of Baudelaire: "One of the masterpieces 
of French literature — Sylvie, by Gerard de Nerval — like the Memoires d'outre- 
tombe <of Chateaubriand) . . . , contains a sensation of the same character as the 
savor of the madeleine. . . . And finally, in Baudelaire, these reminiscences are still 
more frequent and obviously less incidental and therefore, in my opinion, deci- 
sive. Here it is the poet himself who, with more variety and more indolence, 
purposely seeks in the odor of a woman's hair or her breast, for example, inspir- 
ing resemblances which shall evoke for him 'the canopy of overarching sky' and 
'a harbor filled with masts and sails.' I was going to endeavor to recall the poems 
of Baudelaire which are based in similar manner on a transferred sensation, in 
order definitely to place myself again in line with such a noble literary heritage 
and reassure myself that the work I was now about to undertake without any 
further hesitation was worth the effort I was going to devote to it, when I reached 
the foot of the stairs . . . and suddenly found myself ... in the midst of a fete." 
Marcel Proust, Le Temps retrouve (Paris <1927>), vol. 2, pp. 82-83. 2il [K.9,2] 



"Man is himself, is man, only at the surface. Lift the skin, dissect: here begin the 
machines. It is then you lose yourself in an inexplicable substance, something alien 
to everything you know, and which is nonetheless the essential." Paul Valery, 
CahierB, 1910 (Paris <1930>), pp. 39-40. [K.9,3] 



Dream city of Napoleon I: "Napoleon, who originally had wanted to erect the Arc 
de Triomphe somewhere inside the city, like the disappointing first effort made at 
the Place du Caroussel, let himself be persuaded by Fontaine to start construction 
west of the city, where a large tract of land was at his disposal, on an imperial Paris 
that would surpass the royal city, Versailles included. Between the summit of the 
Avenue des Champs-Elysees and the Seine, ... on the plateau where today the 
Trocadero stands, was to be built , 'with palaces for twelve kings and their reti- 
nues,' . . . 'not only the most beautiful city that ever was, but the most beautiful 
city that ever could be.' The Arc de Triomphe was conceived as the first edifice of 
this city." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), pp. 27-28. [KJa.l] 



[Dream House, Museum, Spa] 



The genteel variant of the dream house. The entrance to the panorama of 
Gropius is described as follows: "One enters a room decorated in the style of 
Herculaneum; at its center the passerby is drawn for a moment to a basin inlaid 
with shells, in which a small fountain is plashing. Straight ahead, a little flight of 
stairs leads to a cheerful reading room where some volumes are displayed — nota- 
bly, a collection of books designed to acquaint foreigners with the royal resi- 
dence." Erich Stenger, Daguerres Diorama in Berlin (Berlin, 1925), pp. 24-25. 
Bulwer<-Lytton>'s novel. When did the excavations begin? Foyers of casinos, and 
the like, belong to this elegant variant of the dream house. Why a fountain in a 
covered space is conducive to daydreaming has yet to be explained. But in order 
to gauge the shudder of dread and exaltation that might have come over the idle 
visitor who stepped across this threshold, it must be remembered that the discov- 
ery of Pompeii and Herculaneum had taken place a generation earlier, and that 
the memory of the lava-death of these two cities was covertly but all the more 
intimately conjoined with the memory of the great Revolution. For when the 
sudden upheaval had put an end to the style of the ancien regime, what was here 
being exhumed was hastily adopted as the style of a glorious republic; and palm 
fronds, acanthus leaves, and meanders came to replace the rococo paintings and 
chinoueries of the previous century. D Antiquity D [Ll,l] 

"Suddenly, however, they want to transform the French, with one wave of a magic 
wand, into a people of classical antiquity; and on this whim of dreamers isolated in 
their private lihraries (the goddess Minerva notwithstanding), numerous artistic 
endeavors have depended." Friedrich Johann Lorenz Meyer, Frmgmente aus 
Paris im IV"'" Jahr der franzosischen Republic (Hamburg, 1797), vol. 1, p. 146. 
D Antiquity D [Ll,2] 

Dream houses of the collective: arcades, winter gardens, panoramas, factories, 
wax museums, casinos, railroad stations. [Ll>3] 

The Gare Saint-Lazare: a puffing, wheezing princess with the stare of a clock. 
"For our type of man," says Jacques de Lacretelle, "train stations are truly facto- 
ries of dreams" ("Le Reveur parisien," Nouvelle Revue francaue, 1927). To be sure: 



today, in the age of the automobile and airplane, it is only faint, atavistic terrors 
which still lurk within the blackened sheds; and that stale comedy of farewell and 
reunion, carried on before a background of Pullman cars, turns the railway 
platform into a provincial stage. Once again we see performed the timeworn 
Greek melodrama: Orpheus, Eurydice, and Hermes at the station. Through the 
mountains of luggage surrounding the figure of the nymph, looms the steep and 
rocky path, the crypt into which she sinks when the Hermaic conductor with the 
signal disk, watching for the moist eye of Orpheus, gives the sign for departure. 
Scar of departure, which zigzags, like the crack on a Greek vase, across the 
painted bodies of the gods. [Ll,4] 

The domestic interior moves outside. It is as though the bourgeois were so sure 
of his prosperity that he is careless of facade, and can exclaim: My house, no 
matter where you choose to cut into it, is facade. Such facades, especially, on the 
Berlin houses dating back to the middle of the previous century: an alcove does 
not jut out, but — as niche — tucks in. The street becomes room and the room 
becomes street. The passerby who stops to look at the house stands, as it were, in 
the alcove. D Flaneur D [Ll,5] 

On the dream house. The arcade as temple: the habitue of those "ohscure ba- 
zaars" of the bourgeois arcades "will find himself almost on foreign ground in the 
Passage de 1'Opera. He will be profoundly ill at ease there; he will be anxious to 
leave. Another moment and he will discover himself a master, as if he had pene- 
trated the temple of God." Le Livre des cent-et-un, vol. 10 (Paris, 1833), p. 71 
(Amedee Kermel, "Les Passages de Paris"). [Ll,6] 

Apropos of the colored windowpanes which were beginning to be installed in stair- 
ways (and these stairs were often waxed!) Alphonse Karr writes: "The staircase 
has remained something that looks more like a machine of war for defending one's 
house against enemies than a means of communication and access offered to 
friends." Alphonse Karr, 300 pages, new edition (Paris, 1861), pp. 198-199. 

[L1.7] 

The house has always shown itself "barely receptive to new formulations." Sig- 
fried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich <Berlin, 1928>, p. 78. [LI, 8] 

Arcades are houses or passages having no outside — like the dream. [Lla,l] 

Museums unquestionably belong to the dream houses of the collective. In con- 
sidering them, one would want to emphasize the dialectic by which they come 
into contact, on the one hand, with scientific research and, on the other hand, 
with "the dreamy tide of bad taste." "Nearly every epoch would appear, by virtue 
of its inner disposition, to be chiefly engaged in unfolding a specific architectural 
problem: for the Gothic age, this is the cathedrals; for the Baroque, the palace; 
and for the early nineteenth century, with its regressive tendency to allow itself to 



be saturated with the past: the museum." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, g 

p. 36. This thirst for the past forms something like the principal object of my ^ 

analysis — in light of which the inside of the museum appears as an interior ^ 

magnified on a giant scale. In the years 1850-1890, exhibitions take the place of rj 
museums. Comparison between the ideological bases of the two. [Lla,2] 



re 



an 



"The nineteenth century provided all new creations, in every area of endeavor, 
with historicizing masks. This was no less true in the field of architecture than in 
the field of industry or society. New possibilities of construction were being intro- 
duced, hut people felt almost fear at the advent of these new possibilities and 
heedlessly buried them in theatrical decoration. The enormous collective appara- 
tus of industry was being put in place, but its significance was altered entirely by Tm 
the fact that the benefits of the production process were allowed to accrue to only a 
small number. This historicizing mask is indissolubly bound to the image of the 
nineteenth century, and is not to be gainsaid." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frank- 
reich, pp. 1-2. [Lla,3J 

Le Corbusier's work seems to stand at the terminus of the mythological figura- 
tion "house." Compare the following: "Why should the house be made as light 
and airy as possible? Because only in that way can a fatal and hereditary monu- 
mentality be brought to an end. As long as the play of burden and support, 
whether actually or symbolically exaggerated (Baroque), got its meaning from 
the supporting walls, heaviness was justified. But today — with the unburdened 
exterior wall — the ornamentally accentuated counterpoint of pillar and load is a 
painful farce (American skyscrapers)." Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich, p. 85. 

[Lla,4] 

Le Corbusier's "contemporary city" 1 is yet another settlement along a highway. 
Only the fact that now its precincts are traveled over by autos, and that airplanes 
now land in its midst, changes everything. An effort must be made to secure a 
foothold here from which to cast a productive glance, a form-and-distance-creat- 
ing glance, on the nineteenth century. [Lla,5J 

"The condominium is the last incarnation of the haronial manor. It owes its exist- 
ence and its form to the hrutal egoistic competition of individual landowners for 
the rights to territory that, in the struggle for existence, was being hroken up and 
parceled out. We are therefore not surprised to see the form of the manor house 
reappearing as well — in the walled courtyard. One occupant secludes himself from 
another, and that in fact helps to explain why, in the end, a chance remnant of the 
whole survives." Adolf Behne, Neues Wohnen — Neues Bauen (Leipzig, 1927), 
pp. 93-94. [Lla,6] 



The museum as dream house. "We have seen how the Bourbons already thought it 
important that the ancestors of their house he glorified and that the earlier history 
of France, in all its splendor and significance, he recognized once again. Hence, 



they also arranged to have outstanding moments from French history and French 
cultural evolution depicted on the ceilings of the Louvre." Julius Meyer, 
Geschichte der modernenfranzdsischen Malerei (Leipzig, 1867), p. 424. [Lla,7] 

In June of 1837 — "to the everlasting glory of France" — the historic museum of 
Versailles was opened. A suite of rooms that one needs almost two hours merely 
to traverse. Battles and scenes of parliament. Among the painters: Gosse, 
Lariviere, Heim, Deveria, Gerard, Ary Scheffer, and others. Here, then, the 
collecting of pictures turns into: the painting of pictures for the museum. [L2,l] 

Interlacing of museum and domestic inteiior. M. Chabrillat (1882, director of the 
Ambigu theater) one day inherits a complete waxworks museum, "set up in the 
Passage de l'Opera, right above the clock." (Perhaps it was the old Hartkoff 
Museum.) Chabrillat is friends with a certain bohemien, a gifted draftsman, who 
at the time is homeless. This man has an idea. Among the waxworks in this mu- 
seum is one group representing the visit of Empress Eugenie to cholera patients in 
Amiens. At the right, the empress smiles on the patients; to the left is a Sister of 
Charity in white cornet - , and lying on an iron cot, pale and emaciated beneath the 
fine clean bedclothes, is a dying man. The museum closes at midnight. The drafts- 
man opines: Nothing simpler than to remove, with due care, the cholera patient, 
lay him on the floor, and take his place in the bed. Chabrillat gives his permission; 
the wax figures mean little to him. For the next six weeks, then, the artist, having 
just heen thrown out of his hotel, spends the night in the bed of the cholera victim, 
and each morning he awakens under the gentle glance of the sicknurse and the 
smiling glance of the empress, who lets her blond hair fall on him. From Jules 
Claretie, La Vie a Paris, 1882 (Paris <1883>), pp. 301ff. [L2,2] 

"How much I admire those men who decide to be shut up at night in a museum 
in order to examine at their own discretion, at an illicit time, some portrait of a 
woman they illuminate by a dark lantern. Inevitably, afterward, they must know 
much more about such a woman than we do." Andre Breton, Nadja (Paris 
<1928>) , p. 150. 2 But why? Because, in the medium of this image, the transforma- 
tion of the museum into an interior has taken place. [L2,3] 

The dream house of the arcades is encountered again in the church. Encroach- 
ment of the architectural style of the arcades on sacred architecture. Concerning 
Notre Dame de Lorette: "The interior of this building is without doubt in excel- 
lent taste, only it is not the interior of a church. The splendid ceiling would 
suitably adorn the most brilliant ballroom in the world; the graceful lamps of 
bronze, with their frosted glass globes in different colors, look as though they 
came from the city's most elegant cafes." S. F. Lahrs <?>, Briefe aus Paris, in 
Europa: Chronik der gebildeten Welt (Leipzig and Stuttgart, 1837), vol. 2, p. 209. 

[L2.4] 

"As for the new and not yet finished theaters, they appear to helong to no particu- 
lar style. The intention, evidently, is to integrate private into public uses by con- 



structing private residential dwellings all around the perimeter, so that these thea- 
ters can hardly become anything other than colossal containers, giant capsules for 
all sorts of things." Grenzboten, 1861, 2nd semester, vol. 3, p. 143 ("Die Pariser 
Kunstausstellungvon 1861"). [L2,5] 

Think of the arcade as watering place. What we would like is to stumble upon an 
arcade myth, with a legendary source at its center — an asphalt wellspring arising 
at the heart of Paris. The tavern advertising beer "on tap" still draws on this myth 
of the waters. And the extent to which healing is a rite de passage, a transition 
experience, becomes vividly clear in those classical corridors where the sick and 
ailing turn into their recovery, as it were. Those halls, too, are arcades. 3 Compare 
fountains in the vestibule. [L2,6] 

The dread of doors that won't close is something everyone knows from dreams. 
Stated more precisely: these are doors that appear closed without being so. It was 
with heightened senses that I learned of this phenomenon in a dream in which, 
while I was in the company of a friend, a ghost appeared to me in the window of 
the ground floor of a house to our right. And as we walked on, the ghost 
accompanied us from inside all the houses. It passed through all the walls and 
always remained at the same height with us. I saw this, though I was blind. The 
path we travel through arcades is fundamentally just such a ghost walk, on which 
doors give way and walls yield. [L2,7] 

The figure of wax is properly the setting wherein the appearance <Schein> of 
humanity outdoes itself. In the wax figure, that is, the surface area, complexion, 
and coloration of the human being are all rendered with such perfect and unsur- 
passable exactitude that this reproduction of human appearance itself is outdone, 
and now the mannequin incarnates nothing but the hideous, cumiing mediation 
between costume and viscera. D Fashion □ [L2a,l] 

Description of a wax museum as dream house: "Once visitors reached the final 
landing, they looked around the corner into a large, brightly lit room. There was, 
so to say, no one within, though it was filled with princes, crinolines, uniforms, and 
giants at the entrance. The woman went no further, and her escort paused beside 
her, piqued hy a haleful pleasure. They sat down on the steps, and he told her of 
the terror he had experienced as a hoy in reading ahout ill-famed castles where no 
one lived any longer, but where on stormy nights there were lights hurning at all 
the windows. What was going on inside? What gathering was there? Where was 
that light coming from? He had dreamed of catching a glimpse of this assembly 
while hanging from the window ledge, his face pressed against the windowpanes of 
the unspeakahle room." Ernst Bloch, "Leib und Wachsfigur," Frankfurter Zeit- 
ung <December 19, 1929>. [L2a,2] 



"Numher 125: Castan's maze. At first, world travelers and artists suppose them- 
selves transported into the forest of columns that is the magnificent mosque of 
Cordova in Spain. As arch succeeds arch in that edifice, one column crowds upon 



the next in perspective, offering fabulous vistas and unthinkably long avenues 
which no one could foJlow to the end. Then, suddenly, we behold an image that 
takes us into the very heart of the famous Alhambra of Granada. We see the 
tapestry pattern of the Alhambra, with its inscription 'Allah is AJlah' (God is 
great), and already we are standing in a garden, in the orange grove of the Alham- 
bra. But before the visitor arrives at tins courtyard, he must pass through a series 
of labyrinthine divagations." Catalogue of Castan's panopticon 1 (from extracts in 
the Frankfurter Zeitung). [L2a,3] 

"The success of the Romantic school gave rise, around 1825, to the market in 
modern paintings. Before that, art lovers went to the homes of artists. Sellers of 
artists' pigments — Giroux, Suisse, Binant, Berville — began to function as middle- 
men. The first retail house was opened by Goupil in 1829." <Lucien> Dubech and 
<Pierre> d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 359. [L2a,4] 

"The Opera is one of the characteristic creations of the Second Empire. It was 
designed by an unknown young architect, Charles Garnier, whose plan was se- 
lected from among 160 projects submitted. His theater, constructed in the years 
1861-1875, was conceived as a place of pageantry. ... It was the stage on which 
imperial Paris could gaze at itself with satisfaction. Classes newly risen to power 
and to fortune, blendings of cosmopolitan elements — this was a new world, and it 
called for a new name: people no longer spoke of the Court, but of le Tout Paris <all 
fashionable Paris>. ... A theater conceived as an urban center, a center of social 
life — this was a new idea, and a sign of the times." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire 
de Paris, pp. 411-412. [L2a,5] 

To set up, within the actual city of Paris, Paris the dream city — as an aggregate of 
all the building plans, street layouts, park projects, and street-name systems that 
were never developed. [L2a,6] 

The arcade as temple of Aesculapius, medicinal spring. The course of a cure. 
(Arcades as resort spas in ravines — at Schuls-Tarasp, at Ragaz.) The gorge as 
landscape ideal in the nineteenth century. [L3,l] 

Jacques Fahien, Paris en songe (Paris, 1863), reports on the moving of the Porte 
Saint-Martin and the Porte Saint-Denis: "They are no less admired on the summits 
of the Faubourgs Saint-Martin and Saint-Denis" (p. 86). In this way, the areas 
around the gates, which had sunk quite noticeahly, were able to regain their origi- 
nal level. [L3,2] 

Proposal to cover the dead hodies in the morgue with an oilcloth from the neck 
down. "The public lines up at the door and is allowed to examine at its leisure the 
nude cadavers of the unknown dead . . . One day, morality will be given its due; 
and thereafter the worker who now goes at lunchtime to visit the morgue — hands 
in pockets, pipe in mouth, smile on lips — in order to crack jokes over the more or 



less putrefied naked bodies, of both sexes, will soon lose interest in the sparse 
mise-en-scene. I do not exaggerate. These smutty scenes are enacted every day at 
the morgue; people laugh there, smoke there, and chattel- loudly." Edouard Fou- 
caud, Paris inventeur: Physiologie de I'industriefranqaise (Paris, 1844), pp. 212- 
213. [L3,3] 

An engraving from around 1830, perhaps a little earlier, shows copyists at work in 
various ecstatic postures. Caption: "Artistic Inspiration at the Museum." Cabinet 
des Estampes. [L3,4] 

On the beginnings of the museum at Versailles: "M. de Montalivet was in a hurry to 
acquire a quantity of paintings. He wanted them everywhere, and, since the 
Chambers had decried prodigality, he was determined to buy cheaply. The trend 
was toward thrift . . . M. de Montalivet willingly ... let it be thought that it was he 
himself who, on the quays and in the dealers' shops, was buying up third-rate 
canvases. . . . No, ... it was the reigning princes of art who were indulging in this 
hideous business . . . The copies and pastiches in the museum at Versailles are the 
most grievous confirmation of the rapacity of those master artists, who became 
entrepreneurs and barterers of art. . . . Business and industry decided to elevate 
themselves to the level of the artist. The latter, in order to satisfy his need for the 
luxuries which were heginning to tempt him, prostituted art to speculation and 
brought about the degeneration of the artistic tradition by his calculated reduction 
of art to the proportions of a trade." This last refers to the fact that [around 1837] 
painters were passing on to their students commissions they had accepted them- 
selves. Gabriel Pelin, Les Laideurs du beau Paris (Paris, 1861), pp. 85, 87-90. 

[L3,5] 

On suhterranean Paris — old sewers. "We shall form an image more closely resem- 
hling this strange geometric plan by supposing that we see spread upon a back- 
ground of darkness some grotesque alphahet of the East jumbled as in a medley, 
the shapeless letters of which are joined to one another, apparently pell-mell and 
as if by chance, sometimes by their corners, sometimes by their extremities." 
Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 9 (Paris, 1881), pp. 158-159 (Les 
Miserables).* [L3a,l] 

Sewers: "All manner of phantoms haunt these long solitary corridors, putridity 
and miasma everywhere; here and there a breathing-hole through which Villon 
within chats with Rabelais without." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 
9 (Paris, 1881), p. 160 (Les Miserables ).'' [L3a,2] 

Victor Hugo on the obstacles which hindered Parisian digging and tunneling op- 
erations: "Paris is huilt upon a deposit singularly rebellious to the spade, to the 
hoe, to the drill, to human control. Nothing more difficult to pierce and to pene- 
trate than that geological formation upon which is superposed the wonderful his- 
torical formation called Paris; as soon as . . . labor commences and ventures into 



that sheet of alluvium, subterranean resistance abounds. There are liquid clays, 
living springs, hard rocks, those soft deep mires which technical science calls 
moutardes. The pick advances laboriously into these calcareous strata alternating 
with seams of very fine clay and laminar schistose beds, encrusted with oyster 
shells contemporary with the pre-Adamite oceans." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres com- 
pletes, novels, vol. 9 (Paris, 1881), pp. 178-179 (Les Miser ables ). 7 [L3a,3] 

Sewer: "Paris . . . called it the Stink-Hole. . . . The Stink-Hole was no less revolt- 
ing to hygiene than to legend. The Goblin Monk had appeared under the fetid arch 
of the Mouf fetard sewer; the corpses of the Marmousets had been thrown into the 
sewer of the Barillerie. . . . The mouth of the sewer of the Rue de la Mortellerie was 
famous for the pestilence which came from it. . . . Bruneseau had made a begin- 
ning, but it required the cholera epidemics to determine the vast reconstruction 
which has since taken place." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 9 
(Paris, 1881), pp. 166, 180 (Les Miserables, "LTntestin de Leviathan")." [L3a,4] 

1805 — Bruneseau's descent into the sewers: "Hardly had Bruneseau passed the 
first branchings of the subterranean network, when eight out of the twenty labor- 
ers refused to go further. . . . They advanced with difficulty. It was not uncommon 
for the stepladders to plunge into three feet of mire. The lanterns flickered in the 
miasmas. From time to time, a sewerman who had fainted was carried out. At 
certain places, a precipice. The soil had sunk, the pavement had crumbled, the 
sewer had changed into a blind well; they found no solid ground. One man sud- 
denly disappeared; they had great difficulty in recovering him. On the advice of 
Fourcroy, they lighted from point to point, in the places sufficiently purified, great 
cages full of oakum saturated with resin. The wall, in places, was covered with 
shapeless fungi — one would have said with tumors. The stone itself seemed dis- 
eased in this unbreathable atmosphere. . . . They thought they recognized here 
and there, chiefly under the Palais de Justice, some cells of ancient dungeons built 
in the sewer itself. . . . An iron collar hung in one of these cells. They walled them 
all up. . . . The complete survey of the underground sewer system of Paris occu- 
pied seven years, from 1805 to 1812. . . . Nothing equaled the horror of this old 
voiding crypt, . . . cavern, grave, gulf pierced with streets, titanic molehill, in 
which the mind seems to see prowling through the shadow . . . that enormous blind 
mole, the past." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 9 (Paris, 1881), 
pp. 169-171, 173-174 (Les Miserables, "LTntestin de Leviathan"). 9 [L4,l] 

In coimection with the passage from Gerstacker. ! ' An undersea jeweler's shop: 
"We came into the underwater hall of the jeweler's. Never would one have 
believed it possible to be so far removed from terra finna. An immense dome . . . 
overspread the entire marketplace, which was filled with the brilliant glow of 
electricity and the happy busde of crowds, and an assortment of shops with 
glittering display windows." Leo Claretie, Paris depuis ses origines jusqu'en I' an 
3000 (Paris, 1886), p. 337 ("En 1987"). It is significant that this image resurfaces 
just when die beginning of the end has arrived for the arcades. [L4,2] 



The sewers ofPaiis, 1861-1862. Photo by Nadar. Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nation- 
ale de France. See L4,l. 

Proudhon takes a keen interest in the paintings of Courbet and, with the help of 
vague definitions (of "ethics in action") , enlists them in his cause. [L4,3] 

Woefully inadequate references to mineral springs in Koch, who writes of the 
poems dedicated by Goethe to Maria Ludovica at Karlsbad: "The essential thing 
for him in these 'Karlsbad poems' is not the geology but . . . the thought and the 
sensation that healing energies emanate from the otherwise unapproachable per- 



son of the princess. The intimacy of life at the spa creates a fellow feeling . . . with 
the noble lady. Thus, ... in the presence of the mystery of the springs, health 
comes . . . from the proximity of the princess." Richard Koch, Der £auber der 
Heilquellen (Stuttgart, 1933), p. 21. [L4,4] 

Whereas a journey ordinarily gives the bourgeois the illusion of slipping the ties 
that bind him to his social class, the watering place fortifies his consciousness of 
belonging to the upper class. It does this not only by bringing him into contact 
with feudal strata. Mornand draws attention to a more elementary circumstance: 
"In Paris there are no doubt larger crowds, but none so homogeneous as this one; 
for most of the sad human beings who make up those crowds will have eaten 
either badly or hardly at all. . . . But at Baden, nothing of the sort: everyone is 
happy, seeing that everyone's at Baden." Felix Mornand, La Vie des eaux (Paris, 
1855), pp. 256-257. [L4 a ,l] 

The meditative stroll through the pump room proves advantageous to business, 
chiefly through the agency of art. The contemplative attitude that schools itself 
on the work of art is slowly transformed into an attitude more covetous of the 
wares on display. "Having taken a turn before the Trinkhalle, ... or beneath the 
frescoed peristyle of this Greco-German-Italianate colonnade, one will come in- 
doors, . . . read the newspapers for a while, price the art objects, examine the 
watercolors, and drink a small glassful." Felix Mornand, La Vie des eaux (Paris, 
1855), pp. 257-258. [L4 a ,2] 

Dungeons of Chatelet <see also C5a ,1>: "Those cells, the mere thought of which 
strikes terror into the hearts of the people, . . . have lent their stones to the one 
theater above all where people love to go for a good time, since there they hear of 
the undying glory of their sons on the fields of battle." Eclouard Fournier, 
Chroniques et legendes des rues de Paris (Paris, 1864), pp. 155-156. The refer- 
ence is to the Theatre du Chatelet, originally a circus. [L4a,3] 

The revised title page of Meryon's Eaux-fortes sur Paris <Etchings of Paris) de- 
picts a weighty stone whose age is attested to by the encrusted shells and the 
cracks. The title of the cycle is engraved in this stone. "Burty remarks that the 
shells, and the imprint of moss preserved in the limestone, indicate clearly that 
this stone was chosen from among the specimens of ancient Parisian soil in the 
quarries of Montmartre." Gustave Geffroy, Charles Meryon (Paris, 1926), p. 47. 

[L4 a ,4] 

In "Le Joueur genereux," Baudelaire meets with Satan in his infernal gamhling 
den, "a dazzling subterranean dwelling of a fabulous luxury heyond anything the 
upper habitations of Paris could offer." Charles Baudelaire, Le Spleen de Paris, 
ed. R. Simon (Paris), p. 49." [L4 a ,5] 



The gate belongs in a context with the rites de passage. "However it may be 
indicated, one enters the way — whether it be between two sticks driven into the 



ground and sometimes set leaning toward each other, or through a tree trunk 
split in the middle and opened up, ... or under a birch limb bent into an 
arch. ... In these cases, it is always a matter of escaping a hostile . . . element, 
getting clear of some stain, separating off contagion or the spirits of the dead, 
who caimot follow through the narrow opening." Ferdinand Noack, Triumph und 
Triumphbogen, series entitled Vortrage der Bibliothek Warburg, vol. 5 (Leipzig, 
1928), p. 153. Whoever enters an arcade passes through the gate-way in the 
opposite direction. 112 (Or rather, he ventures into the intrauterine world.) [L5,l] 



According to K. Meister, Die Hausschioelle in Sprache und Religion der Romer, 
Proceedings of the Heidelberg Academy of Sciences, Division of Philosophy and 
History, 1924-1925, Treatise 3 (Heidelherg, 1925), the threshold does not have for 
the Greeks, or indeed for any other people, the importance it has for the Romans. 
The treatise is concerned essentially with the genesis of the sublimis as the exalted 
(originally what is carried aloft). [L5,2] 



"Nevertheless, we see a continuous stream of new works in which the city is the 
main character, present throughout, and in whieh the name of Paris almost always 
figures in the title, indicating that the public likes things this way. Under these 
conditions, how could there not develop in each reader the deep-seated conviction 
(which is evident even today) that the Paris he knows is not the only Paris, not even 
the true one, that it is only a stage set, brilliantly illuminated but too normal — a 
piece of scenery which the stagehands will never do away with, and which conceals 
another Paris, the real Paris, a nocturnal, spectral, imperceptible Paris." Roger 
Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 
1937), p. 687. [L5,3] 



"Cities, like forests, have their dens in which all their vilest and most terrible 
monsters hide." Victor Hugo, Les Miser ables, part 3 <Oeuvres completes, novels, 
vol. 7 (Paris, 1881), p. 306>. 13 [L5,4] 

There are relations between department store and museum, and here the bazaar 
provides a link. The amassing of artworks in the museum brings them into 
communication with commodities, which — where they offer themselves en 
masse to the passerby — awake in him the notion that some part of this should fall 
to him as well. [L5,5] 



"The city of the dead, Pere Lachaise . . . The word 'cemetery' cannot properly be 
used for this particular layout, which is modeled on the necropolises of the ancient 
world. This veritable urban establishment — with its stone houses for the dead and 
its profusion of statues, which, in contrast to the custom of the Christian north, 
represent the dead as living — is conceived throughout as a continuation of the city 
of the living." (The name comes from the owner of the land, thefather confessor of 
Louis XIV; the plan is hy Napoleon I.) Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), pp. 161- 
162. [L5 a ] 



[The Flaneur] 



A landscape haunts, intense as opium. 

— Mallanne <"Autref ois, en marge d'un Baudelaire," in Divagations> 

To read what was never written. 
— Hofmannsthal 1 

And I travel in order to get to know my geography. 

— A madman, in Marcel Reja, L'Art chei les fous (Paris, 1907), p. 131 

All that can be found anywhere can be found in Paris. 

— Victor Hugo, Les Mise'rables, in Hugo, Oeiwres completes (Paris, 
1881), novels, vol. 7, p. 30, from the chapter "Ecce Paris, Ecce 
Homo" 2 



But the great reminiscences, the historical shudder — these are a trumpery which 
he (the flaneur) leaves to tourists, who think thereby to gain access to the genius 
loci with a military password. Our friend may well keep silent. At the approach of 
his footsteps, the place has roused; speechlessly, mindlessly, its mere intimate 
nearness gives him hints and instructions. He stands before Notre Dame de 
Lorette, and his soles remember: here is the spot where in former times the cheval 
de renfort — the spare horse — was harnessed to the omnibus that climbed the Rue 
des Martyrs toward Montmartre. Often, he would have given all he knows about 
the domicile of Balzac or of Gavarni, about the site of a surprise attack or even of 
a barricade, to be able to catch the scent of a threshold or to recognize a paving 
stone by touch, like any watchdog. [ M 1 , 1 ] 

The street conducts the flaneur into a vanished time. For him, every street is 
precipitous. It leads downward — if not to the mythical Mothers, then into a past 
that can be all the more spellbinding because it is not his own, not private. 
Nevertheless, it always remains the time of a childhood. But why that of the life 
he has lived? In the asphalt over which he passes, his steps awaken a surprising 
resonance. Hie gaslight that streams down on the paving stones throws an 
equivocal light on this double ground. [Ml ,2] 



An intoxication comes over the man who walks long and aimlessly through the 
streets. With each step, the walk takes on greater momentum; ever weaker grow 
the temptations of shops, of bistros, of smiling women, ever more irresistible the 
magnetism of the next streetcorner, of a distant mass of foliage, of a street name. 
Then comes hunger. Our man wants nothing to do with the myriad possibilities 
offered to sate his appetite. Like an ascetic animal, he flits through unknown 
districts — until, utterly exhausted, he stumbles into his room, which receives him 
coldly and wears a strange air. [M 1,3] 

Paris created the type of the flaneur. What is remarkable is that it wasn't Rome. 
And the reason? Does not dreaming itself take the high road in Rome? And isn't 
that city too full of temples, enclosed squares, national shrines, to be able to enter 
tout entiere — with every cobblestone, every shop sign, every step, and every gate- 
way — into the passerby's dream? The national character of the Italians may also 
have much to do with this. For it is not the foreigners but they themselves, the 
Parisians, who have made Paris the promised land of the flaneur — the "landscape 
built of sheer life," as Hof mannsthal once put it. Landscape — that, in fact, is what 
Paris becomes for the flaneur. Or, more precisely: the city splits for him into its 
dialectical poles. It opens up to him as a landscape, even as it closes around him 
as a room. [M 1 ,4] 

That ananmestic intoxication in which the flaneur goes about the city not only 
feeds on the sensory data taking shape before his eyes but often possesses itself of 
abstract knowledge — indeed, of dead facts — as something experienced and lived 
through. This felt knowledge travels from one person to another, especially by 
word of mouth. But in the course of the nineteenth century, it was also deposited 
in an immense literature. Even before Lefeuve, who described Paris "street by 
street, house by house," there were numerous works that depicted this storied 
landscape as backdrop for the dreaming idler. The study of these books consti- 
tuted a second existence, already wholly predisposed toward dreaming; and 
what the flaneur learned from them took form and figure during an afternoon 
walk before the aperitif. Wouldn't he, then, have necessarily felt the steep slope 
behind the church of Notre Dame de Lorette rise all the more insistently under 
his soles if he realized: here, at one time, after Paris had gotten its first omnibuses, 
the cheval de renfort was harnessed to the coach to reinforce the two other horses. 

[M1.5] 

One must make an effort to grasp the altogether fascinating moral constitution of 
the passionate flaneur. The police — who here, as on so many of the subjects we 
are treating, appear as experts — provide the following indication in the report of 
a Paris secret agent from October 1798(?) : "It is almost impossible to summon 
and maintain good moral character in a thickly massed population where each 
individual, unbeknownst to all the others, hides in the crowd, so to speak, and 
blushes before the eyes of no one." Cited in Adolf Schmidt, Paruer £ustdnde 
wdhrend der Revolution, vol. 3 (Jena, 1876). The case in which the flaneur com- 



pletely distances himself from the type of the philosophical promenader, and 
takes on the features of the werewolf restlessly roaming a social wilderness, was 
fixed for the first time and forever afterward by Poe in his story "The Man of the 
Crowd." [Ml,6] 

The appearances of superposition, of overlap, which come with hashish may be 
grasped through the concept of similitude. When we say that one face is similar 
to another, we mean that certain features of this second face appear to us in the 
first, without the latter's ceasing to be what it has been. Nevertheless, the possi- 
bilities of entering into appearance in this way are not subject to any criterion and 
are therefore boundless. The category of similarity, which for the waking con- 
sciousness has only minimal relevance, attains unlimited relevance in the world 
of hashish. There, we may say, everything is face: each thing has the degree of 
bodily presence that allows it to be searched — as one searches a face — for such 
traits as appear. Under these conditions even a sentence (to say nothing of the 
single word) puts on a face, and this face resembles that of the sentence standing 
opposed to it. In this way every truth points manifestly to its opposite, and this 
state of affairs explains the existence of doubt. Truth becomes something living; 
it lives solely in the rhythm by which statement and counterstatement displace 
each other in order to think each other. 3 [Mla,l] 

Valery Larbaud on the "moral climate of the Parisian street." "Relations always 
begin with the fiction of equality, of Christian fraternity. In this crowd the inferior 
is disguised as the superior, and the superior as the inferior — disguised morally, 
in both cases. In other capitals of the world, the disguise barely goes beyond the 
appearance, and people visibly insist on their differences, making an effort to 
retain them in the face of pagans and barbarians. Here they efface them as much 
as they can. Hence the peculiar sweetness of the moral climate of Parisian streets, 
the charm which makes one pass over the vulgarity, the indolence, the monotony 
of the crowd. It is the grace of Paris, its virtue: charity. Virtuous crowd . . ." 
Valery Larbaud, "Rues et visages de Paris: Pour l'album de Chas-Laborde," 
Commerce, 8 (Summer 1926), pp. 36-37. Is it permissible to refer this phenomenon 
so confidently to Christian virtue, or is there not perhaps at work here an intoxi- 
cated assimilation, superposition, equalization that in the streets of this city 
proves to carry more weight than the will to social accreditation? One might 
adduce here the hashish experience "Dante und Petrarca," 1 and measure the 
impact of intoxicated experience on the proclamation of the rights of man. This 
all unfolds at a considerable remove from Christianity. [Mla,2] 

The "colportage phenomenon of space" is the flaneur's basic experience. Inas- 
much as this phenomenon also — from another angle — shows itself in the mid- 
nineteenth-century interior, it may not be amiss to suppose that the heyday of 
flanerie occur in this same period. Thanks to this phenomenon, everything poten- 
tially taking place in this one single room is perceived simultaneously. The space 



winks at the flaneur: What do you think may have gone on here? Of course, it 
has yet to be explained how this phenomenon is associated with colportage. 5 
□ History D [Mla,3] 



A true masquerade of space — that is what the British embassy's ball on May 17, 
1839, must have been. "In addition to the glorious flowers from gardens and 
greenhouses, 1,000-1,200 rosebushes were ordered as part of the decoration for 
the festivities. It was said that only 800 of them could fit in the rooms of the 
embassy, but that will give you an idea of the utterly mythological magnificence. 
The garden, covered by a pavilion, was turned into a salon de conversation. But 
what a salon! The gay flower beds, full of blooms, were huge jardinieres which 
everyone came over to admire; the gravel on the walks was covered with fresh 
linen, out of consideration for all the white satin shoes; large sofas of lampas and 
of damask replaced the wrought-iron benches; and on a round table there were 
books and albums. It was a pleasure to take the air in this immense boudoir, 
where one could hear, like a magic chant, the sounds of the orchestra, and where 
one could see passing, like happy shadows, in the diree surrounding flower-lined 
galleries, both the fun-loving girls who came to dance and the more serious girls 
who came to sup." H. d'Almeras, La Vie paruienne sous <.le regne de> Louu- 
Philippe <Paris, 1925>, pp. 446-447. The account derives from Madame de 
Girardin. D Interior D Today, the watchword is not entanglement but transpar- 
ency. (Le Corbusier!) [Mla,4] 

The principle of colportage illustration encroaching on great painting. "The re- 
ports on the engagements and battles which, in the catalogue, were supposed to 
illuminate the moments chosen by the painter for battle scenes, but which failed 
to achieve this goal, were usually augmented with citations of the works from 
which these reports were drawn. Thus, one would find at the end, frequently in 
parentheses: Campagnes d'Espagne, by Marshal Suchet; Bulletin de la Grande Ar- 
mee et rapports qfficiels; Gazette de France, number . . . ; and the like; Hutoire de la 
revolution francaue, by M. Thiers, volume . . . , page . . . ; Victoires et conquetes, 
volume . . . , page . . . ; and so forth and so on." Ferdinand von Gall, Paris und 
seine Salons (Oldenburg, 1844), vol. 1, pp. 198-199. [M2,l] 

Category of illustrative seeing — fundamental for the flaneur. Like Kubin when 
he wrote Andere Seite, he composes his reverie as text to accompany the images. 

[M2,2] 

Hashish. One imitates certain tilings one knows from paintings: prison, the 
Bridge of Sighs, stairs like the train of a dress. [M2,3] 

We know that, in the course of flanerie, far-off times and places interpenetrate the 
landscape and the present moment. When the authentically intoxicated phase of 
this condition announces itself, the blood is pounding in the veins of the happy 
flaneur, his heart ticks like a clock, and inwardly as well as outwardly things go 



on as we would imagine them to do in one of those "mechanical pictures" which 
in the nineteenth century (and of course earlier, too) enjoyed great popularity, 
and which depicts in the foreground a shepherd playing on a pipe, by his side two 
children swaying in time to the music, further back a pair of hunters in pursuit of 
a lion, and very much in the background a train crossing over a trestle bridge. 
Chapuis and Gelis, Le Monde des automates (Paris, 1928), vol. 1, p. 330. 6 [M2,4] 

The attitude of the flaneur — epitome of the political attitude of the middle classes 
during the Second Empire. [M2,5] 

With the steady increase in traffic on the streets, it was only the macadamization 
of the roadways that made it possible in the end to have a conversation on the 
terrace of a cafe without shouting in the other person's ear. [M2,6] 

The laissez-faire of the flaneur has its countetpart even in the revolutionary 
philosophemes of the period. "We smile at the chimerical pretension [of a Saint- 
Simon] to trace all physical and moral phenomena back to the law of universal 
attraction. But we forget too easily that this pretension was not in itself isolated; 
under the influence of the revolutionizing natural laws of mechanics, there could 
arise a current of natural philosophy which saw in the mechanism of nature the 
proof of just such a mechanism of social life and of events generally." <Willy> 
Spiihler, Der Saint-Simonumus (Zurich, 1926), p. 29. [M2,7] 

Dialectic of flanerie: on one side, the man who feels himself viewed by all and 
sundry as a true suspect and, on the other side, the man who is utterly undis- 
coverable, the hidden man. Presumably, it is this dialectic that is developed in 
"The Man of the Crowd." [M2.8] 

"Theory of the transformation of the city into countryside: this was . . . the main 
theme of my unfinished work on Maupassant. ... At issue was the city as hunting 
ground, and in general the coneept of the hunter played a major role (as in the 
theory of the uniform: all hunters look alike)." Letter from Wiesengrund, June 5, 
1935. [M2,9] 

The principle of flanerie in Proust: "Then, quite apart from all those literary 
preoccupations, and without definite attachment to anything, suddenly a roof, a 
gleam of sunlight reflected from a stone, the smell of a road would make me stop 
still, to enjoy the special pleasure that each of them gave me, and also because 
they appeared to be concealing, beneath what my eyes could see, something 
which they invited me to approach and take from them, but which, despite all my 
efforts, I never managed to discover." Du Cote de chez Swann <(Paris, 1939), vol. 1, 
p. 256. >' — This passage shows very clearly how the old Romantic sentiment for 
landscape dissolves and a new Romantic conception of landscape emerges — of 
landscape that seems, rather, to be a cityscape, if it is true that the city is the 



properly sacred ground of flanerie. In this passage, at any rate, it would be 
presented as such for the first time since Baudelaire (whose work does not yet 
portray the arcades, though they were so numerous in his day) . [M2a,l] 

So the flaneur goes for a walk in his room: "When Johannes sometimes asked for 
permission to go out, it was usually denied him. But on occasion his father 
proposed, as a substitute, that they walk up and down the room hand in hand. 
This seemed at first a poor substitute, but in fact . . . something quite novel 
awaited him. The proposal was accepted, and it was left entirely to Johannes to 
decide where they should go. Off they went, then, right out the front entrance, 
out to a neighboring estate or to the seashore, or simply through the streets, 
exactly as Johannes could have wished; for his father managed everything. 
While they strolled in this way up and down the floor of his room, his father told 
him of all they saw. They greeted other pedestrians; passing wagons made a din 
around them and drowned out his father's voice; the comfits in the pastry shop 
were more inviting than ever." An early work by Kierkegaard, cited in Eduard 
Geismar, Siren Kierkegaard (Gottingen, 1929), pp. 12-13. Here is the key to the 
schema of Voyage autour de ma chambre* [M2a,2] 

"The manufacturer passes over the asphalt conscious of its quality; the old man 
searches it earefully, follows it just as long as he can, happily taps his cane so the 
wood resonates, and recalls with pride that he personally witnessed the laying of 
the first sidewalks; the poet . . . walks on it pensive and unconcerned, muttering 
lines of verse; the stockbroker hurries past, calculating the advantages of the last 
rise in wheat; and the madcap slides across." Alexis Martin, "Physiologie de l'as- 
phalte," he Boheme, 1, no. 3, (April 15, 1855) — Charles Pradier, editor in chief. 

[M2a,3] 

On the Parisians' technique of inhabiting their streets: "Returning by the Rue 
Saint-I lonore, we met with an eloquent example of that Parisian street industry 
which can make use of anything. Men were at work repairing the pavement and 
laying pipeline, and, as a residt, in the middle of the street there was an area 
which was blocked off but which was embanked and covered with stones. On 
this spot street vendors had immediately installed themselves, and five or six 
were selling writing implements and notebooks, cutlery, lampshades, garters, 
embroidered collars, and all sorts of trinkets. Even a dealer in secondhand goods 
had opened a branch office here and was displaying on the stones his bric-a-brac 
of old cups, plates, glasses, and so forth, so that business was profiting, instead of 
suffering, from the brief disturbance. They are simply wizards at making a 
virtue of necessity." Adolf Stahr, Nach fiinf Jahren (Oldenburg, 1857), vol. 1, 
p. 29." 

Seventy years later, I had the same experience at the corner of the Boulevard 
Saint-Germain and the Boulevard Raspail. Parisians make the street an interior. 

[M3,l] 



"It is wonderful that in Paris itself one can actually wander through countryside." 
Karl Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, p. 61. The other side of the 
motif is thus touched on. For if flanerie can transform Paris into one great 
interior — a house whose rooms are the quartiers, no less clearly demarcated by 
thresholds than are real rooms — then, on the other hand, the city can appear to 
someone walking through it to be without thresholds: a landscape in the round. 

[M3,2] 

But in the final analysis, only the revolution creates an open space for the city. 
Fresh air doctrine of revolutions. Revolution disenchants the city. Commune in 
L Education sentimentale. Image of the street in civil war. [M3,3] 

Street as domestic interior. Concerning the Passage du Pont-Neuf (between the 
Rue Guenegaud and the Rue de Seine): "the shops resemble closets." Nouveaux 
Tableaux de Paris, ou Observations sur les moeurs et usages des Parisiens au 
commencement du XI X e siecle (Paris, 1828), vol. 1, p. 34. [M3,4] 

The courtyard of the Tuileries: "immense savannah planted with lampposts in- 
stead of banana trees." Paul-Ernest de Rattier, Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 1857). 
D Gas D [M3,5] 



Passage Colhert: "The gas lamp illuminating it looks like a coconut palm in the 
middleof a savannah. "0 Gas D Le Livredes cent-et-un (Paris, 183.3), vol. 10, p. 57 
(Amedee Kermel, "Les Passages de Paris"). [M3,6] 

Lighting in the Passage Colbert: "I admire the regular series of those crystal 
globes, which give of f a light both vivid and gentle. Couldn't the same be said of 
comets in battle formation, awaiting the signal for departure to go vagabonding 
through space?" Le Livre des cent-et-un, vol. 10, p. 57. Compare this transforma- 
tion of the city into an astral world with Grandville's Un Autre Monde. □ Gas D 

[M3,7] 

In 1839 it was considered elegant to take a tortoise out walking. This gives us an 
idea of the tempo of flanerie in the arcades. [M3,8] 

Gustave Claudin is supposed to have said: "On the day when a filet ceases to be a 
filet and becomes a 'chateaubriand,' when a mutton stew is called an 'Irish stew,' 
or when the waiter cries out, ''Moniteur, clock!' to indicate that this newspaper was 
recjuested by the customer sitting under the clock — on that day, Paris will have 
been truly dethroned!" Jules Claretie, La Vie m Paris 1896 (Paris, 1897), p. 100. 

[M3,9] 



"There — on the Avenue des Champs-Elysees — it has stood since 1845: the 
Jardin d'Hiver, a colossal greenhouse with a great many rooms for social occa- 



sions, for balls and concerts, although, since its doors are open in summer too, it 
hardly deserves the name of winter garden." When the sphere of planning cre- 
ates such entanglements of closed room and airy nature, then it serves in this way 
to meet the deep human need for daydreaming — a propensity that perhaps 
proves the true efficacy of idleness in human affairs. Woldemar Seyffarth, Wahr- 
nehmungen in Paris 1853 und 1854 (Gotha, 1855), p. 130. [M3.10] 

The menu at Les Trois Freres Provencaux: "Thirty-six pages for food, four pages 
for drink — but very long pages, in small folio, with closely packed text and 
numerous aimotations in fine print." The booklet is bound in velvet. Twenty 
hors d'oeuvres and thirty-three soups. "Forty-six beef dishes, among which are 
seven different beefsteaks and eight filets." "Thirty-four preparations of game, 
forty-seven dishes of vegetables, and seventy-one varieties of compote." Julius 
Rodenberg, Paris bei Sonnenschein und Lampenlicht (Leipzig, 1867), pp. 43-44. 
Flanerie through the bill of fare. [M3a,l] 

The best way, while dreaming, to catch the afternoon in the net of evening is to 
make plans. The flaneur in planning. [M3a,2] 

"Le Corbusier's houses depend on neither spatial nor plastic articulation: the air 
passes through them! Air becomes a constitutive factor! What matters, therefore, 
is neither spatiality per se nor plasticity per se but only relation and interfusion. 
There is but one indivisible space. The integuments separating inside from outside 
fall away." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich <Berlin, 1928>, p. 85. [M3a,3] 

Streets are the dwelling place of the collective. The collective is an eternally 
unquiet, eternally agitated being that — in the space between the building fronts — 
experiences, learns, understands, and invents as much as individuals do within 
the privacy of their own four walls. For this collective, glossy enameled shop 
signs are a wall decoration as good as, if not better than, an oil painting in the 
drawing room of a bourgeois ; walls with their "Post No Bills" are its writing desk, 
newspaper stands its libraries, mailboxes its bronze busts, benches its bedroom 
furniture, and the cafe terrace is the balcony from which it looks down on its 
household. The section of railing where road workers hang their jackets is the 
vestibule, and the gateway which leads from the row of courtyards out into the 
open is the long corridor that daunts the bourgeois, being for the courtyards the 
entry to the chambers of the city. Among these latter, the arcade was the drawing 
room. More than anywhere else, the street reveals itself in the arcade as the 
furnished and familiar interior of the masses. [M3a,4] 

The intoxicated interpenetration of street and residence such as comes about in 
the Paris of the nineteenth century — and especially in the experience of the 
flaneur — has prophetic value. For the new architecture lets this interpenetration 
become sober reality. Giedion on occasion draws attention to this : "A detail of 



anonymous engineering, a grade crossing, becomes an element in the architec- 
ture" (that is, of a villa). S. Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich <Berlin, 1928>, p. 89. 

[M3a,5] 

"Hugo, in Les Miserables, has provided an amazing description of the Faubourg 
Saint-Marceau: 'It was no longer a place of solitude, for there were people passing; 
it was not the country, for there were houses and streets; it was not a city, for the 
streets had ruts in them, like the highways, and grass grew along their borders; it 
was not a village, for the houses were too lofty. What was it then? It was an 
inhabited place where there was nobody, it was a desert place where there was 
somebody, it was a boulevard of the great city, a street of Paris — wilder at night 
than a forest, and gloomier by day than a graveyard."" 0 <Lucien> Dubech and 
<Pierre> d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 366. [M3a,6] 

"The last horse-drawn omnibus made its final run on the Villette— Saint Sulpice 
line in January 1913; the last horse-drawn tram, on the Pantin-Opera line in April 
of the same year." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 463. [M3a,7] 

"On January 30, 1828, the fi rst omnibus began operation on the line running along 
the boulevard from the Bastille to the Madeleine. The fare was twenty-five or 
thirty centimes; the car stopped where one wished. It had eighteen to twenty seats, 
and its route was divided into two stages, with the Saint-Martin gate as midpoint. 
The vogue for this invention was extraordinary: in 1829, the company was run- 
ning fifteen lines, and rival companies were offering stiff competition — Tricycles, 
Ecossaises <Scots Women), Bearnaises <Gascon Women), Dames Blanches <Ladies 
in White). Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 358-359. [M3a,8] 

"After an hour the gathering broke up, and for the first time I found the streets of 
Paris nearly deserted. On the boulevards I met only unaccompanied persons, and 
on the Rue Vivienne at Stock Market Square, where by day you have to wind your 
way through the crowd, there wasn't a soul. I could hear nothing but my own steps 
and the murmur of fountains where by day you cannot escape the deafening buzz. 
In the vicinity of the Palais Royal I encountered a patrol. The soldiers were ad- 
vancing single file along both sides of the street, close to the houses, at a distance of 
five or six paces from one another so as not to be attacked at the same time and so 
as to be able to render mutual aid. This reminded me that, at the very heginning of 
my stay here, I had been advised to proceed in this manner myself at night when 
with several others, hut, ii I had to go home alone, always to take a cah." Eduard 
Devi-ient, Briefe aus Paris (Berlin , 1840), p. 248. [M4,l] 

On the omnibuses. "The driver stops and you mount the few steps of the conven- 
ient little staircase and look about for a place in the car, where henches extend 
lengthwise on the right and the left, with room for up to sixteen people. You've 
hardly set foot in the car when it starts rolling again. The conductor has once more 
pulled the cord, and, with a quick movement that causes a hell to sound, he 



advances the needle on a transparent dial to indicate that another person has 
entered; by this means they keep track of receipts. Now that the car is moving, you 
reach calmly into your wallet and pay the fare. If you happen to be sitting reason- 
ably far from the conductor, the money travels from hand to hand among the 
passengers; the well-dressed lady takes it from the workingman in the blue jacket 
and passes it on. This is all accomplished easily, in routine fashion, and without 
any bother. When someone is to exit, the conductor again pulls the cord and brings 
the car to a halt. If it is going uphill — which in Paris it often is — and therefore is 
going more slowly, men will customarily climb on and off without the car's having 
to stop." Eduard Devrient, Briefe aus Paris (Berlin, 1840), p. 61-62. [M4,2] 

"It was after the Exhibition of 1867 that one began to see those velocipedes which, 
some years later, had a vogue as widespread as it was short-lived. We may recall 
that under the Directory certain Incroyables" could be seen riding velociferes, 
which were bulky, badly constructed velocipedes. On May 19, 1804, a play entitled 
Velociferes was performed at the Vaudeville; it contained a song with this verse: 

You , partisans of the gentle gait, 
Coachmen who have lost the spur, 
Would you now accelerate 
Beyond the prompt velocifere? 
Learn then how to substitute 
Dexterity for speed. 

By the beginning of 1868, however, velocipedes were in circulation, and soon the 
public walkways were everywhere furrowed. Velocemen replaced boatmen. There 
were gymnasia and arenas for velocipedists, and competitions were set up to chal- 
lenge the skill of amateurs. . . . Today the velocipede is finished and forgotten." 
H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Paris a travers les siecles (Paris, 1882), vol. 5, p. 288. 

[M4,3] 

The peculiar irresolution of the flaneur. Just as waiting seems to be the proper 
state of the impassive thinker, doubt appears to be that of the flaneur. An elegy by 
Schiller contains the phrase: "the hesitant wing of the butterfly." 12 This points to 
that association of wingedness with the feeling of indecision which is so charac- 
teristic of hashish intoxication. [M4a,l] 

E. T. A. Hoffmann as type of the flaneur; "Des Vetters Eckfenster" <My Cousin's 
Comer Window> is a testament to this. And thus Hoffmann's great success in 
France, where there has been a special understanding for this type. In the bio- 
graphical notes to the five-volume edition of his later writings (Brodhag?) , 13 we 
read: "Hoffmann was never really a friend of the great outdoors. What mattered 
to him more than anything else was the human being — communication with, 
observations about, the simple sight of, human beings. Whenever he went for a 
walk in summer, which in good weather happened every day toward evening, 



then . . . there was scarcely a tavern or pastry shop where he would not look in to 
see whether anyone — and, if so, who — might be there." [M4a,2] 



Menilmontant. "In this immense quartier where meager salaries doom women and 
children to eternal privation, the Rue de la Chine and those streets which join and 
cut across it, such as the Rue des Partants and that amazing Rue Orfi la, so fantas- 
tic with its roundabouts and its sudden turns, its fences of uneven wood slats, its 
uninhabited summerhouses, its deserted gardens reclaimed by nature where wild 
shrubs and weeds are growing, sound a note of appeasement and of rare calm. . . . 
It is a country path under an open sky where most of the people who pass seem to 
have eaten and drunk." J.-K. Huysmans, Croquis Parisiens (Paris, 1886), p. 95 
("La Rue de la Chine"). [M4a,3] 

Dickens. "In his letters ... he complains repeatedly when traveling, even in the 
mountains of Switzerland, . . . about the lack of street noise, which was indispen- 
sable to him for his writing. 'I can't express how much I want these [streets],' he 
wrote in 1846 from Lausanne, where he was working on one of his greatest novels, 
Dombey and Son. 'It seems as if they supplied something to my brain, which it 
cannot hear, when busy, to lose. For a week or a fortnight I can write prodigiously 
in a retired place . . . and a day in London sets me up again and starts me. But the 
toil and labor of writing, day after day, without that magic lantern, is im- 
mense. . . . My figures seem disposed to stagnate without crowds ahout them. . . . 
In Genoa ... I had two miles of streets at least, lighted at night, to walk ahout in; 
and a great theater to repair to, every night.'"' 1 <Franz Mehring,) "Charles Dick- 
ens," Die neue Zeit, 30, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1912), pp. 621-622. [M4a,4] 

Brief description of misery; probahly under thehridges of the Seine. "Abohemian 
woman sleeps, her head tilted forward, her empty purse hetween her legs. Her 
blouse is covered with pins that glitter in the sun, and the few appurtenances of her 
household and toilette — two brushes, an open knife, a closed tin — are so well 
arranged that this semblance of order creates almost an air of intimacy, the 
shadow of an interieur, around her." Marcel Jouhandeau, Images de Paris (Paris 
<1934>), p. 62. [M5,l] 

"<Baudelaire's> 'Le Beau Navire' <The Good Ship> created quite a stir. . . . It was 
the cue for a whole series of sailor songs, which seemed to have transformed the 
Parisians into mariners and inspired them with dreams of boating. ... In wealthy 
Venice where luxury shines, / Where golden porticoes glimmer in the water, / 
Where palaces of glorious marble reveal / Masterworks of art and treasures di- 
vine, / I have only my gondola, / Sprightly as a bird / That darts and flies at its 
ease, / Skimming the surface of the waters." H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Les Re- 
frains de la rue, de 1830 a 1870 (Paris, 1879), pp. 21-22. [M5,2] 

'"Tell me, what is that awful stew which smells so had and is warming in that great 
pot?' says a provincial sort to an old porter. 'That, my dear sir, is a hatch of 



paving stones that are being baked to pave our poor boulevard, which is looking so 
worn! ... As if strolling wasn't nicer when you walked on the soil, the way you do 
in a garden!" La Grande Ville: Nouveau Tableau de Paris (Paris, 1844), vol. 1, 
p.334("LeBitume"). [M5,3] 

On the first omnibuses: "Competition has already emerged in the form of 'Les 
Dames Blanches.' . . . These cars are painted entirely in white, and the drivers, 
dressed in . . . white, operate a bellows with their foot that plays the tune from La 
Dame Blanche: 'The lady in white is looking at you . . .'" Nadar, Quand fetais 
photographe (Paris <1900>), pp. 301-302 ("1830 et environs"). [M5,4] 

Musset once named the section of the boulevards that lies behind the Theatre des 
Varietes, and that is not much frequented by flaneurs, the East Indies. <See 
Mlla,3.> [M5,5] 

The flaneur is the observer of the marketplace. His knowledge is akin to the 
occult science of industrial fluctuations. He is a spy for the capitalists, on assign- 
ment in the realm of consumers. [M5,6] 

The flaneur and the masses: here Baudelaire's "Reve parisien" might prove very 
instructive. [M5,7] 

The idleness of the flaneur is a demonstration against the division of labor. 

[M5,8] 

Asphalt was first used for sidewalks. [M5,9] 

"A town, such as London, where a man may wander for hours together without 
reaching the beginning of the end, without meeting the slightest hint which could 
lead to the inference that there is open country within reach, is a strange thing. 
This colossal centralization, this heaping together of two and a half millions of 
human beings at one point, has multiplied the power of this two and a half millions 
a hundredfold; has raised London to the commercial capital of the world, created 
the giant docks and assembled the thousand vessels that continually cover the 
Thames. . . . But the sacrifices which all this has cost become apparent later. After 
roaming the streets of the capital a day or two, . . . one realizes for the first time 
that these Londoners have been forced to sacrifice the best qualities of their hu- 
man nature to bring to pass all the marvels of civilization. . . . The very turmoil of 
the streets has something repulsive about it — something against which human na- 
ture rebels. The hundreds of thousands of all classes and ranks crowding past 
each other — aren't they all human beings with the same qualities and powers, and 
with the same interest in being happy? And aren't they obliged, in t he end, to seek 
happiness in the same way, by the same means? And still they crowd by one 
another as though they had nothing in common, nothing to do with one another, 
and their only agreement is the tacit one — that each keep to his own side of the 



pavement, so as not to delay the opposing streams of the crowd — while no man 
thinks to honor another with so much as a glance. The brutal indifference, the 
unfeeling isolation of each in his private interest becomes the more repellent and 
offensive, the more these individuals are crowded together within a limited space. 
And however much one may be aware that this isolation of the individual, this 
narrow self -seeking, is the fundamental principle of our society everywhere, it is 
nowhere so shamelessly barefaced, so self-conscious, as just here in the crowding 
of the great city." Friedrich Engels, Die Lage der arbeitenden Klasse in England, 
2nd ed. (Leipzig, 1848), pp. 36-37 ("Die grossen Stadte"). 13 [M5a,l] 

"By 'bohemians' I mean that class of individuals for whom existence is a problem, 
circumstances a myth, and fortune an enigma; who have no sort of fixed abode, no 
place of refuge; who belong nowhere and are met with everywhere; who have no 
particular calling in life but follow fifty professions; who, for the most part, arise 
in the morningwithout knowing where they are to dine in the evening; who are rich 
today, impoverished tomorrow; who are ready to live honestly if they can, and 
otherwise if they cannot." Adolphed'Ennery and Grange, Les Bohemiens de Paris 
<A play in five acts and eight tableaux> (Paris), pp. 8-9 (L'Ambigu-Comique, Sep- 
tember 27, 1843; series entitled Magasin theatral). 

[M5a,2] 

"Then from out of Saint Martin's Gate / The romantic Omnibus Hashed by." 
[Leon Gozlan,] Le Triomphe des Omnibus: Poeme heroi-comique (Paris, 1828), 
p. 15. [M6,l] 

"When the first German railway line was about to be constructed in Bavaria, the 
medical faculty at Erlangen published an expert opinion . . . : the rapid movement 
would cause . . . cerebral disorders (the mere sight of a train rushing by could 
already do this), and it was therefore necessary, at the least, to build a wooden 
barrier five feet high on both sides of the track." Egon Friedell, Kidturgeschichte 
derNeuzeit (Munich, 1931), vol. 3, p. 91. [M6,2] 

"Beginning around 1845 . . . there were railroads and steamers in all parts of 
Europe, and the new means of transport were celebrated. . . . Pictures, letters, 
stories of travel were the preferred genre for authors and readers." Egon Friedell, 
Kidturgeschichte der Neuzeit (Munich, 1931), vol. 3, p. 92. [M6,3] 

The following observation typifies the concerns of the age: "When one is sailing 
on a river or lake, one's body is without active movement. . . . The skin experi- 
ences no contraction, and its pores remain wide open and capable of absorbing 
all the emanations and vapors of the surrounding environment. The blood . . . 
remains . . . concentrated in the cavities of the chest and abdomen, and reaches 
the extremities with difficulty." J.-F. Dancel, De I'lnfluence des voyages sur I'homme 
et sur ses maladies: Ouvrage specialement destine aux gens du monde (Paris, 1846), 
p. 92 ("Des Promenades en bateau sur les lacs et les rivieres"). [M6,4] 



Remarkable distinction between flanenr and rubberneck (badaud): "Let us not, 
however, confuse the flaneur with the rubberneck: there is a subtle difference. . . . 
The average flaneur ... is always in full possession of his individuality, while that 
of the rubberneck disappears, absorbed by the external world, . . . which moves 
him to the point of intoxication and ecstasy. Under the influence of the spectacle, 
the rubberneck becomes an impersonal being. He is no longer a man — he is the 
public; he is the crowd. At a distance from nature, his naive soul aglow, ever 
inclined to reverie, . . . the true rubberneck deserves the admiration of all upright 
and sincere hearts." Victor Fournel, Ce qu'on voit dans les rues de Paris (Paris, 
1858), p. 263 ("L'Odyssee d'un flaneur dans les rues de Paris"). [M6,5] 

The phantasmagoria of the flaneur: to read from faces the profession, the ances- 
try, the character. [M6,6] 

In 1851 lf) there was still a regular stagecoach line between Paris and Venice. 

[M6.7] 



On the colportage phenomenon of space: '"The sense of mystery,' wrote Odilon 
Redon, who had learned the secret from da Vinci, 'comes from remaining always 
in the equivocal, with double and triple perspectives, or inklings of perspective 
(images within images) — forms that take shape and come into being according to 
the state of mind of the spectator. All things more suggestive just because they do 
appear.'" Cited in Raymond Escholier, "Artiste," Arts et metiers graphiques, No. 
47 (June 1, 1935), p. 7. [M6a,l] 

The flaneur at night. "Tomorrow, perhaps, . , . noctambulism will have had its 
day. Rut at least it will be lived to the full during the thirty or forty years it will 
last. . . . The individual can rest from time to time; stopping places and waysta- 
tions are permitted him. Rut he does not have the right to sleep." Alfred Delvau, 
Les Heures parisiennes (Paris, 1866), pp. 200, 206 ("Deux Heures de matin"). — 
That nightlife was significantly extended is evident already from the fact that, as 
Delvau recounts (p. 163), the stores were closing at ten o'clock. [M6a,2] 

In the musical revue by Rarre, Radet, and Desfontaines, M. Durelief, ou Petite 
Revue des embellissemens de Paris (Paris, 1810), performed at the Theatre de 
Vaudeville on June 9, 1810, Paris in the form of a model constructed by M. Dure- 
lief has migrated into the scenery. The chorus declares "how agreeahle it is to have 
all of Paris in one's drawing room" (p. 20). The plot revolves around a wager 
hetween the architect Durelief and the painter Ferdinand; if the former, in his 
model of Paris, omits any sort of "emhellishment," then his daughter Victorine 
straightaway helongs to Ferdinand, who otherwise has to wait two years for her. It 
turns out that Durelief has forgotten Her Majesty the Empress Marie Louise, "the 
most beautiful ornament" of Paris . [M6a,3] 



The city is the realization of that ancient dream of humanity, the labyrinth. It is 
this reality to which the flaneur, without knowing it, devotes himself. Without 



knowing it; yet nothing is more foolish than the conventional thesis which ration- 
alizes bis behavior, and which f onns the uncontested basis of that voluminous 
literature that traces the figure and demeanor of the flaneur — the thesis, namely, 
that the flaneur has made a study of the physiognomic appearance of people in 
order to discover their nationality and social station, character and destiny, from 
a perusal of their gait, build, and play of features. The interest in concealing the 
true motives of the flaneur must have been pressing indeed to have occasioned 
such a shabby thesis. [M6a,4] 

In Maxime Du Camp's poem "Le Voyageur," the flaneur wears the costume of 
the traveler: 

"I am afraid to stop — it's the engine of my life; 



Love galls me so; I do not want to love." 
"Move on then, on with your bitter travels! 
The sad road awaits you: meet your fate." 

Maxime Du Camp, Les Chants moderixes (Paris, 1855), p. 104. [M7,l] 

Lithograph. Cabmen Doing Battle with Omnibus Drivers. Cabinet des Estampes. 

[M7,2] 



As early as 1853, there are official statistics concerning vehicular traffic at certain 
Parisian nerve centers. "In 1853, thirty-one omnibus lines were serving Paris, and 
it is worth noting that, with a few exceptions, these lines were designated by the 
same letters used for the autobus lines operating at that time. Thus it was that the 
'Madeleine-Bastille' line was already Line E." Paul d'Ariste, La Vie et le monde 
du boulevard, 1830-1870 (Paris <1930>), p. 196. [M7,3] 

At connecting stations for the omnibus, passengers were called up in numerical 
order and had to answer when called if they wanted to preserve their right to a 
seat. (1855) [M7,4] 

"The absinthe hour . . . dates from the burgeoning ... of the small press. In 
earlier times, when there was nothing but large serious newspapers, . . . there was 
no absinthe hour. This heure de Vabsinthe is the logical consequence of the Pari- 
sian gossip columns and tabloids." Gabriel Guillemot, Le Boheme (Paris, 1869), 
p. 72 ("Physiognomies parisie.nnes"). [M7,5] 

Louis Lurine, Le Treizieme Arrondusement de Paris (Paris, 1850), is one of the most 
noteworthy testimonials to the distinctive physiognomy of the neighborhood. 
The book has certain stylistic peculiarities. It personifies the quartier. Formulas 
like "The thirteenth arrandissement devotes itself to a man's love only when it can 
furnish him with vices to love" (p. 216) are not unusual. 57 [M7,6] 



Diderot's "How beautiful the street!" is a favorite phrase of the chroniclers of co 
flanerie. [M7,7] 



Regarding the legend of the flaneur: "With the aid of a word I overhear in passing, 
I reconstruct an entire conversation, an entire existence. The inflection of a voice 
suffices for me to attach the name of a deadly sin to the man whom I have just 
jostled and whose profile I glimpsed." Victor Fournel, Ce qu'on voit dans les rues 
de Pans (Paris, 1858), p. 270. [M7,8] 

In 1857 there was still a coach departing from the Rue Pavee-Saint-Andre at 6 a.m. 
for Venice; the trip took six weeks. See Fournel, Ce qu'on voit dans les rues de 
Paris (Paris), p. 273. [M7,9] 

In omnibuses, a dial that indicated the number of passengers. Why? Asa control 
for the conductor who distributed the tickets. [M7.10] 

"It is worth remarking . . . that the omnibus seems to subdue and to still all who 
approach it. Those who make their living from travelers . . . can he recognized 
ordinarily hy their coarse rowdiness . . . , hut omnihus employees, virtually alone 
among transit workers, display no trace of such behavior. It seems as though a 
calming, drowsy influence emanates from this heavy machine, like that which 
sends marmots and turtles to sleep at the onset of winter." Victor Fournel, Ce 
qu'on voit dans les rues de Paris (Paris, 1858), p. 283 ("Cochers de fiacres, 
cochers de remise et cochers d'omnibus"). [M7a,l] 

"At the time Eugene Sue's Mysteres de Paris was published, no one, in certain 
neighborhoods of the capital, doubted the existence of a Tortillard, a Chouette, a 
Prince Rodolphe." Charles Louandre, Les I dees subversives de notre temps 
(Paris, 1872), p. 44. [M7a,2] 

The first proposal for an omnibus system came from Pascal and was realized 
under Louis XIV, with the characteristic restriction "that soldiers, pages, foot- 
men, and other livery, including laborers and hired hands, were not permitted 
entry into stiid coaches." In 1828, introduction of the omnibuses, about which a 
poster tells us: "These vehicles . . . warn of their approach by sounding specially 
designed horns." Eugene d'Auriac, Histoire anecdotique de I Industrie f ranqaise 
(Paris, 1861), pp. 250, 281. [M7a,3] 

Among the phantoms of the city is "Lambert" — an invented figure, a flaneur 
perhaps. In any case, he is allotted the boulevard as the scene of his apparitions. 
There is a famous couplet with the refrain, "Eh, Lambert!" Delvau, in his Lions 
du jour <Paris, 1867>, devotes a paragraph to him (p. 228). [M7a,4] 



3 



A rustic figure in the urban scene is described by Delvau in his chapter "Le 
Pauvre a cheval" <Poor Man on Horseback>, in Les Lions du jour. "This horseman 



was a poor devil whose means forbade his going on foot, and who asked for alms 
as another man might ask for directions. . . . This mendicant ... on his little nag, 
with its wild mane and its shaggy coat like that of a rural donkey, has long 
remained before my eyes and in my imagination. . . . He died — a rentier." Alfred 
Delvau, Les Lions du jour (Paris, 1867), pp. 116-117 ("Le Pauvre a cheval"). 

[M7a,5] 

Looking to accentuate the Parisians' new feeling for nature, which rises above 
gastronomical temptations, Rattier writes: "A pheasant, displaying itself at the 
door of its leafy dwelling, would make its gold-and-ruby plumage sparkle in the 
sunlight . . . , so as to greet visitors . . . like a nabob of the forest." Paul-Ernest de 
Rattier, Paris n 'existepas (Paris, 1857), pp. 71-72. □ Grandville D [M7a,6] 

"It is emphatically not the counterfeit Paris that will have produced the rubber- 
neck. ... As for the flaneur, who was always — on the sidewalks and before the 
display windows — a man of no account, a nonentity addicted to charlatans and 
ten-cent emotions, a stranger to all that was not cobblestone, cab, or gas lamp, . . . 
he has become a laborer, a wine grower, a manufacturer of wool, sugar, and iron. 
He is no longer dumbfounded at nature's ways. The germination of a plant no 
longer seems to him external to the factory methods used in the Faubourg Saint- 
Denis." Paul-Ernest de Rattier, Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 1857), pp. 74—75. 

[M8,l] 

In his pamphlet Le Steele maudit (Paris, 1843), which takes a stand against the 
corruption of contemporary society, Alexis Dumesnil makes use of a fiction of 
Juvenal's: the crowd on the boulevard suddenly stops still, and a record of each 
individual's thoughts and objectives at that particular moment is compiled 
(pp. 103-104). [M8,2] 

"The contradiction between town and country ... is the crassest expression of the 
subjection of the individual to the division of labor, to a specific activity forced 
upon him — a subjection that makes one man into a narrow-minded city animal, 
another into a narrow-minded country animal." <Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, 
Die deutsche Ideologie> in Marx-Engels Archiv, vol. 1, ed. D. Rjazanov (Frank- 
furt am Main <1928>), pp. 271-272. lu [M8,3] 

At the Arc de Triomphe: "Ceaselessly up and down these streets parade the cabri- 
olets, omnibuses, swallows, velociferes, citadines, dames blanches, and all the 
other public conveyances, whatever they may be called — not to mention the innu- 
merable whiskies, berlins, barouches, horsemen, and horsewomen." L. Rellstab, 
Paris im Friihjahr 1843 (Leipzig, 1844), vol. 1, p. 212. The author also mentions 
an omnihus that carried its destination written on a flag. [M8,4] 



Around 1857 (see H. de Pene, Paris intime [Paris, 1859], p. 224), the upper level 
of the omnibus was closed to women. [M8,5] 



-Jltibtzi' U'ltliuies an WiKompM par»tR,c'csl pas pave ! 

A Paris omnibus. Lithograph by Honore 1 Daumier, 1856. 'Hie caption reads: "Fifteen 
centimes for a full bath! My word, what a bargain!" See M8,5. 

"The genial Vautrin, disguised as the abbe Carlos Herrera, had foreseen the Pari- 
sians' infatuation with public transport when he invested all his funds in transit 
companies in order to settle a dowry on Lucien de Ruhempre." Poete, Beaure- 
paire, Clouzot, and Henriot, line Promenm.de a tr avers Paris au temps des ro- 
mantiques: Exposition de la Bibliotheque et des Travaux historiques de la VUte de 
Paris (1908), p. 28. [M8,6] 



"Therefore the one who sees, without hearing, is much more . . . worried than 
the one who hears without seeing. This principle is of great importance in under- 
standing the sociology of the modern city. Social life in the large city . . . shows a 
great preponderance of occasions to see rather than to hear people. One explana- 
tion ... of special significance is the development of public means of transporta- 
tion. Before the appearance of omnibuses, railroads, and streetcars in the 
nineteenth century, men were not in a situation where, for minutes or hours at a 
time, they could or must look at one another without talking to one another." 
G. Simmel, Melanges de philosophie relativiste: Contribution a la culture philoso- 
phique <trans. Alix Guillain> (Paris, 1912), pp. 26-27 ("Essai sur la sociologie des 
sens"). 19 The state of affairs which Simmel relates to the condition of uneasiness 
and lability has, in other respects, a certain part to play in the vulgar physiog- 



nomy. The difference between this physiognomy and that of the eighteenth 
century deserves study. [M8a,l] 



"Paris . . . dresses up a ghost in old numbers of he Constitutionnel, and produces 
Chodruc Duclos." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 7 (Paris, 1881), 
p. 32 (Les Miserables, ch. 3). 2 " [M8a,2] 

On Victor Hugo: "The morning, for him, was consecrated to sedentary lahors, the 
afternoon to labors of wandering. He adored the upper levels of omnibuses — those 
'traveling balconies,' as he called them — from which he could study at his leisure 
the various aspects of the gigantic city. He claimed that the deafening brouhaha of 
Paris produced in him the same effect as the sea." Edouard Drumont, Figures de 
bronze ou statues de neige (Paris <1900>), p. 25 ("Victor Hugo"). [M8a,3] 

Separate existence of each quartier: around the middle of the century it was still 
being said of the He Saint-Louis that if a girl there lacked a good reputation, she 
had to seek her future husband outside the district. [M8a,4] 

"0 night! 0 refreshing darkness! ... in the stony labyrinths of the metropolis, 
scintillation of stars, bright bursts of city lights, you are the fireworks of the 
goddess Liberty!" Charles Baudelaire, he Spleen de Paris, ed. Hilsum (Paris), 
p. 203 ("Le Crepuscule du soir"). 21 [M8a,5] 

Names of omnibuses around 1840, in Gaetan Niepovie, Etudes physiologiques sill- 
ies grandes metropoles de VEurope occidentale (Paris, 1840), p. 113: Parisiennes, 
Hirondelles <Swallows>, Citadines, Vigilantes <Guardianesses>, Aglaias, Deltas. 

[M8a,6] 

Paris as landscape spread out below the painters: "As you cross the Rue Notre- 
Dame-de-Lorette, lift up your head and direct your gaze at one of those platforms 
crowning the Italianate houses. You cannot fail to notice, etched against the sky 
seven stories above the level of the pavements, something resembling a scarecrow 
stuck out in a field. . . . At first you see a dressing gown upon which all the colors of 
the rainbow are blended without harmony, a pair of long trousers of outlandish 
shape, and slippers impossible to describe. Under this burlesque apparel hides a 
young painter." Paris chez soi (Paris <1854.>), pp. 191-192 (Alberic Second, "Rue 
Notre-Dame-de-Lorette"). [M9,l] 

Geffroy, under the impression made by the works of Meryon: "These are repre- 
sented things which give to the viewer the possibility of dreaming them. " Gustave 
Geffroy, Charles Meryon (Paris, 1926), p. 4. [M9,2] 

"The omnibus — that Leviathan of coachwork — crisscrosses with all the many car- 
riages at the speed of lightning!" Theophile Gautier [in Edouard Fournier, Paris 
demoli, 2nd ed., with a preface by M. Theophile Gautier (Paris, 1855), p. iv]. 



(This preface appeared — presumably as a review of the first edition — in he 
Moniteur universel of January 21, 1854. It would appear to be wholly or in part 
identical to Gautier's "Mosa'ique de mines," in Paris et les Parisiens au XIX" siecle 
[Paris, 1856].) [M9.3] 

"The most heterogeneous temporal elements thus coexist in the city. If we step 
from an eighteenth-century house into one from the sixteenth century, we tumble 
down the slope of time. Right next door stands a Gothic church, and we sink to the 
depths. A few steps farther, we are in a street from out of the early years of 
Bismarck's rule . . . , and once again climbing the mountain of time. Whoever sets 
foot in a city feels caught up as in a web of dreams, where the most remote past is 
linked to the events of today. One house allies with another, no matter what period 
they come from, and a street is horn. And then insofar as this street, which may go 
hack to the age of Goethe, runs into another, which may date from the Wilhelmine 
years, the district emerges. . . . The climactic points of the city are its squares: 
here, from every direction, converge not only numerous streets but all the streams 
of their history. No sooner have they flowed in than they are contained; the edges 
of the square serve as quays, so that already the outward form of the square 
provides information about the history that was played upon it. . . . Things which 
find no expression in political events, or find only minimal expression, unfold in 
the cities: they are a superfine instrument, responsive as an Aeolian harp — despite 
their specific gravity — to the living historic vibrations of the air." Ferdinand Lion, 
Geschichte biologisch gesehen (Ziirich and Leipzig <1935>), pp. 125-126, 128 
("Notiz iiber Stadte"). [M9,4] 

Delvau believes he can recognize the social strata of Parisian society in flanerie as 
easily as a geologist recognizes geological strata. [M9a,l] 

The man of letters: "The most poignant realities for him are not spectacles but 
studies." Alfred Delvau, Les Dessous de Paris (Paris, 1860), p. 121. [M9a,2] 

"A man who goes for a walkought not to have to concern himself with any hazards 
he may run into or with the regulations of a city. If an amusing idea enters his 
head, if a curious shopfront comes into view, it is natural that he would want to 
cross the street without confronting dangers such as our grandparents could not 
have imagined. But he cannot do this today without taking a hundred precautions, 
without checking the horizon, without asking the advice of the police department, 
without mixing with a dazed and breathless herd, for whom the way is marked out 
in advance by hits of shining metal. If he tries to collect the whimsical thoughts 
that may have come to mind, very possihly occasioned by sights on the street, he is 
deafened by car horns, stupefied by loud talkers . . . , and demoralized by the 
scraps of conversation, of political meetings, of jazz, which escape slyly from the 
windows. In former times, moreover, his brothers, the rubbernecks, who ambled 
along so easily down the sidewalks and stopped a moment everywhere, lent to the 
stream of humanity a gentleness and a tranquillity which it has lost. Now it is a 



torrent where you are rolled, buffeted, cast up, and swept to one side and the 
other." Edmond Jaloux, "Le Dernier Flaneur," Le Temps (May 22, 1936). 

[M9a,3] 



"To leave without being forced in any way, and to follow your inspiration as if the 
mere fact of turning right or turning left already constituted an essentially poetic 
act." Edmond Jaloux, "Le Dernier Flaneur," Le Temps (May 22, 1936). [M9a,4] 

"Dickens . . . could not remain in Lausanne because, in order to write his novels, 
he needed the immense labyrinth of London streets where he could prowl about 
continuously. . . . Thomas De Quincey . . . , as Baudelaire tells us, was 'a sort of 
peripatetic, a street philosopher pondering his way endlessly through the vortex of 
the great city.'" 22 Edmond Jaloux, "Le Dernier Flaneur," Le Temps (May 22, 
1936). [M9a,5] 

"Taylor's obsession, and that of his collaborators and successors, is the 'war on 
flanerie.'" Georges Friedmann, La Crise du progres (Paris <1936>), p. 76. 

[M10.1] 

The urban in Balzac: "Nature appears to him in its magical aspect as the arcanum 
of matter. It appears to him in its symbolic aspect as the reverberation of human 
energies and aspirations: in the crashing of the ocean's waves, he experiences the 
'exaltation of human forces'; and in the show of color and fragrance produced by 
flowers, he reads the cipher of love's longing. Always, for him, nature signifies 
something other, an intimation of spirit. The opposite movement he does not rec- 
ognize: the immersion of the human back into nature, the saving accord with stars, 
clouds, winds. He was far too engrossed by the tensions of human existence." 
Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), pp. 468-469. [M10.2] 

"Balzac lived a life ... of furious haste and premature collapse, a life such as that 
imposed on the inhabitants of hig cities by the struggle for existence in modern 
society. ... In Balzac's case we see, for the first time, a genius who shares such a 
life and lives it as his own." Ernst Rohert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), pp. 464— 
465. On the question of tempo, compare the following: "Poetry and art . . . derive 
from a 'quick inspection of things.' ... In Seraphita, velocity is introduced as an 
essential feature of artistic intuition: "that 'mind's eye' whose rapid perception 
can engender within the soul, as on a canvas, the most diverse landscapes of the 
world." 2 ' Ernst Robert Curtins, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), p. 445. [M10.3] 

"If God . . . has imprinted every man's destiny in his physiognomy, . . . why 
shouldn't the human hand sum up that physiognomy in itself, since the hand 
comprises human action in its entirety and is its sole means of manifestation? 
Hence palmistry. . . . To foretell the events of a man's life from the study of his 
hand is a feat ... no more extraordinary than telling a soldier he is going to fight, 
a barrister that he is going to plead a cause, a cobbler that he is going to make 



boots or shoes, a farmer that he is going to fertilize and plough his land. Let us take 
a still more striking example: genius is a sort of immaterial sun whose rays give 
color to everything passing by. Cannot an idiot be immediately recognized by 
characteristics which are the opposite of those shown by a man of genius? . . . Most 
observant people, students of social nature in Paris, are able to tell the profession 
of a passerby as they see him approach." Honore de Balzac, he Cousin Pons, in 
Oeuvres completes, vol. 18, Scenes de la vie parisienne, 6 (Paris, 1914), p. 130. 24 

[M10,4] 

"What men call love is very small, very restricted, and very weak compared with 
this ineffable orgy, this holy prostitution of the soul which gives itself entirely, 
poetry and charity, to the unforeseen that reveals itself, to the unknown that 
happens along." Charles Baudelaire, he Spleen de Paris, ed. R. Simon, p. 16 
("Les Foules"). 25 [Ml0a,l] 

"Which of us, in his moments of ambition, has not dreamed of the miracle of a 
poetic prose, musical, without rhythm and without rhyme, supple enough and 
rugged enough to adapt itself to the lyrical impulses of the soul, the undulations of 
reverie, the jibes of conscience? / It was, above all, out of my exploration of huge 
cities, out of the medley of their innumerable interrelations, that this haunting 
ideal was born." Charles Baudelaire, he Spleen de Pmris, ed. R. Simon, pp. 1-2 
("A Arsene Houssaye"). 26 [Ml0a,2] 

"There is nothing more profound, more mysterious, more pregnant, more insidi- 
ous, more dazzling than a window lighted by a single candle." Charles Baudelaire, 
Le Spleen de Paris, ed. R. Simon (Paris), p. 62 ("Les Fenetres"). 27 [Ml0a,3] 

"The artist seeks eternal truth and knows nothing of the eternity in his midst. He 
admires the column of the Babylonian temple and scorns the smokestack on the 
factory. Yet what is the difference in their lines? When the era of coal-powered 
industry is over, people will admire the vestiges of the last smokestacks, as today 
we admire the remains of temple columns. . . . The steam vapor so detested by 
writers allows them to divert their admiration. . . . Instead of waiting to visit the 
Bay of Bengal to find objects to exclaim over, they might have a little curiosity 
about the objects they see in daily life. A porter at the Gare de l'Est is no less 
picturesque than a coolie in Colombo. ... To walk out your front door as if you've 
just arrived from a foreign country; to discover the world in which you already 
live; to begin the day as if you've just gotten off the boat from Singapore and have 
never seen your own doormat or the people on the landing . . . — it is this that 
reveals the humanity before you, unknown until now." Pierre Hamp, "La Littera- 
ture, image de la societe" (Encyclopedic franqaise, vol. 16, Arts et litteratures 
dans Im. societe contemporaine, 1, p. 64). [Ml0a,4] 



Chesterton fastens on a specimen of English argot to characterize Dickens in his 
relation to the street: "He has the key to the street" is said of someone to whom the 



door is closed. "Dickens himself had, in the most sacred and serious sense of the 
term, the key to the street. . . . His earth was the stones of the street; his stars were 
the lamps of the street; his hero was the man in the street. He could open the 
inmost door of his house — the door that leads into that secret passage which is 
lined with houses and roofed with stars." G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, series enti- 
tled Vies des hommes illustres, vol. 9, translated from the English by Laurent and 
Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), p. 30. 2,i (Ml 1 , 1 ] 

Dickens a s a child : "Whenever he had done drudging, h e had n o other resource but 
drifting, and he drifted over half London. He was a dreamy child, thinking mostly 
of his own dreary prospects. . . . He did not go in for 'observation,' a priggish 
habit; he did not look at Charing Cross to improve his mind or count the lamp- 
posts in Holborn to practice his arithmetic. But unconsciously he made all these 
places the scenes of the monstrous drama in his miserable little soul. He walked in 
darkness under the lamps of Holborn, and was crucified at Charing Cross. So for 
him ever afterwards these places had the beauty that only belongs to battlefields." 
G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, series entitled Vie des hommes illustres, vol. 9, trans- 
lated from the English by Laurent and Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), pp. 30-31. 29 

[M11.2] 



On the psychology of the flaneur: "The undying scenes we can all see if we shut our 
eyes are not the scenes that we have stared at under the direction of guide-books; 
the scenes we see are the scenes at which we did not look at all — the scenes in which 
we walked when we were thinking about something else — about a sin, or a love 
affair, or some childish sorrow. We can see the background now because we did not 
see it then. So Dickens did not stamp these places on his mind; he stamped his 
mind on these places." G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, series entitled Vie des hommes 
illustres, vol. 9, translated from the English by Laurent and Martin-Dupont 
(Paris, 1927), p. 31. 30 [Ml 1,3] 



Dickens: "In May of 1846 he ran over to Switzerland and tried to write Dombey 
and Son at Lausanne. . . . He could not get on. He attributed this especially to his 
love of London and his loss of it, 'the absence of streets and numbers of 
figures. . . . My figures seem disposed to stagnate without crowds about them.'" 
G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, translated from the English by Laurent and Martin- 
Dupont (Paris, 1927), p. 125." [Mlla.11 

"In . . . he Voyage de MM. Dunanan pere et fils, two provincials are deceived into 
thinking that Paris is not Paris but Venice, which they had set out to visit. . . . 
Paris as an intoxication of all the senses, as a place of delirium." S. Kracauer, 
Jacques Offenbach unci das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 1937), p. 283. 32 

[Mlla,2] 



According to a remark by Musset, the "East Indies" begin at a point beyond the 
boundary of the boulevards. (Shouldn't it be called instead the Far East?) (See 
Kracauer, Offenbach, p. 105.) 33 [Mlla,3] 



Kracauer writes that "the boulevardiers . . . eschewed nature. . . . Nature was as 
Plutonic, as volcanic, as the people." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach (Amster- 
dam, 1937), p. 107. :i4 [Mlla,4] 



On the detective novel: "We must take as an established fact that this metamor- 
phosis of the city is due to a transposition of the setting — namely, from the savan- 
nah and forest of Fenimore Cooper, where every broken branch signifies a worry 
or a hope, where every tree trunk hides an enemy rifle or the bow of an invisible 
and silent avenger. Beginning with Balzac, all writers have clearly recorded this 
debt and faithfully rendered to Cooper what they owed him. Works like Les Mohi- 
cans de Paris, by Alexander Dumas — works where the title says all — are ex- 
tremely common." Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle Revue 
francaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), pp. 685-686. [Mlla,5] 

Owing to the influence of Cooper, it becomes possible for the novelist in an 
urban setting to give scope to the experiences of the hunter. Tliis has a bearing on 
the rise of the detective story. [Mlla,6] 

"It seems reasonable to say that there exists ... a phantasmagorical repre- 
sentation of Paris (and, more generally, of the big city) with such power over the 
imagination that the question of its accuracy would never be posed in practice — a 
representation created entirely by the book, yet so widespread as to make up . . . 
part of the collective mental atmosphere." Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe mod- 
erne," Nouvelle Revue francaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1 , 1937), p. 684. [M12.1] 

"The Faubourg Saint-Jacques is one of the most primitive suburbs of Paris. Why 
is that? Is it because it is surrounded by four hospitals as a citadel is surrounded 
by four bastions, and these hospitals keep the tourists away from the neighbor- 
hood? Is it hecause, leading to no major artery and terminating in no center, . . . 
the place is rarely visited by coaches? Thus, as soon as one appears in the distance, 
the lucky urchin who spies it first cups his hands around his mouth and gives a 
signal to all the inhabitants of the faubourg, just as, on the seashore, the one who 
first spots a sail on the horizon gives a signal to the others." A. Dumas, Les Mohi- 
cans de Paris, vol. 1 (Paris, 1859), p. 102 (ch. 25: "Oil il est question des sauvages 
du Faubourg Saint- Jacques"). The chapter describes nothing but the arrival of a 
piano before a house in the district. No one suspects that the object is a musical 
instrument, but all are enraptured by the sight of "a huge piece of mahogany" 
(p. 103). For mahogany furniture was as yet hardly known in this quartier. 

[M12,2] 

The first words of an advertisement for Les Mohicans de Paris: "Paris — The Mo- 
hicans! . . . Two names as discordant as the qui vive of two gigantic unknowns, 
confronting each other at the brink of an abyss traversed by that electric light 
whose source is Alexandre Dumas." [M12,3] 



Frontispiece of the third volume of Les Mohicans de Paris (Paris, 1863): "The 
Virgin Forest" [of the Rue d'Enfer]. [M12.4] 



"What wonderful precautions! What vigilance! What ingenious preparations and 
keen attention to detail! The North American savage who, even as he moves, 
obliterates his footprints in order to elude the enemy at his heels is not more 
skillful or more meticulous in his precautions." Alfred Nettement, Etudes sur le 
feuilleton-roman, vol. 1 <Paris, 1845>, p. 419. [M12,5] 

Vigny (according to Miss Corkran, Celebrities and I <London, 1902>, cited in 
L. Seche, A. de Vigny, vol. 2 <Paris, 1913>, p. 295), on viewing the chimneys of 
Paris: "I adore these chimneys. . . . Oh, yes, the smoke of Paris is more beautiful 
to me than the solitude of forests and mountains." [M12,6] 

One does well to consider the detective story in conjunction with the methodical 
genius of Poe, as Valery does (in his introduction to Les Flews du mal [Paris, 
1928], p. xx): "16 reach a point which allows us to dominate a whole field of 
activity necessarily means that one perceives a quantity of possibilities. . . . It is 
therefore not surprising that Poe, possessing so . . . sure a method, became the 
inventor of several different literary forms — that he provided the fir st . . . exam- 
ples of the scientific tale, the modern cosmogonic poem, the detective novel, the 
literature of morbid psychological states." 35 [M12a,l] 

Concerning Poe's "Man of the Crowd," this passage from an article in La Semaine 
of October 4, 1846, attributed to Balzac or to Hippolyte Castille (cited in Messac 
<Le "Detective Novel" et Vinfluence de Im pensee scientifique [Paris, 1929]>, 
p. 424): "Our eye is fixed on the man in society who moves amonglaws, snares, the 
betrayals of his confederates, as a savage in the New World moves among reptiles, 
ferocious beasts, and enemy trihes." [M12a,2] 

Apropos of "The Man of the Crowd": Bulwer<-Lytton> orchestrates his descrip- 
tion of the big-city crowd in Eugene Aram (pt. 4, ch. 5) with a reference to 
Goethe's observation that every human being, from the humblest to the most 
distinguished, carries around with him a secret which would make him hateful to 
all others if it became known, hi addition, there is already in Bulwer a confronta- 
tion between city and country that is weighted in favor of the city. [M12a,3] 

Apropos of detective fiction: "In the American hero-fantasy, the Indian's charac- 
ter plays a leading role. . . . Only the Indian rites of initiation can compare with 
the ruthlessness and savagery of rigorous American training. ... In everything on 
which the American has really set his heart, we catch a glimpse of the Indian. His 
extraordinary concentration on a particular goal, his tenacity of purpose, his 
unflinching endurance of the greatest hardships — in all this the legendary virtues 
of the Indian find full expression." C. G. Jung, Seelenprobleme der Gegenivart 
(Zurich, Leipzig, Stuttgart, 1932), p. 207 ("Seele und Erde"). 56 [M12a,4] 



Chapter 2, "Physiognomie de la rue," in the Argument du livre sur la Belgique: 
"Washing of the sidewalks and the facades of houses, even when it rains in tor- 
rents. A national mania, a universal mania. . . . No display windows in the shops. 
Flanerie, so dear to nations endowed with imagination, impossible in Brussels; 
nothing to see, and the roads impossible." Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, ed. Y.-G. 
Le Dantec <Paris, 1932>, pp. 709-710. [M12a,5] 

Le Breton reproaches Balzac with having offered the reader "an excess of Mohi- 
cans in spencer jackets and of Iroquois in frock coats." Cited in Regis Messac, Le 
"Detective Novel" et ^influence de la pensee scientijique (Paris, 1929), p. 425. 

[M13.1] 

From the opening pages of Les Mysteres de Paris: "Everyone has read those admi- 
rable pages in which Fenimore Cooper, the American Walter Scott, has brought to 
life the fierce ways of the savages, their colorful and poetic speech, the thousand 
tricks they use when following or fleeing their enemies. ... It is our intent to bring 
before the eyes of the reader some episodes in the lives of various other barbari- 
ans, no less removed from the civilized world than the tribes so well portrayed by 
Cooper." Cited in Regis Messac, Le "Detective Novel" (Paris, 1929), p. 425. " 

[M13.2] 

Noteworthy connection between flanerie and the detective novel at the beginning 
of Les Mohicans de Paris: "At the outset Salvator says to the poet Jean Robert, You 
want to write a novel? Take Lesage, Walter Scott, and Cooper. . . .' Then, with 
characters like those of the Thousand and One Nights, they cast a piece of paper to 
the winds and follow it, convinced it will lead them to a subject for a novel, which 
is what in fact happens." Regis Messac, Le "Detective Novel" et I 'influence de la 
pensee scientijique (Paris, 1929), p. 429. [M13.3] 



On the epigones of Sue and Balzac, "who came swarming to the serial novels. The 
influence of Cooper makes itself felt here sometimes directly and sometimes 
through the mediation of Balzac or other imitators. Paul Feval, beginning in 1856 
with Les Coiiteaux d , or <The Golden Knives>, boldly transposes the habits and 
even the inhabitants of the prairie to a Parisian setting: we find there a wonder- 
fully gifted dog named Mohican, an American-style duel between hunters in a 
Paris suburb, and a redskin called Towah who kills and scalps four of his enemies 
in a hackney eab in the middle of Paris, and performs this feat with such dexterity 
that the driver never notices. Later, in Les Habits noirs <The Black Attire) (1863), 
he multiplies those comparisons of which Balzac is so fond: 'Cooper's savages in 
the middle of Paris! Is not the big city as mysterious as the forests of the New 
World?'" An additional remark: "Compare also chapters 2 and 19, in which he 
brings two vagabonds on the scene, Eehalot and Similor, 'Hurons of our lakes of 
mud, Iroquois of the gutter.'" Regis Messac, Le "Detective Novel" et I'influence de 
la pensee scientijique, series entitled Bibliotheque de la revue de litterature corn- 
puree, vol. 59, pp. 425-426. [M13,4] 



"That poetry of terror which the stratagems of enemy tribes at war create in the 
heart of the forests of America, and of which Cooper has made such good use, was 
attached to the smallest details of Parisian life. The passersby, the shops, the 
hackney carriages, a person standing at a window — to the men who had been 
numhered off for the defense of Peyrade's life, everything presented the ominous 
interest which in Cooper's novels may be found in a tree trunk, a beaver's dam, a 
rock, a buffalo skin, a motionless canoe, a hranch drooping over the water." 
Balzac, A combien V amour revient aux vieillards. m [M13a,l] 

Preformed in the figure of the flaneur is that of the detective. The flaneur re- 
quired a social legitimation of his habitus. It suited him very well to see his 
indolence presented as a plausible front, behind which, in reality, hides the riv- 
eted attention of an observer who will not let the unsuspecting malefactor out of 
his sight. [M13a,2] 

At the end of Baudelaire's essay on Marceline Desbordes-Valmore emerges the 
promeneur, who strolls through the garden landscape of her poetry; the perspec- 
tives of the past and future open before him. "But these skies are too vast to be 
everywhere pure, and the temperature of the climate too warm. . . . The idle 
passerby, who contemplates these areas veiled in mourning, feels tears of hysteria 
come to his eyes." Charles Baudelaire, I! Art romantique (Paris), p. 343 ("Mar- 
celine DesbordesAfolmore"). 39 The promeneur is no longer capable of "meander- 
ing capriciously." He takes refuge in the shadow of cities: he becomes a flaneur. 

[M13a,3] 

Jules Claretie relates of the aged Victor Hugo, at the time when he was living on the 
Rue Pigalle, that he enjoyed riding through Paris on the upper level of omnibuses. 
He loved looking down, from this eminence, on the bustle of the streets. See Ray- 
mond Escholier, Victor Hugo raconte par ceux qui font vu (Paris, 1931), p. 350 — 
Jules Claretie, "Victor Hugo." [M13a,4] 

"Do you recall a tableau . . . , created hy the most powerful pen of our day, which 
is entitled 'The Man of the Crowd'? From behind the window of a cafe, a convales- 
cent, contemplating the crowd with delight, mingles in thought with all the 
thoughts pulsating around lum. Having just escaped from the shadow of death, he 
joyfully breathes in all the germs and emanations of life; having heen on the point 
of forgetting everything, he now remembers and ardently wishes to rememher 
everything. Finally, he rushes into the crowd in search of an unknown person 
whose face, glimpsed momentarily, fascinated him. Curiosity has hecome a fatal, 
irresistible passion." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 61 ("Le Peintre de 
la vie moderne")."" [M14,l] 

Already Andre Le Breton, Balzac, Vhomme et Voeuvre <Paris, 1905>, compares 
Balzac's characters — "the usurers, the attorneys, the hankers" — to Mohicans, 
whom they resemhle more than they do the Parisians. See also Remy de Gour- 



mont, Promenades litteraires, second series (Paris, 1906), pp. 117-118: "Les 
Maitres de Balzac.") [M14.2] 



From Baudelaire's Fusees: "Man ... is always ... in a state of savagery. What are 
the perils of jungle and prairie compared to the daily shocks and conflicts of 
civilization? Whether a man embraces his dupe on the boulevard, or spears his 
prey in unknown forests, is he not . . . the most highly perfected beast of prey?'"" 

[M14.3] 

There were representations (lithographs?) by Raffet of Ecossaises and Tricycles. 
<See M3a,8.> [M14.4] 

"When Balzac lifts the roofs or penetrates the walls in order to clear a space for 
observation, . . . you listen at the doors. ... In the interest of sparking your imagi- 
nation, that is, . . . you are playing the role of what our neighbors the English, in 
their prudishness, call the 'police detective'!" Hippolyte Babou, La Verite sur le 
cas de M. Champjleury (Paris, 1857), p . 30. [M14.5] 

It would be profitable to discover certain definite features leading toward the 
physiognomy of the city dweller. Example: the sidewalk, which is reserved for 
the pedestrian, runs along the roadway. Thus, the city dweller in the course of his 
most ordinary affairs, if he is on foot, has constantly before his eyes the image of 
the competitor who overtakes him in a vehicle. — Certainly the sidewalks were 
laid down in the interests of those who go by car or by horse. When? [M14,6] 

"For the perfect flaneur, ... it is an immense joy to set up house in the heart of the 
multitude, amid the ebb and flow. . . . To be away from home, yet to feel oneself 
everywhere at home; to see the world, to he at the center of the world, yet to 
remain hidden from the world — such are a few of the slightest pleasures of those 
independent, passionate, impartial [!!] natures which the tongue can but clumsily 
define. The spectator is a prince who everywhere rejoices in his incognito. . . . The 
lover of universal life enters into the crowd as though it were an immense reservoir 
of electric energy. We might also liken him to a mirror as vast as the crowd itself; or 
to a kaleidoscope endowed with consciousness, which, with each one of its move- 
ments, represents the multiplicity of lif e and the flickering grace of all the elements 
of life." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), pp. 64-65 ("Le Peintre de la vie 
moderne"). 12 [M14a,l] 

The Paris of 1908. "A Parisian used to crowds, to traffic, and to choosing his 
streets could still go for long walks at a steady pace and even without taking much 
care. Generally speaking, the abundance of means of transportation had not yet 
given more than three million people the . . . idea that they could move about just 
as they liked and that distance was the last thing that counted." Jules Romains, 
Les Homines de bonne volonte, hook 1 , Le 6 octobre (Paris <1932>), p . 204.' y 

[Ml4a,2] 



In Le 6 octobre, in Chapter 17, "Le Grand Voyage du petit garcon" (pp. 176-184), 
Romains describes how Louis Bastide makes his journey through Montmartre, 
from the comer of the Rue Ordener to the Rue Custine: "He had a mission to 
accomplish. Somebody had commissioned him to follow a certain course, to 
carry something, or perhaps to bear news of something" (p. 179)." In this game 
of travel, Romains develops some perspectives — particularly the alpine land- 
scape of Montmartre with the mountain inn (p. 180) — which resemble those in 
which the flaneur's imagination can lose itself. [Ml4a,3] 

Maxim of the flaneur: "In our standardized and uniform world, it is right here, 
deep helow the surface, that we must go. Estrangement and surprise, the most 
thrilling exoticism, are all close by." Daniel Halevy, Pays parisiens (Paris <1932>), 
p. 153. [Ml4a,4] 

In Jules Romains' Crime de Quinette {Les Homines de bonne volonte, book 2), one 
finds something like the negative of the solitude which is generally companion to 
the flaneur. It is, perhaps, that friendship is strong enough to break through such 
solitude — this is what is convincing about Romains' thesis. "According to my 
idea, it's always rather in that way that you make friends with anybody. You are 
present together at a moment in the life of the world, perhaps in the presence of a 
fleering secret of the world — an apparition which nobody has ever seen before 
and perhaps nobody will ever see again. It may even be something very little. 
Take two men going for a walk, for example, like us. Suddenly, thanks to a break 
in the clouds, a ray of light comes and strikes the top of a wall; and the top of the 
wall becomes, for the moment, something in some way quite extraordinary. One 
of the two men touches the other on the shoulder. The other raises his head and 
sees it too, understands it too. Then the thing up there vanishes. But they will 
know in aeternum that it once existed." Jules Romains, Les Homines de bonne 
volonte, book 2, Crime de Quinette <Paris, 1932>, pp. 175-176. 45 [M15,l] 

Mallarme. "He had crossed the Place and the Pont de l'Europe almost every day 
(he confided to George Moore), gripped by the temptation to throw himself from 
the heights of the bridge onto the iron rails, under the trains, so as finally to escape 
this mediocrity of which he was prisoner." Daniel Halevy, Pays parisiens (Paris 
<1932>), p. 105. [M15,2] 

Michelet writes: "I sprang up like a pale blade of grass between the paving stones" 
(cited in Halevy, Pays parisiens, p. 14). [M15,3] 

The tangle of the forest as archetype of mass existence in Hugo: "An astonishing 
chapter of Les Miser ables contains the following lines: 'What had just taken place 
in this street would not have surprised a forest. The trees, the copse, the heath, 
the branches roughly intertangled, the tall grass, have a darkly mysterious exist- 
ence. This wild multitude sees there sudden apparitions of the invisible; there, 



what is below man distinguishes through the dark what is above man."' 46 Gabriel 
Bounoure: "Abimes de Victor Hugo," Mesures (July 15, 1936), p. 49. DGer- 
stacker passage D [M15,4] 



"Research into that serious disease, hatred of the home. Pathology of the disease. 
Progressive growth of the disease." Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, 
vol. 2 (Paris, 1932), p. 653 ("Mon Coeur mis a mi"). 47 [M15,5] 

Letter accompanying the two "Crepuscule" poems; to Fernand Desnoyers, who 
published them in his Fontainebleau (Paris, 1855): "I'm sending you two pieces of 
poetry that more or less sum up the reveries that assail me in the twilight hours. In 
the depths of the woods, shut in by those vaults that recall sacristies and cathe- 
drals, I think of our amazing cities, and that prodigious music which rolls over the 
summits seems to me a translation of the lamentations of mankind." Cited in 
A. Seche, La Vie des Fteurs du mat (Paris, 1928), p. 110."' D Baudelaire D 

[M15a,l] 

The classic early description of the crowd in Poe: "By far the greater number of 
those who went by had a satisfied, business-like demeanor, and seemed to be 
thinking only of making their way through the press. Their brows were knit, and 
their eyes rolled quickly; when pushed against by fellow- wayfarers they evinced 
no symptom of impatience, but adjusted their clothes and hurried on. Others, 
still a numerous class, were restless in their movements, had flushed faces, and 
talked and gesticulated to themselves, as if feeling in solitude on account of the 
very denseness of the company around. When impeded in their progress, these 
people suddenly ceased muttering, but redoubled their gesticulations, and 
awaited, with an absent and overdone smile upon the lips, the course of the 
persons impeding them. If jostled, they bowed profusely to the jostlers, and 
appeared overwhelmed with confusion." Poe, Nouvelles Hutoires extraordinaires, 
trans. Ch. B. (Paris <1886>), p. 89." !) [M15a,2] 

"What are the perils of jungle and prairie compared to the daily shocks and 
conflicts of civilization? Whether a man embraces his dupe on the boulevard, or 
spears his prey in unknown forests , is he not eternal man — that is to say, the most 
highly perfected beast of prey'.'"' Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 
2 <Paris, 1932>, p. 637 ("Fusees"). 50 [M15a,3] 

The image of antiquity that so dazzled France is sometimes to be found in 
immediate proximity to the extremely modern image of America. Balzac on the 
commercial traveler: "See! What an athlete, what an arena, and what a weapon: 
he, the world, and his tongue! A daring seaman, he embarks with a stock of mere 
words to go and fish for money, five or six hundred thousand francs, say, in the 
frozen ocean, the land of savages, of Iroquois — in France!" H. de Balzac, L'lllustre 
Gaudissart, ed. Calmann-Levy (Paris), p. 5. 51 [M15a,4] 



Description of the crowd in Baudelaire, to be compared with the description in 
Poe: 



The gutter, dismal bed, carries along its foulnesses, 
Carries, boiling, the secrets of the sewers; 
It slaps in corrosive waves against the houses, 
Rushes on to jaundice and corrupt the river Seine, 
Sloshing as high as the knees of pedestrians. 

On the slippery pavements everyone passes brutal and self-absorbed, 
Elbowing and spattering us with mud, or thrusting us aside 
In their hurry to arrive somewhere. 
Everywhere mire and deluge and opacity of sky: 
Dire tableau such as dark Ezekiel might have dreamt. 

Ch. B., Oeuvres, vol. 1 <Paris, 1931>, p. 211 (Poemes divers, "Un Jour de 
pluie"). 52 [M16.1] 

On the detective novel: 

The man who hasn't signed anything, who left no picture, 
Who was not there, who said nothing: 
How can they catch him? 
Erase the traces. 

Brecht, Versuche <4-7 (Berlin, 1930)>, p. 116 (Lesebuch fur Stadtebeivohner, 
no. l). 5a [M16.2] 

The masses in Baudelaire. They stretch before the flaneur as a veil: they are the 
newest drug for the solitary. — Second, they efface all traces of the individual: 
they are the newest asylum for the reprobate and the proscript. — Finally, within 
the labyrinth of the city, the masses are the newest and most inscrutable laby- 
rinth. Through them, previously unknown chthonic traits are imprinted on the 
image of the city. [M16,3] 

The social base of flanerie is journalism. As flaneur, the literary man ventures 
into the marketplace to sell himself. Just so — but that by no means exhausts the 
social side of flanerie. "Wfe know," says Marx, "that the value of each commodity 
is determined by the quantity of labor materialized in its use value, by the 
working-time socially necessary for its production" (Marx, Das Kapital, ed. 
Korsch <Berlin, 1932>, p. 188). 5 'The journalist, as flaneur, behaves as if he too 
were aware of this. The number of work hours socially necessary for the produc- 
tion of his particular working energy is, in fact, relatively high; insofar as he 
makes it his business to let his hours of leisure on the boulevard appear as part of 
this work time, he multiplies the latter and thereby the value of his own labor. In 
his eyes, and often also in the eyes of his bosses, such value has something 
fantastic about it. Naturally, this would not be the case if he were not in the 
privileged position of making the work time necessary for the production of his 



use value available to a general and public review by passing that time on the 
boulevard and thus, as it were, exhibiting it. [M16,4] 



The press brings into play an overabundance of information, which can be all the 
more provocative the more it is exempt from any use. (Only the ubiquity of the 
reader would make possible a utilization; and so the illusion of such ubiquity is 
also generated.) The actual relation of this information to social existence is 
determined by the dependence of the information industry on financial interests 
and its alignment with these interests. — As the information industry comes into 
its own, intellectual labor fastens parasitically on every material labor, just as 
capital more and more brings every material labor into a relation of dependency. 



Simmel's apt remark concerning the uneasiness aroused in the urbanite by other 
people, people whom, in the overwhelming majority of cases, he sees without 
hearing, 55 would indicate that, at least in their beginnings, the physiognomies 
correction: physiologies> were motivated by, among other things, the wish to 
dispel this uneasiness and render it harmless. Otherwise, the fantastic pretensions 
of these little volumes could not have sat well with their audience. [M16a,2] 

There is an effort to master the new experiences of the city within the framework 
of the old traditional experiences of nature. Hence the schemata of the virgin 
forest and the sea (Meryon and Ponson du Terrail). [M16a,3] 

Trace and aura. The trace is appearance of a nearness, however far removed the 
thing that left it behind may be. The aura is appearance of a distance, however 
close the thing that calls it forth. In the trace, we gain possession of the thing; in 
the aura, it takes possession of us. [Ml 6a,4] 



Auguste-Marseille Barthelemy, Paris: Revue satirique d M. G. Delessert, Prefet de 



"M. Le Breton says that it is the usurers, attorneys, and hankers in Balzac, rather 
than the Parisians, who sometimes seem like ruthless Mohicans, and he believes 
that the influence of Fenimore Cooper was not particularly advantageous for the 
author of Gobsech. This is possihle, hut difficult to prove." Remy de Gonrmont, 
Promenades litteraires, 2nd series (Paris, 1906), pp. 117-118 ("Les Maitres de 



[M16a,l] 



Faithful to my old established way, 
I like to turn the street into a study; 

How often, then, as chance conducts my dreaming steps, 
I blunder, unawares, into a group of pavers! 



Police (Paris, 1838), p. 8. 



[M16a,5] 



Balzac"). 



[M17,l] 



"The jostling crowdedness and the motley disorder of metropolitan communica- 
tion would ... he unbearahle without . . . psychological distance. Since contempo- 



rary urban culture . . . forces us to be physically close to an enormous number of 
people, . . . people would sink completely into despair if the objectilication of 
social relationships did not bring with it an inner boundary and reserve. The 
pecuniary character of relationships, either openly or concealed in a thousand 
forms, places [a] . . . functional distance between people that is an inner protec- 
tion . . . against the overcrowded proximity." Georg Simmel, Philosophie des 
Geldes (Leipzig, 1900), p. 514.™ [Ml7,2] 



Prologue to Le Flaneur, newspaper for the masses, published at the office of the 
town crier, 45 Rue de la Harpe (the first and, no doubt, only number, dated May 
3, 1848): "To go out strolling, these days, while puffing one's tobacco, . . . while 
dreaming of evening pleasures, seems to us a century behind the times. We are 
not the sort to refuse all knowledge of the customs of another age; but, in our 
strolling, let us not forget our rights and our obligations as citizens. The times are 
necessitous; they demand all our attention, all day long. Let us be flaneurs, but 
patriotic flaneurs." (J. Montaigu) . An early specimen of that dislocation of word 
and meaning which belongs among the devices of journalism. [Ml7,3] 



Balzac anecdote: "He was with a friend one day when he passed a heggar in rags on 
the boulevard. His companion was astonished to see Balzac touch his own sleeve 
with his hand; he had just felt there the conspicuous rip that gaped at the elbow of 
the mendicant." Anatole Cerfberr and Jules Christophe, Repertoire de la 
Comedie humaine de H. de Balzac (Paris, 1887), p. viii (Introduction by Paul 
Bourget). [Ml7,4] 



Apropos of Flaubert's remark that "observation is guided above all by imagina- 
tion," 57 the visionary faculty of Balzac: "It is important to note, first of all, that this 
visionary power could never be exercised directly. Balzac did not have time to 
live; ... he did not have the leisure ... to study men, after the fashion of Moliere 
and Saint-Simon, through daily, familiar contact. He cut his existence in two, 
writing by night, sleeping by day" (p. x). Balzac speaks of a "retrospective pene- 
tration." "It would seem that he took hold of the givens of experience and then 
tossed them, as it were, into a crucible of dreams." A. Cerfberr and J. Christophe, 
Repertoire de la Comedie humaine de H. de Bahac (Paris, 1887), p. xi (Introduction 
by Paul Bourget) . [Ml7a,l] 



Empathy with the commodity is fundamentally empathy with exchange value 
itself. The flaneur is the virtuoso of this empathy. He takes the concept of market- 
ability itself for a stroll. Just as his final ambit is the department store, his last 
incarnation is the sandwich-man. [Ml7a,2] 



In a brasserie in the vicinity of the Gare Saint-Lazare, des Esseintes feels himself 
to he already in England. [Ml7a,3] 



Regarding the intoxication of empathy felt by the flaneur, a great passage from 
Flaubert may be adduced. It could well date from the period of the composition 
of Madame Bovary: "Today, for instance, as man and woman, both lover and 
mistress, I rode in a forest on an autumn afternoon under the yellow leaves, and 
I was also the horses, the leaves, the wind, the words my people uttered, even the 
red sun that made them almost close their love-drowned eyes." 58 Cited in Henri 
Grappin, "Le Mysticisme poetique <et l'imagination> de Gustave Flaubert," Re- 
vue de Paris (December 15, 1912), p. 856. [M17a,4] 

On the intoxication of empathy felt by the flaneur (and by Baudelaire as well) , 
this passage from Flaubert: "I see myself at different moments of history, very 
clearly. ... I was boatman on the Nile, leno [procurer] in Rome at the time of the 
Punic wars, then Greek rhetorician in Suburra, where I was devoured by bed- 
bugs. I died, during the Crusades, from eating too many grapes on the beach in 
Syria. I was pirate and monk, mountebank and coachman — perhaps Emperor of 
the East, who knows?" 59 Grappin, "Le Mysticisme poetique <et l'imagination> de 
Gustave Flaubert," Revue de Paris (December 15, 1912), p. 624. [M17a,5] 

I 

Hell is a city much like London — 

A populous and a smoky city; 
There are all sorts of people undone, 
And there is little or no fun done; 

Small justice shown, and still less pity. 

II 

There is a Castles, and a Canning, 

A Cobbett, and a Castlereagh; 
All sorts of caitiff corpses planning 
All sorts of cozening for trepanning 

Corpses less corrupt than they. 

Ill 

There is a * * *, who has lost 

His wits, or sold them, none knows which; 
He walks about a douhle ghost, 
And though as thin as Fraud almost — 

Ever grows more grim and rich, 

IV 

There is a Chancery Court; a king; 

A manufacturing mob; a set 
Of thieves who by themselves are sent 
Similar thieves to represent; 

An army; and a public debt. 



Which last is a scheme of paper money, 

And means — being interpreted — 
"Bees, keep your wax — give us the honey, 
And we will plant, while skies arc sunny, 
Flowers, which in winter serve instead." 

VI 

There is a great talk of revolution — 
And a great chance of despotism — 
German soldiers — camps — confusion — 
Tumults — lotteries — rage — delusion — 
Cin — suicide — and methodism; 

VII 

Taxes too, on wine and bread, 

And meat, and heer, and tea, and cheese, 
From which those patriots pure are fed, 
Who gorge before they reel to lied 

The tenfold essence of all these. 



IX 

Lawyers — judges — old hohnobhers 

Are there — bailiffs — chancellors — 
Bishops — great and little robhers — 
Rhymesters — pamphleteers — stock-jobbers — 

Men of glory in the wars, — 

X 

Things whose trade is, over ladies 

To lean, and flirt, and stare, and simper, 
Till all that is divine in woman 
Crows cruel, courteous, smooth, inhuman, 

Crucified 'twixt a smile and a whimper. 

Shelley, "Peter Bell the Third" ("Part the Third: Hell")/"' [M18] 

Illuminating for the conception of the crowd: in "Des Vetters Eckfenster" <My 
Cousin's Corner Window>, the visitor still thinks that the cousin watches the 
activity in the marketplace only because he enjoys the play of colors. And in the 
long run, he thinks, this will surely become tiring. Similarly, and at around the 
same time, Gogol writes, in "The Lost Letter," of the annual fair in Konotop: 
"There were such crowds moving up and down the streets that it made one giddy 
to watch them." Russische Gespenster-Geschichten (Munich <1921>), p. 69. 61 

[M18a,l] 



Tissot, in justifying his proposal to tax luxury horses: "The intolerable noise made 
day and night by twenty thousand private carriages in the streets of Paris, the 
continual shaking of the houses, the inconvenience and insomnia that result for so 
many inhabitants of the city — all this deserves some compensation." Amedee de 
Tissot, Paris et Londres compares (Paris, 1830), pp. 172-173. [Ml8a,2] 

The flanenr and the shopfronts: "First of all, there are the flanenrs of the boule- 
vard, whose entire existence unfolds het ween the Church of the Madeleine and the 
Theatre dn Gymnase. Each day sees them returning to this narrow space, which 
they never pass beyond, examining the displays of goods, surveying the shoppers 
seated hefore the doors of cal'es. . . . They would be able to tell you if Goupil or 
Deforge have put out a new print or a new painting, and if Barbedienne has 
repositioned a vase or an arrangement; they know all the photographers' studios 
by heart and could recite the sequence of signs without omitting a single one." 
Pierre Larousse, Grand Dictionnaire universel (Paris <1872>), vol. 8, p. 436. 

[M18a,3] 

On the provincial character of "Des Vetters Eckfenster." "Since that unfortunate 
period when an insolent and overbearing enemy inundated our country," the 
Berlin populace has acquired smoother manners. "You see, dear cousin, how 
nowadays, by contrast, the market offers a delightful picture of prosperity and 
peaceful manners." E. T. A. Hoffmann, Ausgewdhlte Schriften, vol. 14 (Stuttgart, 



1839), pp. 238, 240. ,i2 [Ml9,l] 

The sandwich-man is the last incarnation of the flaneur [Ml9,2] 

On the provincial character of "Des "Vetters Eckfenster": the cousin wants to 

teach his visitor "the rudiments of the art of seeing." 011 [M19.3] 



On July 7, 1838, G. E. Gnhrauer writes to Varuhagen about Heine: "He was 
having a had time with his eyes in the spring. On our last meeting, I accompanied 
him part of the way along the houlevard. The splendor and vitality of that unique 
street moved me to boundless admiration, while, against this, Heine now laid 
weighty emphasis on the horrors attending this center of the world." Compare also 
Engels on the crowd <M5a,l>. Heinrich Heine, Gespriiche, ed. Hugo Bieher (Ber- 
lin, 1926), p. 163. [M19.4] 

"This city marked hy a vitality, a circulation, an activity without equal is also, hy 
a singular contrast, the place where one finds the most idlers, loungers, and rub- 
bernecks." Pierre Larousse, Grand Dictionnaire universel (Paris <1872>), vol. 8, 
p. 436 (article entitled "Flaneur"). [M19,5] 



Hegel writing from Paris to his wife, September 3, 1827: "As I go through the 
streets, the people look just the same as in Berliu, everyone dressed the same, 



about the same faces, the same appearance, yet in a populous mass." Briefe von 
unci an Hegel, ed. Karl Hegel (Leipzig, 1887), part 2, p. 257 (Werke, vol. 19, part 
2)." [M19,6] 



Londres <London> 

It is an immense place, and so spread out 

That it takes a day to cross it by omnibus. 

And, far and wide, there is nothing to see 

But houses, public buildings, and high monuments, 

Set down haphazardly by the hand of time. 

Long black chimneys, the steeples of industry, 

Open their mouths and exhale Rimes 

From their hot bellies to the open air; 

Vast white domes and Gothic spires 

Float in the vapor above the heaps of bricks. 

An ever swelling, unapproachable river, 

Rolling its muddy currents in sinuous onrush, 

Like that frightful stream of the underworld,'' 5 

And arched over by gigantic bridges on piers 

That mimic the old Colossus of Rhodes, 

Allows thousands of ships to ply their way; 

A great tide polluted and always unsettled 

Recirculates the riches of the world. 

Busy stockyards, open shops are ready 

To receive a universe of goods. 

Above, the sky tormented, cloud upon cloud, 

The sun, like a corpse, wears a shroud on its face, 

Or, sometimes, in the poisonous atmosphere, 

Looks out like a miner coal-blackened. 

There, amid the somber mass of things, 

An obscure people lives and dies in silence — 

Millions of beings in thrall to a fatal instinct, 

Seeking gold by avenues devious and straight. 

To be compared with Baudelaire's review of Barbier, his portrayal of Meryon, the 
poems of "Tableaux parisiens." In Barbier's poetry, two elements — the "descrip- 
tion" of the great city and the social unrest — should be pretty much distin- 
guished. Only traces of these elements still remain with Baudelaire, in whom 
they have been joined to an altogether heterogeneous third element. Auguste 
Barbier, Iambes et poemes (Paris, 1841), pp. 193-194. The poem is from the se- 
quence Laiare of 1837. [Ml9a,l] 



If one compares Baudelaire's discussion of Meryon with Barbier's "Londres," 
one asks oneself whether the gloomy image of the "most disquieting of capi- 
tals" 66 — the image, that is, of Paris — was not very materially determined by the 
texts of Barbier and of Poe. London was certainly ahead of Paris in industrial 
development. [Ml9a,2] 



Beginning of Rousseau's Second Promenade: "Having therefore decided to de- 
scribe my habitual state of mind in this, the strangest situation which any mortal 
will ever know, I could diink of no simpler or surer way of carrying out my plan 
than to keep a faithful record of my solitary walks and the reveries that occupy 
them, when I give free rein to my thoughts and let my ideas follow their natural 
course, unrestricted and unconfmed. These hours of solitude and meditation are 
the only ones in the day when I am completely myself and my own master, with 
nothing to distract or hinder me, the only ones when I can truly say that I am 
what nature meant me to be." Jeanjacques Rousseau, Les Reveries du promeneur 
solitaire; preceded by Dix Jours a Ermenonville, by Jacques de Lacretelle (Paris, 
1926), p. 15. 67 — The passage presents the integral link between contemplation 
and idleness. What is decisive is that Rousseau already — in his idleness — is 
enj oying himself, but has not yet accomplished the turning outward. [M2 0 , 1 ] 

"London Bridge." "A little while ago I was walking across London Bridge and I 
paused to contemplate what is for me an endless pleasure — the sight of a rich, 
thick, complex waterway whose nacreous sheets and oily patches, clouded with 
white smoke-puffs, are loaded with a confusion of ships. ... I leaned upon my 
elbows. . . . Delight of vision held me with a ravenous thirst, involved in the play of 
a light of inexhaustihle richness. But endlessly pacing and flowing at my back I was 
aware of another river, a river of the blind eternally in pursuit of [its] immediate 
material object. This seemed to me no crowd of individual beings, each with his 
own history, his private god, his treasures and his scars, his interior monologue 
and his fate; rather 1 made of it — unconsciously, in the depths of my body, in the 
shaded places of my eyes — a flux of identical particles, equally sucked in by the 
same nameless void, their deaf headlong current pattering monotonously over the 
bridge. Never have I so felt solitude, mingled with pride and anguish." Paul 
Valery, Choses tues <Paris, 1930>, pp. 122-124/'" [M20,2] 

Basic to flanerie, among other things, is the idea that the fruits of idleness are 
more precious than the fruits of labor. The flaneur, as is well known, makes 
"studies." On this subject, the nineteenth-century Larousse has the following to 
say: "His eyes open, his ear ready, searching for something entirely different from 
what the crowd gathers to see. A word dropped by chance will reveal to him one 
of those character traits that caimot be invented and that must be drawn directly 
from life; those physiognomies so naively attentive will furnish the painter with 
the expression he was dreaming of; a noise, insignificant to every other ear, will 
strike that of the musician and give him the cue for a harmonic combination; 
even for the thinker, the philosopher lost in his reverie, this external agitation is 
profitable: it stirs up his ideas as the storm stirs the waves of the sea. . . . Most 
men of genius were great flaneurs — but industrious, productive flaneurs. . . . 
Often it is when the artist and the poet seem least occupied with their work that 
they are most profoundly absorbed in it. In the first years of this century, a man 
was seen walking each and every day — regardless of the weather, be it sunshine 
or snow — around the ramparts of the city of Vienna. This man was Beethoven, 



who, in the midst of his wanderings, would work out his magnificent symphonies 
in his head before putting them down on paper. For him, the world no longer 
existed; in vain would people greet him respectfully as he passed. He saw noth- 
ing; his mind was elsewhere." Pierre Larousse, Grand Dictionnaire universel (Paris 
<1872>), vol. 8, p. 436 (article entitled, "Flaneur"). [M20a,l] 

Beneath the roofs of Paris: "These Parisian savannahs consisting of roofs leveled 
out to form a plain, but covering abysses teeming with population." Balzac, La 
Peau de chagrin, ed. Flammarion, p. 95. 69 The end of a long description of the 
roof -landscapes of Paris. [M20a,2] 

Description of the crowd in Proust: "All these people who paced np and down the 
seawall promenade, tacking as violently as if it had been the deck of a ship (for 
they could not lift a leg without at the same time waving their arms, turning their 
heads and eyes, settling their shoulders, compensating by a balancing movement 
on one side for the movement they had just made on the other, and puffing out 
their faces), and who, pretending not to see so as to let it be thought that they were 
not interested, but covertly watching, for fear of running against the people who 
were walking beside or coming towards them, did, in fact, butt into them, became 
entangled with them, because each was mutually the object of the same secret 
attention veiled beneath the same apparent disdain; their love — and consequently 
their fear — of the crowd being one of the most powerful motives in all men, 
whether they seek to please other people or to astonish them, or to show them that 
they despise them." Marcel Pronst, A I'Ombre des jeunes filles en Jleurs (Paris), 
vol. 3, p. 36.™ [M21.1] 

The critique of the Noiwelles Hutoires extraordinaires which Armand de Pont- 
martin publishes in Le Spectateur of September 19, 1857, contains a sentence that, 
although aimed at the overall character of the book, would nevertheless have its 
rightful place in an analysis of the "man of the crowd": "It was certainly there in 
a striking form, that implacable democratic and American severity, reckoning 
human beings as no more than numbers, only to end by attributing to numbers 
something of the life, animation, and spirit of the human being." But doesn't the 
sentence have a more immediate reference to the Hutoires extraordinaires, which 
appeared earlier? (And where is "the man of the crowd"?) Baudelaire, Oeuvres 
completes, Translations, Nouvelles Hutoires extraordinaires, ed. Crepet (Paris, 1933), 
p. 3 1 5 . — The critique is, a t bottom, mean-spirited. [M2 1,2] 

The "spirit of noctambulism" finds a place in Proust (under a different name) : 
"The capricious spirit that sometimes leads a woman of high rank to say to 
herself 'What fun it will be!' and then to end her evening in a deadly tiresome 
manner, getting up enough energy to go and rouse someone, remain a while by 
the bedside in her evening wrap, and finally, finding nothing to say and noticing 
that it is very late, go home to bed." Marcel Proust, Le lemps retrouve (Paris), vol. 
2, p. 185. 71 [M21a,l] 



The most characteristic building projects of the nineteenth century — railroad 
stations, exhibition halls, department stores (according to Giedion) — all have 
matters of collective importance as their object. The fianeur feels drawn to these 
"despised, everyday" structures, as Giedion calls them. In these constructions, 
the appearance of great masses on the stage of history was already foreseen. 
They form the eccentric frame within which the last privateers so readily dis- 
played themselves. (See Kla,5.) [M21a,2] 



[On the Theory of Knowledge, Theory of Progress] 

Times are more interesting than people. 

— Honore de Balzac, Critique litteraire, Introduction by Louis Lumet 
(Paris, 1912), p. 103 [Guy de la Poimeraye, Huloire de I'Amiral 
Cdigny] 

The reform of consciousness consists solely in ... the awaken- 
ing of the world from its dream about itself. 

— Karl Marx, Der Instorische Materialisms: Die Friihschriflen (Leipzig 
<1932>), vol. 1, p. 226 (letter from Marx to Ruge; Kreuzenach, Sep- 
tember 1843)' 



In the fields with which we are concerned, knowledge comes only in lightning 
flashes. The text is the long roll of thunder that follows. [Nl,l] 

Comparison of other people's attempts to the undertaking of a sea voyage in 
which the ships are drawn off course by the magnetic North Pole. Discover this 
North Pole. What for others are deviations are, for me, the data which determine 
my course. — On the differentials of time (which, for others, disturb the main 
lines of the inquiry), I base my reckoning. [Nl,2] 

Say something about the method of composition itself: how everything one is 
thinking at a specific moment in time must at all costs be incorporated into the 
project then at hand. Assume that the intensity of the project is thereby attested, 
or that one's thoughts, from the very beginning, bear this project within them as 
their telos. So it is with the present portion of the work, which aims to charac- 
terize and to preserve the intervals of reflection, the distances lying between the 
most essential parts of this work, which are turned most intensively to the out- 
side. [Nl,3] 

To cultivate fields where, until now, only madness has reigned. Forge ahead with 
the whetted axe of reason, looking neither right nor left so as not to succumb to 
the horror that beckons from deep in the primeval forest. Every ground must at 
some point have been made arable by reason, must have been cleared of the 



■ ■ 

-■ . ........ ...... ■ ■ .. ... 

V -; - : -: ; ' 

v.- - ~ - ■ - - >:- 

■■ 5 ■ ■ '" "' ^ i ' V.:' ' , 
,. ■ . . ■ ■ ■ 




■ : 




rgiM^-rrin-i - - 



* • , ■ .■■-.■:* -. " f ■'" 
, i - „ f- 



A page of Benjamin's manuscript, showing the beginning of 
Convolute N. 



undergrowth of delusion and myth. This is to be accomplished here for the 
terrain of the nineteenth century. [Nl,4] 

These notes devoted to the Paris arcades were begun under an open sky of 
cloudless blue that arched above the foliage; and yet — owing to the millions of 
leaves that were visited by the fresh breeze of diligence, the stertorous breath of 
the researcher, the storm of youthful zeal, and the idle wind of curiosity — they've 
been covered with the dust of centuries. For the painted sky of summer that looks 



down from the arcades in the reading room of the Bibliotheque Nationale in Paris 
has spread out over them its dreamy, unlit ceiling. [Nl,5] 



The pathos of this work: there are no periods of decline. Attempt to see the 
nineteenth century just as positively as I tried to see the seventeenth, in the work 
on Trauer spiel. No belief in periods of decline. By the same token, every city is 
beautiful to me (from outside its borders), just as all talk of particular languages' 
having greater or lesser value is to me unacceptable. [Nl,6] 

And, later, the glassed-in spot facing my seat at the Staatsbibliothek. Charmed 
circle inviolate, virgin terrain for the soles of figures I conjured. [Nl,7] 

Pedagogic side of this undertaking: "To educate the image-making medium 
within us, raising it to a stereoscopic and dimensional seeing into the depths of 
historical shadows." The words are Rudolf Borchardt's in Epilegomena zu Dante, 
vol. 1 (Berlin, 1923), pp. 56-57. [Nl,8] 

Delimitation of the tendency of this project with respect to Aragon: whereas 
Aragon persists within the realm of dream, here the concern is to find the constel- 
lation of awakening. While in Aragon there remains an impressionistic element, 
namely the "mythology" (and this impressionism must be held responsible for 
the many vague philosophemes in his book), 2 here it is a question of the dissolu- 
tion of "mythology" into the space of history. That, of course, can happen only 
through the awakening of a not-yet-conscious knowledge of what has been. 

[N1.9] 

This work has to develop to the highest degree the art of citing without quotation 
marks. Its theory is intimately related to that of montage. [Nl.10] 

"Apart from a certain haut-gout charm," says Giedion, "the artistic draperies and 
wall-hangings of the previous century have come to seem musty." <Sigfried> 
Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig and Berlin <1928>), p. 3. We, however, 
believe that the charm they exercise on us is proof that these things, too, contain 
material of vital importance for us — not indeed for our building practice, as is the 
case with the constructive possibilities inherent in iron frameworks, but rather for 
our understanding, for the radioscopy, if you will, of the situation of the bour- 
geois class at the moment it evinces the first signs of decline. In any case, material 
of vital importance politically; this is demonstrated by the attachment of the 
Surrealists to these things, as much as by their exploitation in contemporary 
fashion. In other words: just as Giedion teaches us to read off the basic features of 
today's architecture in the buildings erected around 1850, we, in turn, would 
recognize today's life, today's forms, in the life and in the apparently secondary, 
lost forms of that epoch. [ N 1 , 1 1 ] 



"In the windswept stairways of the Eiffel Tower, or, better still, in the steel sup- 
ports of a Pont Transbordeur, one meets with the fundamental aesthetic experi- 
ence of present-day architecture: through the thin net of iron that hangs 
suspended in the air, things stream — ships, ocean, houses, masts, landscape, 
harbor. They lose their distinctive shape, swirl into one another as we climb 
downward, merge simultaneously." Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig 
and Berlin) , p. 7. In the same way, the historian today has only to erect a slender 
but sturdy scaffolding — a philosophic structure — in order to draw the most vital 
aspects of the past into his net. But just as the magnificent vistas of the city 
provided by the new construction in iron (again, see Giedion, illustrations on 
pp. 61-63) for a long time were reserved exclusively for the workers and engi- 
neers, so too the philosopher who wishes here to garner fresh perspectives must 
be someone immune to vertigo — an independent and, if need be, solitary worker. 

[Nla,l] 

The book on the Baroque exposed the seventeenth century to the light of the 
present day. Here, something analogous must be done for the nineteenth century, 
but with greater distinctness. [Nla,2] 

Modest methodological proposal for the cultural-historical dialectic. It is very 
easy to establish oppositions, according to determinate points of view, within the 
various "fields" of any epoch, such that on one side lies the "productive," "for- 
ward-looking," "lively," "positive" part of the epoch, and on the other side the 
abortive, retrograde, and obsolescent. The very contours of the positive element 
will appear distinctly only insofar as this element is set off against the negative. 
On the other hand, every negation has its value solely as background for the 
delineation of the lively, the positive. It is therefore of decisive importance that a 
new partition be applied to this initially excluded, negative component so that, by 
a displacement of the angle of vision (but not of the criteria!), a positive element 
emerges anew in it too — something different from that previously signified. And 
so on, ad infinitum, until the entire past is brought into the present in a historical 
apocatastasis. 3 [Nla,3] 

The foregoing, put differently: the indestructibility of the highest life in all things. 
Against the prognosticators of decline. Consider, though: Isn't it an affront to 
Goethe to make a film of Faust, and isn't there a world of difference between the 
poem Faust and the film Faust? lies, certainly. But, again, isn't there a whole world 
of difference between a bad film of Faust and a good one? What matter are never 
the "great" but only the dialectical contrasts, which often seem indistinguishable 
from nuances. It is nonetheless from them that life is always born anew. 

[Nla,4] 



To encompass both Breton and Le Cor busier — that would mean drawing the 
spirit of contemporary France like a bow, with which knowledge shoots the 
moment in the heart. [Nla,5] 



Marx lays bare the causal connection between economy and culture. For us, what 
matters is the thread of expression. It is not the economic origins of culture that 
will be presented, but the expression of the economy in its culture. At issue, in 
other words, is the attempt to grasp an economic process as perceptible Ur- 
phenomenon, from out of which proceed all manifestations of life in the arcades 
(and, accordingly, in the nineteenth century). [Nla,6] 

This research — which deals fundamentally with the expressive character of the 
earliest industrial products, the earliest industrial architecture, the earliest ma- 
chines, but also the earliest department stores, advertisements, and so on — thus 
becomes important for Marxism in two ways. First, it will demonstrate how the 
milieu in which Marx's doctrine arose affected that doctrine through its expres- 
sive character (which is to say, not only through causal connections) ; but, second, 
it will also show in what respects Marxism, too, shares the expressive character of 
the material products contemporary with it. [Nla,7] 

Method of this project: literary montage. I needn't say anything. Merely show. I 
shall purloin no valuables, appropriate no ingenious formulations. But the rags, 
the refuse — these I will not inventory but allow, in the only way possible, to come 
into their own: by making use of them. [Nla,8] 

Bear in mind that commentary on a reality (for it is a question here of commen- 
tary, of interpretation in detail) calls for a method completely different from that 
required by commentary on a text. In the one case, the scientific mainstay is 
theology; in the other case, philology. [N2 , 1 ] 

It may be considered one of the methodological objectives of this work to demon- 
strate a historical materialism which has annihilated within itself the idea of 
progress. Just here, historical materialism has every reason to distinguish itself 
sharply from bourgeois habits of thought. Its founding concept is not progress 
but actualization. [N2,2] 

Historical "understanding" is to be grasped, in principle, as an afterlife of that 
which is understood; and what has been recognized in the analysis of the "after- 
life of works," in the analysis of "fame," is therefore to be considered the founda- 
tion of history in general. [N2,3] 

How this work was written: rung by rung, according as chance would offer a 
narrow foothold, and always like someone who scales dangerous heights and 
never allows himself a moment to look around, for fear of becoming dizzy (but 
also because he would save for the end the full force of the panorama opening 
out to him). [N2,4] 



Overcoming the concept of "progress" and overcoming the concept of "period of 
decline" are two sides of one and the same thing. [N2,5] 



A central problem of historical materialism that ought to be seen in the end; Must 
the Marxist understanding of history necessarily be acquired at the expense of 
the perceptibility of history? Or: in what way is it possible to conjoin a height- 
ened graphicness <Anschaulichkeit> to the realization of the Marxist method? The 
first stage in this undertaking will be to carry over the principle of montage into 
history. That is, to assemble large-scale constructions out of the smallest and 
most precisely cut components. Indeed, to discover in the analysis of the small 
individual moment the crystal of the total event. And, therefore, to break with 
vulgar historical naturalism. To grasp the construction of history as such. In the 
structure of commentary. D Refuse of History D [N2,6] 

A Kierkegaard citation in Wiesengrund, with commentary following: "'One may 
arrive at a similar consideration of the mythical by beginning with the imagistic. 
When, in an age of reflection, one sees the imagistic protrude ever so slightly and 
unobserved in a reflective representation and, like an antediluvian fossil, suggest 
another species of existence which washed away doubt, one will perhaps be 
amazed that the image could ever have played such an important role.' 
Kierkegaard wards off the 'amazement' with what follows. Yet this amazement 
heralds the deepest insight into the interrelation of dialectic, myth, and image. For 
it is not as the continuously living and present that nature prevails in the dialectic. 
Dialectic comes to a stop in the image, and, in the context of recent history, it cites 
the mythical as what is long gone: nature as primal history. For this reason, the 
images — which, like those of the interieur, bring dialectic and myth to the point of 
indifferentiation — are truly 'antediluvian fossils.' They may be called dialectical 
images, to use Benjamin's expression, whose compelling definition of 'allegory' 
also holds true for Kierkegaard's allegorical intention taken as a figure of histori- 
cal dialectic and mythical nature. According to this definition, 'in allegory the 
observer is confronted with the fmcies liippocratica of history, a petrified primor- 
dial landscape. '" Theodor Wiesengrund- Adorno, Kierkegaard (Tiihingen, 1933), 
p. 60.'' □ Refuse of History D [N2,7] 

Only a thoughtless observer can deny that correspondences come into play 
between the world of modem technology and the archaic symbol-world of my- 
thology. Of course, initially the technologically new seems nothing more than 
that. But in the very next childhood memory, its traits are already altered. Every 
childhood achieves something great and irreplaceable for humanity. By the inter- 
est it takes in technological phenomena, by the curiosity it displays before any 
sort of invention or machinery, every childhood binds the accomplishments of 
technology to the old worlds of symbol. There is nothing in the realm of nature 
that from the outset would be exempt from such a bond. Only, it takes form not 
in the aura of novelty but in the aura of the habitual. In memory, childhood, and 
dream. D Awakening D [N2a, 1 ] 

The momentum of primal history in the past is no longer masked, as it used to 
be, by the tradition of church and family — this at once the consequence and 



condition of technology. The old prehistoric dread already envelops the world of 
our parents because we ourselves are no longer bound to this world by tradition. 
The perceptual worlds <Merkwelten> break up more rapidly; what they contain of 
the mythic comes more quickly and more brutally to the fore; and a wholly 
different perceptual world must be speedily set up to oppose it. This is how the 
accelerated tempo of technology appears in light of the primal history of the 
present. D Awakening D [N2a,2] 

It's not that what is past casts its light on what is present, or what is present its 
light on what is past; rather, image is that wherein what has been comes together 
in a flash with the now to form a constellation. In other words, image is dialectics 
at a standstill. For while the relation of the present to the past is a purely tempo- 
ral, continuous one, the relation of what-has-been to the now is dialectical: is not 
progression but image, suddenly emergent. — Only dialectical images are genuine 
images (that is, not archaic); and the place where one encounters them is lan- 
guage. D Awakening □ [N2a,3] 

In studying Simmel's presentation of Goethe's concept of truth, 5 1 came to see 
very clearly that my concept of origin in the Irauer spiel book is a rigorous and 
decisive transposition of this basic Goethean concept from the domain of nature 
to that of history. Origin — it is, in effect, the concept of f/r-phenomenon ex- 
tracted from the pagan context of nature and brought into the Jewish contexts of 
history. Now, in my work on the arcades I am equally concerned with fathoming 
an origin. To be specific, I pursue the origin of the forms and mutations of the 
Paris arcades from their beginning to their decline, and I locate this origin in the 
economic facts. Seen from the standpoint of causality, however (and that means 
considered as causes), these facts would not be primal phenomena; they become 
such only insof ar as in their own individual development — "unfolding" might be 
a better term — they give rise to the whole series of the arcade's concrete histori- 
cal forms, just as the leaf unfolds from itself all the riches of the empirical world 
of plants. [N2a,4] 

"As I study this age which is so close to us and so remote, I compare myself to a 
surgeon operating with local anesthetic: I work in areas that are numh, dead — yet 
the patient is alive and can still talk." Paul Morand, 1900 (Paris, 1931), pp. 6-7. 

[N2a,5] 

What distinguishes images from the "essences" of phenomenology is their his- 
torical index. (Heidegger seeks in vain to rescue history for phenomenology 
abstractly through "historicity.") 1 ' These images are to be thought of entirely 
apart from the categories of the "human sciences," from so-called habitus, from 
style, and the like. For the historical index of the images not only says that they 
belong to a particular time; it says, above all, that they attain to legibility only at 
a particular time. And, indeed, this acceding "to legibility" constitutes a specific 
critical point in the movement at their interior. Every present day is determined 



by the images that are synchronic with it: each "now" is the now of a particular 
recognizability. In it, truth is charged to the bursting point with time. (This point 
of explosion, and nothing else, is the death of the intentio, which thus coincides 
with the birth of authentic historical time, the time of truth.) It is not that what is 
past casts its light on what is present, or what is present its light on what is past; 
rather, image is that wherein what has been comes together in a flash with the 
now to form a constellation. In other words: image is dialectics at a standstill. For 
while the relation of the present to the past is purely temporal, the relation of 
what-has-been to the now is dialectical: not temporal in nature but figural 
<bildlich>. Only dialectical images are genuinely historical — that is, not archaic — 
images. The image that is read — which is to say, the image in the now of its 
recognizability — bears to the highest degree the imprint of the perilous critical 
moment on which all reading is founded. [N3, 1 ] 

Resolute refusal of the concept of "timeless truth" is in order. Nevertheless, truth 
is not — as Marxism would have it — a merely contingent function of knowing, 
but is bound to a nucleus of time lying hidden within the knower and the known 
alike. This is so true that the eternal, in any case, is far more the ruffle on a dress 
than some idea. [N3,2] 

Outline the story of The Arcades Project in terms of its development. Its properly 
problematic component: the refusal to renounce anything that would demon- 
strate the materialist presentation of history as imagistic <bildh*ft> in a higher 
sense than in the traditional presentation. [N3,3] 

A remark by Ernst Bloch apropos of The Arcades Project: "History displays its 
Scotland Yard badge." It was in the context of a conversation in which I was 
describing how this work — comparable, in method, to the process of splitting the 
atom — liberates the enormous energies of history that are bound up in the "once 
upon a time" of classical historiography. The history that showed things "as they 
really were" was the strongest narcotic of the century. [N3,4] 

"The truth will not escape us," reads one of Keller's epigrams. 7 He thus formu- 
lates the concept of tiuth with which these presentations take issue. [N3a,l] 

"Primal history of the nineteenth century" — this would b e of no interest if it were 
understood to mean that forms of primal history are to be recovered among the 
inventory of the nineteenth century. Only where the nineteenth century would 
be presented as originary form of primal history — in a form, that is to say, in 
which the whole of primal history groups itself anew in images appropriate to 
that century — only there does the concept of a primal history of the nineteenth 
century have meaning. [N3a,2] 



Is awakening perhaps the synthesis of dream consciousness (as thesis) and wak- 
ing consciousness (as antithesis)? Then the moment of awakening would be 



identical with the "now of recognizability," in which things put on their true — 
surrealist — face. Thus, in Proust, the importance of staking an entire life on life's 
supremely dialectical point of rupture: awakening. Proust begins with an evoca- 
tion of the space of someone waking up. [N3a,3] 

"If I insist on this mechanism of contradiction in the biography of a writer . . . , it 
is because his train of thought cannot bypass certain facts which have a logic 
different from that of his thought by itself. It is because there is no idea he adheres 
to that truly holds up ... in the face of certain very simple, elemental facts : that 
workers are staring down the barrels of cannons aimed at them by police, that 
war is threatening, and that fascism is already enthroned. ... It behooves a man, 
for the sake of his dignity, to submit his ideas to these facts, and not to bend these 
facts, by some conjuring trick, to his ideas, however ingenious." Aragon, "D' Al- 
fred de Vigny a Avdeenko," Commune, 2 (April 20, 1935), pp. 808-809. But it is 
entirely possible that, in contradicting my past, I will establish a continuity with 
that of another, which he in turn, as communist, will contradict. In this case, with 
the past of Louis Aragon, who in this same essay disavows his Paysan de Paris: 
"And, like most of my friends, I was partial to the failures, to what is monstrous 
and cannot survive, cannot succeed. ... I was like them: I preferred error to its 
opposite" (p. 807). [N3a,4] 

In the dialectical image, what has been within a particular epoch is always, 
simultaneously, "what has been from time immemorial." As such, however, it is 
manifest, on each occasion, only to a quite specific epoch — namely, the one in 
which humanity, rubbing its eyes, recognizes just this particular dream image as 
such. It is at this moment that the historian takes up, with regard to that image, 
the task of dream interpretation. [N4,l] 

The expression "the book of nature" indicates that one can read the real like a 
text. And that is how the reality of the nineteenth century will be treated here. We 
open the book of what happened. [N4,2] 

Just as Proust begins the story of his life with an awakening, so must every 
presentation of history begin with awakening; in fact, it should treat of nothing 
else. This one, accordingly, deals with awakening from the nineteenth century. 

[N4,3] 

The realization of dream elements in the course of waking up is the canon of 
dialectics. It is paradigmatic for the thinker and binding for thehistorian. [N4,4] 

Raphael seeks to correct the Marxist conception of the normative character of 
Greek art: "If the normative character of Greek art is ... an explicable fact of 
history, ... we will have ... to determine . . . what special conditions led to each 
renascence and, in consequence, what special factors of . . . Greek art these 



renascences adopted as models. For the totality of Greek art never possessed a 
normative character; the renascences . . . have their own proper history. . . . Only 
a historical analysis can indicate the era in which the abstract notion of a 'norm' 
... of antiquity was born. . . . This notion was created solely by the Renais- 
sance — that is, by primitive capitalism — and subsequently taken up by classicism, 
which . . . commenced to assign it its place in a historical sequence. Marx has not 
advanced along this way in the full measure of the possibilities of historical 
materialism." Max Raphael, Proudhon, Marx, Picasso (Pans <1933>), pp. 178-179. 

[N4,5] 

It is the peculiarity of technological forms of production (as opposed to art forms) 
that their progress and their success are proportionate to the transparency of their 
social content. (Hence glass architecture.) [N4,6] 

An important passage in Marx: "It is recognized that where ... the epic, for 
example, ... is concerned, . . . certain significant creations within the compass of 
art are possible only at an early stage of artistic development. If this is the case 
with regard to different branches of art within the sphere of the arts, it is not so 
remarkable that this should also be die case with regard to the whole artistic 
realm and its relation to the general development of the society." Cited without 
references (perhaps Theorien des Mehrwerts, vol. 1 ?)" in Max Raphael, Proudhon, 
Marx, Picasso (Paris <1933>), p. 160. [N4 a ,l] 

The Marxian theory of art: one moment swaggering, and the next scholastic. 

[N4 a ,2] 

Proposal for a gradation of the superstructure, in A. Astnraro, II materialismo 
storico e la sociologia generate (Genoa, 1904) (reviewed by Erwin Szabo in Die 
neue Zeit, 23, no. 1 [Stuttgart], p. 62): "Economy. Family and kinship. Law. War. 
Politics. Morality. Religion. Art. Science." [N4 a ,3] 

Strange remark by Engels concerning the "social forces": "But when once their 
nature is understood, they can, in the hands of the producers working together, 
be transformed from master demons into willing servants." (!) Engels, Die 
Entwicklung des Soiialumus von der Utopie zur Wissenschaft (1882). lJ [N4 a ,4] 

Marx, in the afterword to the second edition of Das Kapital: "Research has to 
appropriate the material in detail, to analyze its various forms of development, to 
trace out their inner connection. Only after this work is done can the actual 
movement be presented in correspondingfashion. If this is done successfully, if the 
life of the material is reflected back as ideal, then it may appear as if we had before 
us an a priori construction." Karl Marx, Das Kapital, vol 1, ed. Korsch (Berlin 
<1932>), p. 45. 10 [N4 a ,5] 



The particular difficulty of doing historical research on the period following 
the close of the eighteenth century will be displayed. With the rise of the mass- 
circulation press, the sources become innumerable. [N4a,6] 



Michelet is perfectly willing to let the people he known as "barharians." "'Bar- 
barians.' I like the word, and I accept the term." And he says of their writers: 
"Their love is boundless and sometimes too great, for they may devote themselves 
to details with the delightful awkwardness of Albrecht Diirer, or with the excessive 
polish of Jean- Jacques Rousseau, who does not conceal his art enough; and by this 
minute detail they compromise the whole. We must not blame them too much. It is 
. . . the luxuriance of their sap and vigor. . . . This sap wants to give everything at 
once — leaves, fruit, and flowers; it bends and twists the branches. These defects of 
many great workers are often found in my books, which lack their good qualities. 
No matter!" J. Michelet, Le Peuple (Paris, 1846), pp. xxxvi-xxxvii." [N5,l] 

Letter from Wiesengrund of August 5, 1935: "The attempt to reconcile your 
'dream' momentum — as the subjective element in the dialectical image — with the 
conception of the latter as model has led me to some formulations . . . : With the 
■vitiation of their use value, the alienated things are hollowed out and, as ciphers, 
they draw in meanings. Subjectivity takes possession of them insofar as it invests 
them with intentions of desire and fear. And insofar as defunct things stand in as 
images of subjective intentions, these latter present themselves as immemorial 
and eternal. Dialectical images are constellated between alienated things and 
incoming and disappearing meaning, are instantiated in the moment of indiffer- 
ence between death and meaning. While things in appearance are awakened to 
what is newest, death transforms the meanings to what is most ancient." With 
regard to these reflections, it should be kept in mind that, in the nineteenth 
century, the number of "hollowed-out" things increases at a rate and on a scale 
that was previously unknown, for technical progress is continually withdrawing 
newly introduced objects from circulation. [N5,2] 

"The critic can start from any form of theoretical or practical consciousness, and 
develop out of the actual forms of existing reality the true reality as what it ought 
to be, that which is its aim." Karl Marx, Der hutoruche Materialumus: Die Friih- 
schriften, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig <1932>), vol. 1, p. 225 (letter from 
Marx to Ruge; Kreuzenach, September 1843). 12 The point of departure invoked 
here by Marx need not necessarily connect with the latest stage of development. 
It can be undertaken with regard to long-vanished epochs whose "ought to be" 
and whose aim is then to be presented — not in reference to the next stage of 
development, but in its own right and as preformation of the final goal of history. 

[N5,3] 

Engels says (Marx und Engels iiber Feuerbach: Aus dem Nachlass, Marx-Engels 
Archiv, ed. Rjazanov, vol. 1 [Frankfurt am Main <1928>], p. 300): "It must not be 
forgotten that law has just as little an independent history as religion." 13 What 



holds for law and religion holds for culture even more. It would be absurd for us 
to conceive of the classless society, its forms of existence, in the image of cultural 
humanity. [N5,4] 

"Our election cry must be: Reform of consciousness not through dogmas, but 
through the analysis of mystical consciousness that is unclear to itself, whether it 
appears in a religious or a political form. Then people will see that the world has 
long possessed the dream of a thing — and that it only needs to possess the con- 
sciousness of this thing in order really to possess it." Karl Marx, Der historische 
Muteriatismus: Die Friihschriften, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig <1932>), vol. 
1, pp. 226-227 (letter from Marx to Ruge; Kreuzenach, September 1843). 14 

[N5a,l] 

A reconciled humanity will take leave of its past — and one form of reconciliation 
is gaiety. "The present German regime . . . , the nullity of the ancien regime 
exhibited for all the world to see, ... is only the comedian of a world order whose 
real heroes are dead. History is thorough, and passes through many stages when 
she carries a worn-out form to burial. The last stage of a world-historical form is 
its comedy. The gods of Greece, who had already been mortally wounded in the 
Prometheus Bound of Aeschylus, had to die yet again — this time a comic death — in 
the dialogues of Lucian. Why does history follow this course? So that mankind 
may take leave of its past gaily." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus: Die 
Friihschriften, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig), vol. 1, pp. 268 ("Zur Kritik der 
Hegelschen Rechtsphilosophie").^' Surrealism is the death of the nineteenth century 
in comedy. [N5a,2] 

Marx (Marx unci Engels iiber Feuerbach: Aus demNachlass, Marx-Engels Archiv, 
vol. 1 [Frankfurt am Main <1928>], p. 3#1): "There is no history of politics, law, 
science, etc. , of art, religion, etc." 16 [N5a,3] 

Die heilige Familie, on the subject of Bacon's materialism: "Matter, surrounded 
by a sensuous poetic glamor, seems to attract man's whole entity with winning 
smiles." 17 [N5a,4] 

"1 regret having treated in only a very incomplete manner those facts of daily 
existence — food, clothing, shelter, family routines, civil law, recreation, social 
relations — which have always been of prime concern in the life of the great major- 
ity of individuals." Charles Seignohos, Histoire sincere de la nation francaise 
(Paris, 1933), p. xi. [N5a,5] 

Ad notam a formula of Valery's : "What distinguishes a truly general phenome- 
non is its fertility"" [N5a,6] 



Barbarism lurks in the very concept of culture — as the concept of a fund of values 
which is considered independent not, indeed, of the production process in which 



these values originated, but of the one in which they survive. In this way they 
serve the apotheosis of the latter <word uncertain>, barbaric as it may be. 

[N5a,7] 

To determine how the concept of culture arose, what meaning it has had in 
different periods, and what needs its institution corresponded to. It could, insofar 
as it signifies the sum of "cultural riches," turn out to be of recent origin; certainly 
it is not yet found, for example, in the cleric of the early Middle Ages who waged 
his war of annihilation against the teachings of antiquity. [N6,l] 

Michelet — an author who, wherever he is quoted, makes the reader forget the 
book in which the quotation appears. [N6,2] 

To be underlined: the painstaking delineation of the scene in the first writings on 
social problems and charity, like Naville, De la Charite legale; Fregier, Des Classes 
dangereuses; and various others. [N6,3] 

"I cannot insist too strongly on the fact that, for an enlightened materialist like 
Lafargue, economic determinism is not the 'absolutely perfect instrument' which 
'can provide the key to all the problems of history.'" Andre Breton, Position 
politique du surrealisme (Paris <1935>), pp. 8-9. [N6,4] 

All historical knowledge can be represented in the image of balanced scales, one 
tray of which is weighted with what has been and the other widi knowledge of 
what is present. Whereas on the first the facts assembled can never be too 
humble or too numerous, on the second there can be only a few heavy, massive 
weights. [N6,5] 

"The only attitude worthy of philosophy ... in the industrial era is . . . restraint. 
The 'scientificity' of a Marx does not mean that philosophy renounces its task . . . ; 
rather, it indicates that philosophy holds itself in reserve until the predominance 
of an unworthy reality is broken." Hugo Fischer, Km.rl Mmrx und sein Verhdltnis 
zu Staat und Wirtschaft (Jena, 1932), p. 59. [N6,6] 

It is not without significance that Engels, in the context of die materialist concep- 
tion of history, lays emphasis on classicality. For the demonstration of the dialec- 
tic of development, he refers to laws "which the actual historical process itself 
provides, insofar as every momentum can be considered to be at the point of its 
full ripening, its classicality." Cited in Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 2, 
Engels und der Aufstieg der Arbeiterbewegung in Europa (Berlin <1933>), pp. 434- 
435. [N6,7] 



Engels in a letter to Mehring, July 14, 1893: "It is above all this semblance of an 
independent history of state constitutions, of systems of law, of ideological concep- 
tions in every separate domain, that dazzles most people. If Luther and Calvin 



'overcome' the official Catholic religion, or Hegel 'overcomes' Fichte and Kant, or 
Rousseau with his republican Contrat social indirectly 'overcomes' the constitu- 
tional Montesquieu, this is a process which remains within theology, philosophy, 
or political science, represents a stage in the history of these particular spheres of 
thought and never passes heyond the sphere of thought. And since the hourgeois 
illusion of the eternity and finality of capitalist production has been added to this, 
even the overcoming of the mercantilists by the physiocrats and Adam Smith is 
regarded as a sheer victory of thought; not as the reflection in thought of changed 
economic facts, but as the finally achieved correct understanding of actual condi- 
tions subsisting always and everywhere." 19 Cited in Gustav Mayer, Friedrich 
Engels, vol. 2, Engels und der Aufstieg der Arbeiterbeivegung in Europa (Berlin), 
pp. 450-451. [N6a,l] 



"What Schlosser could say in response to these reproaches [of peevish moral 
rigor], and what he ivould say, is this: that history and life in general, unlike 
novels and stories, do not teach a lesson of superficial joie de vivre, even to the 
happily constituted spirit and senses; that the contemplation of history is more 
likely to inspire, if not contempt for humanity, then a somher vision of the world 
and strict principles for living; that, at least on the very greatest judges of the 
world and humankind, on men who knew how to measure outward affairs by their 
own inner life, on a Shakespeare, Dante, or Machiavelli, the way of the world 
always made the sort of impression that conduces to seriousness and severity." 
G. G. Gervinus, Friedrich Christoph Schlosser (Leipzig, 1861), in Deutsche Denk- 
reden, ed. Rudolf Borchardt (Munich, 1925), p. 312. [N6a,2] 

The relation of tradition to the technology of reproduction deserves to he stud- 
ied. "Traditions . . . relate to written communications, in general, as reproduction 
of the latter by pen relates to reproduction by the press, as successive copies of a 
book relate to its simultaneous printings." Carl Gustav Jochmarm, Ueber die 
Sprache (Heidelberg, 1828), pp. 259-260 ("Die Riickschritte der Poesie"). 20 

[N6a,3] 

Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne" {Nouvelle Revue frangaue, 25, no. 284 
[May 1, 1937], p. 699), gives a list of the investigations that one would have to 
undertake in order to illuminate the subject further. (1) Descriptions of Paris that 
antedate the nineteenth century (Marivaux, Restif de La Bretonne); (2) the strug- 
gle between Girondists and Jacobins over the relation of Paris to the provinces; 
the legend of the days of revolution in Paris; (3) secret police under the Empire 
and the Restoration; (4) peinture morale of Paris in Hugo, Balzac, Baudelaire; (5) 
objective descriptions of the city: Dulaure, Du Camp; (6) Vigny, Hugo (Paris 
aflame in L'Annee terrible), Rimbaud. [N7,l] 

Still to be established is the connection between presence of mind and the 
"method" of dialectical materialism. It's not just that one will always be able to 
detect a dialectical process in presence of mind, regarded as one of the highest 



forms of appropriate behavior. What is even more decisive is that the dialectician 
cannot look, on history as anything other than a constellation of dangers which 
he is always, as he follows its development in his thought, on the point of 
averting. [N7,2] 

"Revolution is a drama perhaps more than a history, and its pathos is a condition 
as imperious as its authenticity." Blanqui, cited in Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 
1926), vol. 1, p. 232. [N7,3] 

Necessity of paying heed over many years to every casual citation, every fleeting 
mention of a book. [N7,4] 

To contrast the theory of history with the observation by Grillparzer which 
Edmondjaloux translates in 'Joumaux intimes" (Le Temps, May 23, 1937): "To 
read into the future is difficult, but to see purely into the past is more difficult still. 
I say purely, that is, without involving in this retrospective glance anything that 
has taken place in the meantime." The "purity" of the gaze is not just difficult but 
impossible to attain. [N7,5] 

It is important for the materialist historian, in the most rigorous way possible, to 
differentiate the construction of a historical state of affairs from what one custom- 
arily calls its "reconstruction." The "reconstruction" in empathy is one-dimen- 
sional. "Construction" presupposes "destruction." [N7,6] 

In order for a part of the past to be touched by the present instant <Aktualitdt>, 
there must be no continuity between them. [N7,7] 

The fore- and after-history of a historical phenomenon show up in the phenome- 
non itself on the strength of its dialectical presentation. What is more: every 
dialectically presented historical circumstance polarizes itself and becomes a force 
field in which the confrontation between its fore-history and after-history is 
played out. It hecomes such a field insofar as the present instant interpenetrates it. 
<See N7a, 8.> And thus the historical evidence polarizes into fore- and after-his- 
tory always anew, never in the same way. And it does so at a distance from its 
own existence, in the present instant itself — like a line which, divided according 
to the Apollonian section, 21 experiences its partition from outside itself. [N7 a ,l] 

Historical materialism aspires to neither a homogeneous nor a continuous expo- 
sition of history. From the fact that the superstructure reacts upon the base, it 
follows that a homogeneous history, say, of economics exists as little as a homoge- 
neous history of literature or of jurisprudence. On the other hand, since the 
different epochs of the past are not all touched in the same degree by the present 
day of the historian (and often the recent past is not touched at all; the present 
fails to "do it justice"), continuity in the presentation of history is unattainable. 

[N7a,2] 



Telescoping of the past through the present. 



[N7a,3] 



The reception of great, much admired works of art is an ad plures ire.- 2 lN7a,4] 

The materialist presentation of history leads the past to bring the present into a 
critical state. lN7a,5] 

It is my intention to withstand what "Valery calls "a reading slowed by and 
bristling with the resistances of a refined and fastidious reader." Charles Baude- 
laire, Les Flews du mal, Introduction by Paul "Valery (Paris, 1928), p. xiii. 23 

[N7a,6] 

My drinking is related to theology as blotting pad is related to ink. It is saturated 
with it. Were one to go by the blotter, however, nothing of what is written would 
remain. [N7a,7] 

It is the present that polarizes the event into fore- and after-history. [N7a,8] 

On the question of the incompleteness of history, Horkheimer's letter of March 
16, 1937: "The determination of incompleteness is idealistic if completeness is 
not comprised within it. Past injustice has occurred and is completed. The slain 
are really slain. ... If one takes the lack of closure entirely seriously, one must 
believe in the Last Judgment. . . . Perhaps, with regard to incompleteness, there is 
a difference between the positive and the negative, so that only the injustice, the 
horror, the sufferings of the past are irreparable. The justice practiced, the joys, 
the works, have a different relation to time, for their positive character is largely 
negated by the transience of things. This holds first and foremost for individual 
existence, in which it is not the happiness but the unhappiness that is sealed by 
death." The corrective to this line of thinking may be found in the consideration 
that history is not simply a science but also and not least a form of remembrance 
<Eingedenken>. What science has "determined," remembrance can modify. Such 
mindfulness can make the incomplete (happiness) into something complete, and 
the complete (suffering) into something incomplete. That is theology; but in 
remembrance we have an experience that forbids us to conceive of history as 
fundamentally atheological, little as it may be granted us to try to write it with 
inmiediately theological concepts. [N8,l] 

The unequivocally regressive function which the doctrine of archaic images has 
for Jung comes to light in the following passage from the essay "Uber die Bezie- 
hungen der analytischen Psychologie zum dichterischen Kunstwerk": "The crea- 
tive process . . . consists in an unconscious activation of the archetype and in an 
. . . elaboration of this original image into the finished work. By giving it shape, 
the artist in some measure translates this image into the language of the pre- 
sent. . . . Therein lies the social significance of art: ... it conjures up the forms in 
which the Zeitgeist, the spirit of the age, is most lacking. The unsatisfied yearning 



of the artist reaches back to the primordial image in the unconscious which is best 
fitted to compensate the . . . one-sidedness of the spirit of the age. This image his 
longing seizes on, and as he . . . brings it to consciousness, the image changes its 
form until it can be accepted by the minds of his contemporaries, according to 
their powers." C. G. Jung, Seelenprobleme der Gegenwart (Zurich, Leipzig, and 
Stuttgart, 1932), p. 7l. n Thus, the esoteric theory of art comes down to making 
archetypes "accessible" to the "Zeitgeist." [N8,2] 

In Jung's production there is a belated and particularly emphatic elaboration of 
one of the elements which, as we can recognize today, were first disclosed in 
explosive fashion by Expressionism. That element is a specifically clinical nihil- 
ism, such as one encounters also in the works of Benn, and which has found a 
camp follower in Celine. This nihilism is born of the shock imparted by the 
interior of the body to those who treat it. Jung himself traces the heightened 
interest in psychic life back to Expressionism. He writes: "Art has a way of 
anticipating future changes in man's fundamental outlook, and expressionist art 
has taken this subjective turn well in advance of the more general change." See 
Seelenprobleme der Gegenwart (Zurich, Leipzig, and Stuttgart, 1932), p. 415 — 
"Das Seelenproblem des modernen Menschen"). 25 In this regard, we should not 
lose sight of the relations which Lukacs has established between Expressionism 
and Fascism. (See also K7a,4.) [N8a,l] 

"Tradition, errant fable one collects, / Intermittent as the wind in the leaves." 
Victor Hugo, La Fin de Satan (Paris, 1886), p. 235. [N8a,2] 

Julien Benda, in Un Regulier dans le siecle, cites a phrase from Fustel de Cou- 
langes : "If you want to relive an epoch, forget that you know what has come af ter 
it." That is the secret Magna Charta for the presentation of history by the 
Historical School, and it carries little conviction when Benda adds: "Fustel never 
said that these measures were valid for understanding the role of an epoch in 
history." [N8a,3] 

Pursue the question of whether a connection exists between the secularization of 
time in space and the allegorical mode of perception. The former, at any rate (as 
becomes clear in Blanqui's last writing), is hidden in the "worldview of the 
natural sciences" of the second half of the century. (Secularization of history in 
Heidegger.) 20 [N8a,4] 

Goethe saw it coming: the crisis in bourgeois education. Pie confronts it in 
Wilhelm Meuter. Pie characterizes it in his correspondence with Zelter. [N8a,5] 

Wilhelm von Plumboldt shifts the center of gravity to languages; Marx and 
Engels shift it to the natural sciences. But the study of languages has economic 
functions, too. It comes up against global economics, as the study of natural 
sciences comes up against the production process. [N9,l] 



Scientific method is distinguished by the fact that, in leading to new objects, it 
develops new methods. Just as form in art is distinguished by the fact that, 
opening up new contents, it develops new forms. It is only from without that a 
work of art has one and only one form, that a treatise has one and only one 
method. [N9,2] 

On the concept of "rescue": the wind of the absolute in the sails of the concept. 
(The principle of the wind is the cyclical.) The trim of the sails is the relative. 

[N9.3] 

What are phenomena rescued from? Not only, and not in the main, from the 
discredit and neglect into which they have fallen, but from the catastrophe repre- 
sented very often by a certain strain in their dissemination, their "enshrinement 
as heritage." — They are saved through the exhibition of the fissure within 
them. — There is a tradition that is catastrophe. [N9,4] 

It is the inherent tendency of dialectical experience to dissipate the semblance of 
eternal sameness, and even of repetition, in history. Authentic political experi- 
ence is absolutely free of this semblance. [N9,5] 

What matters for the dialectician is to have the wind of world history in his sails. 
Thinkirg means for him; setting the sails. What is important is how they are set. 
Words are his sails. The way they are set makes them into concepts. [N9,6] 

The dialectical image is an image that emerges suddenly, in a flash. What has 
been is to be held fast — as an image flashing up in the now of its recognizability. 
The rescue that is carried out by these means — and only by these — can operate 
solely for the sake of what in the next moment is already irretrievably lost. In this 
connection, see the metaphorical passage from my introduction to Jochmarm, 
concerning the prophetic gaze that catches fire from the summits of the past.' 27 

[N9.7] 

Being a dialectician means having the wind of history in one's sails. The sails are 
the concepts. It is not enough, however, to have sails at one's disposal. What is 
decisive is knowing the art of setting them. [N9,8] 

The concept of progress must be grounded in the idea of catastrophe. That 
things are "status quo" is the catastrophe. It is not an ever-present possibility but 
what in each case is given. Thus Strindberg (in To Damascus?): 2 * hell is not 
something that awaits us, but this life here and now. [N9a,l] 

It is good to give materialist investigations a truncated ending. [N9a,2] 



To the process of rescue belongs the firm, seemingly brutal grasp. 



[N9a,3] 



The dialectical image is that form of the historical object which satisfies Goethe's 
requirements for the object of analysis: to exhibit a genuine synthesis. It is the 
primal phenomenon of history. [N9a,4] 



The enshrinement or apologia is meant to cover up the revolutionary moments 
in the occurrence of history At heart, it seeks the establishment of a continuity. It 
sets store only by those elements of a work that have already emerged and played 
a part in its reception. The places where tradition breaks off — hence its peaks and 
crags, which offer footing to one who would cross over them — it misses. 

[N9a,5] 

Historical materialism must renounce the epic element in history. It blasts the 
epoch out of the reifi ed "continuity of history." But it also explodes the homoge- 
neity of the epoch, interspersing it with ruins — that is, with the present. [N9a,6] 

In every true work of art there is a place where, for one who removes there, it 
blows cool like the wind of a coming dawn. From this it follows that art, which 
has often been considered refractory to every relation with progress, can provide 
its true definition. Progress has its seat not in the continuity of elapsing time but 
in its interferences — where the truly new makes itself felt for the first time, with 
the sobriety of dawn. [N9a,7] 

For the materialist historian, every epoch with which he occupies himself is only 
prehistory for the epoch he himself must live in. And so, for him, there can be no 
appearance of repetition in history, since precisely those moments in the course 
of history which matter most to him, by virtue of their index as "fore-history," 
become moments of the present day and change their specific character accord- 
ing to the catastrophic or triumphant nature of that day. [N9a,8] 

Scientific progress — like historical progress — is in each instance merely the first 
step, never the second, third, or n + 1 — supposing that these latter ever belonged 
not just to the workshop of science but to its corpus. That, however, is not in fact 
the case; for every stage in the dialectical process (like every stage in the process 
of history itself), conditioned as it always is by every stage preceding, brings into 
play a fundamentally new tendency, which necessitates a fundamentally new 
treatment. The dialectical method is thus distinguished by the fact that, in leading 
to new objects, it develops new methods, just as form in art is distinguished by 
the fact that it develops new forms in delineating new contents. It is only from 
without that a work of art has one and only one form, that a dialectical treatise has 
one and only one method. [N10.1] 



Definitions of basic historical concepts: Catastrophe — to have missed the oppor- 
tunity. Critical moment — the status quo threatens to be preserved. Progress — the 
first revolutionary measure taken. [ N 1 0 , 2] 



If the object of history is to be blasted out of the continuum of historical succes- 
sion, that is because its monadological structure demands it. This structure first 
comes to light in the extracted object itself. And it does so in the form of the 
historical confrontation that makes up the interior (and, as it were, the bowels) of 
the historical object, and into which all the forces and interests of history enter on 
a reduced scale. It is owing to this monadological structure that the historical 
object finds represented in its interior its own fore-history and after-history. 
(Thus, for example, the fore-history of Baudelaire, as educed by current scholar- 
ship, resides in allegory; his after-history, injugendstil.) [N10,3] 

Forming the basis of the confrontation with conventional historiography and 
"enshrinement" is the polemic against empathy (Grillparzer, Fustel de Cou- 
langes). [N10.4] 

The Saint-Simonian Barrault distinguishes between epoques organiques and e'po- 
ques critiques. <See U15a,4.> The derogation of the critical spirit begins directly 
after the victory of the bourgeoisie in the July Revolution. [N10,5] 

The destructive or critical momentum of materialist historiography is registered 
in that blasting of historical continuity with which the historical object first consti- 
tutes itself. In fact, an object of history cannot be targeted at all within the 
continuous elapse of history. And so, from time immemorial, historical narration 
has simply picked out an object from this continuous succession. But it has done 
so without foundation, as an expedient; and its first thought was then always to 
reinsert the object into the continuum, which it would create anew tlirough 
empathy. Materialist historiography does not choose its objects arbitrarily. It 
does not fasten on them but rather springs them loose from the order of succes- 
sion. Its provisions are more extensive, its occurrences more essential. [NlOa.l] 

[For] the destructive momentum in materialist historiography is to be conceived 
as the reaction to a constellation of dangers, which tlireatens both the burden of 
tradition and those who receive it. It is this constellation of dangers which the 
materialist presentation of history comes to engage. In this constellation is com- 
prised its actuality; against its threat, it must prove its presence of mind. Such a 
presentation of history has as goal to pass, as Engels puts it, "beyond the sphere 
of thought." 29 [N10a,2] 

To thinking belongs the movement as well as the arrest of thoughts. Where 
drinking comes to a standstill in a constellation saturated with tensions — there 
the dialectical image appears. It is the caesura in the movement of thought. Its 
position is naturally not an arbitrary one. It is to be found, in a word, where the 
tension between dialectical opposites is greatest. Hence, the object constructed in 
the materialist presentation of history is itself the dialectical image. The latter is 
identical with the historical object; it justifies its violent expulsion from the con- 
tinuum of historical process. [N10a,3] 



The archaic form of primal history, which has been summoned up in every 
epoch and now once more by Jung, is that form which makes semblance in 
history still more delusive by mandating nature as its homeland. [Nl 1,1] 

To write history means giving dates their physiognomy. [Nl 1,2] 

The events surrounding the historian, and in which he himself takes part, will 
underlie his presentation in the form of a text written in invisible ink. The history 
which he lays before the reader comprises, as it were, the citations occurring in 
this text, and it is only these citations that occur in a manner legible to all. To 
write history thus means to cite histoiy. It belongs to the concept of citation, 
however, that the historical object in each case is torn from its context. [Nil, 3] 

On the elementary doctrine of historical materialism. (1) An object of history is 
that through which knowledge is constituted as the object's rescue. (2) History 
decays into images, not into stories. (3) Wherever a dialectical process is realized, 
we are dealing with a monad. (4) The materialist presentation of history carries 
along with it an immanent critique of the concept of progress. (5) Historical 
materialism bases its procedures on long experience, common sense, presence of 
mind, and dialectics. (On the monad: Nl0a,3.) [Nil, 4] 

The present determines where, in the object from the past, that object's fore- 
history and after-history diverge so as to circumscribe its nucleus. [Nil, 5] 

To prove by example that only Marxism can practice great philology, where the 
literature of the previous century is concerned. [Nil, 6] 

"The regions which were the first to become enlightened are not those where the 
sciences have made the greatest progress." Turgot, Oeuvres, vol. 2 (Paris, 1844), 
pp. 601-602 ("Second discours sur les progres successifs de l'esprit humain"). 30 
The thought is taken up in the later literature, and also in Marx. [Nil, 7] 

In the course of the nineteenth century, as the bourgeoisie consolidated its posi- 
tions of power, the concept of progress would increasingly have forfeited the 
critical functions it originally possessed. (In this process, the doctrine of natural 
selection had a decisive role to play: it popularized the notion that progress was 
automatic. The extension of the concept of progress to the whole of human 
activity was furthered as a result.) With Turgot, the concept of progress still had 
its critical functions. In particular, the concept made it possible to direct people's 
attention to retrograde tendencies in history. Turgot saw progress, charac- 
teristically, as guaranteed above all in the realm of mathematical research. 

[Nlla.l] 

"But what a spectacle the succession of men's opinions presents! There I seek the 
progress of the human mind, and I find virtually nothing hut the history of its 
errors. Why is its course — which is so sure, from the very first steps, in the field of 



mathematical studies — so unsteady in everything else, and so apt to go astray? . . . 
In this slow progression of opinions and errors, ... I fancy that I see those first 
leaves, those sheaths which nature has given to the newly growing stems of plants, 
issuing before them from the earth, and withering one by one as other sheaths 
come into existence, until at last the stem itself makes its appearance and 
is crowned with flowers and fruit — a symbol of late-emerging truth." Turgot, 
Oeuvres, vol. 2 (Paris, 1844), pp. 600-601 ("Second discours sur les progres sue- 
cessifs de l'esprit humain"). ;!1 [Nlla,2] 

A limes to progress still exists in Turgot: "In later times, ... it was necessary for 
them, through reflection, to take themselves back to where the first men had been 
led by blind instinct. And who is not aware that it is here that the supreme effort 
of reason lies?" Turgot, Oeuvres, vol. 2, p. 610. 32 This limit is still present in Marx; 
later it is lost. [Nlla,3] 

Already with Turgot it is evident that the concept of progress is oriented toward 
science, but has its corrective in art. (At bottom, not even art can be ranged 
exclusively under the concept of regression; neither does Jochmann's essay de- 
velop this concept in an unqualified way.) Of course, Turgot's estimate of art is 
different from what ours would be today. "Knowledge of nature and of truth is as 
infinite as they are; the arts, whose aim is to please us, are as limited as we are. 
Time constantly brings to light new discoveries in the sciences; but poetry, paint- 
ing, and music have a fixed limit which the genius of languages, the imitation of 
nature, and the limited sensibility of our organs determine. . . . The great men of 
the Augustan age reached it, and are still our models." Turgot, Oeuvres, vol. 2 
(Paris, 1844), pp. 605-606 ("Second discours sur les progres successifs de l'esprit 
humain"). 33 Thus a programmatic renunciation of originality in art! [N12.1] 

"There are elements of the arts of taste which could be perfected with time — for 
example, perspective, which depends on optics. But local color, the imitation of 
nature, and the expression of the passions are of all times. 1 ' Turgot, Oeuvres, vol. 
2 (Paris, 1844), p. 658 ("Plan du second discours sur l'histoire universelle"). 3 ' 1 

[N12.2] 

Militant representation of progress: "It is not error that is opposed to the progress 
of truth; it is indolence, obstinacy, the spirit of routine, everything that contrib- 
utes to inaction. — The progress of even the most peaceful of arts among the 
ancient peoples of Greece and their republics was punctuated by continual wars. 
It was like the Jews' building the walls of Jerusalem with one hand while defend- 
ing them with the other. Their spirits were always in ferment, their hearts always 
high with adventure; and each day was a further enlightenment." Turgot, 
Oeuvres, vol. 2 (Paris, 1844), pp. 672 ("Pensees et fragments"). [N12.3] 

Presence of mind as a political category comes magnificently to life in these 
words of Tirgot: "Before we have learned to deal with things in a given position, 
they have already changed several times. Thus, we always perceive events too 



late, and politics always needs to foresee, so to speak, the present." Turgot, 
Oeuvres, vol. 2 (Paris, 1844), p. 673 ("Pensees et fragments"). 35 [N12a,l] 



"The . . . radically altered landscape of the nineteenth century remains visible to 
this clay, at least in traces. It was shaped by the railroads. . . . The focal points of 
this historical landscape are present wherever mountain and tunnel, canyon and 
viaduct, torrent and funicular, river and iron bridge . . . reveal their kinship. . . . 
In all their singularity, these things announce that nature has not withdrawn, amid 
the triumph of technological civilization, into the nameless and inchoate, that the 
pure construction of bridge or tunnel did not in itself . . . usurp the landscape, hut 
that river and mountain at once took their side, and not as subjugated adversaries 
but as friendly powers. . . . The iron locomotive that disappears into the mountain 
tunnel . . . seems ... to be returning to its native element, where the raw material 
out of which it was made lies slumbering." Dolf Sternberger, Panorama, oder 
Ansichten vom 19. Jahrhundert (Hamburg, 1938), pp. 34—35. [N12a,2] 

The concept of progress had to run counter to the critical theory of history from 
the moment it ceased to be applied as a criterion to specific historical develop- 
ments and instead was required to measure the span between a legendary incep- 
tion and a legendary end of history. In other words: as soon as it becomes the 
signature of historical process as a whole, the concept of progress bespeaks an 
uncritical hypostatization rather than a critical interrogation. This latter may be 
recognized, in the concrete exposition of history, from the fact that it outlines 
regression at least as sharply as it brings any progress into view. (Thus Turgot, 
Jochmann.) [N13,l] 

Lotze as critic of the concept of progress: "In opposition to the readily accepted 
doctrine that the progress of humanity is ever onward and upward, more cau- 
tious reflection has been forced to make the discovery that the course of history 
takes the form of spirals — some prefer to say epicycloids. In short, there has 
never been a dearth of thoughtful but veiled acknowledgments that the impres- 
sion produced by history on the whole, far from being one of unalloyed exulta- 
tion, is preponderantly melancholy. Unprejudiced consideration will always 
lament and wonder to see how many advantages of civilization and special 
charms of life are lost, never to reappear in their integrity." Hermann Lotze, 
Mikrokosmos, vol. 3 (Leipzig, 1864), p. 21. 36 [N13.2] 

Lotze as critic of the concept of progress: "It is not . . . clear how we are to 
imagine one course of education as applying to successive generations of men, 
allowing the later of these to partake of the fruits produced by the unrewarded 
efforts and often by the misery of those who went before. To hold that the claims 
of particular times and individual men may be scorned and all their misfortunes 
disregarded if only mankind would improve overall is, though suggested by 
noble feelings, merely enthusiastic thoughtlessness. . . . Nothing is progress 
which does not mean an increase of happiness and perfection for those very souls 



which had suffered in a previous imperfect state." Hermann Lotze, Mikrokosmos, 
vol. 3 (Leipzig, 1864), p. 23. 37 If the idea of progress extended over the totality of 
recorded history is something peculiar to the satiated bourgeoisie, then Lotze 
represents the reserves called up by those on the defensive. But contrast Holder- 
lin: "I love the race of men who are coming in the next centuries." 38 [N13,3] 

A thought-provoking observation: "It is one of the most noteworthy peculiarities 
of the human heart . . . that so much selfishness in individuals coexists with the 
general lack of envy which every present day feels toward its future." This lack of 
envy indicates that the idea we have of happiness is deeply colored by the time in 
which we live. Happiness for us is thinkable only in the air that we have 
breathed, among the people who have lived with us. In other words, there 
vibrates in the idea of happiness (this is what that noteworthy circumstance 
teaches us) the idea of salvation. This happiness is founded on the very despair 
and desolation which were ours. Our life, it can be said, is a muscle strong 
enough to contract the whole of historical time. Or, to put it differently, the 
genuine conception of historical time rests entirely upon the image of redemp- 
tion. (The passage is from Lotze, Mikrokosmos, vol. 3 [Leipzig, 1864], p. 49.) 39 

[Nl3a,l] 

■enial of the notion of progress in the religious view of history: "History, how- 
ever it may move forward or fluctuate hither and thither, could not by any of its 
movements attain a goal lying out of its own plane. And we may spare ourselves 
the trouble of seeking to find, in mere onward movement upon this plane, a 
progress which history is destined to make not there but by an upward move- 
ment at each individual point of its course forward." Hermann Lotze, Mikrokos- 
mos, vol. 3 (Leipzig, 1864), p. 49. 40 [N13a,2] 

Connection, in Lotze, between the idea of progress and the idea of redemption: 
"The reason of the world would be turned to unreason if we did not reject the 
thought that the work of vanishing generations should go on forever benefiting 
only those who come later, and being irreparably wasted for the workers them- 
selves" (p. 50). This cannot be, "unless the world itself, and all the flourish about 
historical development, are to appear as mere vain and unintelligible noise. . . . 
Tbat in some mysterious way the progress of history affects them, too — it is this 
conviction that first entitles us to speak as we do of humanity and its history" 
(p. 51). Lotze calls this the "thought of the preservation and restoration of all 
things" (p. 52). 41 [Nl3a,3] 

Cultural history, according to Bernheim, developed out of the positivism of 
Comte; Beloch's Greek History (<vol. 1,> 2nd edition, 1912) is, according to him, a 
textbook example of Comtean influence. Positivist historiography "disregarded 
. . . the state and political processes, and saw in the collective intellectual develop- 
ment of society the sole content of history. . . . The elevation ... of cultural 
history to the only subject worthy of historical research!" Ernst Bernheim, Mit- 



telalterliche Z e ^ ansc ^ auun E, en zw H irem Einfluss auf Politik und Geschichtsschreibung 
(Tubingen, 1918), p. 8. [N14,l] 



'"The logical category of time does not govern the verb as much as one might 
expect.' Strange as it may seem, the expression of the future does not appear to be 
situated on the same level of the human mind as the expression of the past and of 
the present. . . . 'The future often has no expression of its own; or if it has one, it is 
a complicated expression without parallel to that of the present or the past.' . . . 
'There is no reason to believe that prehistoric Indo-European ever possessed a 
true future tense' (Meillet)." Jean-Richard Bloch, "Langage d'utilite, langage 
poetique" (Encyclopediefranqaise, vol. 16 [16-50], 10). [N14.2] 

Simmel touches on a very important matter with the distinction between the 
concept of culture and the spheres of autonomy in classical Idealism. The separa- 
tion of the three autonomous domains from one another preserved classical 
Idealism from the concept of culture that has so favored the cause of barbarism. 
Simmel says of the cultural ideal: "It is essential that the independent values of 
aesthetic, scientific, ethical, . . . and even religious achievements be transcended, 
so that they can all be integrated as elements in the development of human 
nature beyond its natural state." Georg Simmel, Philosophie des Geldes (Leipzig, 
1900), pp. 476-477." ' [N14.3] 

"There has never been a period of history in which the culture peculiar to it has 
leavened the whole of humanity, or even the whole of that one nation which was 
specially distinguished by it. All degrees and shades of moral barbarism, of mental 
obtuseness, and of physical wretchedness have always been found in juxtaposition 
with cultured refinement of life . . . and free participation in the benefits of civil 
order." Hermann Lotze, Mikrokosmos, vol. 3 (Leipzig, 1864), pp. 23-24. 11 

[N14a,l] 

To the view that "there is progress enough if , . . . while the mass of mankind 
remains mired in an uncivilized condition, the civilization of a small minority is 
constantly struggling upward to greater and greater heights," Lotze responds with 
the question: "How, upon such assumptions, can we be entitled to speak of one 
history of mankind?" Lotze, Mikrokosmos, vol. 3, p. 25. 14 [N14a,2] 

"The way in which the culture of past times is for the most part handed down," 
Lotze says, "leads directly back to the very opposite of that at which historical 
development should aim; it leads, that is, to the formation of an instinct of culture, 
which continually takes up more and more of the elements of civilization, thus 
making them a lifeless possession, and withdrawing them from the sphere of that 
conscious activity hy the efforts of which they were at first obtained" (p. 28). 
Accordingly: "The progress of science is not . . . , directly, human progress; it 
would be this if, in proportion to the increase in accumulated truths, there were 



also an increase in men's concern for them . . . and in the clearness of their insight 
concerning them." Lotze, Mikrohosmos, vol. 3, p. 29. 15 [N14a,3] 



Lotze on humanity: "It cannot be said that men grow to what they are with a 
consciousness of this growth, and with an accompanying remembrance of their 
previous condition." Lotze, Mikrokosmos, vol. 3, p. 31. 10 [N14a,4] 

Lotze's vision of history can be related to Stifter's: "that the unruly will of the 
individual is always restricted in its action by universal conditions not subject to 
arbitrary will — conditions which are to be found in the laws of spiritual life in 
general, in the established order of nature . . . "Lotze, Mikrokosmos, vol. 3, p. 34." 

[N14 a ,5] 

To be compared with Stifter's preface to Bunte Steine <Colored Stones>: "Let us at 
the outset regard it as certain that a great effect is always due to a great cause, 
never to a small one." Histoire de Jules Cesar, vol. 1 (Paris, 1865) (Napoleon III). 

[N14 a ,6] 

A phrase which Baudelaire coins for the consciousness of time peculiar to some- 
one intoxicated by hashish can be applied in the definition of a revolutionary 
historical consciousness. He speaks of a night in which he was absorbed by the 
effects of hashish: "Long though it seemed to have been . . . , yet it also seemed to 
have lasted only a few seconds, or even to have had no place in all eternity." 
<Baudelaire, Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec (Paris, 1931 ),> vol. 1, pp. 298-299." 

[N15.1] 

At any given time, the living see themselves in the midday of history. They are 
obliged to prepare a banquet for the past. The historian is the herald who invites 
the dead to the table. [N15,2] 

On the dietetics of historical literature. The contemporary who learns from 
books of history to recognize how long his present misery has been in prepara- 
tion (and this is what the historian must inwardly aim to show him) acquires 
thereby a high opinion of his own powers. A history that provides this kind of 
instruction does not cause him sorrow, but arms him. Nor does such a history 
arise from sorrow, unlike that which Flaubert had in mind when he penned the 
confession: "Few will suspect how depressed one had to be to undertake the 
resuscitation of Carthage."' 19 It is pure curiosite that arises from and deepens 
sorrow. [N15,3] 

Example of a "cultural historical" perspective in the worse sense. Huizinga 
speaks of the consideration displayed for the life of the common people in the 
pastorals of the late Middle Ages. "Here, too, belongs that interest in rags and 
tatters which ... is already beginning to make itself felt. Calendar miniatures 
note with pleasure the threadbare knees of reapers in the field, while paintings 



accentuate the rags of mendicants. . . . Here begins the line that leads through 
Rembrandt's etchings and Murillo's beggar boys to the street types of Steinlen." 
J. Huizinga, Herbst des Mittelalters (Munich, 1928), p. 448. 50 At issue, of course, is 
actually a very specific phenomenon. [Nl 5 ,4] 

"The past has left images of itself in literary texts, images comparahle to those 
which are imprinted by light on a photosensitive plate. The future alone possesses 
developers active enough to scan such surfaces perfectly. Many pages in Marivaux 
or Rousseau contain a mysterious meaning which the first readers of these texts 
could not fully have deciphered." Andre Monglond, Le Preromantismefranqmis, 
vol. 1, Le litres preromantique (Grenohle, 1930), p. xii. [N15a,l] 

A revealing vision of progress in Hugo, "Paris incendie" (L'Anne'e terrible) : 

What! Sacrifice everything! Even the granary! 
What! The library, arch where dawn arises, 
Unfathomable ABC of the ideal, where progress, 

Eternal reader, leans on its elbows and dreams . . . [N15a,2] 

On the style one should strive for: "It is through everyday words that style bites 
into and penetrates the reader. It is through them that great thoughts circulate 
and are accepted as genuine, like gold or silver imprinted with a recognized seal. 
They inspire confidence in the person who uses them to make his droughts more 
understandable; for one recognizes by such usage of common language a man 
who knows life and the world, and who stays in touch with things. Moreover, 
these words make for a frank style. They show that the author has long rumi- 
nated the thought or the feeling expressed, that he has made them so much his 
own, so much a matter of habit, that for him the most common expressions 
suffice to express ideas that have become natural to him after long deliberation. 
In the end, what one says in this way will appear more truthful, for nothing is so 
clear, when it comes to words, than those we call familiar; and clarity is some- 
thing so characteristic of the truth that it is often confused with it." Nothing more 
subtle than the suggestion: be clear so as to have at least the appearance of truth. 
Offered in this way, the advice to write simply— which usually harbors resent- 
ment — has the highest authority. J. Joubert, Oeuvres (Paris, 1883), vol. 2, p. 293 
("Du Style," no. 99). [N15a,3] 

Tf le person who could develop the Joubertian dialectic of precepts would pro- 
duce a stylisrics worth mentioning. For example, Joubert recommends the use of 
"everyday words" but warns against "colloquial language," which "expresses 
things relevant to our present customs only" ("Du Style," no. 67 < Oeuvres, vol. 2, 
p. 286>). [N16.1] 

"All heautiful expressions are susceptible of more than one meaning. When a 
beautiful expression presents a meaning more beautiful than the author's own, it 



should be adopted." J. Joubert, Oeuvres (Paris, 1883), vol. 2, p. 276 ("Du Style," 
n«. 17). [N16,2] 



With regard to political economy, Marx characterizes as "its vulgar element" 
above all "that element in it which is mere reproduction — that is, representation 
of appearance." Cited in Korsch, Karl Marx <manuscript>, vol. 2, p. 22. 51 This 
vulgar element is to be denounced in other sciences as well. [N16,3] 

Concept of nature in Marx: "If in Hegel . . . 'physical nature likewise encroaches 
on world history,' then Marx conceives nature from the beginning in social catego- 
ries. Physical nature does not enter directly into world history; rather, it enters 
indirectly, as a process of material production that goes on, from the earliest 
moment, not only between man and nature but also between man and man. Or, to 
use language that will be clear to philosophers as well: in Marx's rigorously social 
science, that pure nature presupposed by all human activity (the economic nm.tura 
naturans) is replaced everywhere by nature as material production (the economic 
natura naturatd) — that is, by a social 'matter' mediated and transformed 
through human social activity, and thus at the same time capable of further change 
and modification in the present and the future." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, p. 3. :>2 

[N16.4] 

Korsch provides the following reformulation of the Hegelian triad in Marxian 
terms: "The Hegelian 'contradiction' was replaced by the struggle of the social 
classes; the dialectical 'negation,' by the proletariat; and the dialectical 'synthe- 
sis,' by the proletarian revolution." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, p. 45. s,i [N16,5] 

Restriction of the materialist conception of history in Korsch: "As the material 
mode of production changes, so does the system of mediations existing between the 
material base and its political and juridical superstructure, with its corresponding 
social forms of consciousness. Hence, the general propositions of materialist social 
theory concerning the relations between economy and politics or economy and 
ideology, or concerning such general concepts as class and class struggle, . . . have 
a different meaning for each specific epoch and, strictly speaking, are valid, in the 
particular form Marx gave them within the present bourgeois society, only for this 
society. . . . Only for contemporary bourgeois society, where the spheres of econ- 
omy and politics are formally and entirely separated from each other, and where 
workers as citizens of the state are free and possessed of equal rights, does the 
scientific demonstration of their actual ongoing lack of freedom in the economic 
sphere have the character of a theoretical discovery." Korsch, vol. 3, pp. 21-22. 

[N16a,l] 

Korsch makes "the seemingly paradoxical observation (which is nonetheless . . . 
suited to the final and most mature form of Marxian science) that in the materialist 
social theory of Marx the ensemhle of social relations, which hourgeois sociologists 
treat as an independent domain . . . , already is investigated according to its objec- 



So tive . . . content hy the historical and social science of economics. . . . In this sense, 

Marx's materialist social science is not sociology but economics.'''' Korsch, Karl 
Marx, vol. 3, p. 103. 54 [N16a,2] 

| 

A citation from Marx on the mutahility of nature (in Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, 
t« p. 9): "Even the naturally grown variations of the human species, such as differ- 

gp- ences of race, . . . can and must be abolished in the historical process." 35 

| [N16a,3] 

£k Doctrine of the superstructure, according to Korsch: "Neither 'dialectical causal- 

ly ity' in its philosophic definition, nor scientific 'causality' supplemented by 'inter- 

1 actions,' is sufficient to determine the particular kinds of connections and 

jjj relations existing hetween the economic 'base' and the juridical and political 'su- 

perstructure . . . ,' together with the 'corresponding' forms of consciousness. . . . 
8 Twentieth-century natural science has learned that the 'eausal' relations which 

H the researcher in a given field has to estahlish for that field cannot he defined in 

•B terms of a general concept or law of causality, but must he determined specifically 

for each separate field.* [*See Philipp Frank, Das Kmusalgesetz und seine Gren- 
'g, zen <The Law of Causality and Its Limits) (Vienna, 1932).] . . . The greater part of 

the results . . . obtained by Marx and Engels consist not in theoretical formula- 
tions of the new principle hut in its specific application to a series of . . . questions, 
which are either of fundamental practical importance or of an extremely suhtle 
nature theoretically. ... * [*Here, for example, belong the questions raised by 
Marx at the end of the 1857 'Introduction' <to the Grundrisse> (pp. 779ff .), and 
which concern the 'unequal development' of different spheres of social life: un- 
equal development of material production vis-a-vis artistic production (and of the 
various arts among themselves), the level of education in the United States as 
compared to that of Europe, unequal development of the relations of production 
as legal relations, and so forth.] The more precise scientific determination of the 
present contexts is still a task for thefuture . . . , a task whose center will lie, once 
again, not in theoretical formulation but in the further application and testing of 
the principles implicit in Marx's work. Nor should we adhere too strictly to the 
words of Marx, who often used his terms only figuratively — as, for instance, in 
describing the connections under consideration here as a relation between 'base' 
and 'superstructure,' as a 'correspondence,' and so on. ... In all these cases, the 
Marxian concepts (as Sorel and Lenin, among the later Marxists, understood best) 
are not intended as new dogmatic fetters, as preestablished conditions which must 
be met in some particular order by any 'materialist' investigation. They are, 
rather, a wholly undogmatic guide to research and action." Korseh, Karl Marx 
(manuscript), vol. 3 , pp. 93-96. 56 [N17] 

Materialist conception of history and materialist philosophy: "The formulas of 
materialist history that were applied by Marx and Engels . . . solely to the . . . 
investigation of bourgeois society, and transferred to other historical periods only 
with suitable elaboration, have been detached by the Marxist epigones from this 
specific application, and in general from every historical connection; and out of 



so-called historical materialism they have made a universal . . . sociological the- 
ory. From this . . . leveling ... of materialist theory of society, it was only a step to 
the idea that once again today — or especially today — it was necessary to shore up 
the historical and economic science of Marx, not only with a general social philoso- 
phy but even with a . . . universal materialist worldview embracing the totality of 
nature and society. Thus, the . . . scientific forms into which the real kernel of 
eighteenth-century philosophical materialism had evolved . . . were ultimately 
carried back to what Marx himself had once unmistakably repudiated as 'the 
philosophical phrases of the Materialists about matter.' Materialist social science 
. . . does not need . . . any such philosophic support. This most important advance 
. . . carried out by Marx was later overlooked even by . . . 'orthodox' interpreters 
of Marx. . . . They have thus reintroduced their own backward attitudes into a 
theory which Marx had consciously transformed from a philosophy into a science. 
It is the almost grotesque historical fate of the Marx-orthodoxy that, in repulsing 
the attacks of revisionists, it ultimately arrives, on all important issues, at the very 
same standpoint as that taken by its adversaries. For example, the leading repre- 
sentative of this school, . . . Plekhanov, in his eager pursuit of that 'philosophy' 
which might be the true foundation of Marxism, finally hit upon the idea of pre- 
senting Marxism as 'a form of Spinoza's philosophy freed by Feuerbach of its 
theological addendum.'" Korsch, Karl Marx (manuscript), vol. 3, pp. 29-31. 57 

[N17a] 

Korsch cites Bacon, from the Novum Orgamim: '"Recte enim Veritas temporis 
(ilia dicitur non auctoritas.' On that authority of all authorities, time, he had 
based the superiority of the new bourgeois empirical science over the dogmatic 
science of the Middle Ages." Korsch, KarlMarx (manuscript), vol. 1, p. 72. 511 

[N18.1] 

"For the positive use, Marx replaces the overweening postulate of Hegel that the 
truth must be concrete with the rational principle of specification. . . . The real 
interest lies ... in the specific traits through which each particular historical 
society is distinguished from the common features of society in general and in 
which, therefore, its development is comprised. ... In the same manner, an exact 
social science cannot form its general concepts by simply abstracting from some 
and retaining other more or less arbitrarily chosen characteristics of the given 
historical form of bourgeois society. It can secure the knowledge of the general 
contained in that particular form of society only by the minute investigation of all 
the historical conditions underlying its emergence from another state of society 
and from the actual modification of its present form under exactly established 
conditions. . . . Thus, the only genuine laws in social science are laws of develop- 
ment." Korsch, Karl Marx (manuscript), vol. 1, pp. 49-52. 5 " [N18.2] 



Hie authentic concept of universal history is a messianic concept. Universal 
history, as it is understood today, is an affair of obscurantists. [N18,3] 



The now of recognizability is the moment of awakening. (Jung would like to 
distance awakening from the dream.) [N18.4] 



In his characterization of Leopaidi, Sainte-Beuve declares himself "persuaded . . . 
that the full value and originality of literary criticism depends on its applying 
itself to subjects for which we have long possessed the background and all the 
immediate and more distant contexts." C.-A. Sainte-Beuve, Portraits contempo- 
rains, vol. 4 (Paris, 1882), p. 365. On the other hand, it must be admitted that the 
absence of certain of the conditions demanded here by Sainte-Beuve can have its 
value. A lack of feeling for the most delicate nuances of the text can itself cause 
the reader to inquire more attentively into the least of facts within the social 
relations underlying the work of art. Moreover, the insensitivity to fine shades of 
meaning can more readily procure for one (thanks to clearer apprehension of the 
contours of the work) a certain superiority to other critics, insofar as the feeling 
for nuances does not always go together with the gift for analysis. [Nl8a,l] 

Critical remarks on technical progress show up quite early. The author of the 
treatise On Art (Hippocrates?): "I believe that the inclination ... of intelligence is 
to discover any one of those things that are still unknown, if indeed it is better to 
have discovered them than not to have done so at all." Leonardo da Vmci: "How and 
why I do not write of my method of going underwater for as long as I can remain 
there without eating: if I neither publish nor divulge this information, it is be- 
cause of the wickedness of men who would avail themselves of it to commit 
murder at the bottom of the sea — by staving in ships and sinking them with their 
crews." Bacon: "In . . . lire New Atlantis, ... he entrusts to a specially chosen 
commission the responsibility for deciding which new inventions will be brought 
before the public and which kept secret." Pierre-Maxime Schuhl, Machinisme et 
philosophic (Paris, 1938), pp. 7, 35. — "The bombers remind us of what Leonardo 
da Vinci expected of man in fl ight: that he was to ascend to the skies 'in order to 
seek snow on the mountaintops and bring it back to the city to spread on the 
sweltering streets in summer" (Schuhl, Machinisme et philosophie, p. 95). 

[N18a,2] 

It may be that the continuity of tradition is mere semblance. But then precisely 
the persistence of this semblance of persistence provides it with continuity. 

[N19.1] 

Pronst, apropos of a citation (from a letter hy <Guez de> Balzac to M. deForgues) 
which he evidently borrowed from Montesquiou, to whom his comments are ad- 
dressed. (The passage may contain a nonsensical slip of the pen or a printer's 
error.) "It was fifteen days ago that I removed it [that is, the citation] from my 
proof sheets. . . . My book will no doubt he too little read for there to have been 
any risk of tarnishing your citation. Furthermore, I withdrew it less for your sake 
than for the sake of the sentence itself. In fact, I believe there exists for every 
beautiful sentence an imprescriptible right which renders it inalienable to all tak- 



ers except the one for whom it waits, according to a destination which is its des- 
tiny." Correspondance generate de Marcel Proust, vol. 1, Lettres a. Robert de 
Montesquiou, (Paris, 1930), pp. 73-74. 60 [N19.2] 

The pathological element in the notion of "culture" comes vividly to light in the 
effect produced on Raphael, the hero of lire Wild Ass's Skin, by the enormous 
stock of merchandise in the four-story antique shop into which he ventures. "To 
begin with, the stranger compared . . . three showrooms — crammed with the 
relics of civilizations and religions, deities, royalties, masterpieces of art, the prod- 
ucts of debauchery, reason and unreason — to a minor of many facets, each one 
representing a whole world. . . . The young man's senses ended by being 
numbed at the sight of so many national and individual existences, their authen- 
ticity guaranteed by the human pledges which had survived them. . . . For him 
this ocean of furnishings, inventions, fashions, works of art, and relics made up 
an endless poem. . . . He clutched at every joy, grasped at every grief, made all 
the formulas of existence his own, and . . . generously dispersed his life and 
feelings over the images of that empty, plastic nature. . . . He felt smothered 
under the debris of fifty vanished centuries, nauseated with this surfeit of human 
thought, crushed under the weight of luxury and art. . . . Alike in its caprices to 
our modern chemistry, which would reduce creation to one single gas, does not 
the soul distill fearful poisons in the rapid concentration of its pleasures ... or its 
ideas? Do not many men perish through the lightning action of some moral acid 
or other, suddenly injected into their innermost being?" Balzac, La Peau de cha- 
grin, ed. Flammaiion (Paris), pp. 19, 21-22, 24. 61 [N19,3] 

Some theses by Focillon which have appearances on their side. Of course, the 
materialist theory of art is interested in dispelling such appearance. "We have no 
right to confuse the state of the life of forms with the state of social life. The time 
that gives support to a work of art does not give definition either to its principle 
or to its specific form" (p. 93). "The combined activity of the Capetian monar- 
chy, the episcopacy, and the townspeople in the development of Gothic cathe- 
drals shows what a decisive influence may be exercised by the alliance of social 
forces. Yet no matter how powerful this activity may be, it is still by no means 
qualified to solve problems in pure statics, to combine relationships of values. 
The various masons who bonded two ribs of stone crossing at right angles 
beneath the north tower of Bayeux . . . , the creator of the choir at Saint-Denis, 
were geometers working on solids, and not historians interpreting time. [!!] The 
most attentive study of the most homogeneous milieu, of the most closely woven 
concatenation of circumstances, will not serve to give us the design of the towers 
of Laon" (p. 89). It would be necessary to follow up on these reflections in order 
to show, first, the difference between the theory of milieu and the theory of the 
forces of production, and, second, the difference between a "reconstruction" and 
a historical interpretation of works. Henri Focillon, Vie des formes (Paris, 1934). 02 

[N19a,l] 



Focillon on technique: "It has been like some observatory whence both sight and 
study might embrace within one and the same perspective the greatest possible 
number of objects and their greatest possible diversity. For technique may be 
interpreted in many various ways: as a vital force, as a theory of mechanics, or as 
a mere convenience. In my own case as a historian, I never regarded technique as 
the automatism of a 'craft,' nor as . . . the recipes of a 'cuisine'; instead I saw it as 
a whole poetry of action and ... as the means for attaining metamorphoses. It 
has always seemed to me that . . . the observation of technical phenomena not 
only guarantees a certain controllable objectivity, but affords entrance into the 
very heart of the problem, by presenting it to us in the same terms and from the same 
point of view as it is presented to the artist. " The phrase italicized by the author 
marks the basic error. Henri Focillon, Vie des formes (Paris, 1934), pp. 53-54. 03 

[Nl9a,2] 

The "activity on the part of a style in the process of self -definition ... is generally 
known as an 'evolution,' this term being here understood in its broadest and most 
general sense. Biological science checked and modulated the concept of evolution 
with painstaking care; archaeology, on the other hand, took it simply as ... a 
method of classification. I have elsewhere pointed out the dangers of 'evolution': 
its deceptive orderliness, its single-minded directness, its use, in those problematic 
cases . . . , of the expedient of 'transitions,' its inability to make room for the 
revolutionary energy of inventors." Henri Focillon, Vie des formes (Paris, 1934), 
pp. 11-12. 64 [N20] 



[Prostitution, Gambling] 



Love is a bird of passage. 

— Mouveaux tableaux de Paris, ou Observations sur les moeurs el usages des 
Parisieiu au commencement du XIX siide (Paris, 1828), vol. 1, p. 37 

... in an arcade, 

Women are as in their boudoir. 

— Brazier, Gabriel and Dumersan, Les Passages et les rues, ou La Guerre 
declaree (Paris, 1827), p. 30 



Hasn't his eternal vagabondage everywhere accustomed him to reinterpreting 
the image of the city? And doesn't he transform the arcade into a casino, into a 
gambling den, where now and again he stakes the red, blue, yellow jetons of 
feeling on women, on a face that suddenly surfaces (will it return his look?), on a 
mute mouth (will it speak?) ? What, on the baize cloth, looks out at the gambler 
from every number — luck, that is — here, from the bodies of all the women, 
winks at him as the chimera of sexuality: as his type. This is nothing other than 
the number, the cipher, in which just at that moment luck will be called by name, 
in order to jump immediately to another number. His type — that's the number 
that pays off thirty- six-fold, the one on which, without even trying, the eye of the 
voluptuary falls, as the ivory ball falls into the red or black compartment. He 
leaves the Palais-Royal with bulging pockets, calls to a whore, and once more 
celebrates in her arms the communion with number, in which money and riches, 
absolved from every earthen weight, have come to him from the fates like a 
joyous embrace returned to the full. For in gambling hall and bordello, it is the 
same supremely sinful delight: to chaJlenge fate in pleasure. Let unsuspecting 
idealists imagine that sensual pleasure, of whatever stripe, could ever determine 
the theological concept of sin. The origin of true lechery is nothing else but this 
stealing of pleasure from out of the course of life with God, whose covenant with 
such life resides in the name. The name itself is the cry of naked lust. This sober 
thing, fateless in itself — the name — knows no other adversary than the fate that 
takes its place in whoring and that forges its arsenal in superstition. Thus in 
gambler and prostitute that superstition which arranges the figures of fate and 



fills all wanton behavior with fateful forwardness, fateful concupiscence, bringing 
even pleasure to kneel before its throne. [0 1 , 1 ] 



"When I turn back in thought to the Salon des Etrangers, as it was in the second 
decade of our century, I see before me the finely etched features and gallant figure 
of the Hungarian Count Hunyady, t he greatest gambler of his day, who hack then 
took all society's breath away. . . . Hunyady's luck for a long time was extraordi- 
nary; no hank could withstand his assault, and his winnings must have amounted 
to nearly two million francs. His manner was surprisingly calm and extremely 
distinguished; he sat there, as it appeared, in complete equanimity, his right hand 
in thehreast of his jacket, while thousands of francs hung upon the fall of a card or 
a roll of the dice. His valet, however, confided to an indiscreet friend that Mon- 
sieur's nerves were not so steely as he wanted people to helieve, and that of a 
morning the count more often than not would hear the bloody traces of his nails, 
which in his excitement he had dug into the fl esh of his chest as the game was tak- 
ing a dangerous turn." Captain Gronow, Aits der grossen Welt iPariser und Lon- 
doner Sittenbilder, 1810-1860, ed. Heinrich Conrad> (Stuttgart, 1908), p. 59.' 

[Ol,2] 

On the way Blucher gambled in Paris, see Gronow's hook, Aits der grossen Welt 
<pp. 54— 56> . When he had lost, he forced the Bank of France to advance him 
100,000 francs so he could continue playing; after this scandal broke, he had to 
leave Paris. "Blucher never quit Salon 113 at the Palais-Royal, and spent six 
million during his stay; all his lands were in pledge at the time of his departure 
from Paris." Paris took in more during theoccupation <of 1814> than it paid out 
in war reparations. [Ol,3] 

It is only by comparison with the ancien regime that one can say that in the 
nineteenth century the bourgeois takes to gambling. [Ol,4] 

The following account shows very conclusively how public immorality (in con- 
trast to private) carries in itself, in its liberating cynicism, its own corrective. It is 
reported by Carl Benedict Hase, who was in France as an indigent tutor and who 
sent letters home from Paris and other stations of his wandering. "As I was 
walking in the vicinity of the Pont Neuf, a heavily made-up prostitute accosted 
me. She had on a light muslin dress that was tucked up to the knee and that 
clearly displayed the red silk drawers covering thigh and belly. l Tiens, tieru, mon 
ami? she said, 'you are young, you're a foreigner, you will have need of it." She 
then seized my hand, slipped a piece of paper into it, and disappeared in the 
crowd. Thinking I had been given an address, I looked at the missive; and what 
did I read? — An advertisement for a doctor who was claiming to cure all imagin- 
able aihnents in the shortest possible time. It is strange that the girls who are 
responsible for the malady should here put in hand the means to recover from 
it." Carl Benedict Hase, Briefe von der Wanderung und aus Paris (Leipzig, 1894), 
pp. 48-49. [Ol,5] 




A gallery of the Palais-Royal. From a watercolor entitled La Sortie du numero 113, artist un- 
known, 1815. See 01,3. 



"As for the virtue of women, I have hut one response to make to those who would 
ask me about this: it strongly resemhles the curtains in theaters, for their petti- 
coats rise each evening three times rather than once." Comte Horace de Viel- 
Castel, Memoires sur le regne de Napoleon III (Paris, 1883), vol. 2, p. 188. 



"Hirondelles — women who work the window." Levic-Torca, Paris-Noceur (Paris, 
1910), p. 142. The windows in the upper story of the arcades are choir lofts in 
which the angels that men call "swallows" are nesting. [Ola.2] 

On what is "close" (Veuillot: "Paris is musty and close") in fashion: the "glaucous 
gleam" under the petticoats, of which Aragon speaks. 2 The corset as the torso's 
arcade. The absolute antithesis to this open-air world of today. What today is de 
rigueur among the lowest class of prostitutes — not to undress — may once have 
been the height of refinement. One liked the woman retrousse e, tucked up. Hessel 
thinks he has found here the origin of Wedekind's erotics; in his view, 
Wedekind's fresh-air pathos was only a bluff. And in other respects? D Fashion D 

[Ola.3] 

On the dialectical function of money in prostitution. It buys pleasure and, at the 
same time, becomes the expression of shame. "I knew," says Casanova of a 
procuress, "that I would not have the strength to go without giving her some- 
thing." This striking admission reveals his knowledge of the most secret mecha- 
nism of prostitution. No girl would choose to become a prostitute if she counted 
solely on the stipulated payoff from her partner. Even his gratitude, which per- 
haps results in a small percentage more, would hardly seem to her a sufficient 
basis. How then, in her unconscious understanding of men, does she calculate? 
This we cannot comprehend, so long as money is thought of here as only a 
means of payment or a gift. Certainly the whore's love is for sale. But not her 
client's shame. The latter seeks some hiding place during this quarter-hour, and 
finds the most genial: in money. There are as many nuances of payment as there 
are nuances of lovemaking — lazy and swift, furtive or brutal. What does this 
signify? The shame-reddened wound on the body of society secretes money and 
closes up. It forms a metallic scab. We leave to the roue the cheap pleasure of 
believing himself devoid of shame. Casanova knew better: impudence throws 
the first coin onto the table, and shame pays out a hundred more to cover it. 

[Ola.4] 

"The dance in which . . . vulgarity makes its appearance with unexampled impu- 
dence is the traditional French quadrille. When the dancers manage to offend 
against every tender feeling by their pantomime — without, however, going so far 
as to have to fear heing ejected from the room by the on-duty police agents — then 
this type of dance is called quincan. But when all moral sentiment is trampled on 
by the manner of the dancing, when at last, after lengthy hesitation, the sergeants 
de villefeel compelled to recall the dancers to a sense of decorum with the custom- 
ary words, "Dance more decently or you will he shown the door!" — then this 
intensification or, better, 'this degradation' is known as chahue. I . . . The bestial 
grossness . . . has led to the creation of a police ordinance. . . . Men, accordingly, 
are not allowed to appear at these halls either masked or in costume. This is in part 
to prevent their being tempted by their disguise to behave still more vilely hut also, 
and chielly, in the event a dancer should reach the Parisian ne plus ultra of de- 
pravity in dancing and subsequently he shown to the door by the sergeants de 



ville, to make sure he will be recognized thereafter and kept from reentering the 
room. . . . Women, on the other hand, are not allowed to appear unless they are 
masked." Ferdinand von Gall, Paris unci seine Salons (Oldenburg, 1844), vol. 1, 
pp. 209,213-214. [Ola,5] 

Comparison of today's erotic fields of action with those of the middle of the 
previous century. The social play of eroticism turns today on the question: How 
far can a respectable woman go without losing herself? To represent the joys of 
adultery without its actual circumstances is a favorite device of dramatists. The 
terrain on which love's duel with society unfolds is thus, in a very broad sense, 
the realm of "free" love. For the Forties, Fifties, and Sixties of the previous 
century, however, things were entirely different. Nothing illustrates this more 
clearly than the account of the "pensions" which Ferdinand von Gall provides in 
his book Paris und seine Salons (Oldenburg, 1844-1845) <vol. 1, pp. 225-231>. 
There we learn that in many of these boardinghouses at the evening meal — 
which, with prior notification, strangers too could attend — it was the rule to 
bring in cocottes, whose job it was to play the part of girls from good families. In 
fact, they were not disposed to let down their masks too quickly, preferring 
instead to wrap themselves in endless layers of respectability and family connec- 
tion; to strip these away entailed an elaborate game of intrigues that ultimately 
served to raise the women's price. What is expressed in these relations, it goes 
without saying, is less the period's pruderie than its fanatical love of masquerade. 

[02,1] 



More on the mania for masks: "We know from the statistics on prostitution that 
the fallen woman takes a certain pride in being deemed by nature still worthy of 
motherhood — a feeling that in no way excludes her aversion to the hardship and 
disfigurement that goes along with this honor. She thus willingly chooses a middle 
way to exhibit her condition: she keeps it 'for two months, for three months,' 
naturally not longer." F. Th. Vischer, Mode und Cynismus (Stuttgart, 1879), p. 7. 
D Fashion □ [02,2] 

In prostitution, one finds expressed the revolutionary side of technology (the 
symbolic side, which creates no less than discovers). "As if the laws of nature to 
which love submits were not more tyrannical and more odious than the laws of 
society! The metaphysical meaning of sadism is the hope that the revolt of man 
will take on such intensity as to summon nature to change its laws. For, with 
women no longer wanting to endure the ordeal of pregnancy, the risks and the 
sufferings of delivery and of miscarriage, nature will be constrained to invent 
some other means for perpetuating humanity on this earth." Emmanuel Berl, 
"Premier Pamphlet," Europe, 75 <1929>, pp. 405-406. And in fact: the sexual 
revolt against l»ve not only springs from the fanatical, obsessional will to pleas- 
ure; it also aims to make nature adaptable and obedient to this will. The traits in 
question here appear more clearly still when prostitution (especially in the cynical 
form it took toward the end of the century, in the Paris arcades) is regarded less 
as the opposite than as the decline of love. It is then that the revolutionary aspect 



of this decline fuses, as though of its own accord, with the very same aspect in the 
decline of the arcades. [02,3] 



Feminine fauna of the arcades: prostitutes, grisettes, old-hag shopkeepers, female 
street vendors, glovers, demoiselles. — This last was the name, around 1830, for 
incendiaries disguised as women. [02,4] 

Around 1830: "The Palais-Royal is still enough in fashion that the renting of 
chairs brings in some 32,000 francs to Louis Philippe, and the tax on gaming some 
five and a half million to the treasury. . . . The gambling houses of the Palais-Royal 
rival those of the Cercle des Etrangers on the Rue Grange-Bateliere and of Fras- 
cati on the Rue de Richelieu." <Lucien> Dubech and < Pierre) d'Espezel, Histoire 
de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 365. [02,5] 

Rites de passage — this is the designation in folklore for the ceremonies that attach 
to death and hirth, to marriage, puberty, and so forth. In modern life, these 
transitions are becoming ever more unrecognizable and impossible to experience. 
We have grown very poor in threshold experiences. Falling asleep is perhaps the 
only such experience that remains to us. (But together with this, there is also 
waking up.) And, finally, there is the ebb and flow of conversation and the sexual 
permutations of love — experience that surges over thresholds like the changing 
figures of the dream. "How mankind loves to remain transfixed," says Aragon, 
"at the very doors of the imagination!" Paysan <de Paris (Paris, 1926)>, p. 74. 3 It is 
not only from the thresholds of these gates of imagination that lovers and friends 
like to draw their energies; it is from thresholds in general. Prostitutes, however, 
love the thresholds of these gates of dream. — The threshold must be carefully 
distinguished from the boundary. A Schwelle <threshold> is a zone. Transforma- 
tion, passage, wave action are in the word schwellen, swell, and etymology ought 
not to overlook these senses: 1 On the other hand, it is necessary to keep in mind 
the immediate tectonic and ceremonial context which has brought the word to its 
current meaning. D Dream House D [02a,l] 

Under the northeast peristyle of the Palais-Royal lay the Cafe des Aveugles. 
"There, a half-dozen hlindmen from the Quinze-Vlngts Hospital unceasingly per- 
formed more or less deafening music from six o'clock in the evening to one o'clock 
in the morning; for the underground establishments were open to the public only 
from dusk to dawn. They were the preferred rendezvous of those licensed Dryads 
and Nysiads, those impure Sirens who at least had the merit of conferring move- 
ment and life on this immense bazaar of pleasures — sad, somber and mute today 
as the brothels of Herculaneum." Histoire des cafes de Paris extraite des 
mhnoires d'un viveur (Paris, 1857), p. 7. [02a,2] 

"On December 31, 1836, all the gambling houses were closed by authority of the 
police. At Frascati, there was a small riot. This was the mortal blow to the Palais- 
Royal, already dethroned since 1830 by the boulevard." Dubech and d'Espezel, 
Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 389. [02a,3] 



"Talma, Talleyrand, Rossini, Balzac" — named as gamblers in Edouard Gourdon, 
Les Faucheurs de nuit (Paris, 1860), p. 14. [02a,4J 



"I submit that the passion for gambling is the noblest of all passions, because it 
comprehends all others. A series of lucky rolls gives me more pleasure than a man 
who does not gamble can have over a period of several years. I play by intuition, 
par Vesprit — that is to say, in the most keenly felt and delicate manner. Do you 
think I recognize gain only in terms of the gold that comes my way? You are 
mistaken. I see it in terms of the joys which gold procures, and I savor them to the 
full. These joys, vivid and scorching as lightning, are too rapid-fire to hecome 
distasteful, and too diverse to become boring. I live a hundred lives in one. If it is 
a voyage, it is like that of an electric spark. ... If I keep my fist shut tight, and if I 
hold onto my banknotes, it is because I know the value of time too well to spend it 
like other men. To give myself to one pleasure alone would cause me to lose a 
thousand others. ... I have spiritual pleasures, and I want no others." Edouard 
Gourdon, Les Faucheurs de nuit (Paris, 1860), pp. 14-15. The passage cited from 
La Bruyere! — Compare: " What? I no longer act as I might choose?" Wallenstein:' 

[02a,5] 

"The gamhling concessions included the Maison du Cercle des Etrangers, at 6 Rue 
Grange-Bateliere; the Maison de Livry, known as Frascati, at 103 Rue Richelieu; 
the Maison Dunans, 40 Rue du Mont-Blanc; the Maison Marivaux, 13 Rue Mari- 
vaux; the Maison Paphos, 110 Rue dn Temple; the Maison Dauphine, 36 Rue 
Dauphine; and at the Palais-Royal, no. 9 (through no. 24), no. 129 (through no. 
137), no. 119 (extending from no. 102), no. 154 (extending from no. 145). These 
businesses, despite their great number, were not enough for the gamblers. Specu- 
lation brought about the opening of others which the police were not always able to 
monitor effectively. The patrons played ecarte, bouillotte, and baccarat. The es- 
tablishments were managed by . . . hideous-looking old women, disgraceful rem- 
nants of every vice. They gave themselves out to he widows of generals; they were 
protected by self-styled colonels, who received a share of the take. This state of 
things continued until 1837, when the gamhling establishments were shut down." 
Edouard Gourdon, Les F aucheurs de nuit (Paris 1860), p. 34. [03,1] 

Gourdon notes that, in certain circles, the gamblers were almost exclusively 
women (Les Faucheurs de nuit, pp. 55ff.). [03,2] 

"The adventure of the municipal guardsman on horsehack, placed like a fetish at 
the door of a gambler down on his luck, has remained in the annals of our circle. 
The worthy trooper, helieving himself stationed there to pay honor to the guests at 
some reception, was greatly amazed at the silence of the street and the house, when 
suddenly, at around one o'clock in the morning, the sad victim of the green tahles 
returned. As on other evenings, and despite the influence of the fetish, the gambler 
had lost heavily. He rings the bell; no one comes. He rings again; nothing stirs in 
the lodge of the sleeping Cerherus, and the door is unrelenting. Impatient, irri- 



tatecl, provoked above all by the losses he has just sustained, the tenant smashes a 
pane of glass with his walking-stick to rouse the porter. Here the municipal guards- 
man, until then a mere spectator of this nocturnal scene, believes it is his duty to 
intervene. He stoops down, seizes the troublemaker by the collar, hoists him onto 
his horse, and trots smartly off to his barracks, delighted to have a decent pretext 
for punishing a faction he dislikes. . . . Explanations notwithstanding, the gambler 
spent the night on a camp cot." Edouard Gourdon, Les Faucheurs de nuit (Paris, 
1860), pp. 181-182. [03,3] 

On the Palais-Royal: "The former minister of police, Merlin, proposed turning 
this palace of luxury and intemperate pleasure into barracks, and so to shut out 
that vile breed of humanity from their habitual gathering place." F. J. L. Meyer, 
Fragmente aus Paris ini IV Jahr der franzdsischen Republik (Hamburg, 1797), 
vol. 1, p. 24. [03,4] 

Delvau on the lorettes of Montmartre: "They are not women — they are nights." 
Alfred Delvau, Les Dessous de Park (Paris 1860), p. 142. [03,5] 

Isn't there a certain structure of money that can be recognized only in fate, and a 
certain structure of fate that can be recognized only in money? [03,6] 

Professors of argot: 6 "Possessed of nothing more than a perfect knowledge of 
martingales, series, and intermittences, they sat in the gambling dens from open- 
ing to closing time and ended their evening in those grottoes of bouillotte nick- 
named Baural houses. Always on the lookout for novices and beginners . . . , 
these bizarre professors dispensed advice, talked over past throws of the dice, 
predicted the throws to come, and played for others. In the event of losses, they 
had only to curse the toss or put the blame on a drawn game, on chance, on the 
date of the month if it was the thirteenth, on the day of the week if it was Friday. 
In the event of a win, they would draw their dividend, over and above what they 
skimmed during their management of funds — a transaction which was known as 
'feeding the magpie.' These operators divided into different classes: the aristo- 
crats (all colonels or marquis of the ancien regime), the plebeians bom of the 
Revolution, and finally those who offered their services for fifty centimes." Alfred 
Marquiset, Jeux et joueurs d'autrefois, 1789-1837 (Paris, 1917), p. 209. The book 
contains valuable information on the role of the aristocracy and the military in 
the cultivation of gambling. [03a,l] 

Palais-Royal. "The second story is inhabited largely by the high-class femmes 
perdues. . . . On the third floor and ait paradis, in the mansards, reside those of a 
lower grade. Their livelihood compels them to live in the center of the city, in the 
Palais-Royal, in the Rue Traversiere, and surrounding areas. . . . Perhaps 600- 
800 live in the Palais-Royal, but a far greater number go walking there in the 
evenings, for that is where most of the idlers are to he found. On the Rue Saint- 
Honore and some adjacent streets, at evening, they stand in a row just like the 



cabriolets for rent in the Palais during the clay. But their numbers diminish as one 
moves further away, in the city, from the Palais-Royal." J. F. Benzenherg, Briefe 
geschrieben auf einer Reise nach Paris (Dortmund, 1805), vol. 1, pp. 261, 263. 
The author estimates the number of femmes perdues at "around 10,000"; "before 
the Revolution, according to a police report, they numhered 28,000'' (p. 261). 



"Vice had accomplished its customary task, for her as for the others. It had refined 
and rendered desirable the brazen ugliness of her face. Although the girl had lost 
none of the suburban quaintness of her origins, she had become — with her showy 
jewelry and her physical attractions ostentatiously worked up through creams — 
capahle of stimulating and tempting the bored appetites and dulled sensibilities 
that are enlivened only hy the provocations of makeup and the swirl of lavish 
gowns." J.-K. Huysmans, Croquis parisiens (Paris, 1886). p. 57 ("L'Amhu- 



"It is useless to expect that a bourgeois could ever succeed in comprehending the 
phenomena of the distribution of wealth. For, with the development of mechanical 
production, property is depersonalized and arrayed in the impersonal collective 
form of the joint stock company, whose shares are finally caught up in the whirl- 
pool of the Stock Exchange. . . . They are . . . lost hy one, won by another — in- 
deed, in a manner so reminiscent of gamhling that the huying and selling of stocks 
is actually known as 'playing' the market. Modern economic development as a 
whole tends more and more to transform capitalist society into a giant interna- 
tional gambling house, where the hourgeois wins and loses capital in consequence 
of events which remain unknown to him. . . . The 'inexplicable' is enthroned in 
bourgeois society as in a gambling hall. . . . Successes and failures, thus arising 
from causes that are unanticipated, generally unintelligible, and seemingly de- 
pendent on chance, predispose the hourgeois to the gambler's frame of mind. . . . 
The capitalist whose fortune is tied up in stocks and bonds, which are suhject to 
variations in market value and yield for which he does not understand the causes, 
is a professional gamhler. The gamhler, however, ... is a snpremely superstitious 
being. The hahitues of gamhling casinos always possess magic formulas to conjure 
the Fates. One will mutter a prayer to Saint Anthony of Padua or some other spiri t 
of the heavens; another will place his bet only if a certain color has won; while a 
third holds a rahhit's foot in his left hand; and so on. The inexplicable in society 
envelops the hourgeois, as the inexplicahle in nature the savage." Paul Laf argue, 
"Die Ursachen des Gottesglauhens," Die nene Zeit, 24., no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1906), 



Adolph Stahr mentions a certain Chicard as premier cancan dancer at the Bal 
Mahille, and maintains that he dances under the surveillance of two police ser- 
geants whose sole responsibility is to keep an eye on the dancing of this one man. In 
comiection with this: the statement — cited, without specific references, in Wolde- 
mar Seyffarth, Wahrnehmungen in Paris, 1853 und 1854* (Gotha, 1855), p. 136 — 



[03a,2] 



lame"). 



[03a,3] 



p. 512. 



[04,1] 



"that only the superior strength of the police force ean keep within certain harely 
adequate hounds the hestiality of the Paris crowds." [04,2] 



The "Original" — a sort of primitive man with enormous heard who can he seen in 
the Palais-Royal — is called Chodruc Duclos. [04,3] 

"Is it an insignifieant delight to tempt fortune? Is it a pleasure devoid of intoxica- 
tion to taste in one second months, years, a whole lifetime of fears and hopes? I was 
not ten years old when M. Grepinet, my master in the junior class, read us the 
fable L' Homme et le genie <The Man and the Genie>. Yet I rememher the talc 
hetter than if I had read it yesterday. A genie gives a boy a ball of thread, and tells 
him: 'This is the thread of your life. Take it. When you find time heavy on your 
hands, pull it out; your days will pass quick or slow, according as you unwind the 
ball rapidly or little by little. So long as you leave the thread alone, you will remain 
stationary at the same hour of your existence.' The hoy took the thread; first he 
pulled at it to become a man, then to marry the girl he loved, then to see his 
children grow up, to win offices and profit and honor, to abridge anxieties, to 
escape griefs and the infirmities that come with the years, and finally, alas! to cut 
short a peevish old age. He had lived just four months and six days since the date 
of the genie's visit. Well, what is gambling, I should like to know, hut the art of 
producing in a second the changes that Destiny ordinarily effects only in the 
course of many hours or even many years, the art of collecting into a single instant 
the emotions dispersed throughout the slow-moving existence of ordinary men, the 
secret of living a whole lifetime in a few minutes — in a word, the genie's ball of 
thread? Gambling is a hand-to-hand encounter with Fate. . . . The stake is 
money — in other words, immediate, infinite possibilities. . . . Perhaps the next 
card turned, the hall now rolling, will give the player parks and gardens, fields and 
forests, castles and manors lifting heavenward their pointed turrets and fretted 
roofs. Yes, that little bouncing ball holds within it acres of good land and roofs of 
slate with sculpted chimneys reflected in the hroad bosom of the Loire; it contains 
treasures of art, marvels of taste, jewels of price, the most exquisite bodies in all 
the world, nay! even souls — souls no one ever dreamed were venal, all the decora- 
tions, all the distinctions, all the elegance, and all the puissance of the world. . . . 
And you would have me give up gamhling? Nay; if gamhling only availed to give 
endless hopes, if our only vision of it were the smile of its green eyes, it would he 
loved less fanatically. But it has nails of adamant; it is cruel and terrible. At its 
caprice it gives poverty and wretchedness and shame — that is why its votaries 
adore it. The fascination of danger is at the bottom of all great passions. There is 
no fullness of pleasure unless the precipice is near. It is the mingling of terror with 
delight that intoxicates. And what more terrifying than gamhling? It gives and 
takes away; its logic is not our logic. It is dumb and hlind and deaf. It is almighty. 
It is a God. ... It has its votaries and its saints, who love it for itself, not for what 
it promises, and who fall down in adoration when its hlow strikes them. It strips 
them ruthlessly, and they lay the hlame on themselves, not on their duty. T played 



a bad game,' they say. They find fault with themselves; they do not blaspheme 
their God." Anatole France, Le Jardin d? Epicure (Paris), pp. 15-18. ' [04a] 



Beraud seeks to advocate, through extensive argumentation, the benefits of ad- 
ministrative — as opposed to judicial — proceedings against prostitutes: "Thus, the 
sanctuary of justice will not have been publicly sullied hy an unclean affair, and 
the crime is punished, but in a discretionary manner, hy virtue of a particular 
ordinance of the Prefect of PoUce." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris 
et la police qui les regit (Paris and Leipzig, 1839), vol. 2, p. 50. [05,1] 

"A marlou <tomcat> ... is a handsome young man, strong and well built, who 
knows how to defend himself, to dress well, to dance the chahue and the cancan 
with elegance, to he ohliging toward girls devoted to the cult of Venus, and to 
provide for them in times of conspicuous danger; who knows also how to get them 
respect and to force them to conduct themselves decently. . . . Here, then, we have 
a class of individuals who, f rom time immemorial, have distinguished themselves 
hy their attractive appearance, by their exemplary conduct, and by the services 
they have rendered society, and who now are reduced to dire circumstances." 
50,000 Voleurs de plus a Paris, ou Reclamation des anciens marlous de la capi- 
tale, contre I'ordonnance de M. le Prefet de police, concernant les filles publiques; 
Par le beau Theodore Cancan, cited in F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de 
Paris et la police qui les regit (Paris and Leipzig, 1839), vol. 2, p. 109-110, 113- 
114. [The pamphlet slightly antedates the work that cites it.] [05,2] 

From the police edict of April 14., 1830, regulating prostitution: "Art. (1) . . . They 
are forbidden to appeal - at any time, or on any pretext, in the arcades, in the 
public gardens, or on the boulevards. Art. (2) Filles publiques are not permitted to 
engage in prostitution except in licensed brothels (maisons de tolerance). Art. (3) 
Filles isolees — that is to say, those who do not reside in licensed brothels — may not 
enter these houses until after the lighting of the street lamps; they must proceed 
directly there and be dressed simply and decently. . . . Art. (4) They may not, in a 
single evening, leave one licensed brothel to go to another. Art. (5) Unattached 
girls must leave the licensed hrothels and return home hy eleven o'clock in the 
evening. . . . Art. (7) Licensed brothels shall he indicated by an entry light and, in 
the early hours, by an older woman tending the door. . . . Signed: Mangin." 
F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris et la police qui les regit (Paris and 



Bonuses earmarked for the brigade d'ordre: three francs for identification of a 
prostitute under the age of twenty-one; fifteen franes for identification of an illicit 
brothel; twenty-five francs for identification of a brothel of minors. Beraud, Les 



Leipzig, 1839), vol. 2, p. 133-135. 



[05,3] 



Filles publiques, <vol. 2,> pp. 138-139. 



[05,4] 



Explanations offered hy Beraud concerning his proposals for new regulations. (1) 
With respect to the old woman at the threshold: "The second paragraph prohihits 



this woman from passing beyond the doorstep, because it often happens that she 
has the audacity to step out and intercept passersby. With my own eyes I have seen 
these panders take men by the arm or by the coat and, so to speak, force them to 
enter their houses." (2) With respect to the interdiction on commerce for prosti- 
tutes: "I would also forbid the opening of stores or shops in which filles publiques 
are installed as milliners, seamstresses, sellers of perfume, and the like. Women 
who work in these stores and shops will station themselves at open doors or win- 
dows in order to send signals to passersby. . . . There are others more ingenious 
who close their doors and windows hut send signals through glass panes unpro- 
vided with curtains; or the curtains are left open just enough to permit easy com- 
munication between outside and interior. Some of these women rap against the 
front of the shop each time a man passes by, so that he returns to the spot where 
the noise was heard; and then such scandalous signs and beckonings ensue as 
could escape the attention of no one. All these shops are found in the arcades." 
F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris et la police qui les regit (Paris and 



Beraud declares liimself in favor of an unlimited number of brothels. "Art. (13) 
Every woman or girl of legal age who has suitable space in her living quarters (at 
least two rooms), and who is authorized by her husband if she is married, . . . will 
be able, as the proprietor or principal tenant of the house she inhabits, to become 
mistress of the house and to obtain a license for operating a brothel." Beraud, Les 
Filles publiques de Paris, vol. 2, p. 156. [OSa,2] 

Beraud's proposal is that every girl, even a minor, should, if she so desires, be 
registered as a prostitute. From his argument: "Your feeling of duty demands a 
continual surveillance to protect these children. ... To spurn them is to take on 
one's head all the consequences of cruel abandonment. . . . They must be regis- 
tered, then, and surrounded with all the vigilance of authority. Instead of return- 
ing them to an atmosphere of corruption, let us suhmit these hardly nubile girls to 
a regular life in a house specially designed to receive them. . . . Notify their par- 
ents. As soon as they understand that the dissolute life of their daughters will 
remain undisclosed, that it is a secret religiously guarded by the administration, 
they will consent once again to acknowledge them." Beraud, Les Filles publiques, 



"Why don't . . . the police allow . , . some of the mistresses of the better-known 
houses of prostitution to give . . . evening parties, balls, and concerts, with the 
addition of tables for ecarte? Then, at least, the sharpers could be carefully 
watched, whereas in other circles [gambling houses are meant] this is impossible, 
seeing that police action . . . there is . . . virtually nil." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles 
publiques de Paris et la police qui les regit (Paris and Leipzig, 1839), vol. 2, p. 202. 



Leipzig, 1839), vol. 2, pp. 149-150, 152-153. 



[05a,l] 



<vol. 2,> pp. 170-171. 



[05a,3] 



[06,1] 



"There are . . . epochs, seasons of the year even, which are fatal to the virtue of a 
great many young Parisiennes. During these periods, in the licensed brothels and 



elsewhere, the investigations of the police turn up many more girls engaged in illicit 
prostitution than during all the rest of the year. I have often inquired into the 
causes of these periodic surges of dehauchery, hut there isn't anyone — even in the 
administration — who can answer this question. I have to rely on my own ohserva- 
tions here, and, after much perseverance, I have finally succeeded in discovering 
the true principle of this increase in prostitution . . . at . . . certain times of the 
year. . . . With the approach of New Year's Day, of the Feast of Kings, and the 
festivals of the Virgin, . . . girls like to give and receive presents or to offer beauti- 
ful bouquets; they also want a new dress for themselves, or a hat in the newest 
fashion, and, lacking the necessary pecuniary means, . . . they turn for some days 
to prostitution to acquire such means. . . . Here, then, are the motives for the 
recrudescence in acts of debauchery at certain intervals and during certain holi- 
days." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris et la police qui les regit (Paris 
and Leipzig, 1839), vol. 1, pp. 252-254. [06,2] 

Against the medical examination at police headquarters: "Every woman seen 
walking along the Rue de Jerusalem, either to or from the police station there, is 
immediately stigmatized with the name fille publique. ... It is a regular scandal. 
On the days set aside for visits, one always finds the approaches to the station 
overrun by a large number of men awaiting the appearance of these unhappy 
creatures, knowing, as they do, that those who leave by the dispensary have been 
deemed healthy." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris, vol. 1, pp. 189- 
190. [06,3] 

The lorettes preferred the neighborhood around Notre Dame de Lorette because it 
was new, and because, as the first occupants of the recently constructed buildings, 
they paid lower rents. [06,4] 

"If it is a different sort of allure that you seek, go to the Tuileries, to the Palais- 
Royal, or to the Boulevard des Italiens. There you will see more than one urban 
siren seated on a chair, her feet resting on another chair, while beside her a third 
chair lies vacant. It is a magnet for the ladies' man. . . . The milliners' shops . . . 
likewise offer a multitude of resources for enthusiasts. There you dicker over 
hats — pink, green, yellow, lilac, or plaid. You agree on a price; you give your 
address; and next day, at the appointed hour, you see arrive at your place not only 
the hat but the girl who was positioned behind it, and who was crimping, with 
delicate fingers, the gauze, the ribbon, or some other frill so pleasing to the la- 
dies." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris; Precedees dhuie notice histo- 
rique sur la prostitution chez les divers peuples de la terre, by M.A.M., vol. 1, 
pp. cii-civ (Preface). [06a,l] 

"That the numher of filles publiques at first seems very great is •wing to a sort of 
phantasmagoria produced by the comings and goings of these women along a rou- 
tine circuit, which has the effect of multiplying them to infinity. . . . Adding to this 
illusion is the fact that, on a single evening, the fille publique very often sports 
multiple disguises. With an eye just the least hit practiced, it is easy to convince 



oneself that the woman who at eight o'clock is dressed in a rich and elegant outfit is 
the same who appears as a cheap grisette at nine, and who will show herself at ten 
in a peasant dress. It is this way at all points in the capital to which prostitutes are 
habitually drawn. For example: follow one of these girls down the boulevard, 
between the Porte Saint-Martin and the Porte Saint-Denis. She is attired for the 
nonce in a hat with feathers and a silk gown covered by a shawl. She turns into the 
Rue Saint-Martin, keeping always to the right-hand side, comes to the narrow 
streets that border the Rue Saint-Denis, and enters one of the numerous houses of 
debauchery located there. A short time later, she comes out wearing her gray gown 
or rustic weeds." F. F. A. Beraud, Les Filles publiques de Paris (Paris and Leipzig, 
1839), vol. 1, pp. 51-52. D Fashion D [06a,2] 

Les Filles de marbre <The Marble Maidens), a play in five acts, with songs, by 
MM. Theodore Barriere and Lambert Thiboust; performed for the first time, in 
Paris, at the Theatre du Vaudeville, May 17, 1853. The first act has the main 
characters appearing as ancient Greeks; the hero, Raphael, who later dies for love 
of the marble maiden, Marco, is here the sculptor Phidias, who creates the figures 
of marble. The act closes with a smile from the statues: they remained motionless 
when Phidias promised them fame, but turn smiling to Gorgias, who promises 
them money. [07,1] 

"You see, ... in Paris there are two kinds of women, just as there are two kinds of 
houses . . . : the bourgeois house, where one lives only after signing a lease, and the 
rooming house, where one lives by the month. . . . How are they to be distin- 
guished? . . . By the sign. . . . Now, the outfit is the sign of the female . . . , and 
there are outfits of such eloquence that it is ahsolutely as if you could read on the 
second floor the advertisement, 'Furnished Apartment to Let'!" Dumanoir and 
Th. Barriere, Les Toilettes tapageuses: Comedie en un acte (Paris, 1856), p. 28. 

[07,2] 

Nicknames of the drum corps at the Ecole Polytechnique around 1830: Gavotte, 
Vaudeville, Melodrame, Zephir. Around 1860: Brin d'Amour < Blade of Love), 
Cuisse de Nymphe <Nymph's Thigh >. <G.> Pinet, <Histoire de V Ecole polytech- 
nique (Paris, 1887),> p. 212. [07,3] 

Bourlier proposes that the gambling houses reopen concessions and that the re- 
ceipts be used to build an opera house — "one as magnificent as the Stock Ex- 
change" — and a hospital. Louis Bourlier, Epitre aux detracteurs du jeu (Paris, 
1831), p. vii. [07,4] 

Against the gambling firm of Benazet — which, among other things, engaged in 
illegal business practices by using, in its gambling houses, a higher exchange-rate 
on gold for its own transactions — the following tract appeared: Louis Bonrlier, 
Petition a MM. les deputes (Paris [Galeries d'Orleans], June 30, 1839). Bourlier 
was a former employee of the firm. [07,5] 



•n the floor of the Stock Exchange, as on our parquet, 

You come take your chances, wager what yon may: 

Keel and black at trente et quurunte, rise and fall at the Bourse, 

•f every loss and every gain are equally the source, 



For if playing the market is just like our roulette, 
Why proscribe the latter and the former abet? 

Louis Bourlier, Stances d V occasion de la loi qui sup prime la ferme des jeux; 
Addressees a la Chambre (Paris, 1837), <p. 5>. [07,6] 

A great print (lithograph) from 1852, Maison de jeu < Gambling House>, shows at 
center the emblematic figure of a panther or tiger, on whose coat, as though on a 
rug, the better half of a roulette table is set. Cabinet des Estampes. [07a,l] 

"Lorettes were variously priced, according to the districts in which they lived." 
Going from the cheaper to the more expensive: Rue de Grammont, Ruedu Helder, 
Rues Saint-Lazare and Chaussee-d'Antin, Faubourg du Roule. Paul d'Ariste, La 
Vie et le monde du boulevard, 1830-1870 (Paris < 1930>), pp. 255-256. [07a,2] 

"Women are not allowed in the Stock Exchange when prices are being quoted, but 
they can be seen standing around in groups outside, impatiently awaiting the great 
oracle of the day." Acht Tmge in Paris (Paris, July 1855), p. 20. [07a,3] 

"In the thirteenth arrondissement there are women who expire as they begin to 
make love; they whisper to love a last sweet nothing." Louis Lurine, Le Treizieme 
Arrondissement de Paris (Paris, 1850), pp. 219-220. A nice expression for the Lady 
of Camellias, who appeared two years later. <See Ol0a,7> [07a,4] 

At the time of the Restoration: "It was no disgrace to gamble. . . . Through the 
coming and going of soldiers, who were almost always adept at games of chance, 
the Napoleonic, wars had spread abroad the pleasure of gambling." Egon Caesar 
Conte Corti, Der Zauberer von Homburg und Monte Carlo (Leipzig <1932>), 
p. 30. [07a,5] 

January 1, 1838. "After the prohibition, the French hankers in the Palais-Royal, 
Benazet and Chabert, departed for Baden-Baden and Wieshatlen, and many em- 
ployees went to Pyrmont, Aachen, Spa, and elsewhere." Egon Caesar Conte Corti, 
Der Zauberer von Homburg und Monte Carlo (Leipzig), pp. 30-31. [07a,6] 

Front M. J . Ducos (de Gondriu), Comment on se mine a la Bourse (Paris, 1858): 
"In no way desiring to attack legitimate rights, I have nothing to say against the 
serious operations of the Stock Market, operations for which stockbrokers were 
specifically created. My criticism concerns the commissions charged on fictitious 
markets, ... as well as the usurious earnings" (p. 7). "No matter how favorahle it 
might happen to he, there is no luck, in the playing of the Stock Exchange, that 



o 



could withstand the exorbitant commissions of the stockbrokers. . . . On the 
Rhine, there are two gambling establishments (at Homburg and Wiesbaden) where 
they conduct a game of trente et quarante in which a slight commission of 62'/a 
centimes for every 100 francs is deducted in advance. . . . This is . . . one thirty- 
second of the stockbroker's commission and the earnings combined. Trente et 
quarante is played for red and black, just as on the Stock Market one plays for the 
rise and fall, with the difference that the odds are always exactly the same with the 
former and any kind of fraud is impossible — the weak, there, being not at all at the 
mercy of the strong" <p. 16>. [07a,7] 

In the provinces, speculation on the Stock Exchange was dependent on "getting 
news from Paris . . . about the fluctuations in the exchange of the most important 
stocks. . . . Special couriers and carrier pigeons had to serve this end, and one of 
the favorite methods in a France that, in those days, was dotted with windmills was 
to transmit signals from mill to mill. If the window of one of these mills was opened, 
that meant a rise in prices, and the signal was taken up by nearby mills and passed 
on; if the window remained closed, then a fall in prices was indicated. And the 
news traveled in this way, from mill to mill, out of the capital and into the prov- 
inces." The Blanc brothers, however, preferred to make use of the optical tele- 
graph, which was legally reserved for the government. "One fine day in 1834, at 
the request of an agent for Blanc, a Parisian telegraphist in an official telegram 
sent an U to Bordeaux, which was supposed to indicate a rise in stocks. In order to 
mark this letter, and also to guard against discovery, he inserted after the U a 
symbol denoting error." Difficulties cropped up along this route, and so the Blancs 
combined this method with another. "If, for example, the French stocks at 3 
percent showed an advance of at least 25 centimes, then the Paris agent for the 
Blancs, a certain Gosmand, sent a packet containing gloves to the telegraph official 
in Tours, whose name was Guibout, and who was prudently addressed on the 
parcel as a manufacturer of gloves and stockings. But if there was a decline of at 
least the same amount, then Gosmand sent stockings or neckties. The address 
written on this packet carried a letter or a number which Guibout then immedi- 
ately dispatched, together with the error symbol, in an official telegram to Bor- 
deaux." This system functioned for about two years. Reported in the Gazette des 
Tribunaux of 1837. Egon Caesar Conte Corti, Der Zauberer von Homburg unci 
Monte Carlo (Leipzig <1932>), pp. 17-19. (08,1] 

Amorous Conversations of Two Girls of the Nineteenth Century at Fireside (Rome 
and Paris: Verlag Grangazzo, Vache & Cie). Some remarkable formulations: "Ah, 
ass and cunt, how simple these words, and yet so expressive. Look at me now — 
how do you like my ass, then, and my cnnt, dear Lise?" (p. 12). "In the temple the 
sacrifice!-, in the anus the forefinger as sexton, on the clitoris two fingers as dea- 
cons; and thus I awaited the things that should come there. Tf my ass is in the right 
position, then please, my friend, begin!'"" The names of the two girls: Elise and 
Lindamine. [08,2] 



Lecomte on the fashion correspondent Constance Aubert, who had an important 
position at he Temps, and whose articles were paid for with deliveries of fashion- 
able items from the houses about which she had written: "The pen becomes a true 
source of capital which, day by day, can fix the amount of revenue one wishes to 
obtain. All of Paris becomes a bazaar where nothing escapes the hand that reaches 
for it. It's already been quite a while since this hand was extended." Jules 
Lecomte, Les Lettres de Van Engelgom, ed. Henri d'Almeras (Paris, 1925), 
p. 190. Lecomte's letters first appeared in 1837 in the Independant of Brussels. 

[08a,l] 

"It is hy the tendency of the mind called reminiscence that the wishes of the man 
condemned to the glittering captivity of cities incline . . . toward a stay in the 
country, toward his original abode, or at least toward the possession of a simple, 
tranquil garden. His eyes aspire to rest on some greenery, sufficiently far away 
from the stresses of the shop counter or the intrusive rays of the living room lamp. 
His sense of smell, continually assaulted by pestilent emanations, longs for the 
scent of flowers. A border of modest and mild violets would altogether ravish his 
senses. . . . Tliis happiness . . . denied him, he would push the illusion so far as to 
transform the ledge of his window into a hanging garden, and the mantelpiece of 
his unassuming parlor into an enamel bed of blossoms and leaves. Such is the man 
of the city, and such is the source of his passion for the flowers of the fields. . . . 
These reflections induced me to set up a number of looms on which I had weavers 
make designs imitating the flowers of nature. . . . The demand for these kinds of 
shawls was enormous. . . . They were sold before being made; the orders for their 
delivery streamed in. . . . This brilliant period of shawls, this golden age of manu- 
facture . . . did not last long, yet in France it resulted in a virtual goldmine, from 
which flowed wealth that was all the more considerable in that its main source was 
foreign. Along with the fact of this remarkable demand, it may be of interest ... to 
know in what manner it generally propagated itself. Just as I had expected, Paris 
bought up very few shawls with natural flowers represented on them. It was the 
provinces that demanded these shawls, in proportion to their distance from the 
capital; and foreign countries, in proportion to their distance from France. And 
their reign is not yet over. I still supply countries all across Europe, where there is 
hardly a chance for a shawl of cashmere hearing artificial designs. . . . On the hasis 
of what Paris did not do in the case of shawls with natural-flower designs, . . . 
couldn't one conclude, recognizing Paris as the real center of taste, that the far- 
ther one gets from this city, the closer one comes to natural inclinations and feel- 
ings; or, in other words, that taste and naturalness have, in this case, nothing in 
common — and are even mutually exclusive?" J. Rey, Manufacturer of Cashmere 
Shawls, Etudes pour servir a Vhistoire des chiles (Paris, 1823), pp. 201-202, 
204—206. The copy in the Bibliotheque Nationale contains, on the frontispiece, an 
inscription by an early reader: "This treatise on a seemingly trivial subject ... is 
remarkable for the purity and elegance of its style, as well as for an erudition 
worthy of Anarcharsis." [08a,2] 



Should the flower fashions of the Biedermeier period and the Restoration be 
linked t o a n unconscious discomfort with the growth o f the bigcides? [08a,3] 



"At the beginning of the reign of Louis Philippe, public opinion was also [like that 
of today concerning the Stock Market] opposed to games of chance. . . . The 
Chamber of Deputies . . . voted for their suppression, even though the state de- 
rived from them an annual revenue of twenty million francs. ... At the present 
time, in Paris, play on the Stock Market does not provide anything like twenty 
million per year to the government; but, on the other hand, it does produce at least 
one hundred million for those stockbrokers, outside brokers, 9 and usurers . . . 
who reported earnings . . . , raising at times the interest rate to above 20 per- 
cent. — These hundred million are won from the four or five thousand undiscern- 
ing players who, by seeking naively to take advantage of one another, get 
completely taken themselves" (that is, by the stockbrokers). M. J. Ducos (de Gon- 
drin), Comment on se mine a la Bourse (Paris, 1858), pp. v— vi. [09,1] 

During the July Revolution, the Stock Exchange was used as a military hospital 
and munitions factory. Prisoners were employed in the manufacture of grapeshot. 
See Tricotel, Esquisse de quelques scenes de Vinterieur de la Bourse <Paris, 
1830>. It was also used as a treasury. Silverware looted from the Tuileries was 
brought tbere. [09,2] 

There were shawls that took twenty-five to thirty days to weave. [09,3] 

Rey argues in favor of French cashmeres. Among other things, they have the 
advantage of being new. Which Indian shawls are not. "Need I mention all the 
revels it has witnessed, all the torrid scenes — to say no more — it has served to veil? 
Our modest and discreet Frenchwomen would be more than a little embarrassed if 
they came to know the antecedents of that shawl which makes them so happy!" 
Nevertheless, the author does not wish to endorse the opinion according to which 
all shawls have already been worn in India — a proposition just as false as that 
"which says that the tea coming out of China has already been steeped." J. Rey, 
Etudes pour servir a Vhistoire des chales (Paris, 1823), pp. 226-227. [09,4] 

The first shawls appear in France in the wake of the Egyptian campaign. 10 

[09,5] 

Onward, my sisters, march on, night and day, 
At every hour, and at every price, to make love. 
Herehelow we are constrained by fate 
To save the home and all respectable women. 



A. Barbier, Satires et poemes: Lazare (Paris, 1837), p. 271; cited in Liefde, he 
Saint-Simonisme dans la poesie franqaise <entre 1825 et 1865 (Haarlem, 1927)>, 
p. 125. [09,6] 



In the sixteenth section of Baudelaire's Spleen de Paris, "L'Horloge" <The Clock>, 
we come upon a conception of time which can be compared to that of the 
gambler. [09,7] 



Regarding the influence of fashion on erotic life, a telling observation by Eduard 
Fuchs (Die Karikatur der europauchen Volker, vol. 2 <Munich, 1921>, p. 152): 
"Women of the Second Empire do not say, 'I love him,' but rather, 'I fancy 
him' — 'J'ai un caprice pour lui." > [09,8] 

J. Pellcoq depicts the high-kicking leg in the cancan with the inscription: "Present 
arms!" Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der europdischen Volker, vol. 2, p. 171. 

[09a,l] 

"Many of the galante lithographs puhlished in the 1830s featured simultaneous 
obscene variations for the lover of directly erotic images. . . . Toward the end of 
the Thirties, these novelties passed gradually out of fashion." Eduard Fuchs, 
Illustrierte Sittengeschichte vom Mittelalter bis zur Gegenivart: Das biirgerliche 
Zeitalter, supplement (Munich), p. 309. [09a,2] 

Eduard Fuchs mentions "the appearauce of an illustrated catalogue of prostitutes, 
which could date from 1835-184.0. The catalogue in question consists of twenty 
erotiti lithographs in color, each one of which has printed at the bottom the address 
of a prostitute." Five different arcades figure among the first seven addresses in 
the catalogue. Eduard Fuchs, Illustrierte Sittengeschichte vom Mittelalter bis zur 
Gegenivart: Das biirgerliche Zeitalter, supplement (Munich), p. 157. [09a,3] 

As Engels was being trailed hy police agents, in consequence of statements made hy 
itinerant German artisans (among whom his agitation, up until the weakening of 
Grii n's position, had met with little success), he writes to Marx: "If the suspicious- 
looking individuals who have heen following me for the past fourteen days really 
are police spies, . . . then Headquarters will have handed out, of late, a good many 
admission tickets to the bals Montesquieu, Valentino, Prado, and the rest. I am 
indebted to M. Delessert for an acquaintance with some very lovely grisettes and 
for much plaisir." 11 Cited in Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich 
Engels in seiner Friihzeit, 2 ml ed. (Berlin <1933>), p. 252. 

[09a,4] 

In 1848, on a trip through France's wine-producing regions, Engels discovers 
"that each of these wines produces a different intoxication, and that with a few 
bottles you can pass through ... all intermediate stages, from the Musard qua- 
drille to the Marseillaise, from the mad gaiety of the cancan to the wild ardor of 
revolutionary fever." Cited in Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich 
Engels in seiner Friihzeit (Berlin), p. 319. 12 [09a,5] 



"After the Cafe de Paris closed in 1856, the Cafe Anglais came to occupy a position 
during the Second Empire corresponding to that of the Cafe de Paris during the 
reign of Louis Philippe. It was a tall white building with a maze of corridors and 
innumerable public and private rooms." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach and das 
Paris seiner Zeit( Amsterdam, 1937), p. 332. Ki [09a,6] 

"The factory workers in France call the prostitution of their wives and daughters 
the X' 1 ' working hour, which is literally correct." Karl Marx, Der historische Mate- 
rialismus, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig <1932>), p. 318. 1,1 [010,1] 

"The print seller . . . will provide, on request, the address of the model who has 
posed for his obscene photographs." Gabriel Pelin, Les Laideurs dn beau Paris 
(Paris, 1861), p. 153. In the shops of these imagiers, obscene pictures of individual 
models were hung in the window, while pictures of groups were found inside. 

[010,2] 

Dance halls, according to Le Caricaturiste of August 26, 1849: Salon du Sauvage, 
Salon d'Apollon, Chateau des Brouillards. Paris sons la Republique de 1848, 
Exposition of the City of Paris (Paris, 1909), p. 40. [Ol0,3] 

"The regulation of the hours of work . . . was the first rational bridle on the 
murderous, meaningless caprices of fashion — caprices that consort so badly with 
the system of modern industry." Footnote here: "John Bellers remarked as far 
back as 1699: 'The uncertainty of fashions does increase necessitous poor' (Essays 
about the Poor, Manufactures, Trade, Plantations, and Immorality, p. 9)." Karl 
Marx, Das Kapital, ed. Korsch (Berlin <1932>), p. 454. 15 [Ol0,4] 

From the Petition des filles publiques de Paris a MM. le Prefet de police etc., 
redigee par Mile. Pauline et apostillee par MM. les epiciers, cabaretiers, li- 
monadiers et marchands de comestibles de la capitale . . . : "The business in itself 
is unfortunately quite ill-paid, but with the competition of other women and of 
elegant ladies, who pay no taxes, it has become wholly unprofitable. Or are we all 
the more blameworthy because we take cash while they take cashmere shawls? The 
city charter guarantees personal freedom to everyone; if our petition to Monsieur 
le Prefet proves unavailing, then we shall . . . apply to the Chambers. Otherwise, 
it would he better to live in the kingdom of Goleonda, where girls of our sort 
formed one of the forty-four divisions of the populace and, as their sole responsi- 
bility, had only to dance before the king — which service we are prepared to render 
His Honor the prefect, should he ever wish it." Friedrich von Raumer, Briefe aus 
Paris u nd Frankreich im Jahre 1830 (Leipzig, 1831), vol. 1, pp. 206-207. 

[010,5] 

The author of the preface to Journet's Poesies speaks of "workshops involving 
different kinds of needlework, where, . . . for forty eentimes per day, the women 



and young girls with no work would . . . squander . . . their . . . health. Nearly all 
of these unfortunate women . . . are forced to fall back on the fifth quarter of their 
day." Jean Journet, Poesies et chants harmoniens (Paris: A la Lihrairie Uni- 
verselle de Joubert, 2 Passage dn Saumon, et chez l'auteur, June 1857), p. lxxi 
(Editor's preface). [Ol0,6] 

"Le Trottoir de la Rue des Martyrs" cites many of Gavami's captions but makes 
no mention at all of Guys, who nevertheless could have furnished the immediate 
model for the following description: "It is a pleasure to see them walking down 
this asphalt pavement, one side of their dress hitched up jauntily to the knee, so 
as to flash in the sun a leg fine and nervous as that of an Arabian horse, full of 
exquisite quivers and tremors, and terminating in a half-boot of irreproachable 
elegance. Wlio cares about the morality of these legs ! . . . What one wants is to 
go where they go." Alfred Delvau, Les Dessous de Paris (Paris, 1860), pp. 143-44 
("Les Trottoirs parisiens" <Parisian Sidewalks>). [O10a,l] 

Proposal of Gamin's: To use part of the proceeds from the state lottery as income 
for gamblers who have reached a certain age. [Ol0a,2] 

Lottery agents: "Their shops always have two or three exits and several compart- 
ments, so as to facilitate the overlapping operations of gambling and usury and to 
show consideration for timid customers. It is not unusual for man and wife, with- 
out suspecting a tiling, to be sitting right beside each other in these mysterious 
cubicles, which each thinks to utilize so cunningly alone." Carl Gustav Jochmann, 
Reliquien, ed. Heinrich Zschokke, vol. 2 (Hechingen, 1837), p. 44 ("Die Gliicks- 
spiele" <Games of Chance>). [Ol0a,3] 

"If it is the belief in mystery that makes believers, then there are evidently more 
believing gamblers in the world than believing worshipers." Carl Gustav 
Jochmann, Reliquien, ed. Heinrich Zschokke, vol. 2 (Hechingen, 1837), p. 46 
("Die Gliicksspiele"). [Ol0a,4] 

According to Poisson, "Memoire sur les chances que les jeux de hasarcl, adniis 
dans les maisons de jeu de Paris, presentent a la hanque" (Report on the Odds 
Presented to the Bank by the Games of Chance Operating in the Gambling Houses 
of Paris >, as read before the Academy of Sciences in 1820, the yearly turnover in 
trente-et-un was 230 million francs (bank's earnings, 2,760,000); in roulette, 100 
million francs (with the bank earning 5,000,000). See Carl Gustav Jochmann, 
Reliquien, ed. Heinrich Zschokke, vol. 2 (Hechingen, 1837), p. 51 ("Die Gliicks- 
spiele"). [Ol0a,5] 

Gambling is the inf ernal counterpart to the music of the heavenly hosts. 

[Ol0a,6] 



On Halevy's Froufrou: ''''Les Filles de marbre had introduced the age of the courte- 
san, and Froufrou marked its end. . . . Froufrou breaks down under the . . . 



strain of knowing that her life is ruined, and finally she returns to her family, a 
dying woman." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach unci das Paris seiner Zeit (Am- 
sterdam, 1937), pp. 385-386. The comedy Les Filles de marbre was an answer to 
Dumas' La Dame aux camelias of the year before. 16 [Ol0a,7] 

"The gamhler is driven by essentially narcissistic and aggressive desires for om- 
nipotence. These, insofar as they are not immediately linked to directly erotic 
desires, are characterized hy a greater temporal radius of extension. A direct 
desire for coitus may, through orgasm, he satisfied more rapidly than the narcis- 
sist-aggressive desire for omnipotence. The fact that genital sexuality, in even the 
most favorable cases, leaves a residue of dissatisfaction goes hack, in turn, to three 
facts: not all pregenital desires, such as later are subsidiary to genitality, can he 
accommodated in coitus; and from the standpoint of the Oedipus complex, the 
object is always a surrogate. Together with these two . . . considerations goes . . . 
the fact that the impossibility of acting out large-scale unconscious aggression 
contributes to the lack of satisfaction. The aggression abreacted in coitus is very 
much domesticated. . . . Thus it happens that the narcissistic and aggressive 
fiction of omnipotence becomes ahove all a cause of suffering: whoever on that 
account has experienced the mechanism of pleasure as abreacted in games of 
chance, and possessing, as it were, eternal value, succumhs the more readily to it 
in proportion as he is committed to the 'neurotic pleasure in duration' (Pfeifer); 
and, as a consequence of pregenital fixations, he is less able to assimilate such 
pleasure to normal sexuality. ... It should also be borne in mind that, according 
to Freud, the sexuality of human beings bears the stamp of a function that dwin- 
dles, whereas this cannot in any way be predicated of the aggressive and narcissis- 
tic tendencies." Edmund Bergler, "Zur Psychologie des Hasardspielers," Imago, 
22, no. 4(1936), pp. 438-440. [Oll.l] 

"The game of chance represents the only occasion on which the pleasure principle, 
and the omnipotence of its thoughts and desires, need not be renounced, and on 
which the reality principle offers no advantages over it. In this retention of the 
infantile fiction of omnipotence lies posthumous aggression against the . . . author- 
ity which has 'inculcated' the reality principle in the child. This unconscious 
aggression, together with the operation of the omnipotence of ideas and the experi- 
ence of the socially viable repressed exhibition, conspires to form a triad of pleas- 
ures in gambling. This triad stands opposed to a triad of punishments constituted 
from out of the unconscious desire of loss, the unconscious homosexual desire for 
domination, and the defamation of society. ... At the deepest level, the game of 
chance is love's will to be extorted by an unconscious masochistic design. This is 
why the gambler always loses in the long run." Edmund Bergler, "Zur Psychologie 
des Hasardspielers," Imago, 22, no. 4 (1936), p. 440. [Oil, 2] 

Brief account of Ernst Simmel's ideas on the psychology of the gamhler: "The 
insatiable greed that finds no rest within an unending vicious circle, where loss 
becomes gain and gain hecomes loss, is said to arise from the narcissistic compul- 



sion to fertilize and give birth to oneself in an anal birth fantasy, surpassing and 
replacing one's own father and mother in an endlessly escalating process. 'Thus, 
in the last analysis, the passion for gambling satisfies the claim of the bisexual 
ideal, which the narcissist discovers in himself; at stake is the formation of a 
compromise between masculine and feminine, active and passive, sadistic and 
masochistic; and in the end it is the unresolved decision between genital and anal 
libido that confronts the gambler in the well-known symbolic colors of red and 
black. The passion for gambling thus serves an autoerotic satisfaction, wherein 
betting is foreplay, winning is orgasm, and losing is ejaculation, defecation, and 
castration. 1 " Edmund Bergler, "Zur Psychologie des Hasardspielers," Imago, 22, 
no. 4 (1936), pp. 409-410; with reference to Ernst Simmel, "Zur Psychoanalyse 
des Spielers "Internationale Zeitschriftfiir Psychoanalyse, 6 (1920), p. 397. 

[Olla.l] 

With the discovery of Tahiti, declares Fourier, with the example of an order in 
which "large-scale industry" is compatible with erotic freedom, "conjugal slav- 
ery" has become unendurahle.' 7 [OHa,2] 

Apropos of Freud's conjecture that sexuality is a dwindling function "of" the 
human being, Brecht remarked on how the bourgeoisie in decline differs from 
the feudal class at the time of its downfall: it feels itself to be in all things the 
quintessence of humankind in general, and hence can equate its own decline with 
the death of humanity. (Tbis equation, moreover, can play a part in the unmistak- 
able crisis of sexuality within the bourgeoisie.) The feudal class, by virtue of 
privileges, felt itself to be a class apart, which corresponded to the reality. That 
enabled it, in its waning, to manifest some elegance and insouciance. [OHa,3] 

Love for the prostitute is the apotheosis of empathy with the commodity. 

[OHa,4] 

Magistrate of Paris! March with the system, 
Pursue the good work of Mangin and Belleyme: 
Design, as chateaux for the filthy Phrynes, 
Pestilent, lonely, and dark qumrtiers. 

<Auguste-Marseille> Barthelemy, Paris: Revue satirique a M. G. Delessert (Paris, 
1828), p. 22. [012,1] 

A description of the lower class of prostitute that had settled in the vicinity of the 
city gate, the barriere. It comes from Du Camp, and would make an excellent 
caption for many of Guys's watercolors: "If one pushes open the barrier and the 
door that closes the entrance, one finds oneself in a bar furnished with marble or 
wooden tables and lighted by gas; through the clouds of smoke given off by the 
pipes, one distinguishes garbage men, diggers, carters — drinkers, for the most 
part — seated before a flask of absinthe and talking to creatures who are as gro- 
tesque as they are pitiable. All of these creatures are dressed, in almost the same 



way, in that red cotton fabric that is dear to African Negroes, and out of which 
the curtains in little provincial inns are made. What covers them cannot be called 
a dress; it is a beltless smock, puffed up with a crinoline. Exposing the shoulders 
with an outrageously low cut, and coming just to the level of the knees, this outfit 
gives them the look of large, inflated children, prematurely aged and glistening 
with fat, wrinkled, dazed, and with those pointed heads that are the sign of 
imbecility. When the inspectors, checking the registration book, call them and 
they get up to reply, they have all the charm of a circus dog." Maxime Du Gamp, 
Paris: Ses organes, ses fonctions et sa vie dans la seconde moitie du XIX siecle, vol. 3 
(Paris, 1872), p. 447 ("La Prostitution"). (012,2) 

"The basic principle ... of gambling . . . consists in this: . . . that each round is 
independent of the one preceding. . . . Gambling strenuously denies all acquired 
conditions, all antecedents . . . pointing to previous actions; and that is what dis- 
tinguishes it from work. Gamhling rejects . . . this weighty past which is the main- 
stay of work, and which makes for seriousness of purpose, for attention to the long 
term, for right, and for power. . . . The idea of beginning again, . . . and of doing 
better, . . . occurs often to one for whom work is a struggle; but the idea is . . . 
useless, . . . and one must stumble on with insufficient results." Alain <Emile- 
Auguste Chartier>, Les Idees et les ages < Paris, 1927 >, vol. 1, pp. 183-184 ("Le 
Jeu"). [Ol2,3] 

The lack of consequences that defines the character of the isolated experience 
<Erlebnis> found drastic expression in gambling. During the feudal age, the latter 
was essentially a privilege of the feudal class, which did not participate directly in 
the production process. What is new is that in the nineteenth century the bour- 
geois gambles. It was above all the Napoleonic armies that, on their campaigns, 
became the agents of gambling f or the bourgeoisie. [ 0 1 2 a , 1 ] 

The significance of the temporal element in the intoxication of the gambler has 
been noticed before this by Gourdon, as well as by Anatole France. But these two 
writers see only the meaning time has for the gambler's pleasure in his winnings, 
which, quickly acquired and quickly surrendered, multiply themselves a hun- 
dredfold in his imagination through the numberless possibilities of expenditure 
remaining open and, above all, through the one real possibility of wager, of mi se 
en jeu. What meaning the factor of time might have for the process of gambling 
itself is at issue in neither Gourdon nor France. And the pastime of gambling is, 
in fact, a singular matter. A game passes the time more quickly as chance comes 
to light more absolutely in it, as the number of combinations encountered in the 
course of play (of coups) is smaller and their sequence shorter. In other words, the 
greater the component of chance in a game, the more speedily it elapses. This 
state of affairs becomes decisive in the disposition of what comprises the authen- 
tic "intoxication" of the gambler. Such intoxication depends on the peculiar 
capacity of the game to provoke presence of mind through the fact that, in rapid 
succession, it brings to the fore constellations which work — each one wholly 



independent of the others — to summon up in every instance a thoroughly new, 2 

original reaction from the gambler. This fact is mirrored in the tendency of _^ 

gamblers to place their bets, whenever possible, at the very last moment — the ^ 

moment, moreover, when only enough room remains for a purely reflexive >jj 

move. Such reflexive behavior on the part of the gambler rules out an "interpre- 8 
tation" of chance. The gambler's reaction to chance is more like that of the knee 

to the hanuner in the patellar reflex. [Ol2a,2] § 



The superstitious man will be on the lookout for hints; the gambler will react to 
them even before they can be recognized. To have foreseen a winning play 
without having made the most of it will cause the uninitiated to think that he is 
"in luck" and has only to act more quickly and courageously the next time 
around. In reality, this occurrence signals the fact that the sort of motor reflex 
which chance releases in the lucky gambler failed to materialize. It is only when it 
does not take place that "what is about to happen" as such, comes clearly to 
consciousness. [Ol3,l] 

Only the future that has not entered as such into his consciousness is parried by 
the gambler. [Ol3,2] 

The proscription of gambling could have its deepest roots in the fact that a 
natural gift of humanity, one which, directed toward the highest objects, elevates 
the human being beyond himself, only drags him down when applied to one of 
the meanest objects: money. The gift in question is presence of mind. Its highest 
manifestation is the reading that in each case is divinatory. [Ol3,3] 

The peculiar feeling of happiness in the one who wins is marked by the fact that 
money and riches, otherwise the most massive and burdensome things in the 
world, come to him from the fates like a joyous embrace returned to the full. 
They can be compared to words of love from a woman altogether satisfied by her 
man. Gamblers are types to whom it is not given to satisfy the woman. Isn't Don 
Juan a gambler? [Ol3,4] 

"During the period of facile optimism, such as radiated from the pen of an Alfred 
Capus, it was customary on the boulevard to attribute everything to luck." 
Gaston Rageot, "Qu'est-ce qu'un evenement?," Le Temps, April 16, 1939. — The 
wager is a means of conferring shock value on events, of loosing them from the 
contexts of experience. 18 It is not by accident that people bet on the results of 
elections, on the outbreak of war, and so on. For the bourgeoisie, in particular, 
political affairs easily take the form of events on a gaming table. This is not so 
much the case for the proletarian. He is better positioned to recognize constants 
in the political process. [013,5] 



The Cemetery of the Innocents as promenade. "Such was the place which the 
Parisians of the fifteenth century frequented as a sort of lugubrious counterpart to 



the Palais-Royal of 1789. ... In spite of the incessant burials and exhumations 
going on there, it was a public lounge and a rendezvous. Shops were established 
before the charnel houses, and prostitutes strolled under the cloisters." J. Huiz- 
inga, Herbst des Mittelalters (Munich, 1928), p. 210. 19 [013a,l] 

Are fortunetelling cards more ancient than playing cards? Does the card game 
represent a pejoration of divinatory technique? Seeing the future is certainly 
crucial in card games, too. [013a,2] 

Money is what gives life to number; money is what animates the marble maiden 
(see07,l). [013a,3] 

Gracian's maxim — "In all things, know how to win time to your side" — will be 
understood by no one better and more gratefully than the one to whom a 
long-cherished wish has been granted. With this, compare the magnificent defini- 
tion which Joubert gives of such time. It defines, contrariwise, the gambler's 
time: "There is time even in eternity; but it is not a terrestrial or worldly time. . . . 
It destroys nothing; it completes." J. Joubert, Pensees (Paris, 1883), vol. 2, p. 162. 

[013a,4] 

Concerning the heroic element in gambling — as it were, a corollary to Baude- 
laire's poem "Le Jeu": "A thought which regularly crosses my mind at the gam- 
bling table . . . : What if one were to store up all the energy and passion . . . which 
every year is squandered ... at the gaming tables of Europe — would one have 
enough to make a Roman people out of it, and a Roman history? But that's just 
it. Because each man is born a Roman, bourgeois society aims to de-Romanize 
him, and thus there are games of chance and games of etiquette, novels, Italian 
operas and stylish gazettes, casinos, tea parties and lotteries, years of apprentice- 
ship and travel, military reviews and changing of the guard, ceremonies and 
visits, and the fifteen or twenty close-fitting garments which daily, with a salutary 
loss of time, a person has to put on and take off again — all these have been 
introduced so that the overabundant energy evaporates unnoticed!" Ludwig 
Bome, Gesammelte Schriften (Hamburg and Frankfurt am Main, 1862), vol. 3, 
pp. 38-39 ("Das Gastmahl der Spieler" <Gamblers' Banquet>). [013a,5] 

"But can you realize what delirium, what frenzy, possesses the mind of a man 
impatiently waiting for a gambling den to open? Between the evening gambler and 
the morning gambler the same difference exists as between the nonchalant hus- 
band and the ecstatic lover waiting under his mistress's window. It is only in the 
morning that quivering passion and stark need manifest themselves in all their 
horror. At that time of day, you can stare in wonderment at the true gambler — one 
who has not eaten or slept, lived or thought, so cruelly has he been scourged by the 
lash of his vice. ... At that baleful hour, you will meet with eyes whose steady calm 
is frightening, with faces that hold you spellbound; you will intercept gazes which 
lift the cards and greedily peer beneath them. Gaming-houses then reach sublimity 



only at opening time." Balzac, La Peau de chagrin, Editions Flammarion (Paris), 
p. 7. 20 [014,1] 

Prostitution opens a market in feminine types. [014,2] 

On gambling: the less a man is imprisoned in the bonds of fate, the less he is 
determined by what lies nearest at hand. [014,3] 

The ideal of the shock-engendered experience <Erlebnis> is the catastrophe. This 
becomes very clear in gambling: by constantly raising the stakes, in hopes of 
getting back what is lost, the gambler steers toward absolute ruin. [014,4] 



p 

[The Streets of Paris] 

In short, the streets of Paris 
Were set to rhyme. Hear how. 

— Beginning of Dit des rues de Paris, by Guillot (Paris, 1875), with 
preface, notes, and glossary by Edgar Marcuse (first word of the 
second line in the original: "Was") 

We leave an imprint each time we enter into a history. 1 



They spoke of Paris as la ville qui remue — the city that never stops moving. But 
no less important than the life of this city's layout is here the unconquerable 
power in the names of streets, squares, and theaters, a power which persists in the 
face of all topographic displacement. Those little theaters which, in the days of 
Louis Philippe, still lined the Boulevard du Temple — how often has one of them 
been torn down, only to resurface, newly built, in some other quartier. (To speak 
of "city districts" is odious to me.) How many street names, even today, preserve 
the name of a landed proprietor who, centuries earlier, had his demesne on their 
ground. The name "Chateau d'Eau," referring to a long-vanished fountain, still 
haunts various arrondusements today. Even the better-known eating estab- 
lishments are, in their way, assured of their small municipal immortality — to say 
nothing of the great literary immortality attaching to the Rocher de Cancall, the 
\€four, the Trois Freres Provencaux. For hardly has a name made its way in the 
field of gastronomy, hardly has a Vatel or a Riche achieved its fame, than all of 
Paris, including the suburbs, is teeming with Petits Vatels and Petits Riches. Such 
is the movement of the streets, the movement of names, which often enough run 
at cross-purposes to one another. [Pl,l] 

And then the timeless little squares that suddenly are there, and to which no 
name attaches. They have not been the object of careful planning, like the Place 
\endome or the Place des Greves, and do not enjoy the patronage of world 
history, but owe their existence to houses that have slowly, sleepily, belatedly 
assembled in response to the summons of the centuiy. In such squares, the trees 
hold sway; even the smallest afford thick shade. Later, however, in the gaslight, 
their leaves have the appearance of dark-green frosted glass near the street lamps, 



and their earliest green glow at dusk is the automatic signal for the start of spring 
in the big city. [Pl,2] 



The Quartier de l'Europe already existed as a project, incorporating the names of 



On February 4, 1805, houses were first numbered, by imperial decree. Previous 
attempts to do this — in January 1726 — had met with violent resistance. Owners of 
houses declared themselves ready to number the side entrances, but not their 
carriage entrances. The Revolution had already introduced the numbering of 
houses according to districts; in some districts, there were 1,500-2,000 numbers. 



After the assassination of Marat, Montmartre was renamed Mont-Marat. [PI, 5] 

The function of the saints in the naming of Parisian streets suddenly became 
clear during the Revolution. To be sure, the Rues Saint-Honore, Saint-Roch, and 
Saint- Antoine were, for a while, known as Honore, Roch, and Antoine, but it 
could not take hold; a hiatus had opened up that to the ear of the Frenchman was 
unendurable. [PI, 6] 

"An enthusiast of the Revolution once proposed transforming Paris into a map of 
the world: all streets and squares were to be rechristened and their new names 
drawn from noteworthy places and things across the world." Pursue this in 
imagination and, from the surprising impression made by such an optical- 
phonetic image of the city, you will recognize the great importance of street 
names. Pinkerton, Mercier, and C. F. Cramer, Ansichten der Hauptstadt des fran- 
zbsuchen Kauerreichs vomjahre 1806 an, vol. 1 (Amsterdam, 1807), p. 100 (ch. 8, 
"Neologie," by Pinkerton). [Pl,7] 

There is a peculiar voluptuousness in the naming of streets. [PI ,8] 

"The name La Roquette, given to two prisons, a street, and an entire district, 
comes from the plant of that name (Eruca sativa), which used to flourish in for- 
merly uninhabited areas." La Grande Roquette was, for a long time, the prison in 
which those sentenced to death awaited the outcome of their appeal. Maxime Du 
Camp, Paris, vol. 3, p. 264. [Pl,9] 

The sensuality in street names — certainly the only sort which citizens of the 
town, if need be, can still perceive. For what do we know of streetcorners, curb- 
stones, the architecture of the pavement — we who have never felt heat, filth, and 
the edges of the stones beneath our naked soles, and have never scrutinized die 
uneven placement of the paving stones witii an eye toward bedding down on 



the European capitals, in 1820. 



[Pl,3] 



[P1.4] 



them. 



[PU«] 



"Pont d'Austerlitz! Its famous name evokes for me something quite other than the 
battle. Despite what people have maintained to me, and which I accept for form's 
sake, it was the battle that took its name from the bridge. An explanation for this 
took shape in my mind on the basis of my reveries, my recollection of distracted 
schooldays, and analogies in the savor and sound of certain words. As a child, I 
always kept this explanation under my hat; it was part of my secret language. And 
here it is: at the time of wars, crusades, and revolutions, on the eve of battle, the 
warriors would proceed with their ensigns to this bridge, old as the hills, and 
there, in all solemnity, would drink a cup of austerlitz. This austerlitz, formidable 
brew, was quite simply the hydromel of our ancestors, the Gauls, but more bitter 
and more filled with seltzer." Charles Vildrac < Charles Messager>, <Les> Ponts de 
Paris < Paris, ca. 1930 >. [Pla,l] 

Excursus on the Place du Maroc. Not only city and interior but city and open air 
can become entwined, and this intertwining can occur much more concretely. 
There is the Place du Maroc in Belleville: that desolate heap of stones with its 
rows of tenements became for me, when I happened on it one Sunday afternoon, 
not only a Moroccan desert but also, and at the same time, a monument of 
colonial imperialism; topographic vision was entwined with allegorical meaning 
in this square, yet not for an instant did it lose its place in the heart of Belleville. 
But to awaken such a view is something ordinarily reserved for intoxicants. And 
in such cases, in fact, street names are like intoxicating substances that make our 
perceptions more stratified and richer in spaces. One could call the energy by 
which they transport us into such a state their vertu evocatrice, their evocative 
power — but that is saying too little; for what is decisive here is not the association 
but the interpenetration of images. This state of affairs may be adduced, as well, 
in connection with certain pathological phenomena : the patient who wanders the 
city at night for hours on end and forgets the way home is perhaps in the grip of 
this power. [Pla,2] 

Street names in Jean Brunet, he Messianisme — organisation generate de Paris: 
Sa constitution generate, part 1 (Paris, 1858): Boulevard of Financiers, Boule- 
vard of Jewelers, Boulevard of Merchants, Boulevard of Manufacturers, Boule- 
vard of Metalworkers, Boulevard of Dyers, Boulevard of Printers, Boulevard of 
Students, Boulevard of Writers, Boulevard of Artists, Boulevard of Administra- 
tors. — Quartier Louis XIV (detailed argument for this name, p. 32, involving "em- 
bellishment" of the Saint-Martin and Saint-Denis gateways): Confection Street, 
Exportation Square, Ceramics Street, Bookbinding Street. [Pla,3] 

"I read of a geographic scheme in which Paris would be the map, and hackney 
coaches the professors. Certainly, I would rather have Paris be a geographic map 
than a volume in the Roman calendar; and the names of saints, with which the 
streets are baptized, cannot compare, in either euphony or utility, with the names 
of the towns that have been proposed as substitutes for them. Thus, the Faubourg 
Saint-Denis, according to this plan, would be called the Faubourg de Valenci- 



ennes; the Faubourg Saint-Marceau would become the Faubourg de Marseille; the 
Place de Greves would be known as the Place de Tours or de Bourges; and so on." 
Mercier, Le Nouveau Paris <Paris, 1800> , vol. 5, p. 75. [Pla,4] 



Rue des Immeubles Industriels — How old is this street? [Pla,5] 

A surprising argument, a hundred years ago, in favor of an American system for 
demarcating streets: "You poor professors, who teach moral philosophy and 
belles lettres! Your names are posted in small black letters on a streetcorner, above 
a milestone. The name of this jeweler is as dazzling as a thousand fires — it shines 
like the sun. It is for sale, but it is expensive." Mercier, Le Nouveau Paris, vol. 4, 
pp. 74-75. [PI a, 6] 

Apropos of the theory of street names: "Proper names, too, have an effect that is 
conceptually unburdened and purely acoustic. . . . To borrow an expression from 
Curtius (p. 65), proper names are "bare formulas" which Proust can nil up with 
feelings because they have not yet been rationalized by language." Leo Spitzer, 
Stilstudien (Munich, 1928), vol. 2, p. 434. [Pla,7) 

"Street," to be understood, must be profiled against the older term "way." With 
respect to their mythological natures, the two words are entirely distinct. The 
way brings with it the terrors of wandering, some reverberation of which must 
have struck the leaders of nomadic tribes. In the incalculable turnings and resolu- 
tions of the way, there is even today, for the solitary wanderer, a detectable trace 
of the power of ancient directives over wandering hordes. But the person who 
travels a street, it would seem, has no need of any way wise guiding hand. It is not 
in wandering that man takes to the street, but rather in submitting to the monoto- 
nous, fascinating, constantly unrolling band of asphalt. The synthesis of these 
twin terrors, however — monotonous wandering — is represented in the labyrinth. 
D Antiquity D [P2,l] 

Whoever wishes to know how much at home we are in entrails must allow 
himself to be swept along in delirium through streets whose darkness greatly 
resembles the lap of a whore. D Antiquity D [P2,2] 

How names in the city, though, first become potent when they issue within the 
labyrinthine halls of the Metro. Troglodytic kingdoms — thus they hover on the 
horizon: Solferino, Italie and Rome, Concorde and Nation. Difficult to believe 
that up above they all run out into one another, that under the open sky it all 
draws together. D Antiquity D [P2,3] 

The true expressive character of street names can be recognized as soon as they 
are set beside reformist proposals for their normalization. For example, Pujoulx's 
proposal for naming the streets of Paris after the cities and localities of France, 
taking into consideration their geographic positions relative to one another, as 



well as their population, and having regard for rivers and mountains, whose 
names would go especially to long streets which cross several districts — all of this 
"in order to provide an ensemble such that a traveler could acquire geographic 
knowledge of France within Paris and, reciprocally, of Paris within France." J. B. 
Pujoulx, Paris a la Jin du dix-huitieme siecle (Paris, 1801), p. 81. D Flanerie D 

[P2,4] 

"Seventeen of the gates correspond to imperial routes. ... In these names, one 
would seek in vain for a general system. What are Antihes, Toulouse, and Bale 
doing there beside La Villette and Saint-Ouen? ... If one had wanted to establish 
some distinctions, one could have given to each gate the name of the French city 
most distant in that direction." E. de Lahedolliere, Histoire du nouvemu (Paris), 
p. 5. [P2,5] 

"Some beneficial measures by the municipal magistracy date from the time of the 
Empire. On November 3, 1800, there was, by decree, a general revision of street 
names. Most of the grotesque vocables invented by the Revolution disappeared. 
The names of politicians were almost all replaced by the names of military men." 
Lucien Dubech and Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 336. 

[P2,6] 



"In 1802, in various neighborhoods — Rue du Mont-Blanc, Chaussee d'Antin — 
sidewalks were built, with an elevation of three or four inches. There was then an 
effort to get rid of the gutters in the center of the streets." Lucien Dubech and 
Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 336. [P2,7] 

"In 1805, the new system of sequential numhering of houses, begun on the initia- 
tive of Frochot and still in effect today: even numbers separated from odd, the 
even numbers on the right and the odd on the left, according as one moves away 
from the Seine or follows its course. The numbers were white and were placed on a 
red background in streets parallel to the river, on a black background in streets 
perpendicular to it." Lucien Dubech and Pierre d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris 
(Paris, 1926), p. 337. [P2,8] 

Around 1830: "The Chaussee d'Antin is the neighborhood of the nouveaux riches 
of the financial world. All these districts in the western part of town have been 
discredited: the city planners of the period believed that Paris was going to develop 
in the direction of the saltpeter works, an opinion that ought to instill prudence in 
today's developers. ... A lot on the Chaussee d'Antin had trouble finding a buyer 
at 20,000 to 25,000 francs." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 
1926), p. 364. [P2a,l] 



July Monarchy: "While most of the street names recalling political events were 
done away with, new ones appeared commemorating a date: the Rue du 29 Juil- 
let." Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 389. [P2a,2] 



"I know nothing more ridiculous and more inconsistent than the names of streets, 
squares, blind alleys, and culs-de-sac in Paris. Let us choose at random some of 
these names in one of the more beautiful neighborhoods, and we cannot but note 
this incoherence and caprice. I arrive by the Rue Croix-des-Petits-Champs; I 
cross the Place des Victoires; I turn into the Rue Vuide-Gousset, which takes me to 
the Passage des Petits-Peres, from which it is only a short distance to the Palais- 
Egalite. What a salmagundi! The first name calls to mind a cult object and a rustic 
landscape; the second offers military triumphs; the third, an ambush; the fourth, 
the memory of a nickname given to a monastic order; and the last, a word which 
ignorance, intrigue, and ambition have taken turns abusing." J. B. Pujoulx, Paris 
a la fin du XVIII* siecle (Paris, 1801), pp. 73-74. [P2a,3] 

"Two steps from the Place de la Bastille in the Faubourg Saint-Antoine, people still 
say, 'I am going to Paris'. . . . This suburb has its own mores and customs, even its 
own language. The municipality has numbered the houses here, as in all other 
parts of Paris; but if you ask one of the inhabitants of this suburb for his address, 
he will always give you the name his house bears and not the cold, official num- 
ber. . . . This house is known by the name 'To the King of Siam,' that by 'Star of 
Gold' ; this house is called 'Court of the Two Sisters, 1 and that one is called 'Name 
of Jesus'; others carry the name 'Basket of Flowers,' or 'Saint Esprit,' or 'Bel 
Air,' or 'Hunting Box,' or 'The Good Seed.'" Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der 
franzdsischenArbeiterassociationen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 3, p. 126. [P2a,4] 

Excerpt from a proposal for naming streets which presumably stems from the 
Revolution: "Someone . . . proposed giving streets and alleys the names of virtues 
and generous sentiments, without reflecting that this moral nomenclature was too 
limited for the great number of streets to be found in Paris. . . . One senses that in 
this project there was a certain logic in the arrangement of names; for example, the 
Rue de la Justice, or that of V 'Humanite, had necessarily to lead to the Rue du 
Bonheur, . . . while the Rue de la Probite . . . had to cross all of Paris in leading to 
the most beautiful neighborhoods." J. B. Pujoulx, Paris a la fin du XV I IP siecle 
(Paris, 1801), pp. 83-84. [P2a,5] 

Concerning the magic of street names. Delvau on the Place Maubert: "It is not a 
square; it is a large blot, so full of filth and mire that even the lips sully themselves 
in pronouncing this name from the thirteenth century — not because it is old but 
because it exhales an odor of iniquity . . . which shocks the sense of smell." 
A. Delvau, Les Dessous de Paris (Paris, 1866), p. 73. [P2a,6] 

"It is not superfluous to observe that a foreigner, who, on arriving in a city, starts 
out everywhere judging by appearances, could well suppose, in coming upon these 
unsystematic and insignificant street names, that the reasoning of those who live 
here was no less loosely connected; and, certainly, if several streets presented him 
with base or obscene names, he would have grounds for believing in the immorality 



of the inhabitants." J. B. Pujoulx, Paris a la fin du XVIII" siecle (Paris, 1801), 



Rationalism took particular offense at names like Rue des Mauvais-Garcons, Rue 
Tire-Boudin, Rue Mauvaises-Paroles, Rue Femme-sans-Tete, Rue du Chat qui 
Peche, Rue Courtaud-Villain. 2 It is such places that are frequented, says Pujoulx, 



"What a pleasure for the resident of the South of France to rediscover, in the 
names of the various districts of Paris, those of the place where he was born, of the 
town where his wife came into the world, of the village where he spent his early 
years." J. B. Pujoulx, Paris a la fin du XVIII' siecle (Paris, 1801), p. 82. [P3,3] 

"The hawkers choose their newspapers according to which neighborhoods they 
want to work in, and even within these areas there are nuances that must be 
distinguished. One street reads he Peuple, while another will have only La 
Reforme, but the street perpendicular to these, which connects them, takes L 'As- 
sembles nationale, or perhaps L'Union. A good hawker ought to be able to tell 
you, with an eye to the promises made by all the aspiring legislators and written 
upon our walls, what percentage of the vote in a particular arrondissement each of 
these political mendicants can expect to have." A. Privat d'Anglemont, Paris in- 
connu (Paris, 1861), p. 154. D Flaneur D [P3,4] 

What was otherwise reserved for only a very few words, a privileged class of 
words, the city has made possible for all words, or at least a great many: to be 
elevated to the noble status of name. This revolution in language was carried out 
by what is most general: the street. — Through its street names, the city is a 
linguistic cosmos. [P3,5] 

Apropos of Victor Hugo's "command of image. The few insights we have into his 
methods of composition conlirm that the faculty of interior evocation was much 
stronger in him than in other people. This is why he was able — from memory, and 
without taking any notes — to describe the quartier of Paris through which Jean 
Valjean escapes in Les Miserables; and this description is strictly accurate, street 
by street, house by house." Paul Bourget, obituary notice for Victor Hugo in the 
Journal des debuts: "Victor Hugo devant l'opinion" (Paris, 1885), p. 91. [P3,6] 

On an etching: "Rue Tirechape — in 1863 as it was in 1200." Cabinet des 
Estampes. [P3,7] 

In an engraving from 1830, one can see a man seated on a tree trunk in the 
Boulevard Saint-Denis. [P3,8] 



p. 77. 



[P3,l] 



by those who won't listen to his proposals. 



[P3,2] 



In 1865, *n the Boulevard des Capucines, at the corner of the Rue de Seze and the 
Rue Caumartin, the first ivfuge, or street-island, was installed. [P3a,l] 



"The way the cutups go to make faces at the entrance to the morgue; the way the 
showoffs come there to recite their grotesque jokes ... in such a place; the way the 
crowd . . . gathers around to laugh their lill at the often indecent antics of a 
juggler, after gaping at five cadavers laid out side by side. . . . Now, that's what I 
call revolting . . . !" Victor Fournel, Ce qu 'on voit dans les rues de Paris (Paris, 
1858), p. 355 ("La Morgue"). [P3a,2] 

Ghosts of the city: "Romanticism on the decline . . . delights in legends. While 
George Sand, dressed as a man, supposedly rides on horseback across Paris in the 
company of Lamartine, dressed as a woman, Dumas has his novels written in 
cellars and drinks champagne upstairs with various actresses. Or, better yet, Du- 
mas does not exist; he is only a mythical being, a trade name invented by a syndi- 
cate of editors." J. Lucas-Dubreton, La Vie d'Alexandre Dumas Pere (Paris 
<1928>), p. 141. [P3a,3] 

"Here, then, ... is the . . . Dictionnaire de la langue verte < Dictionary of Slang > , 
of which I would like people to say . . . what was said of Sebastien Mercier's 
Tableau de Paris — namely, that it was conceived in the street and written on a 
milestone." Alfred Delvau, Dictionnaire de la langue verte (Paris, 1866), p. iii. 

[P3a,4] 

A nice description of elegant neighborhoods: "the nobiUty, silently bunkered in 
these cloistral streets as in an immense and splendid monastery of peace and 
refuge." Paul-Ernest Rattier, Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 1857), p. 17. [P3a,5] 

Around 1860, the Paris bridges were still insufficient for the traffic between the 
two banks; there was frequent recourse to ferries. The fare for this service was two 
sous; proletarians, therefore, could only rarely make use of it. (From P.-E. Rat- 
tier, Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 1857), pp. 49-50. [P3a,6] 

"In Hugo, the Vendome Column, the Arc de Triomphe, and the Invalides go hand 
in hand, if I may put it this way. There is a historical and political, a real and 
literary connection among these three monuments. Today, . . . the position of these 
three terms, their relation, has changed. The Column has been effectively sup- 
planted, in spite of Vuillaume. And it is the Pantheon that has come, as it were, to 
replace it — especially since Hugo's success in bringing it to yield, so to speak, to 
the great men. Today, the trilogy of monuments is the Arc de Triomphe, the Pan- 
theon, and the Church of the Invalides." Charles Peguy, Oeuvres completes, 
1873-1914: Oeuvres de prose (Paris, 1916), p. 419 ("Victor-Marie, Comte Hugo"). 
<See C6; C6a,l, section IIL> [P3a,7] 

"The true Paris is by nature a dark, miry, malodorous city, confined within its 
narrow lanes, . . . swarming with bUnd alleys, culs-de-sac, and mysterious pas- 
sages, with labyrinths that lead you to the devil; a city where the pointed roofs of 
the somber houses join together up there near the clouds and thus begrudge you 



the bit of blue which the northern sky would give in alms to the great capital. . . . 
The true Paris is full of freak shows, repositories at three centimes a night for 
unheard-of beings and human phantasmagorias. . . . There, in a cloud of ammo- 
niac vapor, . . . and on beds that have not been made since the Creation, reposing 
side by side are hundreds, thousands, of charlatans, of match sellers, of accordion 
players, of hunchbacks, of the blind and the lame; of dwarfs, legless cripples, and 
men whose noses were bitten off in quarrels, of rubber- jointed men, clowns mak- 
ing a comeback, and sword swallowers; of jugglers who balance a greasy pole on 
the tips of their teeth . . . ; children with four legs, Basque giants and other kinds, 
Tom Thumb in his twentieth reincarnation, plant-people whose hand or arm is the 
soil of a living tree, which sprouts each year its crown of branches and leaves; 
walking skeletons, transparent humans made of light . . . and whose faint voice 
can make itself heard to an attentive ear . . . ; orangutans with human intelligence; 
monsters who speak French." Paul-Ernest de Rattier, Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 
1857), pp. 12, 17-19. To be compared with this are Hugo's drawings, and also 
Haussmann's vision of Paris. [P4,l] 

Fate of the republican opposition under Guizot. "L' Emancipation, of Toulouse, 
cites the words of a conservative to whom someone had expressed pity for the 
plight of those political prisoners languishing behind bars: 'I will feel sorry for 
them when mushrooms begin growing on their backs.'" Jean Skerlitch, L'Opinion 
publique en France d'apres la poesie politique et sociale de 1830 m 1848 
< Lausanne, 1901 > , pp. 162-163. [P4,2] 

"With this magic title of Paris, a play or review or book is always assured of 
success." Theophile Gautier, first sentence of the Introduction to Paris et les 
Parisiens au XIX" siecle (Paris, 1856), p. i. [P4,3] 

"The universe does nothing but gather the cigar hutts of Paris." Theophile Gau- 
tier, Introduction, Paris et les Parisiens au XIX" siecle (Paris, 1856), p. iii. [P4,4] 

"A long time ago, someone had the idea of peopling the Champs-Elysees with 
statues. The moment for this has still not arrived." Th. Gautier, "Etudes philoso- 
phiques," Paris et les Parisiens auXIH'' <siecle,> p. 27. [P4,5] 

"Thirty years ago ... it was still . . . virtually the sewer it had been in ancient 
times. A very large numher of streets, whose surface is now crowned, were then 
hollow causeways. You very often saw, at the low point where the gutters of a street 
or a square terminated, large rectangular gratings with great bars, the iron of 
which shone, polished by the feet of the multitude, dangerous and slippery for 
wagons, and making horses stumble. ... In 1832, in many streets, . . . the old 
Gothic cloaca still cynically showed its jaws. They were enormous, sluggish gaps of 
stone, sometimes surrounded by stone blocks, displaying monumental effront- 



ery." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 9 (Paris, 1881), p. 181 (Les 
Miserables)* [P4a,l] 



On the wall of the Farmers-General, under Louis XVI: "The mur < wall> by which 



As a legend of the morgue, Maillard cites the following remarks from E. Texier, he 
Tableau de Paris (1852): "In this building lives a clerk who . . . has a family. Who 
knows whether the clerk's daughter does not have a piano in her room and, on 
Sunday evenings, does not dance with her friends to the strains of the ritornellos of 
Pilodo or Musard." According to Maillard, however, the clerk did not live in the 
morgue in 1852. Cited in Firmin Maillard, Recherches historiqu.es et critiques sur 
la Morgue (Paris, 1860), pp. 26-27. The account goes hack, as Maillard himself 
explains, to a report of 1830 by Leon Gozlan, which for its part was somewhat 
feuilletonistic. [P4a,3] 

"The Place Maubert, accursed square which hides the name of Alhertus Magnus. " 
Paris chez soi < Paris, 1854>, p. 9 (Louis Lurine, "A travers les rues") . [P4a,4] 

In Mercier, JSouveau Paris (1800), vol. 6, p. 56, it is recounted that "the mysteri- 
ous hornblowers ... in fact made a pretty sinister noise. It was not to announce 
the sale of water that they made this noise; their lugubrious hlare, Signified fan- 
fare of terror, was most often a threat of arson: 'They were in the taverns, and 
they would communicate from one neighborhood to the next,' says Mercier. 'All 
their harmonized sounds were centrally coordinated, and when they played with 
redoubled force, one expected something to happen. You would listen for a long 
while, understanding nothing; but in all this uproar there was a language of sedi- 
tion. These plots were no less deep for being hatched so blatantly. It has been 
remarked that, at the time of the fi res, the signal was more prompt, more rapid, 
more shrill. When the hlaze broke out at Les Celestins, . . . my brain had been 
dulled the day before by the noise of the horns. On another occasion, the ears were 
assailed by the cracking of whips; on some days, it was a hanging on hoxes. One 
trembles at these keen daily alarms.'" Edouard Fournier, Enigmes des rues de 



C. Bougie, Chez les prophetes socialistes (Paris, 1918), cites, in the essay "L' Alli- 
ance intellectuelle franco-allemande" (p. 123), Borne's phrase about the streets of 
Paris: those glorious streets "whose pavement one ought to tread with hare feet 



Paris is immured makes Paris murmur. 



[P4a,2] 



Paris (Paris, 1860), pp. 72-73 ("Sur quelques bruits de Paris"). 



[P4a,5] 



only. 



[P5.1] 



The Avenue Rachel leads to the cemetery of Montmartre. Ahout this, Daniel 
Halevy writes (Pays parisiens [Paris <1932>], p. 276): "Rachel, the tragedienne, 
is here the herald and patroness." [P5,2] 



"The importance accorded the traffic of pilgrims — many people in those days went 
to venerate relics — is attested by the fact that the old Roman road, with its two 
sections, was named after the principal destinations of such pilgrimage: in the 
north, Saint-Martin, after the Cathedral of Tours; and in the south, Saint- 
Jacques, after the Spanish Jago di Compostella." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin 
<1929>),p. 67. [P5,3] 

The oft-formulated observation that the neighborhoods of Paris each have a life 
of their own is given support by Stahl {Paris, p. 28) in a reference to certain 
Parisian monuments. (He speaks of the Arc de Triomphe, and one could also 
mention Notre Dame or Notre Dame de Lorette.) Forming a background to 
important streets, these buildings give their districts a center of gravity and, at the 
same time, represent the city as such within them. Stahl says "that each monu- 
mental edifice . . . appears with an escort, like a prince with his train of followers, 
and by this retinue it is separated from the respectfully withdrawing masses. It 
becomes the ruling nucleus of a neighborhood that appears to have gathered 
around it" (p. 25). [P5,4] 



^^^^^^^^ 



[Panorama] 



Does anyone still want to go with me into a panorama? 

— Max Brod, Uber die Schonheit hasslkher Bilder 
(Leipzig, 1913), p. 59 



There were panoramas, 1 dioramas, cosmoramas, diaphanoramas, navaloramas, 
pleoramas (pled, "I sail," "I go by water"), fantoscope<s>, fantasma-parastases, 
phantasmagorical and fantasmaparastatic experiences, picturesque journeys in a 
room, georamas; optical picturesques, cineoi-amas, phanoramas, stereoramas, cy- 
cloramas, panorama dramatique. 

"In our time so rich in pano-, cosmo-, neo-, myrio-, kigo- and dio-ramas." M. G. 
Saphir, in the Berliner Courier, March 4, 1829; cited in Erich Stenger, Daguerres 
Diorama in Berlin (Berlin, 1925), p. 73. [Ql,l] 

The postrevolutionary Versailles as waxworks: "The leftover royal statues were 
remodeled. That of Louis XIV in the great Salle de l'Orangerie wears a liberty cap 
in place of the chiseled-away peruke, carries a pike instead of the official baton; 
and, so that no one mistakes the identity of the newly created god of war, there is 
written at the foot of the statue: 'French Mars, protector of the liberty of the 
world.' A similar prank was played with Coustou's colossal has-relief, repre- 
senting Louis XIV on horseback, in the large gallery of the chateau. The genius of 
fame, who descends from the clouds, holds a liberty cap over the hare head of the 
king, instead of the laurel wreath of former times." D Colportage D F. J. L. Meyer, 
Fragmente aus Paris im IV. Jahr der franzdsischen Republik (Hamburg, 1797), 
vol. 2, p. 315. [Ql,2] 

On the exhibition of a group of thieves reproduced in wax, which (around 1785) 
was put together hy Curtius or some other entrepreneur for the fair in Saint- 
Laurent: "Some were chained and clad in rags, while others were almost naked 
and lying on straw. It was a fairly graphic rendering. The only portraits that were 
likenesses were those of the two or three leaders; but since the gang was large, the 
owner had heen obliged to find them some company. I took it for granted that he 
had fashioned these others more or less according to whim, and with this thought 
in mind I was rather casually strolling past the swarthy faces — often obscured by 



the coarse moustaches of these inferior brigands — when I thought I perceived 
beneath their repulsive appearance some characteristics that were not at all unfa- 
miliar. As I looked more closely, I became convinced that the owner of the master 
thieves (who was also the owner of the other waxworks), wanting to make use of 
some wax figures that were no longer in fashion, or of some commissioned portraits 
that were subsequently rejected, had dressed them up in rags, loaded them with 
chains, and slightly disfigured them in order to place them here with the great 
thieves. ... I could not help smiling when I considered that the wife of one of the 
subjects might well discover, among these gentlemen, the portrait of her husband 
that had once been so gloriously commissioned. And, really, I am not joking when 
I say that I saw among this group an excellent likeness of Linguet,* who, several 
months earlier, had enjoyed a place of honor ixi the other room, and who undoubt- 
edly had been transported here for economic reasons, and to fill out the prison." 
(*Simon-Nicolas-Henri Linguet, 1736-1794; polygraph and lawyer; executed on 
the guillotine.) J. B. Pujoulx, Paris a lufindu XVIII' siecle (Paris, 1801), pp. 102- 



"Waiting" can be associated with the exhibition of imperial panoramas as much 
as with boredom. It is highly significant that Brod, in a gloss on "panorama" hits 
upon all the keywords of this investigation: "fashion," "boredom," "gaslight," 



"A melange of Morgue and Musee de Luxembourg": this was how Jules Claretie 
characterized the battle panoramas. La Vie d Paris, 1881 (Paris), p. 438. In these 
panoramas we perceive that wars, too, are subject to fashion. Max Brod, in his 
"Panorama," sees "inactive officers . . . searching about for suitable battlefields to 
wage their imaginary colonial wars." It is a wardrobe of battles: the impecunious 
come and look around to see if somewhere there is not a used battlefield they can 
make their own without going to great expense. [Ql ,5] 

Play on words with "-rama" (on the model of "diorama") in Balzac, at the begin- 
ning of Pere Goriot. 2 [ 0,1,6] 

Setup of the panoramas: View from a raised platform, surrounded by a balus- 
trade, of surfaces lying round about and beneath. The painting runs along a 
cylindrical wall approximately a hundred meters long and twenty meters high. 
The principal panoramas of the great panorama painter Prevost: Paris, Toulon, 
Rome, Naples, Amsterdam, Tilsit, Wagram, Calais, Antwerp, London, Florence, 
Jerusalem, Athens. Among his pupils: Daguerre. [Q, la ,l] 

1838: the Rotonde des Panoramas constructed by Hittorff. D Iron □ [Ql a >2] 



103.[]ColportageO 



[0.1-3] 



and so on. 



[0.1,4] 



Panorama at the Paris Exhibition of 1855. 



[Qla,3] 



A panorama under construction, in an image originally published in Llllustrtiion. Courtesy of 
the Syndicat Autoren- und Verlagsgesellschaf t, Frankfurt am Main. See Ql a, 1 . 



1 1 remains to b e discovered what is meant when, in the dioramas, the variations 
in lighting which the passing day brings to a landscape take place in fifteen or 
thirty minutes. Here is something like a sportive precursor of fast-motion cinema- 
tography — a witty, and somewhat malicious, "dancing" acceleration of time, 
which, by way of contrast, makes one think of the hopelessness of a mimesis, as 
Breton evokes it in Nadja: the painter who in late afternoon sets up his easel 
before the Vieux-Port in Marseilles and, in the waning light of day, constantly 
alters the light-relations in his picture, until it shows only darkness. For Breton, 
however, it was "unfinished.'" [Qla,4] 

To reflect rigorously on the particular pathos that lies hidden in the art of the 
panoramas. On the particular relation of this art to nature, but also, and above 
all, to history. How peculiar this relation was may be gathered from these sen- 
tences by Wiertz, whose painting, in fact, has a distinctly panoramic tendency. 
"There has been much talk of realism in painting. Generally speaking, paintings 
which are called 'realistic' are rarely in keeping with this rubric. Pure realism 
ought to manage things so that a represented object would seem within reach of 
your hand. ... If, in general, what is properly termed trompeToeil has been little 
appreciated, that is because up until now this genre of painting has been practiced 
only by mediocre painters, by sign painters, those restricted merely to the repre- 



sentation of certain still-life objects. . . . Will the example of M. Wiertz give birth 
to a new genre?" Commentary on La Curieuse, in the catalogue written by the 
painter himself and entitled L'Atelier de M. Wiertz. In Oeuvres litteraires <Paris, 
1870>, pp. 501-502. [Qla,5] 

"Nocturnorama. A new sort of concert will entertain the fashionable society of 
Paris this winter. All that the music expresses, during these concerts, will be ren- 
dered visible through painted transparencies of superior quality. Haydn's Crea- 
tion is in rehearsal and, accompanied by the appropriate phantasmagorias, will no 
doubt doubly captivate the senses of the audience. / To me, however, this arrange- 
ment seems more suited to gay and sentimental diversions than to this great work. 
/ Thus, for example, a strikingly lifelike and moving portrait of Malibran is to 
appear, while, behind the scenes, a very fine singer delivers an Italian aria — as 
though one were hearing the shade of Malibran sing." August Lewald, Album der 
Boudoirs (Leipzig and Stuttgart, 1836), pp. 42-43. [Qla,6] 

From time to time in his diorama, Daguerre would have, among other things, the 
Church of Saint-Etienne du Mont. Midnight Mass. With organ. At the end: extin- 
guishing of candles. [Ql a, 7] 

The fact that film today articulates all problems of modern form-giving — under- 
stood as questions of its own technical existence — and does so in the most 
stringent, most concrete, most critical fashion, is important for the following 
comparison of panoramas with this medium. "The vogue for panoramas, among 
which the panorama of Boulogne was especially remarkable, corresponds to the 
vogue for cinematographs today. The covered arcades, of the type of the Passage 
des Panoramas, were also beginning their Parisian fortunes then." Marcel Poete, 
Unellede cite Paris (Paris, 1925), p. 326. [Qla,8] 

<Jacques-Louis> David exhorted his students to make studies of nature in the 
panorama. [Ql a, 9] 

"Many people imagine that art can be perfected indefinitely. This is an error. 
There is a limit at which it stops. And here is why: it is because the conditions in 
which the imitation of nature is confined are immutable. One wants a picture — 
that is to say, a flat surface, surrounded or not surrounded by a frame — and on 
this surface a representation produced exclusively by means of various colored 
substances. . . . Within these conditions, which constitute the picture, everything 
has been attempted. The most difficult problem was perfect relief, deep perspec- 
tives carried to the most complete illusion. The stereoscope resolved it." A. J. 
Wiertz, Oeuvres litteraires (Paris, 1870), p. 364. This comment not only throws an 
interesting light on the points of view from which people looked at things like 
stereoramas in those days; it also shows very clearly that the theory of "progress" 
in the arts is bound up with the idea of the imitation of nature, and must be 
discussed in the context of this idea. [Q2,l] 



The multiple deployment of figures in the wax museum opens a way to the 
colportage phenomenon of space and hence to the fundamental ambiguity of the 
arcades. The wax statues and busts — of which one is today an emperor, tomor- 
row a political subversive, and the next day a liveried attendant; of which another 
represents today Julia Montague, tomorrow Marie Lafargue, the day after tomor- 
row Madame Doumergue — all are in their proper place in these optical whisper- 
ing-galleries. For Louis XI, it is the Louvre; for Richard II, the Tower; for Abdel 
Krim, the desert; and for Nero, Rome. □ Flaneur □ [Q2,2] 

Dioramas take the place of the magic lantern, which knew nothing of perspec- 
tive, but with which, of course, the magic of the light insinuated itself quite 
differently into residences that were still poorly lit. "Lanteme magique! Piece 
curieuse!" With this cry, a peddler would travel through the streets in the evening 
and, at a wave of the hand, step up into dwellings where he operated his lantern. 
The affiche for the first exhibition of posters still characteristically displays a 
magic lantern. [Q2,3] 

There was a georama for a while in the Galerie Colbert. — The georama in the 
fourteenth arrondissement contained a small-scale natural reproduction of 
France. 4 [Q2,4] 

In the same year in which Daguerre invented photography, his diorama burned 
down. 1839. D Precursors □ [Q2,5] 

There is an abundant literature whose stylistic character forms an exact counter- 
part to the dioramas, panoramas, and so forth. I refer to the feuilletonist miscella- 
nies and series of sketches from midcenttiry. Works like La Grande Ville <The Big 
City>, Le Diable a Paris <The Devil in Paris>, Les Frangau peints par eux-memes 
<The French as Painted by Themselves>. In a certain sense, they are moral 
dioramas — not only related to the others in their unscrupulous multiplicity, but 
technically constructed just like them. To the plastically worked, more or less 
detailed foreground of the diorama corresponds the sharply profiled feuilletonis- 
tic vesturing of the social study, which latter supplies an extended background 
analogous to the landscape in the diorama. [Q2,6] 

The sea — "never the same" 5 for Proust at Balbec, and the dioramas with their 
varied lighting, which sets the day marching past the viewer at exactly the speed 
with which it passes before the reader in Proust. Flere, the highest and the lowest 
forms of mimesis shake hands. [Q2,7] 

The wax museum <Panoptihim> a manifestation of the total work of art. The 
universalism of the nineteenth century has its monument in the waxworks. Pan- 
opticon: not only does one see everything, but one sees it in all ways. [Q2,8] 



<; Navalorama." Eduard Devrient, Briefe aus Paris (Berlin, 1840), p. 57. [Q2,9] 



Principal panoramic representations by Prevost for the panoramas of "passage." 
"Paris, Toulon, Rome, Naples, Amsterdam, Tilsit, Wagram, Calais, Antwerp, 
London, Florence, Jerusalem, and Athens. All were conceived in the same man- 
ner. His spectators, situated on a platform surrounded by a balustrade, as though 
on the summit of a central building, commanded a view of the entire horizon. Each 
canvas, affixed to the inner wall of a cylindrical room, had a circumference of 97 
meters, 45 centimeters, 2 millimeters (300 feet) and a height of 19 meters, 42 
centimeters (60 feet). Thus, the eighteen panoramas by Prevost represent a sur- 
face area of 86,667 meters, 6 centimeters (224,000 feet)." Labedolliere, Histoire 
du nouveau Paris (Paris), p. 30. [Q2a,l] 

In The Old Curiosity Shop, Dickens speaks of the "unchanging air of coldness and 
gentility" about the waxwork. 6 D Dream House D [Q2a,2] 

Daguerre and the Academy [Francaise?]: "Lemercier . . . gave me a ticket to a 
public session of the Institute. ... At this session he is going to recite a poem about 
Daguerre's machine <See Q3a,l> in order to revive interest in the thing, for the 
inventor lost his whole apparatus in a fire in his room. And so, during my sojourn 
in Paris, there was nothing to see of the wondrous operation of this machine." 
EduardDevrient, Briefe mus Paris (Berlin, 1840), p. 260 [letter of April 28, 1839]. 

[Q2a,3] 

In the Palais-Royal, the "Cafe du Mont Saint-Bernard, a very odd sight, on the 
first floor opposite the staircase. (A coffeehouse where, roundabout on the walls, 
are painted Alpine pastures. At the height of the tables is a small gallery in which 
miniature models constitute the foreground of the painting: small cows, Swiss 
chalets, mills, sowers [should perhaps be cowherds], and the like — a very odd 
sight.)" J. F. Benzenberg, Briefe geschrieben auf einer Reise nach Paris (Dort- 
mund, 1805), vol. 1, p. 260. [Q2a,4] 

A poster: "The French Language in Panorama." In J. F. Benzenberg, vol. 1, 
p. 265. In the same context, information concerning the regulation that applies to 
hillstickers. [Q2a,5] 

An exceptionally detailed description of the program at the Pierre Theatre 7 in 
Benzenberg, vol. 1, pp. 287-292. [Q2a,6] 

The interest of the panorama is in seeing the true city — the city indoors. What 
stands within the windowless house is the true. Moreover, the arcade, too, is a 
windowless house. The windows that look down on it are like loges from which 
one gazes into its interior, but one cannot see out these windows to anything 
outside. (What is true has no windows; nowhere does the true look out to the 
universe.) [Q?a,7] 



"The illusion was complete. I recognized at first glance all the monuments and all 
the places, down to the little courtyard where I lived in a room at the Convent of 
the Holy Savior. Never did a traveler undergo such an arduous trial; I could not 



have expected that Jerusalem and Athens would be transferred to Paris in order to 
convince me of truth or illusion." Chateaubriand, in the preface to his Itineraire 
de <Paris a> Jerusalem, cited in Emile de Labedolliere, Le Nouveau (Paris), p. 30. 

[Q3,i] 

The innermost glowing cells of the city of light, the old dioramas, nested in the 
arcades, one of which today still bears the name Passage des Panoramas. It was, 
in the first moment, as though you had entered an aquarium. Along the wall of 
the great darkened hall, broken at intervals by narrow joints, it stretched like a 
ribbon of illuminated water behind glass. The play of colors among deep-sea 
fauna cannot be more fiery. But what came to light here were open-air, atmo- 
spheric wonders. Seraglios were mirrored on moonlit waters; bright nights in 
deserted parks loomed large. In the moonlight you could recognize the chateau 
of Saint-Leu, where the last Conde was found hanged in a window. A light was 
still burning in a window of the chateau. A couple of times the sun splashed wide 
in between. In the clear light of a summer morning, one saw the rooms of the 
Vatican as they might have appeared to the Nazarenes; not far beyond rose 
Baden-Baden. But candlelight, too, was honored: wax tapers encircled the mur- 
dered Due de Berry in the dusky cathedral that served as mortuary chapel, and 
hanging lamps in the silken skies of an isle of love practically put round Luna to 
shame. It was an ingenious experiment on the moonstruck magic night of Ro- 
manticism, and its noble substance emerged from the trial victorious. [Q3,2] 

The waxwork figure as mannequin of history. — In the wax museum the past 
enters into the same aggregate state that distance enters into in the interior. 

[Q3,3] 

On the world-travel panorama, which operated under the name "Le Tour du 
Monde" at the Paris world exhibition of 1900, and which animated a changing 
panoramic background with living figures in the foreground, each time costumed 
accordingly. "The 'World-Tour Panorama' is housed in a building that has al- 
ready caused a general sensation because of its bizarre exterior. An Indian gallery 
crowns the walls of the edifice, while rising at the corners are the tower of a 
pagoda, a Chinese tower, and an old Portuguese tower." "Le Tour du Monde/' in 
Die Paruer Weltaasstellung in Wort und Bild, ed. Dr. Georg Malkowsky (Berlin, 
1900), p. 59. — The similarity of this architecture to that in zoological gardens is 
worth noting. [Q3,4] 

Three stages in Lemercier's Lampelie et Daguerre: (1) presentation of stationary 
panoramas; (2) presentation of the technique of their animation, which Daguerre 
got from Lampelie; (3) description of the overcoming of Lampelie by the tireless 
Daguerre. In the following, the first stage (the third under D Photography 0). 

Daguerre, in the tower where his erudite brush 
Makes a radiant theater of optics, 
Reveals in the dark of a giant enclosure 
Bright horizons of awesome perspective. 
His palette is magic; and his conihient lights, 



Diorama on the Rue de Bondy, 1837. Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale de France. 
See Q3a,3. 



Once the scene is complete and in place all around, 
Transform a bare cloth covering circular walls 
To a mirror of nature itself. 

Nepomucene Lemercier, Sur la Decouverte de Vingenieux peintre du diorama 
[afterward: Lampelie et Daguerre] (Institut Royal de France, Annual Public Ses- 
sion of the Five Academies, Thursday, May 2, 1839, chaired by M. Chevreul, 
president [Paris, 1839], pp. 26-27). [Q3a,l] 

After the July Revolution, Dagnerre's diorama included a view of "la Place de la 
Bastille, July 28, 1830." Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique < Paris, 1887 >, 
p. 208. [Q3a,2] 

Dioramas at the Chateau d'Eau (later the Place de la Repuhlique) and on the Rue 
de Bondy. Cabinet des Estampes. [Q3a,3] 

A print advertising the manufacture of precision instruments, J. Molteni and Co., 
62 Rue du Chateau d'Eau, refers (after 1856!) to, among other things, "apparatus 
of phantasmagoria, polyoramas, dioramas, and such." Cabinet des Estampes. 

[Q3a,4] 

Empire vignette: "The Panorama." An illustration plate, linen or paper, showing 
tightrope walkers in the middle ground. Amor, with the pointed cap of a carnival 
clown or of a town crier, points to a puppet theater in the foreground, where a 



knight kneels before his lady while declaring his love. This all in a landscape. 
Cabinet des Estampes. [Q3a,5] 



"I prepared myself to receive the depositions of the women she called his pano- 
ramistes — that is to say, those who walk up and down all the panoramas, particu- 
larly the one on the Boulevard Montmartre." P. Cuisin, La Galanterie sous la 
sauvegarde des lois (Paris, 1815), pp. 136-137. [Q3ai6] 

"Carporama . . . specializing in the plants, flowers, and fruits of India." J.-L. 
Croze, "Quelques Spectacles de Paris pendant l'ete de 1835" (he Temps, August 
22, 1935). [Q3a,7] 

The panoramic principle in Balzac: "Our investigation has enabled us to take 
account of some three hundred real names in the Paris of the period 1800 to 1845, 
during which the characters of the Comedie humaine develop. If one added to this 
the political figures, the writers and playwrights, the celebrities of all kinds who 
. . . appear in Balzac's narratives . . . without any link to the action, the total 
would perhaps mount to five hundred." H. Clouzot and R.-H. Valensi, Le Paris de 
la Comedie humaine: Balzac et sesfournisseurs (Paris, 1926), p. 175. [Q4,l] 

Passage des Panoramas. "You will have guessed that this arcade owes its name to a 
particular spectacle introduced in France in January 1799. The first Panorama in 
Paris was under the direction of a man from the United States ... by the name of 
Robert Fulton. . . . Fulton, at the time of the plan to invade England, presented to 
the emperor a report on the immediate conversion of the imperial navy to 
steam. . . . Having been rejected in France, this engineer went on to succeed in 
America, and it is said that, when finally returning to Saint-Helene to die, the 
emperor saw through his spyglass a steamboat which bore the name The Fulton." 
Louis Lurine, "Les Boulevarts," in Paris chez soi (Paris < 1854>), p. 60. [Q4,2] 

Balzac: "When in 1822 he visits the diorama run by Daguerre, he enthusiastically 
calls it one of the miracles of the century — 'a thousand problems are resolved.' 
And when the daguerreotype is developed twenty years later, he allows a photo- 
graph of himself to he made and writes altogether deliriously of this invention, 
which he claims to have prophesied already in Louis Lambert (1835)." [Note at 
this point: Corriespondance (1876)>, vol. 1, p. 68 (compare Goriot); Lettres <d 
I'Etrangere) , vol. 2 <1906>, p. 36.] Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), 
p. 237. [Q4,3] 

Dickens: "lliere floated before him a vision of a monstrous magazine, entirely 
written by himself. . . . One characteristic thing he wished to have in the peri- 
odical. He suggested an Arabian Nights of London, in which Gog and Magog, 
the giants of the city, should give forth chronicles as enormous as themselves." 
G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, trans. Laurent and Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), 
p. 81.' Dickens had numerous projects for serials. [Q4,4] 



The world exhibition of 1889 had a "Panorama Historique," put together by 
Stevens and Gervex, at the conclusion of which a white-haired Victor Hugo was 
shown before an allegorical monument of France, which in turn was flanked by 
allegories of labor and of national defense. [Q4,5] 

Balthasar's Feast, by the conductor and composer Jullien (circa 1836): "The chief 
role . . . devolved upon seven brilliantly colored transparents, which gleamed so 
fantastically in the darkness that Jullien's orchestra, instead of being the principal 
attraction, sank to being merely an accompaniment. This feast for the eyes, which 
was called a 'nocturnorama,' was produced by a mechanical device." S. Kracauer, 
Jacques Offenbach unci das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 1937), p. 64.'' [Q4a,l] 

"Panorama" 1 " — the best known of the Greek-based coinages which emerged dur- 
ing the French Revolution. "On the seventh of Floreal, in the year VII, Rohert 
Fretton <Fulton?> took out a patent 'for the purpose of exhibiting circular pic- 
tures called "panoramas." 1 This first attempt would lead to the idea of a 'peri- 
panorama,' then a 'cosmorama,' and later a 'panstereorama' (1813)." Ferdinand 
Brunot, Histoire de let langue franqaise des origines jusqu'm 1900; vol. 9, La 
Revolution et V Empire; section 2, Les Evenements, les institutions et la. langue 
(Paris, 1937), p. 1212 ("Les Nomenclatures sous la Revolution"). [Q4a,2] 

From Joseph Dufour (1752-1827) we have "hanging tableaux" — strips twelve to 
fifteen meters long, illustrated in the manner of panoramas. They show landscapes 
(Bosporus, Italy), genre scenes (savages of the South Seas), mythologies. [Q4a,3] 

"I would rather return to the dioramas, whose brutal and enormous magic has the 
power to impose on me a useful illusion. I would rather go to the theater and feast 
my eyes on the scenery, in which I find my dearest dreams artistically expressed 
and tragically concentrated. These things, hecause they are false, are infinitely 
closer to the truth." Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2 < Paris, 
1932 > , p. 273 ("Salon de 1859," section 8, "Le Paysage"). 11 [Q4a,4] 



In Balzac's works, the number of supernumeraries runs to fi ve hundred persons. 
Five hundred of his characters appear episodically without being integrated into 
the action. [Q4a,5] 



[Mirrors] 



The way mirrors bring the open expanse, the streets, into the cafe — this, too, 
belongs to the interweaving of spaces, to the spectacle by which the flaneur is 
ineluctably drawn. "During the day, often sober; in the evening, more buoyant, 
when the gas flames glow. The art of the dazzling illusion is here developed to 
perfection. The most commonplace tavern is dedicated to deceiving the eye. 
Through mirrors extending along walls, and reflecting rows of merchandise right 
and left, these establishments all obtain an artificial expansion, a fantastical mag- 
nitude, by lamplight." Karl Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, 
p. 225. 

Thus, precisely with the approach of night, distant horizons bright as day open 
up throughout the city. [Rl , 1 ] 

Here, in connection with the mirror motif, should be mentioned the story of the 
man who could not bear to have, in the interior of his shop or bistro, the legend 
on the outer windowpane incessantly before his eyes in mirror writing. To dis- 
cover an anecdote that accords with this. [Rl,2] 

Brittle, too, are the mosaic thresholds that lead you, in the style of the old 
restaurants of the Palais-Royal, to a "Parisian dinner" for five francs; they mount 
boldly to a glass door, but you can hardly believe that behind this door is really a 
restaurant. The glass door adjacent promises a "Petit Casino" and allows a 
glimpse of a ticket booth and the prices of seats; but were you to open it — would 
it open into anything? Instead of entering the space of a theater, wouldn't you be 
stepping down to the street? Where doors and walls are made of mirrors, there is 
no telling outside from in, with all the equivocal illumination. 1 Paris is the city of 
mirrors. The asphalt of its roadways smooth as glass, and at the entrance to all 
bistros glass partitions. A profusion of windowpanes and mirrors in cafes, so as to 
make the inside brighter and to give all the tiny nooks and crannies, into which 
Parisian taverns separate, a pleasing amplitude. Women here look at themselves 
more than elsewhere, and from this comes the distinctive beauty of the 
Parisienne. Before any man catches sight of her, she already sees herself ten times 
reflected. But the man, too, sees his own physiognomy flash by. He gains his 
image more quickly here than elsewhere and also sees himself more quickly 



merged with tliis, his image. Even the eyes of passersby are veiled mirrors, and 
over that wide bed of the Seine, over Paris, the sky is spread out like the crystal 
mirror hanging over the drab beds in brothels. [Rl,3] 

Where were these mirrors manufactured? And when did the custom of furnishing 
bars with them arise? [Rl,4] 

Since when the custom of inserting mirrors, instead of canvases, into the expensive 
carved frames of old paintings? [Rl,5] 

Let two mirrors reflect each other; then Satan plays his favorite trick and opens 
here in his way (as his partner does in lovers' gazes) the perspective on infinity. Be 
it now divine, now satanic: Paris has a passion for mirror-like perspectives. The 
Arc de Triomphe, the Sacre Coeur, and even the Pantheon appear, from a dis- 
tance, like images hovering above the ground and opening, architecturally, a fata 
morgana. D Perspective D [ R 1 , 6 ] 

At the end of the 1860s, Alphonse Karr writes that no one knows how to make 
mirrors any more. [Rl>7] 

That the last but also the greatest work of this mirror magic is still around to be 
seen is owing, perhaps, more to its high production costs than to its drawing 
power and profitability, which today are already on the decline. This work is the 
"Cabinet des Mirages" at the Musee Grevin. Here were united, one final time, 
iron supporting beams and giant glass panes intersecting at countless angles. 
Various coverings make it possible to transform these beams into Greek columns 
one moment, Egyptian pilasters the next, then into street lamps; and, according 
as they come into view, the spectator is surrounded with unending forests of 
Greco-Roman temple colunms, with suites, as it were, of innumerable railroad 
stations, market halls, or arcades, one succeeding another. A fluctuating light and 
gentle music accompany the performance, and coming before each transforma- 
tion is the classic signal of the hand bell, and the jolt, which we recognize from 
our earliest trips around the world, when, in the Kaiserpanorama, before our 
eyes that were full of the pain of departure, an image would slowly disengage 
from the stereoscope, allowing the next one to appear. [Rl,8] 

Mallarme as genius of mirrors. [Rla,l] 

"The manufacture of mirrors in Paris and Saint-Gobain, 'mirrors known all over 
Europe and without serious rival,' continues unabated." Levasseur, Histoire des 
classes ouvrieres <et de Vindustrie en France, de 1789 a 1870 (Paris, 1903)>, vol. 
1, p. 446. [Rla,2] 



"Our mirrors are growing larger by the day, which makes them more and more 
sought after throughout Europe. Today they are within range of the most middling 



fortune, and whereas there is scarcely a household in France that does not possess 
at least one or two, nothing is rarer in England than to come upon one of our 
mirrors, even in castles." Adolphe Blanqui, Histoire de I 'exposition des produits 
de I Industrie f ranqaise en 1827 (Paris, 1827), p. 130. [Rla,3] 

Egoistic — "that is what one becomes in Paris, where you can hardly take a step 
without catching sight of your dearly beloved self. Mirror after mirror! In cafes 
and restaurants, in shops and stores, in haircutting salons and literary salons, in 
baths and everywhere, 'every inch a mirror'!" S. F. Lahrs<?>, Briefe aus Paris, in 
Europa: Chronik der gebildeten Welt, ed. August Lewald (Leipzig and Stuttgart, 
1837), vol. 2, p. 206. [Rla,4] 

Redon paints things as if they appeared in a somewhat clouded mirror. But his 
mirror world is flat, averse to perspective. [Rla,5] 

"So long as the plate glass was produced solely through expansion of a glass cylin- 
der blown with the mouth at the end of the pipe, its dimensions had a constant and 
relatively confined limit, one determined by the lung power expended in the Mow- 
ing. Only recently was this replaced hy compressed air. But with the introduction 
of the casting process ... in 1688, these dimensions were immediately and sig- 
nificantly increased." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 1907), pp. 54—55. 
Note to this passage: "The first mirrors cast in Paris are said ... to have measured 
84 hy 50 inches, as compared to a maximum of 50 by 45 inches hef ore this." 

[Rla,6] 

Actually, in the arcades it is not a matter of illuminating the interior space, as in 
other forms of iron construction, but of damping the exterior space. [Rla,7] 

On the light that reigns in the arcades: "A glaucous gleam, seemingly filtered 
through deep water, with the special quality of pale brilliance of a leg suddenly 
revealed under a lifted skirt. The great American passion for city planning, im- 
ported into Paris by a prefect of police during the Second Empire and now being 
applied to the task of redrawing the map of our capital in straight lines, will soon 
spell the doom of these human aquariums. Although the life that originally quick- 
ened them has drained away, they deserve, nevertheless, to he regarded as the 
secret repositories of several modern myths." Louis Aragon, he Paysan de Paris 
(Paris, 1926), p. 19. 2 D Mythology D [R2,l] 

Outside surged "the green, transparent tide, filling the street to a level high above 
the houses; and there, up and down, swam the queerest fish, often nearly human 
in appearance. . . . The street itself could have come from some prehistoric book 
of images; gray gabled houses with high pointed roofs and narrow windows, the 
latter sometimes straight across, sometimes on a slant, the sides of the houses in 
some spots almost overgrown with shells and seaweed, though in other spots 
clean and well preserved, and adorned with tasteful paintings and shell 



figures. . . . Before every door stood a tall shady coral tree; and planted not 
infrequently along the walls, like the grapevines and roses we train on slender 
trellises at home, were polyps with spreading arms that reached in their luxuri- 
ance high above the windows, often to the very gables that protruded from the 
roofs." Friedrich Gerstacker, Die versunkene Stadt (<Berlin:> Neufeld and Henius, 
1921), p. 30. If a work of literature, an imaginative composition, could arise from 
repressed economic contents in the consciousness of a collective, as Freud says it 
can from sexual contents in an individual consciousness, then in the above de- 
scription we would have before our eyes the consummate sublimation of the 
arcades, with their bric-a-brac growing rankly out of their showcases. Even the 
vitreous radiance of the globes of the street lamps, the utter pomp and splendor 
of gas lighting, enters into this undersea world of Gerstacker's. The hero sees, to 
his amazement, "that, with the gradual infusion of twilight, these undersea corri- 
dors just as gradually lit up by themselves. For everywhere in the bushes of coral 
and sponge, among the wreaths and thick curtains of seaweed and the tall waving 
seagrass towering up behind, were sitting broad-brimmed, glassy-looking medu- 
sas, which already at the outset had given off a weak, greenish phosphorescent 
light that quickly picked up strength at the approach of darkness and now was 
shining with great intensity." Gerstacker, Die versunkene Stadt, p. 48. Here, the 
arcade in Gerstacker in a different constellation: "Hardly had they left the house 
than they entered into a wide and airy, crystal-crowned passageway, onto which 
nearly all the neighboring houses seemed to issue; just beyond this, however, and 
divided from it only by a perfectly transparent partition that appeared to be 
formed of thin sheets of ice, lay the luminous waters." Gerstacker, Die versunkene 
Stadt, p. 42. [R2,2] 

As rocks of the Miocene or Eocene in places bear the imprint of monstrous 
creatures from those ages, so today arcades dot the metropolitan landscape like 
caves containing the fossil remains of a vanished monster: the consumer of the 
pre-imperial era of capitalism, the last dinosaur of Europe. On the walls of these 
caverns their immemorial flora, the commodity, luxuriates and enters, like can- 
cerous tissue, into the most irregular combinations. A world of secret affinities 
opens up within: palm tree and feather duster, hairdryer and Venus de Milo, 
prostheses and letter-writing manuals. The odalisque lies in wait next to the 
inkwell, and priestesses raise high the vessels into which we drop cigarette butts 
as incense offerings. These items on display are a rebus: how one ought to read 
here the birdseed in the fixative-pan, the flower seeds beside the binoculars, the 
broken screw atop the musical score, and the revolver above the goldfish bowl — 
is right on the tip of one's tongue. After all, nothing of the lot appears to be new. 
The goldfish come perhaps from a pond that dried up long ago, the revolver was 
a corpus delicti, and these scores could hardly have preserved their previous 
owner from starvation when her last pupils stayed away. And since, to the dream- 
ing collective itself, the decline of an economic era seems like the end of the 
world, the writer Karl Kraus has looked quite correctly on the arcades, which, 
from another angle, must have appealed to him as the casting of a dream: "In the 



Berlin Arcade, there is no grass growing. It looks like the day after the end of the 
world, although people are still moving about. Organic life is withered, and in 
this condition is put on display. Castan's Panopticon. Ah, a summery day there, 
among the waxworks, at six o'clock. An orchestrion plays mechanical music to 
accompany Napoleon Ill's bladder-stone operation. Adults can see the syphilitic 
chancre of a Negro. Positively the very last Aztecs. Oleographs. Street youths, 
hustlers, with thick hands. Outside is life: a third-rate cabaret. The orchestrion 
plays 'You're a Fine Fellow, Emil.' Here God is made by machine." <Karl Kraus,> 
Macks (Vienna and Leipzig, 1924), pp. 201-202. [R2,3] 

On the Crystal Palace of 1851: "Of course, for sensuous perception, these glass 
surfaces are themselves practically dissolved in light. / In its basic principle, this 
is by no means something altogether new; rather, its prehistory goes hack centuries 
at least, if not millennia. For it begins with the decision to cover the walls with 
shining metal plates. / . . . That is the first step on the way to the new valuation of 
space at work in the Crystal Palace. In the domed chamber of the Mycenaeans, 
this conception of space was already so decidedly in force that the entire space of 
the room could be dissolved in luster ... In this way, however, one sacrificed that 
fundamental means of all spatial organization: contrast. The whole of the succeed- 
ing historical development was determined through this means — although, from 
the perspective of what concerns us at present, this development first begins only a 
thousand years later, and then no longer with the 'luster' of metal but with that of 
glass. / . . . The high point here is with the window of the Gothic cathedral. . . . 
The increasing transparency of glass in colorless glazing draws the outer world 
into the interior space, while covering the walls with mirrors projects the image of 
the interior space into the outer world. In either case the 'wall,' as a container of 
space, is deprived of its significance. The 'luster' increasingly forfeits the distinc- 
tive color that was part of its character and becomes ever more exclusively just a 
mirror of external light. / This process culminated in the profane interior space of 
the seventeenth century, where it was no longer only the embrasures of windows 
that were filled with plate glass clear as water, but also the remaining surfaces of 
the wall surrounding the room, particularly in places that lay opposite a window 
opening: in the 'mirror galleries of the rococo interiors.' / . . . But in this the 
principle of contrast still prevails. ... In the Sainte-Chapelle, however, as in 
<Versaille's> Hall of Mirrors, this relation between surface and light was consti- 
tuted in such a way that it is no longer the light that interrupts the surface area but 
the surface area that interrupts the light. / In terms of the unfolding valuation of 
space, therefore, we see a continuous progression. At its end stand the green- 
houses, and the halls of the Crystal Palace in London." A. G. Meyer, Eisenbauten 
(Esslingen, 1907), pp. 65-66. [R2a,l] 

One may compare the pure magic of those walls of mirrors which we know from 
feudal times with the oppressive magic worked by the alluring mirror-walls of 
the arcades, which invite us into seductive bazaars. □ Magasins de Nouveautcs □ 

[R2a,2] 



A look at the ambiguity of the arcades: their abundance of mirrors, which fabu- 
lously amplifies the spaces and makes orientation more difficult. For although 
this mirror world may have many aspects, indeed infinitely many, it remains 
ambiguous, double-edged. It blinks : it is always this one — and never nothing — 
out of which another immediately arises. The space that transforms itself does so 
in the bosom of nothingness. In its tarnished, dirty mirrors, things exchange a 
Kaspar-Hauser-look with the nothing. It is like an equivocal wink coming from 
nirvana. And here, again, we are brushed with icy breath by the dandyish name 
of Odilon Redon, who caught, like no one else, this look of things in the mirror 
of nothingness, and who understood, like no one else, how to join with things in 
their collusion with nonbeing. The whispering of gazes fills the arcades. There is 
no thing here that does not, where one least expects it, open a fugitive eye, 
blinking it shut again; but if you look more closely, it is gone. To the whispering 
of these gazes, the space lends its echo. "Now, what," it blinks, "can possibly 
have come over me?" We stop short in some surprise. "What, indeed, can pos- 
sibly have come over you?" Thus we gently bounce the question back to it. 



"Images of interiors are at the center of the early Kierkegaard's philosophical 
constructions. These images are, in fact, produced by philosophy, . . . but they 
point beyond this stratum in virtue of the things they hold fast. . . . The great motif 
of reflection belongs to the interiew. The 'seducer' begins a note: 'Why can't you 
he quiet and well behaved? You have done nothing the entire morning except to 
shake my awning, pull at my window mirror, play with the hell-rope from the third 
story, rattle the windowpanes — ill short, do everything possible to get my atten- 
tion!' . . . The window mirror is a characteristic furnishing of the spacious nine- 
teenth-century apartment. . . . The function of the window mirror is to project the 
endless row of apartment buildings into the encapsulated bourgeois living room; 
by this means, the living room dominates the refl ected row at the same time that it 
is delimited hy it." Theodor Wiesengrund-Adorno, Kierkegaard (Tubingen, 



lb be cited in reference to the physiologies, even though coming later, is the 
passage from the "Lettre a Charles Asselineau," in which Babou gives free rein to 
his nonconformist and antimodernist sentiments. "I know that the public of 
today, being the most seemly of all publics, loves to admire itself en jkmille in 
those very large mirrors which adorn the cafes of the boulevard, or which the 
hand of an arty decorator has kindly installed in its bedroom." Hippolyte Babou, 
Les Payens innocents (Paris, 1858), p. xviii. [R3,2] 



D Hanerie D a 



[R2a,3] 



1933), p. 45. 4 D Flaneur D Interior D 



[R3,l] 



s 

[Painting, Jugendstil, Novelty] 

lb create history with the very detritus of history. 

— Remy de Gourmont, Le II"" Livre des masques (Paris, 1924), p. 259 

Events profit from not being commented on. 

— Alfred Delvau, Preface to Murailles revolutiomiaires (Paris), vol. 1, p. 4 

Pains eternal, 
And ever fresh, 
Hide from their hearts 
All your terrors. 

— Verse of die Devil, sung while he transforms a desolate and rocky 
landscape into a boudoir; from Hippolyte Lucas and Eugene Barre, 
Le Cielet I'afer: Feerie (Paris, 1853), p. 88 

Wliile procreation used to be the fashion, 
We think of that, pardon, as tripe. 

— Faust, Part 2 (Wagner in the homunculus scene) 1 



"History is like Janus: it has two faces. Whether it looks to the past or to the 
present, it sees the same things." <Maxime> Du Camp, Paris <Paris, 1869-1875), 
vol. 6, p. 315.0 Fashion D [Sl,l] 

"It has often happened to me to note certain trivial events passing before my eyes 
as showing a quite original aspect, in which I fondly hoped to discern the spirit of 
the period. 'This,' I would tell myself, 'was bound to happen today and could not 
have been other than it is. It is a sign of the times.' Well, nine times out of ten, I 
have come across the very same event with analogous circumstances in old mem- 
oirs or old history books." Anatole France, Le Jardin d'Epicure (Paris), p. 113. 2 
□ Fashion D [Sl,2] 

The change in fashions, the eternally up-to-date <das Exvig-Heutiga, escapes "his- 
torical" consideration; it is truly overcome only tlirough a consideration that is 
political (theological). Politics recognizes in every actual constellation the genu- 



inely unique-— what will never recur. Characteristic of a fashionable considera- 
tion, which proceeds from bad contemporariness, is the following item of infor- 
mation, which is found in Benda's La Irahuon des clercs <The Betrayal of the 
Intellectuals): a German reports his amazement when, sitting at a table d'hote in 
Paris fourteen days after the storming of the Bastille, he heard no one speak of 
politics. It is no different when Anatole France has the aged Pilate chatting in 
Rome of the days of his governorship and saying, as he touches on the revolt of 
the king of the Jews, "Now, what was he called?" 3 [SI, 3] 

Definition of the "modern" as the new in the context of what has always already 
been there. The always new, always identical "heathscape" in Kafka (Der Prozefi) 
is not a bad expression of this state of affairs. '"Wouldn't you like to see a picture 
or two that you might care to buy?' . . . Titorelli dragged a pile of unframed 
canvases from under the bed; they were so thickly covered with dust that when 
he blew some of it from the topmost, K. was almost blinded and choked by the 
cloud that flew up. 1 Wild Nature, a heathscape,' said the painter, handing K. the 
picture. It showed two stunted trees standing far apart from each other in darkish 
grass. In the background was a many-hued sunset. 'Fine,' said K., Til buy it.' K's 
curtness had been unthinking and so he was glad when the painter, instead of 
being offended, lifted another canvas from the floor. 'Here's the companion 
picture,' he said. It might have been intended as a companion picture, but there 
was not the slightest difference that one could see between it and the other; here 
were the two trees, here the grass, and there the sunset. But K. did not bother 
about that. 'They're fine prospects,' he said. Til buy both of them and hang them 
up in my office.' 'You seem to like the subject,' said the painter, fishing out a third 
canvas. 'By a lucky chance I have another of these studies here.' But it was not 
merely a similar study, it was simply the same wild heathscape again. The painter 
was apparently exploiting to the full this opportunity to sell off his old pictures. 
Til take that one as well,' said K. 'How much for the three pictures?' 'We'll settle 
that next time,' said die painter. ... 'I must say I'm very glad you like these 
pictures, and I'll throw in all the others under the bed as well. They're 
heathscapes every one of them — I've painted dozens of them in my time. Some 
people won't have anything to do with these subjects because they're too somber, 
but there are always people like yourself who prefer somber pictures."' Franz 
Kafka, Der Prozefi (Berlin, 1925), pp. 284-286. ' D Hashish D [SI ,4] 

The "modern," the time of hell. The punishments of hell are always the newest 
thing going in this domain. What is at issue is not that "the same thing happens 
over and over," and even less would it be a question here of eternal return. It is 
rather that precisely in that which is newest the face of the world never alters, that 
this newest remains, in every respect, the same.— This constitutes the eternity of 
hell. To determine the totality of traits by which the "modem" is defined would 
be to represent hell. [SI ,5] 

Of vital interest to recognize a particular point of development as a crossroads. 
The new historical thinking that, in general and in particulars, is characterized by 



higher concreteness, redemption of periods of decline, revision of periodization, 
presently stands at such a point, and its utilization in a reactionary or a revolu- 
tionary sense is now being decided. In this regard, the writings of the Surrealists 
and the new book by Heidegger 5 point to one and the same crisis in its two 



Remy de Gourmont on the "Histoire de la societe francaise pendant la Revolution 
et sous le Directoire": "It was the fundamental originality of the Goncourts to 
create history with the very detritus of history." Remy de Gourmont, Le II" m Livre 



"If one takes from history only the most general facts, those which lend them- 
selves to parallels and to theories, then it suffices, as Schopenhauer said, to read 
only the morning paper and Herodotus. All the rest intervening — the evident 
and fatal repetition of the most distant and the most recent facts — becomes 
tedious and useless." Remy de Gourmont, Le IT" Livre des masques (Paris, 1924), 
p. 259. The passage is not entirely clear. The wording would lead one to assume 
that repetition in the course of history concerns the great facts as much as the 
small. But the author himself probably has in mind only the former. Against this 
it should be shown that, precisely in the minutiae of the "intervening," the 
eternally selfsame is manifest. [Sla,2] 

The constructions of history are comparable to military orders that discipline the 
true life and confine it to barracks. On the other hand: the street insurgence of 
the anecdote. The anecdote brings things near to us spatially, lets them enter our 
life. It represents the strict antithesis to the sort of history which demands "empa- 
thy," which makes everything abstract. The same technique of nearness may be 
practiced, calendrically, with respect to epochs. Let us imagine that a man dies on 
the very day he turns fifty, which is the day on which his son is born, to whom 
the same thing happens, and so on. If one were to have the chain commence at 
the time of the birth of Christ, the result would be that, in the time since we 
began our chronological reckoning, not forty men have lived. Thus, the image of 
a historical course of time is totally transformed as soon as one brings to bear on 
it a standard adequate and comprehensible to human life. This pathos of near- 
ness, the hatred of the abstract configuration of history in its "epochs," was at 
work in the great skeptics like Anatole France. [Sla,3] 

There has never been an epoch that did not feel itself to be "modern" in the sense 
of eccentric, and did not believe itself to be standing directly before an abyss. The 
desperately clear consciousness of being hi the middle of a crisis is something 
chronic in humanity. Every age unavoidably seems to itself a new age. The 
"modem," however, is as varied in its meaning as the different aspects of one and 
the same kaleidoscope. <Gompare Nli,l.> [Sla,4] 



possible solutions. 



[S1.6] 



des masques (Paris, 1924), p. 259. 



[Sla,l] 



Connection between the colportage intention and the deepest theological inten- 
tion. It mirrors it back darkly, displaces into the space of contemplation what 



§ only holds good in the space of the just life. Namely: that the world is always the 
same (that all events could have taken place in the same space) . On a theoretical 
plane, despite everything (despite the keen insight lurking within it), this is a tired 
and withered truth. Nevertheless, it finds supreme confirmation in the existence 
g of the pious, to whom all things serve the greatest good, as here the space serves 
=3" all that has happened. So deeply is the theological element sunk in the realm of 
B colportage. One might even say that the deepest truths, far from having risen 
« ; above the animal torpor of human being, possess the mighty power of being able 
bB to adapt to the dull and commonplace — indeed, of mirroring themselves, after 
Jj their fashion, in irresponsible dreams. [Sla,5] 

No decline of the arcades, but sudden transformation. At one blow, they became 
the hollow mold from which the image of "modernity" was cast. Here, the 
century mirrored with satisfaction its most recent past. [Sla,6] 



Every date from the sixteenth century trails purple after it. Those of the nine- 
teenth century are only now receiving their physiognomy. Especially from the 
data of architecture and socialism. [Sla,7] 



Every epoch appears to itself inescapably modern — but each one also has a right 
to be taken thus. What is to be understood by "inescapably modern," however, 
emerges very clearly in the following sentence: "Perhaps our descendants will 
understand the second main period of history after Christ to have its inception in 
the French Revolution and in the turn from the eighteenth to the nineteenth 
century, while grasping the first main period in terms of the development of the 
whole Christian world, including the Reformation." At another place, it is a 
question of "a great period that cuts more deeply than any other into the history 
of the world — a period without religious founders, without ref onners or lawgiv- 
ers." Julius Meyer, Geschichte der modernen Franzosuchen Malerei (Leipzig, 1867), 
pp. 22, 21. The author assumes that history is constantly expanding. But this is, 
in reality, a consequence of the fact that industry gives it its truly epochal charac- 
ter. The feeling that an epochal upheaval had begun with the nineteenth century 
was no special privilege of Hegel and Marx. [Sla,8] 



The dreaming collective knows no history. Events pass before it as always identi- 
cal and always new. The sensation of the newest and most modern is, in fact, just 
as much a dream formation of events as "the eternal return of the same." The 
perception of space that corresponds to this perception of time is the interpene- 
trating and superposed transparency of the world of the flaneur. This feeling of 
space, this feeling of time, presided at the birth of modem feuilletonism. D Dream 
Collective D [S2,l] 



"What drives us into contemplation of the past is the similarity between what has 
been and our own life, which are somehow one being. Through grasping this 



identity, we can transport ourselves into even the purest of all regions — into S 
death." Hugo von Hofmannsthal, Buck derFreunde (Leipzig, 1929), p. 111." 

t S2 ' 2 ] m 

Very striking how Hofmaimsthal calls this "somehow one being" a being in the j§_ 
sphere of death. Hence the immortality of his "religious novice," that fictional 
character of whom he spoke during his last meeting with me, and who was c 
supposed to make his way through changing religions down the centuries, as 3_ 
through the suite of rooms of one grand apartment. 7 How it is that, within the ji 
narrowly confined space of a single life, this "being somehow one" with what has 2 
been leads into the sphere of death — this dawned on me for the first time in Paris, ?i 
during a conversation about Proust, in 1930. To be sure, Proust never heightened 
but rather analyzed humanity. His moral greatness, though, lies in quite another 
direction. With a passion unknown to any writer before him, he took as his 
subject the fidelity to things that have crossed our path in life. Fidelity to an 
afternoon, to a tree, a spot of sun on the carpet; fidelity to garments, pieces of 
furniture, to perfumes or landscapes. (The discovery he ultimately makes on the 
road to Meseglise is the highest "moral teaching" Proust has to offer: a sort of 
spatial transposition of the semper idem.) I grant that Proust, in the deepest sense, 
"perhaps ranges himself on the side of death." His cosmos has its sun, perhaps, in 
death, around which orbit the lived moments, the gathered things. "Beyond the 
pleasure principle" is probably the best commentary there is on Proust's works. 
In order to understand Proust, generally speaking, it is perhaps necessary to 
begin with the fact that his subject is the obverse side, le revers, "not so much of 
the world but of life itself." [S2,3] 

The eternity of the operetta, says Wiesengrund in his essay on this form," is the 
eternity of yesterday. [S2,4] 

"Perhaps no simulacrum has provided us with an ensemble of oh jects more pre- 
cisely attuned to the concept of 'ideal' than that great simulacrum which consti- 
tutes the revolutionary ornamental architecture of Jugendstil. No collective effort 
has succeeded in creating a dream world as pure, and as disturhing, as these 
Jugendstil buildings. Situated, as they are, on the margins of architecture, they 
alone constitute the realization of desires in which an excessively violent and cruel 
automatism painfully betrays the sort of hatred for reality and need for refuge in 
an ideal world that we find in childhood neurosis." Salvador DaK, "L'Ane 
pourri," Le Surrealisme oil service de la revolution, 1, no. 1 (Paris, 1930), p. 12. 
D Industry D Advertising D [S2,5] 

"Here is what we can still love: the imposing block of those rapturous and frigid 
structures scattered across all of Europe, scorned and neglected by anthologies 
and studies." Salvador Dali, "L'Ane pourri," Le Surrealisme au service de la involu- 
tion, 1, no. 1 (Paris, 1930), p. 12. Perhaps no city contains more perfect examples 



of thisjugendstil than Barcelona, in the works of the architect who designed the 
Church of the Sagrada Familia. 9 [S2a,l] 



Wiesengrund cites and comments on a passage from Kierkegaard's Repetition: 
"One ciimhs the stairs to the first lloor in a gas-illuminated building, opens a little 
door, and stands in the entry. To the left is a glass door leading to a room. One 
continues directly ahead into an anteroom. Beyond are two entirely identical 
rooms, identically furnished, as though one were the mirror reflection of the 
other." Apropos of this passage (Kierkegaard, <Gesammelte> Werke, vol. 3 <Jena, 
1909 > , p. 138), which he cites at greater length, Wiesengrund remarks: "The du- 
plication of the room is unfathomable, seeming to be a reflection without being so. 
Like these rooms, perhaps all semblance in history resembles itself, so long as it 
itself, obedient to nature, persists as semblance." Wiesengrund-Adorno, Kier- 
kegaard (Tubingen, 1933), p. 50. 10 D Mirror D Interior D [S2a,2] 

On the motif of the heathscapes in Kafka's Der Prozefi: in the time of hell, the new 
(the pendant) is always the eternally selfsame. [S2a,3] 

After the Commune: "England welcomed the exiles and did everything it could to 
keep them. At the exhibition of 1878, it became clear that she had risen above 
France and Paris to take the premier position in the applied arts. If the modern 
style returned to France in 1900, this is perhaps a distant consequence of the 
barbarous manner in which the Commune was repressed." Dubech and d'Espezel, 
Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 437. [S2a,4] 

"The desire was to create a style out of thin air. Foreign infl uences favored the 
'modern style, 1 which was almost entirely inspired by floral decor. The English 
Pre-Baphaelites and the Munich urbanists provided the model. Iron construction 
was succeeded by reinforced concrete. This was the nadir for architecture, one 
which coincided with the deepest political depression. It was at this moment that 
Paris acquired those buildings and monuments which were so very strange and so 
little in accord with the older city: the building in composite style designed by 
M. Bouwens at 27 Quai d'Orsay; the subway shelters; the Samaritaine department 
store, erected by Frantz Jourdain in the middle of the historic landscape of the 
Quartier Saint-Germain rAuxerrois." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, 
p. 465. [S2a,5] 

"What M. Arsene Alexandre, then, calls 'the profound charm of streamers blow- 
ing in the wind' — this serpentine effect is that of the octopus style, of green, poorly 
fired ceramics, of lines forced and stretched into tentacular ligaments, of matter 
tortured for no good reason. . . . Gourds, pumpkins, hibiscus roots, and volutes 
are the inspiration for an illogical furniture upon which appear hydrangeas, bats, 
polianthes, and peacock feathers — creations of artists in the grip of an unfortu- 
nate passion for symbols and 'poetry. 1 ... In an era of light and electricity, what 



triumphs is the aquarium, the greenish, the submarine, the hybrid, the poison- 
ous." Paul Morand, 1900 (Paris, 1931), pp. 101-103. [S2a,6] 



"This style of 1900, moreover, infects the whole of literature. Never was writing 
more pretentious. In novels, the particule is obligatory for names: there is Ma- 
dame de Scrimeuse, Madame de Girionne, Madame de Charmaille, Monsieur de 
Phocas; impossible names: Yanis, Damosa, Lord Eginard. . . . The Legendes du 
Moyen age, by Gaston Paris, which has just come out, plays to the fervent cult of 
the neo-Gothic: it offers nothing but Grails, Isoldes, Ladies of the Unicorn. Pierre 
Louys writes "le throne," with the older Latinate spelling; everywhere are found 
abysses, ymages, gyres, and the like. , . , The triumph of the y. " Paul Morand, 
1900 (Paris, 1931), pp. 179-181. [S3,l] 

"It seemed to me worthwhile to bring together, in an issue of the journal [Mino- 
taure, 3-4] containing several admirable specimens of Jugendstil art, a certain 
number of mediumistie designs .... In fact, one is immediately struck by similari- 
ties between these two modes of expression. What is Jugendstil, I am tempted to 
ask, but an attempt to generalize and to adapt mediumistie design, painting, and 
sculpture to dwellings and furniture? We find there the same discordance in the 
details; the same impossibility of repetition that guides the true, captivating 
stereotypy; the same delight in the never-ending curve (whether it he growing fern, 
or ammonite, or embryonic curl); the same profusion of minutiae, the contempla- 
tion of which seduces the eye away from pleasure in the whole. ... It could be 
maintained that these two enterprises are actually conceived tinder the same sign, 
which might well be that of the octopus: "the octopus," as Lautreamont has said, 
"with the gaze of silk." From one part to another, in terms of plastic design, down 
to the very smallest feature, it is the triumph of the equivocal; in terms of interpre- 
tation, down to the most insignificant detail, it is the triumph of the complex. Even 
the borrowing, ad nauseam, of subjects, accessory or otherwise, from the plant 
world is common to these two modes of expression (which respond, in principle, to 
quite different needs for externalization). And both of them display, to an equal 
degree, a tendency to evoke superficially . . . certain ancient artforms of Asia and 
the Americas." Andre Breton, Point du jour (Paris <1934>), pp. 234—236. 

[S3,2] 

The painted foliage on the ceilings of the Bibliothei|ue Nationale. As one leafs 
through the pages down below, it rustles up above. [S3,3] 

"Just as pieces of furniture gravitate toward one another — davenport and coat 
rack are actually the fruit of such convergence — so it seems that walls, fl oors, and 
ceilings are possessed of a peculiar power of attraction. Increasingly, furniture is 
becoming untranspor table, immovahle; it clings to walls and corners, sticks fast to 
floors, and, as it were, takes root. . . . 'Detached' works of art, like paintings that 
need to be hung or sculpture that has to be placed, are wherever possible es- 
chewed, and this tendency is very materially abetted by the revival of wall paint- 



§ ing, frescoes, decorative tapestry, and glass-painting. ... In this way, all perma- 

nent contents of the home are absorbed in exchange, while the occupant himself 
loses the power of moving about freely and becomes attached to ground and prop- 

"g erty." Dolf Sternberger, "Jugendstil," Die neue Rundschau, 45 (September 9, 

| 1934), pp. 264-266. [S3a,l] 

•3 

g "It is by means of the rich and powerful contour that . . . the figure of the soul 

becomes ornament. . . . Maeterlinck . . . praises silence (in he Tresor des humbles 

bB <The Treasure of the Humble)), that silence which does not depend on the arbi- 

trary will of two separate beings but rather wells up, so to speak, as a third being, 

O, sufficient to itself, thereafter growing to envelop the lovers and, in this way, first 

* enabling their intimacy. This veil of silence reveals itself clearly enough as a form 

of contour or as a truly animated . . . form of ornament." Dolf Sternberger, 
"Jugendstil," Die neue Rundschuu, 45 (September 9, 1934), p. 270. [S3a,2] 

"Thus, every house appears ... to be an organism which expresses its interior 
through its exterior, and van de Velde unmistakably betrays . . . the model for his 
vision of the city of characters . . .: 'To anyone who objects that this would he a 
carnival of confusion . . ., we would point to the harmonious and gladdening im- 
pression produced by a garden where terrestrial and aquatic plants are growing 
freely. ' If the city is a garden full of freely growing house-organisms, it is not clear 
where, in such a vision, man would occupy a place, unless it be that he is caught 
within the interior of this plant life, himself rooted and attached to the soil — land 
or water — and, as if by enchantment (metamorphosis), rendered incapable of 
moving otherwise than as the plant that frames and encases him should move. . . . 
It is something like the astral body which Rudolf Steiner envisioned and experi- 
enced — Rudolf Steiner, . . . whose . . . school . . . endowed so many of its works 
. . . with an ornamental solemnity, the curved signature of which is nothing other 
than a vestige of Jugendstil ornament." See the essay's epigraph from Ovid, Meta- 
morphosis, hook 3, lines 509-510: "But when they sought his body, they found 
nothing, / Only a flower with a yellow center / Surrounded with white petals."" 
Sternberger, "Jugendstil," pp. 268-269, 254. [S3a,3] 

The view of Jugendstil represented below is very problematic, for no historical 
phenomenon can be grasped exclusively under the category of flight; such flight 
is always registered concretely in terms of what is flown. "What . . . remains 
outside ... is the din of cities, the unbridled fury not of the elements but of 
industry, the all-inclusive sovereignty of the modem economics of exchange, the 
world of ongoing activity, of technologized labor, and of the masses, the world 
that appeared to the exponents of Jugendstil as a general uproar, stifling and 
chaotic." Dolf Sternberger, 'Jugendstil," Die neue Rundschau, 45 (September 9, 
1934), p. 260. [S4,l] 



"The most characteristic work of Jugendstil is the house. More precisely, the 
single-family dwelling." Sternberger, "Jugendstil," Die neue Rundschau, 45 (Sep- 
tember 9, 1934), p. 264. [S4,2] 



Delvau speaks, at one point, of the "future Benedictines who will write the history 
of Paris as it was in the nineteenth century." Alfred Delvau, Les Dessous de Paris 
(Paris, 1860), p. 32 ("Alexandre Privat d'Anglemont"). [S4,3] 



Jugendstil and socialist housing policy: "The art of the future will be more per- 
sonal than what has come before. At no other time has man's passion for self- 
knowledge been so strong as it is today, and the place where he can best fulfill and 
transform his individuality is the house, the house which each of us, according to 
his . . . heart's desire, will build. ... In each of us slumbers a gift for ornamental 
invention . . . sufficiently compelling ... to allow us to dispense with any middle- 
man in order to build our house." After citing these lines from van de Velde's 
Renaissance in modernen Kunstgeiverbe < Renaissance in the Modern Decorative 
Arts>, Karski continues: "For anyone who reads this, it must be absolutely clear 
that such an ideal is impossible in the present state of society, and that its realiza- 
tion is reserved for socialism." J. Karski, "Moderne Kunststromungen und Sozial- 
ismus," Die neue Zeit, 20, no. 1 (Stuttgart < 1901-1902 >), pp. 146-147. [S4,4] 



Among the stylistic elements that enter into Jugendstil from iron construction 
and technical design, one of the most important is the predominance of the vide 
over the plein, the empty over the full. [S4,5] 

Just as Ibsen passes judgment on Jugendstil architecture in ihe Master Builder, so 
he passes judgment on its female type in Hedda Gabler. She is the theatrical sister 
of those diseuses and dancers who, in floral depravity or innocence, appear naked 
and without objective background on Jugendstil posters. [S4,6] 

When we have to get up early on a day of departure, it can sometimes happen 
that, unwilling to tear ourselves away from sleep, we dream that we are out of 
bed and getting dressed. Such a dream was dreamed in Jugendstil by the bour- 
geoisie, fifteen years before history woke them with a bang. [S4a, 1] 

'"'That is the longing: to dwell midst the waves / and have no homeland in time." 
Rainer Maria Rilke, Diefriihen Gedichte (Leipzig, 1922), p. 1 (epigraph). 

[S4a,2] 



"The Paris Street," at the Paris world exhibition of 1900, realizes, in an extreme 
manner, the idea of the private dwelling that is characteristic of Jugendstil: "Here, 
in a long row, buildings of various kinds . . . have been erected . . . The satirical 
newspaper Le Rire has set up a Punch and Judy show. . . . The originator of the 
serpentine dance, Loie Fuller, has her theater in the row. Not far away ... a house 
that appears to be standing on its head, with its roof planted in the earth and its 
doorsills pointing skyward, and which is known as The Tower of Wonders.' . . . 
The idea, at any rate, is original." Th. Heine, "Die Strasse von Paris" in Die 
Pariser Weltausstellung in Wort und Bild, ed. Dr. Georg Malkowsky (Berlin, 1900), 
p. 78. [S4a,3] 



On the upside-down manor house: "This little house, constructed in Gothic style, 
stands . . . literally on its head; that is, its roof, with its chimneys and turrets, is 
stuck into the ground, while its foundation points to the heavens. Naturally, all the 
windows, doors, balconies, galleries, moMings, ornaments, and inscriptions are 
upside down too, and even the face of the grandfather clock obeys this ten- 
dency. ... So far, this mad idea is amusing . . . , but once you are inside, it becomes 
tiresome. There, you are . . . yourself . . . upside down, together with . . . the 
objects on view. . . . One sees a table set for lunch, a rather richly furnished salon, 
as well as a hathroom. . . . The adjoining room . . . and some others, too, are 
actually lined with concave and convex mirrors. The contractors call them quite 
simply 'laughing chambers. '" "Le Manoir a Ten vers," Die Pmriser Weltausstellung 
in Wort unci Bild, ed. Dr. Georg Malkowsky (Berlin, 1900), p. 474-475. [S4a,4] 

On the London world exhibition of 1 85 1 : "~V\fe still reside amid the aftereffects of 
what this exhibition achieved — not only in the realm of technology and machines, 
but in the realm of artistic development. . . . We ask ourselves today whether the 
movement that led to the production of monumental buildings in glass and iron 
. . . was not also heralded in the design of furniture and utensils. In 1851 this 
question could not have arisen, although there were many things that could be 
noted. In the first decades of the nineteenth century, mechanized industry in 
England had advanced to the point where furnishings and utensils were being 
stripped of superfluous ornamentation so as to be manufactured more easily 
through machines. In this way there emerged, for furniture especially, a series of 
very simple but thoroughly constructive and altogether sensible forms, in which 
we are again beginning to take an interest. The wholly modern furniture of 1900, 
which eschews all ornament and puts the accent on pure line, maintains a direct 
link to that delicately balanced and compact mahogany furniture of 1830-1850. 
But in 1850 no one appreciated what had already in fact been reached in the 
pursuit of new and fundamental forms." (People succumbed, instead, to the 
historicism that initially fostered a vogue for the Renaissance.) Julius Lessing, 
Das halbe Jahrhundert der Weltausstellungen (Berlin, 1900), p. 1 1-12. [S5,l] 

In connection with Kafka's Titorelli <Sl,4>, compare the program of the natural- 
ist painters around 1860: "According to them, the position of the artist toward 
nature ought to be . . . impersonal — so much so that he should be capable of 
painting the same picture ten times in succession, without hesitating and without 
having the later copies differ in any way from those that came before." Gisela 
Freund, La Photographic au point de vne sociologique (manuscript, p. 128). [S5,2] 

Perhaps an attempt should be made to extend the scope of this inquiry up to the 
threshold of the war, by tracing the influence of Jugendstil on the youth move- 
ment. 12 [S5,3] 



The facade of the "Information" Building on the Rue Reaumur is an example of 
Jugendstil in which the ornamental modification of supporting structures is seen 
particularly clearly. [S5,4] 



Influence of the processes of technological reproduction on the realists' theory of 
painting: "According to them, the position of the artist toward nature ought to be 
completely impersonal — so much so that he should be capable of painting the 
same picture ten times in succession, without hesitating and without having the 
later copies differ in any way from those that came before." Gisele Freund, La 
Photogrmphie en France au XIX siecle (Paris, 1936), p. 106. [S5,5] 

Careful attention should be given to the relation of Jugendstil to Symbolism, 
which brings out its esoteric side. Therive writes, in his review of Edouard 
Dujardin, Mallarrne par un des siens (Paris, 1936) : "In an astute preface to a book 
by Edouard Dujardin, Jean Cassou explains that le symbolisme was a mystical, 
magical enterprise, and that it posed the eternal problem of jargon — 'argot essen- 
tialized, which signifies, on the part of the artistic caste, the will to absence and 
escape.' . . . What Symbolism liked best was the semiparodic play with dreams, 
with ambiguous forms; and this commentator goes so far as to say that the 
melange of aestheticism and bad taste of the sort popularized by Le Chat Noir 
(caf' cone', for at/e concert; leg-o'-mutton sleeves; orchids; and hairstyles inspired 
by wrought-iron designs) was a necessary and exquisite combination." Andre 
Therive, "Les Livres" (Le Temps, June 25, 1936). [S5a,l] 

Dernier labored four years on a portrait that hangs in the Louvre, and along the 
way he did not scorn the use of a magnifying glass to obtain a reproduction 
perfectly faithful to nature. This at a time when photography had already been 
invented. <?> So difficult is it for man to relinquish his place and allow the 
apparatus to take over for him. (See Gisele Freund, La Photographie en France au 
XIX siecle [Paris, 1936], p. 112.) * [S5 a ,2] 

In a prefiguration of Jugendstil, Baudelaire sketches "a room that is like a dream, 
a truly spiritual room. . . . Every piece of furniture is of an elongated form, 
languid and prostrate, and seems to be dreaming — endowed, one would say, with 
a sonmambular existence, like minerals and plants." In this text, he conjures an 
idol that might well call to mind the "unnatural mothers" of Segantini or Ibsen's 
Hedda Gabler: "the Idol . . . Yes, those are her eyes . . . those subtle and terrible 
eyes that I recognize by their dread mockery." Charles Baudelaire, Le Spleen de 
Paris, ed. R. Simon (Paris), p. 5 ("La Chambre double"). 13 [S5 a ,3] 

In the book The Nightside of Paris, by Edmund B. d'Auvergne (London, n.d., 
circa 1910), there is a mention, on page 56, of the old Chat Noir cafe (Rue Yictor- 
Masse), where, over the door, there was an inscription that read: "Passerhy, he 
modern!" (In a letter from Wiesengrund.) — Rollinat at Le Chat Noir. <See 
J55a,7.> [S5 a ,4] 

"What could be further from us than the amazing ambition of a Leonardo, who, 
considering painting as a supreme end, a supreme display of knowledge, and 
deciding that it called for omniscience, did not hesitate to embark on a universal 
analysis whose depth and precision leave us overwhelmed? The passage from the 



ancient grandeur of painting to its present condition is quite perceptible in the 
artworks and writings of Eugene Delacroix. This modern, full of ideas, is tortured 
with restlessness and a sense of impotence; at each instant he encounters the limits 
of his resources in his efforts to equal the masters of the past. Nothing could better 
illustrate the diminution of that indefinable force and fullness of earlier days than 
the spectacle of that very noble artist, divided against himself, embarking nerv- 
ously on a last struggle to attain the grand style in art." Paul Valery, Pieces sur 
Vart (Paris), pp. 191-192 ("Antonr de Corot"). 14 [S6,l] 



"The victories of art seem bought by the loss of character." Karl Marx, "Die 
Revolutionen von 1848 und das Proletariat," speech to mark the fourth anniver- 
sary of the foundation of the <Chartist> Peoples Paper; published in The Peoples 
Paper, April 19, 1856. [In Karl Marx als Denker, Mensch und Revolutioniir, ed. 
D. Rjazanov (Vienna, Berlin <1928>), p. 42. ] ,s [S6,2] 

Dolf Sternberger's essay "Hohe See und Schiffbruch" <High Seas and Shipwreclo 
is concerned with the "transformations of an allegory." "It is from allegory that 
genre is born. Shipwreck as allegory signifies . . . the ephemerality of the world in 
general; shipwreck as genre is a peephole looking out on a world beyond ours, on a 
dangerous life that is not our life but is nevertheless necessary. . . . This heroic 
genre remains the sign under which the reorganization and reconciliation of soci- 
ety . . . begins," as he writes in another passage with reference to Spielhagen's 
Stunnflut <The Breaking of the Storm> (1877). Die neue Rundschau, 46 (August 
8, 1935), pp. 196, 199. [S6,3] 

"Private comfort was virtually unknown among the Greeks. These citizens of 
small towns, who raised in their midst so many admirable public monuments, 
resided in houses that were more than modest, houses in which vases (though 
masterpieces of elegance, to be sure) constituted the only furnishings. Ernest 
Renan, Essais de morale et de critique (Paris, 1859), p. 359 ("La Poesie a 1'Exposi- 
tion"). To be compared with this is the character of the rooms in the Goethe 
House. — Note die quite opposite love of comfort in Baudelaire's production. 

[S6,4] 

"Far from saying that the progress of art is parallel to that made by a nation in the 
taste for 'comfort' (I am forced to use this barbarous word to express an idea quite 
un-French), we can unequivocally state, on the contrary, that the epochs and the 
countries in which comfort became the public's principal attraction have had the 
least talent for art. . . . Convenience excludes style; a pot from an English factory 
is better adapted to its end than all the vases of Vulci or Nola. These latter are 
works of art, whereas the English pot will never be anything but a household 
utensil. . . . The incontestable conclusion is that nowhere in history is the progress 
of industry in any way parallel to the progress of art." Ernest Renan, Essais de 
moral et de critique (Paris, 1859), pp. 359, 361, 363 ("La Poesie de l'Exposition"). 

[S6a,l] 



"The rapid overpopulation of the capital had the effect ... of reducing the surface 
area in rooms. Already in his 'Salon de 1828,' Stendhal wrote: 'Eight days ago, I 
went to look for an apartment on the Rue Godot-de-Mauroy. I was struck by the 
smallness of the rooms. The century of painting is over, I said to myself with a sigh; 
only engraving can prosper.'" Amedee Ozenfant, " La Peinture murale," (in Ency- 
clopedic franqaise, vol. 16, Arts et litteratures dans la societe content poraine, 1 
<Paris, 1935 >, p. 70). [S6a,2] 

Baudelaire in his review of Madame Bovary: "Realism — a repulsive insult flung in 
the face of every analytic writer, a vague and elastic word which for the ordinary 
man signifies not a new means of creation, hut a minute description of trivial 
details." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique, p. 413. 16 [S6a,3] 

In Chapter 24, "Beaux-Arts," of the Argument du livre sur la Belgique: "Special- 
ists. — One painter for sunshine, one for snow, one for moonlight, one for furni- 
ture, one for fabrics, one for flowers — and subdivision of specialties ad 
infinitum. — Collaboration a necessity, as in industry." Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 
2, cd. Y.-G. Le Dantec <Paris, 1932>, p. 718. [S6a,4] 

"The elevation of urban life to the level of myth signifies right away, for the more 
clearheaded, a keen predisposition of modernity. The position which tliis latter 
concept occupies in Baudelaire is well known. . . . For lrim, as he says, it is a 
'principal and essential problem,' a question of knowing whether or not his age 
possesses 'a specific beauty inherent in our new passions.' We know bis answer: it 
is the conclusion of that essay which, at least in its range, remains the most consid- 
erable of his theoretic writings: "The marvelous envelops and permeates us, like 
the atmosphere itself; hut we do not see it. . . . For the heroes of the Iliad cannot 
compare with you, 0 Vautrin, 0 Rastignac, 0 Birotteau — nor with you, 0 Fon- 
tanares, who dared not publicly recount your sorrows wearing the funereal and 
rumpled frock coat of today; nor with you, 0 Honore de Balzac, you the most 
heroic, the most amazing, the most romantic, and the most poetic of all the charac- 
ters that you have drawn from your fertile bosom' (Baudelaire, 'Salon de 1846,' 
section 18)."" Roger CaiJlois, "Paris, mythe moderne, Nouvelle Revue franqaise, 
25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), pp. 690-691. [S7,l] 

In Chapter 24, "Beaux-Arts," of the Argument du livre sur la Belgique: "A few 
pages on that infamous poseur named Wiertz, a favorite of English cockneys." 
Baudelaire, Oeuvres, vol. 2, ed. Y.-G. Le Dantec <Paris, 1932> , p. 718. And page 
720: "Independent painting. — Wiertz. Charlatan. Idiot. Thief. . . . Wiertz, the 
philosopher-painter and litterateur. Modern moonshine. The Christ of humani- 
tarians. . . . Inanity comparable to that of Victor Hugo at the end of Les Contem- 
plations. Aholition of death's sting, infinite power of humanity. / Inscriptions on 
walls. Grave offenses against France and French critics. Wiertz's maxims, ahove 
all. . . . Brussels the capital of the world. Paris a province. Wiertz's books. Plagia- 
risms. He doesn't know how to draw, and his stupidity is as massive as his giants. 



This phony, in sum, knows how to manage his affairs. But what will Brussels do 
with aJl this after his death? / Trompe-l'oeil. The bellows camera. Napoleon in 
hell. The book of Waterloo. Wiertz and Victor Hugo are out to save the world." 



Ingres, in his Reponse au rapport sur I'Ecole des Beaux-Arts (Paris, 1863), makes the 
bluntest possible defense of the institutions of the school before the Minister of 
Fine Arts, to whom the communication is directed. In this, he does not take sides 
against Romanticism. His response has to do, from the beginning (p. 4), with 
industry: "Now people want to marry industry to art. Industry! We want none of 
it! Let it keep to its place and not come plant itself on the steps of our 
school . . . !" — Ingres insists on making drawing the sole basis of instruction in 
painting. One can learn the use of colors in eight days. [S7a,l] 

Daniel Halevy remembers seeing Italian models in his childhood — women dressed 
in the costume of Sorrento with a tambourine in their hands, who used to stand 
chatting at the fountain in the Place Pigalle. See Halevy, Pays parisiens < Paris, 



The life of flowers injugendstil: from the flowers of evil extends an arc, over the 
flower-souls of Odilon Redon, to the orchids which Proust weaves into the eroti- 



Segantini's "unnatural mothers," as a motif of Jugendstil, closely related to Les 
Lesbiennes <seeJ19,4>. The depraved woman stays clear of fertility, as the priest 
stays clear of it. Jugendstil, in fact, describes two distinct lines. That of perversion 
leads from Baudelaire to Wilde and Beardsley; the hieratic line leads through 
Mallaime to George. In the end, a third line stands out more vigorously, the only 
one that here and there emerges from the realm of art. This is the line of emanci- 
pation, which, taking its departure from Les Fleurs du mal, conjoins the under- 
world that produces the Tagebuch einer Verlorenen ls with the heights of Zara- 
thustra. (This, presumably, the point of the remark made by Capus.) [S7a,4] 

Motif of infertility: Ibsen's women characters don't sleep with their men; they go 
"hand in hand" with them to encounter something terrible. [S7a,5] 

The perverse flower-glance of Odilon Redon. [S7a,6] 

Formulas of emancipation in Ibsen: the ideal challenge; dying in beauty; homes 
for human beings <see I4,4>; one's own responsibility {The Lady from the Sea). 



[S7.2] 



1932 >, p. 60. 



[S7a,2] 



cism of his Swann. 



[S7a,3] 



[S8.1] 



Jugendstil is the stylizing style par excellence. 



[S8.2] 



The idea of eternal return in £aratkustra is, according to its true nature, a styliza- $ 

tion of the worldview that in Blanqui still displays its infernal traits. It is a ^ 

stylization of existence down to the tiniest fractions of its temporal process. „ 

Nevertheless: Zarathustra's style disavows itself in the doctrine that is ex- 13 

pounded through it. [S8,3] 1' 

I' 

The three defining "motifs" ofjugendstil: the hieratic motif, the motif of perver- 05 

sion, the motif of emancipation. They all have their place in Les Flenrs du tnal; to cL 

each of them one can assign a representative poem from the collection. To the J* 5 

first, "Benediction"; to the second, "Delphine et Hippolyte"; to the third, "Les jf" 

Litanies de Satan." [S8,4] a. 



Zarathustra has, first of all, appropriated to himself the tectonic elements of 
Jugendstil, in contrast to its organic motifs. The pauses especially, which are 
characteristic of his rhytlnnics, are an exact counterpart to the tectonic phenome- 
non so basic to this style — namely, the predominance of the hollow form over the 
filled form. [S8,5] 



Certain themes ofjugendstil are derived from technological forms. Thus the 
profiles of iron supports that appear as ornamental motifs on facades. See the 
essay [by Martin?] in the Frankfurter ^eihing, circa 1926-1929. [S8,6] 



"Benediction" : "So thoroughly will I twist this miserable tree / that it will never 
put forth its evil-smelling buds!" 1 * The plant motif ofjugendstil, and its line, 
appear here — and certainly not in a passage more ready to hand. [S8,7] 



Jugendstil forces the auratic. Never has the sun worn a more glorious aureole; 
never was the eye of man more radiant than with Fidus. Maeterlinck pushes the 
unfolding of the auratic to the point of absurdity. The silence of the characters in 
his plays is one of its manifestations. Baudelaire's "Perte d'aureole" 2 " stands in the 
most decided opposition to this Jugendstil motif. [S8,8] 



Jugendstil is the second attempt on the part of art to come to terms with technol- 
ogy. The first attempt was realism. There the problem was more or less present in 
the consciousness of the artists, who were uneasy about the new processes of 
technological reproduction. (The theory of realism demonstrates this; see S5,5.) 
In Jugendstil, the problem as such was already prey to repression. Jugendstil no 
longer saw itself threatened by the competing technology. And so the confronta- 
tion with technology that lies hidden within it was all the more aggressive. Its 
recourse to technological motifs arises from the effort to sterilize them ornamen- 
tally. (It was tliis, we may say in passing, that gave Adolf Loos's struggle against 
ornament its salient political significance.) [S8a,l] 



The fundamental motif ofjugendstil is the transfiguration of infertility. The body 
is portrayed, preferably, in the forms that precede sexual maturity. [S8a,2] 



Lesbian love carries spiritualization forward into the very womb of the woman. 
There it raises its lily-banner of "pure love," which knows no pregnancy and no 
family. [S8a,3] 

The consciousness of someone prone to spleen furnishes a miniature model of 
the world spirit to which the idea of eternal recurrence would have to be as- 
cribed. [S8a,4] 

"There, man passes through forests of symbols / Which observe him with famil- 
iar eyes." "Correspondances." 21 It is the flower-gazes ofjugendstil that emerge 
here. Jugendstil wins back symbols. The word "symbol" is not often found in 
Baudelaire. [S8a,5] 

The development that led Maeterlinck, in the course of a long life, to an ex- 
tremely reactionary position is logical. [S8a,6] 

The reactionary attempt to sever technologically constituted forms from their 
functional contexts and turn them into natural constants — that is, to stylize 
them — appears, in a mode similar to Jugendstil, somewhat later in Futurism. 

[S8a,7] 

The sense of sorrow which autumn awakens in Baudelaire. It is the season of 
harvest, the time when the flowers are undone. Autumn is invoked in Baudelaire 
with particular solemnity. To it are consecrated the words that are perhaps the 
most mournful in all his poetry. Of the sun, it is said: "He bids the crops to grow 
and ripen / in the immortal heart that would always flower." 22 In the figure of the 
heart that would bear no fruit, Baudelaire has already passed judgment on 
Jugendstil, long before its appearance on the scene. [S9,l] 

"This seeking for my home . . . was my affliction. . . . Where is — my home? I ask 
and seek and have sought for it; I have not found it. Oh, eternal Everywhere; oh, 
eternal Nowhere." Citation from Zarathustra, in Karl Lowith, Nietzsches Phi- 
losophic der ewigen Wiederkunft < Berlin, 1935 >, p. 35 [compare the Rilke epi- 
graph, S4a,2], ed. Kroner, p. 398. 2 ! [S9,2] 

It may be supposed that in the typical Jugendstil line — conjoined in fantastic 
montage — nerve and electrical wire not infrequently meet (and that the vegetal 
nervous system in particular operates, as a limiting form, to mediate between the 
world of organism and the world of technology) . "The fm-de-siecle cult of the 
nerves . . . maintains this telegraphic image of exchange. It was said of Strindberg 
by his second wife, Frida, . . . that his nerves had become so sensitive to atmo- 
spheric electricity that an approaching thunderstorm would send its signal over 



them as if over electrical wires." Dolf Sternberger, Panorama (Hamburg, 1938), 
p. 33. [S9,3] 



Injugendstil, the bourgeoisie begins to come to terms with the conditions — not 
yet, to be sure, of its social dominion — but of its dominion over nature. Insight 
into these conditions engenders a strain at the threshold of its consciousness. 
Hence the mysticism (Maeterlinck) which seeks to deflect this pressure; but 
hence also the reception of technological forms injugendstil — for example, of 
hollow space. [S9,4] 

TTie chapter in £arathastra entitled "Unter Tochtem der Wiiste" < Among the 
Daughters of the Desert> is instructive, not only for the fact that the flower 
maidens — an important Jugendstil motif — make an appearance here in 
Nietzsche, but also in view of Nietzsche's kinship with Guys. The phrase "deep 
but without thoughts" 2 1 perfectly captures the expression worn by the prostitutes 
in Guys. [S9a,l] 

The extreme point in the technological organization of the world is the liquida- 
tion of fertility. The frigid woman embodies the ideal of beauty injugendstil. 
(Jugendstil sees in every woman not Helena but Olympia.) [S9a,2] 

Individual, group, mass — the group is the principle of genre. For Jugendstil, the 
isolation of the individual is typical (see Ibsen). [S9a,3] 

Jugendstil represents an advance, insofar as the bourgeoisie gains access to the 
technological bases of its control over nature; a regression, insofar as it loses the 
power of looking the everyday in the face. (That can still be done only within the 
security of the saving lie.) 25 — The bourgeoisie senses that its days are numbered; 
all the more it wishes to stay young. Thus, it deludes itself with the prospect of a 
longer life or, at the least, a death in beauty. [S9a,4] 



Segantini and Munch; Margarete Bohme and Przybyszewski. [S9a,5] 

Vaihinger's philosophy of the "as if" is Jugendstil's little death knell, sounding for 
those condemned. [S9a,6] 



"With the early works of Hennebique and the Perret brothers, a new chapter 
opens in the history of architecture. The desire for escape and renewal, it should 
he added, had been seen in the efforts of the Jugendstil school, which failed miser- 
ably. These architects, it seemed, would torture stone to the point of exhaustion, 
and they thus prepared the way for a fierce reaction in favor of simplicity. Archi- 
tectural art was to he reborn in serene forms through the utilization of new materi- 
als." Marcel Zahar, "Les Tendances actuelles de 1' architecture," Encyclopedic 
francaise, vol. 17, p. 17). [S9a,7] 



In his "Salons," Baudelaire has given himself out as an implacable foe of genre. 
Baudelaire stands at the beginning of that "modern style" which represents an 
attempt to liquidate genre. In Les Flairs du mal, this Jugendstil emerges for the 
first time with its characteristic floral motif. [S10,1] 

The following passage from Valery [Oeuvres completes, J, cited by Therive, Le 
lemps, April 20, 1939) reads like a reply to Baudelaire: "Modern man is a slave to 
modernity. . . . We will soon have to build heavily insulated cloisters. . . . Speed, 
numbers, effects of surprise, contrast, repetition, size, novelty, and credulity will 
be despised there." 2 " [S10.2] 

Concerning sensation: this pattern — novelty and the depreciation that befalls it, 
with a shock — has found a peculiarly drastic expression since the middle of the 
nineteenth century. The worn coin loses nothing of its value; the postmarked 
stamp is devalued. It is probably the first sort of voucher whose validity is 
inseparable from its character of newness. (The registration of value goes to- 
gether here with its cancellation.) [S10.3] 

On the motif of sterility in Jugendstil: procreation was felt to be the least worthy 
manner of subscribing to the animal side of creation. [S 10,4] 

The "no" to be grasped as the antithesis of what goes "according to plan." On the 
subject of planning, compare Scheerbart's Lesabendio: we are all so weary because 
we have no plan. [S10,5] 

"Novelty. The cult of novelty. The new is one of those poisonous stimulants which 
end up becoming more necessary than any food; drugs which, once they get a hold 
on us, need to be taken in progressively larger doses until they are fatal, though 
we'd die without them. It is a curious habit — growing thus attached to that perish- 
able part of things in which precisely their novelty consists." Paul Valery, Choses 
tu.es < Paris, 1930> , pp. 14-15. 27 [S10.6] 

Decisive passage in Proust concerning the aura. He speaks of his journey to 
Balbec and comments that it would probably be made today in an automobile, 
which, moreover, would have its advantages. "But, after all, the special attraction 
of the journey lies not in our being able to alight at places on the way . . . , but in 
its making the difference between departure and arrival not as imperceptible but 
as intense as possible, so that we are conscious of it . . . intact, as it existed in our 
mind when imagination bore us from the place in which we were living right to 
the very heart of a place we longed to see, in a single sweep which seemed 
miraculous to us not so much because it covered a certain distance as because it 
united two distinct individualities of the world, took us from one name to an- 
other name; and this difference is accentuated (more than in a form of locomo- 
tion in which, since one can stop and alight where one chooses, there can scarcely 
be said to be any point of arrival) by the mysterious operation that is performed 



in those peculiar places, railway stations, which do not constitute, so to speak, a oJ 
part of the surrounding town but contain the essence of its personality, just as 

upon their signboards they bear its painted name. . . . Unhappily diose marvel- ^ 

ous places which are railway stations, from which one sets out for a remote ^ 

destination, are tragic places also, for . . . we must lay aside all hope of going B 

home to sleep in our own bed, once we have made up our mind to penetrate into cp 

the pestiferous cavern through which we may have access to the mystery, into ^ 

one of those vast, glass-roofed sheds, like that of Saint-Lazare, into which I must 2 

go to find the train for Balbec, and which extended over the rent bowels of the £. 

city one of those bleak and boundless skies, heavy with an accumulation of ^ 

dramatic menaces, like certain skies painted with an almost Parisian modernity ^ 

by Mantegna or Veronese, beneath which could be accomplished only some "3 
solemn and tremendous act, such as a departure by train or the Elevation of the 
Cross." Marcel Proust, A I'Ombre des jeunes Jilles en Jieurs (Paris), vol. 2, pp. 62- 
63. 2 » [SlOa] 

Proust on the museum: "But in this respect, as in every other, our age is infected 
with a mania for showing things only in the environment that properly belongs to 
them, thereby suppressing the essential thing: the act of mind which isolated them 
from that environment. A picture is nowadays 'presented' in the midst of furni- 
ture, ornaments, hangings of the same period, a secondhand scheme of decora- 
tion . . . ; and among these, the masterpiece at which we glance up from the table 
while we dine does not give us that exhdarating delight which we can expect from it 
only in a public galJery, which symbolizes far better by its bareness, by the ahsence 
of all irritating detail, those innermost spaces into which the artist withdrew to 
create it." Marcel Proust, A VOmbre des jeunes filles en Jieurs (Paris), vol. 2, 
pp. 62-63. 29 [SI 1,1] 

How does modernism become Jugendstil? [Sll,2] 

Battlefield or hazaar? "In former times, we may recall, there was, in literature, a 
movement of generous and disinterested activity. There were schools and leaders 
of schools, parties and leaders of parties, systems comhating other systems, intel- 
lectual currents and countercurrents . . . — a passionate, militant literary life. . . . 
Ah yes, around 1830, I should say, all the men of letters used to glory in being 
soldiers on an expedition, and what they required of puhlicity they got, in the 
shadow of some banner or other, from the proud summons to the field of bat- 
tle. . . . What remains to us today of all this hrave show? Our forefathers fought 
the good fight, and we — we manufacture and sell Amid the confusion of the pre- 
sent, what is most clear to me is that in place of the battlefield have come myriad 
shops and workshops, where each day sees the production and vending of the 
newest fashions and what, in general, is known as the Paris article.'''' "Yes, modiste 
is the word for our generation of thinkers and dreamers." Hippolyte Babon, Les 
Payens innocents (Paris, 1858), pp. vii-viii ("Lettre a Charles Asselineau"). 

[S11.3] 



[Modes of Lighting] 



Et noctumis facibus illustrata. 1 

— Medal of 1667, commemorating the introduction 
of street lighting 



"Napoleon has coverings of wool, velvet, silk, embroidery, gold, and silver; a glass 
ball for his hat; wreaths of the immortals; and an eternal gas lamp." Karl Gutz- 
kow, Briefe aus Paris (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, p. 270. <See "The Ring of Saturn. "> 

[Tl.l] 

Note relating to 1824: "Paris was illuminated, this year, by means of 11,205 street 
lamps. . . . The entrepreneur has been hired to provide lighting for the entire city 
for at least forty minutes — that is to say, beginning twenty minutes before the hour 
prescribed daily, and finishing twenty minutes later; he can assign no more than 
twenty-five lamps to each lamplighter." J. -A. Dulaure, Histoire < physique, civile 
et morale> de Paris depuis 1821 jusqua nos jours (Paris <1835>), vol. 2, pp. 118- 
119. [T1.2] 

"A dreamlike setting, where the yellowish flickering of the gas is wedded to the 
lunar frigidity of electric light." Georges Montorgueil, Paris au hasard (Paris, 
1895), p. 65. [n,3] 

1857, the first electric streetlights (at the Louvre). [Tl,4] 

Originally gas was delivered to fashionable establishments in containers for daily 
consumption. [Tl,5] 

"I boldly declare myself the friend of Argand lamps; these, to tell the truth, are 
content with shedding light and do not dazzle the eyes. Much less volatile than gas, 
their oil never causes explosions; with them we breathe more freely, and the odor 
is less offensive. Truly incomprehensible to me is the existence of all those shop- 
keepers who, entrenched in our arcades, remain — at all hours and in the warmest 
of weathers — within shops where, on account of the gas, it feels like the Tropics." 
0 Arcades □ Nouveaux tableaux de Paris, ou Observations sur les moeurs et us- 
ages des Parisiens au commencement du XIX'' siecle (Paris, 1828), vol. 1, p. 39. 

[Tl,6] 



"During this same period, the amount of street lighting more than doubled. Gas 
was now used instead of oil. New street lamps took the place of the older appara- 
tus, and permanent lighting was substituted for intermittent lighting." M. Pocte, 
E. Clouzot, G. Henriot, La Transformation de Paris sous le Second Empire, 
< Paris, 1910 >, p. 65 (Exposition de la Bibliotheque et des Travaux historiques de 
la ville de Paris). [Tl,7] 

On the ladies of the cash register: "All day long they go about in hair curlers and 
dressing gown; after sundown, however, when the gas is lit, they make their ap- 
pearance, arrayed as for a ball. Seeing them, then, enthroned at the cashier's 
desk, surrounded by a sea of light, one may well think back to The Blue Library 2 
and the fairy tale of the prince with golden hair and the enchanting princess, a 
comparison the more admissible inasmuch as Parisian women enchant more than 
they are enchanted." Eduard Kroloff, Schilderungenaus Paris (Hamburg, 1839), 
vol. 2, pp. 76-77. [Tl,8] 

The tin racks with artificial flowers, which can be found at refreshment bars in 
railroad stations, and elsewhere, are vestiges of the floral arrangements that 
formerly encircled the cashier. [Tl,9] 

Du Bartas called the sun "Grand Duke of Candles." Cited by M. Du Camp, Paris 
(Paris, 1875), vol. 5, p. 268. [T1.10] 

"The lantern carriers will have oil lanterns with 'six thick wicks'; they will be 
stationed at posts, each one separated from the next by a distance of eight hundred 
paces. . . . They will have a tinted lamp hung above their post that will serve as a 
beacon, and on their belts an hour glass of a quarter hour's duration, bearing the 
shield of the city. . . . Here, once again, it was a matter of empiricism; these wan- 
dering lamps provided no security at all to the city, and the carriers beat up the 
people they were accompanying on more than one occasion. Lacking anything 
better, however, the city used them; and they were used so long that they were still 
to be found at the beginning of the nineteenth century." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 5, 
p. 275. [Tl,ll] 

"They [the lantern carriers] would hail hackney cabs, would serve as crier- 
escorts for chauffeured carriages, and would accompany late-night passersby 
right to their homes, coming up to their apartments and lighting the candles. Some 
claim that these lantern carriers voluntarily gave accounts every morning to the 
lieutenant general of police on what they had noticed during the night." Du Camp, 
Paris, vol. 5, p. 281. [Tla,l] 



"The patent of importation taken out by Winsor for Paris is dated December 1, 
1815; in January 1817, the Passage des Panoramas was illuminated. . . . The first 
attempts by businesses were not at all satisfactory; the public seemed resistant to 



this kind of lighting, which was suspected of being dangerous and of polluting 
breathable air." Du Camp, Paris, vol. 5, p. 290. [Tla,2] 



"This place visited by commercial death, under this gas . . . which seems to trem- 
ble at the thought of not being paid for." Louis VeuiJlot, Les Odeurs de Paris 
(Paris, 1914), p. 182. [Tla,3] 

"Glass is destined to play an important role in metal-architecture. In place of thick 
walls whose solidity and resistance is diminished by a large number of apertures, 
our houses will he so filled with openings that they will appear diaphanous. These 
wide openings, furnished with thick glass, single- or double-paned, frosted or 
transparent, will transmit — to the inside during the day and to the outside at 
night — a magical radiance." Gobard, "L'Architecture de 1'avenir," Revue 
generate d' architecture (1849), p. 30 [S. Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich <Leipzig 
and Berlin, 1928 >, p. 18]. [Tla,4] 

Lamps in the form of vases. The rare flower "light," as done in oil. (The form on a 
fashionable copper engraving of 1866.) [Tla,5] 

The old gas torches that burned in the open air often had a flame in the shape of a 
butterfly, and were known accordingly as papillons. [Tla,6] 

In the Carcel lamp, a clockwork drives the oil up into the burner; whereas in the 
Argand lamp ( quinquet ), the oil drips into the burner from a reservoir above it, 
thereby producing a shadow. [Tla,7] 

Arcades — they radiated through the Paris of the Empire like fairy grottoes. For 
someone entering the Passage des Panoramas in 1817, the sirens of gaslight 
would be singing to him on one side, while oil-lamp odalisques offered entice- 
ments from the other. With the kindling of electric lights, the irreproachable glow 
was extinguished in these galleries, which suddenly became more difficult to 
find — which wrought a black magic at entranceways, and which looked within 
themselves out of blind windows. [Tla,8] 

When, on February 12, 1790, the Marquis de Favras was executed for plotting 
against the Revolution, the Place de Greve and the scaffold were adorned with 
Chinese lanterns. [Tla,9] 

"We said, in the first volume, that every historical period is bathed in a distinctive 
light, whether diurnal or nocturnal. Now, for the first time, this world has an 
artificial illumination in the form of gaslight, which burst onto the scene in London 
at a time when Napoleon's star was beginning to decline, which entered Paris more 
or less contemporaneously with the Bourbons, and which, by slow and tenacious 
advances, finally took possession of all streets and public localities. By 1840 it was 
flaring everywhere, even in Vienna. In this strident and gloomy, sharp and Dicker- 



ing, prosaic and ghostly illumination, large insects are busily moving about: shop- 
keepers." Egon Friedell, Kulturgeschichte der Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Munich, 1931), 
p. 86. [Tla.10] 



On the Cafe Mille et Une Nuits: "Everything there was of an unprecedented mag- 
nificence. In order to give you a sense of it, it will suffice to say that the beautiful 
limonadiere had, for her seat at the counter, ... a throne, a veritable royal 
throne, on which one of the great potentates of Europe had sat in all his majesty. 
How did this throne get to be there? We could not say; we affirm the fact without 
undertaking to explain it." Histoire des cafes de Paris, extraite des memoires d'un 
viveur (Paris, 1857), p. 31. [Tla,ll] 

"Gas has replaced oil, gold has dethroned woodwork, billiards has put a stop to 
dominoes and backgammon. Where one formerly heard only the buzzing of flies, 
one now listens to the melodies of Verdi or Aubert." Histoire des cafes de Paris, 
extraite des memoires d'un viveur (Paris, 1857), p. 114. [T2,l] 

Grand Cafe du XIX'' Siecle — opens 1857 on the Boulevard de Strashourg. "The 
green felt tops of numerous billiard tables can be seen there; a splendid counter is 
illuminated by gas jets. Directly opposite is a white marble fountain, on which the 
allegorical subject is crowned hy a luminous aureole." Histoire des cafes de Paris, 
extraite des memoires d'un viveur (Paris, 1857), p. 111. [T2,2] 

"As early as 1801, Lebon had attempted to install gas lighting at the Hotel 
Seignelay, 47 Rue Saint-Dominique. The system was improved at the beginning of 
January 1808: three hundred gas jets lit up the Hospital of Saint-Louis, with such 
success that three gas-jet factories were huilt." Lucien Dubech and Pierre 
d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 335. [T2,3] 

"In matters of municipal administration, the two great works of the Restoration 
were gas lighting and the creation of omnibuses. Paris was illuminated in 1814 by 
5,000 street lamps, serviced by 142 lamplighters. In 1822, the government decided 
that streets would be lit by gas in proportion as the old contracts came due. On 
June 3, 1825, the Compagnie du Gaz Portatif Francais undertook, for the first 
time, to light up a square: the Place Vendome received four multiple-jet street 
lamps at the corners of the column and two street lamps at the corners of the Rue 
de Castiglione. In 1826, there were 9,000 gas burners in Paris; in 1828, there were 
10,000, with 1,500 subscribers, three gas companies, and four gas-jet factories, 
one of which was on the Left Bank." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, 
p. 358. [T2,4] 

From an eighteenth-century prospectus, "Lighting Project, Proposed by Sid:>- 
scription for Decorating the Famous Thoroughfare of the Boulevard Saint- 
Antoine": "The Boulevard will be illuminated by a garland of Lanterns that will 
extend on both sides between the trees. This illumination will take place twice 



weekly, on Thursdays and Sundays, and, when there is a Moon, on the days after 
the abovementioned weekdays. Lighting will begin at ten o'clock, and all will be 
illuminated by eleven. . . . Since this sort of evening Promenade is suited only to 
Lords and Men of Wealth who have carriages, it is only to them that we offer this 
subscription. Subscription for this year is at the rate of 18 pounds for each House; 
in subsequent years, however, it will cost only 12 pounds, the 6 additional pounds 
this year being for the initial expenses of installation" (p. 3). "The Cafes and 
Theaters that border this famous promenade are justly celebrated; Yes — I say this 
to their glory — it was the handsome Lanterns adorning their illustrious Booths 
that gave me the idea of universal Illumination. The celebrated Chevalier Servan- 
doni has promised me designs for the Arcades, for the Garlands, and for the 
elegant Monograms, designs worthy of his fecund genius. Is there a single one of 
our wealthy style-setters who does not heartily support this brilliant Project? 
Adorned in this manner, the Boulevard will become a well-appointed Ballroom, 
one in which Carriages will serve as Box Seats." [T2,5] 

"After the theater I went to a cafe, which was all newly decorated in Renaissance 
style. The walls of the main room were entirely covered by mirrors set between 
gilded columns. The cashier sits at all times behind a large and sumptuous table 
placed upon a platform; before her is silverware, fruits, flowers, sugar, and the 
box for the garqons. It is customary for every paying customer to leave a small 
gratuity for the waiter; this is thrown by the latter into the box. Its contents are 
later equally divided." Eduard Devrient, Briefe aus Paris (Berlin, 1840), p. 20. 

[T2a,l] 

Between the February Revolution and the June Insurrection: "When the club 
meetings were over, workers took to the streets, and the sleeping bourgeois were 
either awakened by cries of 'Des lampions! Des lampions!' in consequence of 
which they would have to light their windows; or else wanton gunshots roused 
them from their beds in terror. . . . There were endless torchlight processions 
through the streets of Paris, and on one occasion it happened that a girl allowed 
herself to be undressed and shown naked to the crowd by torchlight; for the 
crowd, this was merely a reminiscence of the Goddess of Liberty of the fi rst French 
Revolution. ... At one point the prefect of police, Caussidiere, issued a proclama- 
tion against these torchlight processions — but the edict terrified the citizenry of 
Paris still more, because it stated that the people were supposed to brandish 
torches only in the event of some threat to the republic." Sigmund Englander, 
Geschichte der franzosischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 2, 
p. 277-278. [T2a,2] 

"It was still the women who cleaned the oily street lamps by day, and lit them at 
night, climbing up and down with the aid of an extendable rope kept locked in a 
toolbox during the day — since gas, which for some years had been blazing in 
English towns, had yet to he supplied. The merchants who sold the oil and the 
Argand lamps wished to avoid all favorable mention of this other source of light, 



and they soon found two highly reputable writers, messieurs Charles Nodier and 
Amedee Pichot, ... to denounce, ... in octavo format, all the problems and per- 
versities connected with gas, including the danger of our complete annihilation by 
explosion at the hands of malefactors." Nadar, Quand j'etais photographe (Paris 
<1900>), pp. 289-290. [T2a,3] 

Fireworks and illuminations were already on the scene during the Restoration; 
they were set off whenever a measure proposed by the ultraroyalists was defeated 
in the Chamber. [T2a,4] 

Apropos of an institute for the blind and the insane, this excursus on electric light: 
"I come now to the facts. The bright light of electricity served, at first, to illumi- 
nate the subterranean galleries of mines; after that, public squares and streets; 
then factories, workshops, stores, theaters, military barracks; finally, the domes- 
tic interior. The eyes, initially, put up rather well with this penetrating new enemy; 
but, by degrees, they were dazzled. Blindness began as something temporary, soon 
became periodic, and ended as a chronic problem. This, then, was the first re- 
sult — sufficiently comprehensible, I believe; but what about the insanity lately 
visited on our leaders? — Our great heads of finance, industry, big business have 
seen fit ... to send . . . their thoughts around the world, while they themselves 
remain at rest. ... To this end, each of them has nailed up, in a corner of his 
office, electric wires connecting his executive desk with our colonies in Africa, 
Asia, and the Americas. Comfortably seated before his schedules and account 
books, he can communicate directly over tremendous distances; at a touch of the 
finger, he can receive reports from all his far-flung agents on a startling variety of 
matters. One branch-correspondent tells him, at ten in the morning, of a ship- 
wrecked vessel worth over a million . . .; another, at five after ten, of the unex- 
pected sale of the most prosperous house in the two Americas; a third, at ten after 
ten, of the glorious entrance, into the port of Marseilles, of a freighter carrying the 
fruits of a Northern California harvest. All this in rapid succession. The poor 
brains of these men, robust as they were, have simply given way, just as the 
shoulders of some Hercules of the marketplace would give way if he ventured to 
load them with ten sacks of wheat instead of one. And this was the second result." 
Jacques Fahien, Paris en songe (Paris, 1863), pp. 96-98. [T3,l] 

Julien Lemer, Paris augaz (Paris, 1861): "I close the curtains on the sun. It is well 
and duly put to rest; let us speak no more of it. Henceforth, I shall know no other 
light than that of gas" (p. 10). The volume contains three novellas in addition to 
the Parisian vignettes, of which the first gives it its title. [T3,2] 

In the Place de l'Hotel de Ville: ' — aronud 1848 — there was a Cafe du Gaz. 

[T3,3] 

The misfortunes of Aime Argand. The various improvements he made in the old oil 
lamp — the double current of air, the fuse woven in the shape of a hollow cylinder, 



o 
a. 



the glass tubing, and so forth — were at first laid claim to by Lange in England (a 
man with whom Argand had been associated), before being stolen in Paris by 
Quinquet, who gave his name to the invention. And thus Argand ended in misery: 
"The misanthropy to which he succumbed after the withdrawal of his patent led 
him to seek a compensation of sorts in the occult sciences. . . . 'During the last 
years of his life, he was seen wandering through graveyards gathering bones and 
dust from tombs, which he would then submit to chemical processes in the hope 
of finding in death the secret of prolonging life.'" He himself died young. 
A<ntoinette> Drohojowska, Les Grandes Industries de la France: L'Eclairage 
(Paris <1881>),p. 127. [T3a,l] 

Carcel, inventor of the lamp that operates by clockwork. Such a lamp has to be 
wound up. It contains a clockwork mechanism that pumps the oil from a reservoir 
at the bottom up into the wick. Carcel's advance over earlier oil lamps — which had 
the reservoir located above the wick, whence the oil dripped down — consisted in 
eliminating the shadow caused by this overlying reservoir. His invention dates 
from 1800. His enseigne: "B.-G. Carcel, inventor of the Lycnomenes, or mechani- 
cal lamps, manufactures said lamps." [T3a,2] 

"The chemical match is, without doubt, one of the vilest devices that civilization 
has yet produced. ... It is thanks to this that each of us carries around fire in his 
pocket. . . . I . . . detest this permanent plague, always primed to trigger an explo- 
sion, always ready to roast humanity individually over a low flame. If you follow 
M. Alphonse Karr in his crusade against tobacco, you should likewise raise the 
banner in opposition to these matches. ... If we did not have in our pockets the 
possibility of making smoke, we would smoke less." H<enri> de Pene, Paris intime 
(Paris, 1859), pp. 119-120. [T3a,3] 

According to Lurine ("Les Boulevarts," in Paris chez soi < Paris, 1854<>): the first 
gas lighting — 1817, in the Passage des Panoramas. [T3a,4] 

Regarding the definitive installation of street lamps in the streets of Paris (in 
March 1667): "I know of no one but the abbe Terrasson, among the men of letters, 
who spoke ill of the lanterns. . . . According to him, decadence in the realm of 
letters hegan with the establishment of street lights. 'Before this period,' he once 
said, 'everyone returned home early, from fear of losing their lives, and this fact 
worked to the advantage of labor. Nowadays, people stay out at night, and work 
less. ' Surely there is truth in this observation and the invention of gas is not likely 
to give it the lie." Edouard Fournier, Les Lanternes: Histoire de Vancien eclairage 
de Paris (Paris, 1854), p. 25. [T3a,5] 



In the second half of the 1760s, a number of pamphlets were published that dealt 
with the new street lights in poetical form. The following verses come from the 
poem "Les Sultanes nocturnes et ambulantes contre Nosseigneurs les reverberes: 



A la petite vertu" <The Strolling Sultanas of Night against Our Lords the Street 
Lamps: To Easy Virtue) , 1.769: 



The poor woman finds, instead 

Of lovers, only lampposts 

In this dazzling town, 

Once a second Cythera, 

Where nymphs would walk. 

Tender mothers of delight, 

They are forced today 

To squeeze themselves into a box, 

In other words, an octogenarian fiacre, 

Which, by way of B., or F., takes them 

To where fiacres have nothing to do. . . . 

Misericordia, when once the night 

Will let you leave the hovel; 

For life is so needy. 

Not a single corner or carrefour 

The street light does not reach. 

It is a burning-glass that pierces through 

The plans we made by day. . . . 

Edonard Fournier, Les Lanternes: Histoire de I'ancien eclairage de Paris (Paris, 
1854), p. 5 (from the specially paginated printing of the poem). [T4,l] 

In 1799, an engineer installed gas lighting in his house, and thus put into practice 
what previously had been known only as an experiment in the physicist's labora- 
tory. [T4,2] 

It is possible, yon know, to avoid these setbacks 
By choosing the shelter of covered arcades; 
Though, in these lanes the idler favors, 
Spirals of blue smoke rise from Plavanas. 

Make for us, hy your efforts, a gentler life, 
Clear from our path all bumps and jolts, 
And ward off, for a time, the deadly volcanoes 
Of reading rooms and restaurants. 
At dusk, give orders to search 
Those spots defiled by the odorless gas, 
And to sound the alarm with cries of fear 
At the seeping in of flammable fumes. 

Barthelemy, Paris: Revue satirique « M. G. Delessert (Paris, 1838), p. 16. [T4,3] 

'"What a splendid invention this gas lighting is!' Gottfried Semper exclaims. 'In 
how may different ways has it not enriched the festive occasions of life (not to 
mention its infinite importance for our practical needs)!' This striking preemi- 
nence of the festive over the daily, or rather the nightly, imperatives — for, thanks 



to this general illumination, urban nighttime itself becomes a sort of ongoing ani- 
mated festival — clearly betrays the oriental character of this form of lighting. . . . 
The fact that in Berlin, after what is now twenty years of operation, a gas company 
can boast of scarcely ten thousand private customers in the year 1846 can be . . . 
explained ... in the following manner: 'For the most part, of course, one could 
point to general commercial and social factors to account for this phenomenon; 
there was still, in fact, no real need for increased activity during the evening and 
nighttime hours.'" Dolf Sternberger, Pmnorama (Hamburg, 1938), pp. 201, 202. 
Citations from Gottfried Semper, Wissenschaft: Industrie unci Kunst (Brunswick, 
1852), p. 12; and from Handbuch fur Steinkohlengasbeleuchtung, ed. N. H. 
Schilling (Munich, 1879), p. 21. [T4a,l] 

Apropos of the covering over of the sky in the big city as a consequence of 
artificial illumination, a sentence from Vladimir Odoievsky's "The Smile of the 
Dead": "Vainly he awaited the gaze that would open up to him." Similar is the 
motif of the blind men in Baudelaire, which goes back to "Des Vetters Eck- 
fenster." 1 [T4a,2] 

Gaslight and electricity. "I reached the Champs-Elysees, where the ca fes concerts 
seemed like blazing hearths among the leaves. The chestnut trees, brushed with 
yellow light, had the look of painted objects, the look of phosphorescent trees. And 
the electric globes — like shimmering, pale moons, like moon eggs fallen from the 
sky, like monstrous, living pearls — dimmed, with their nacreous glow, mysterious 
and regal, the (taring jets of gas, of ugly, dirty gas, and the garlands of colored 
glass." Guy de Maupassant, Claire de lune (Paris, 1909), p. 122 ("La Nuit cauche- 
mar" <The Nightmare) ). [T4a,3] 

Gaslight in Maupassant: "Everything was clear in the mild night air, from the 
planets down to the gas lamps. So much fire shone there above, just as in the 
town, that the shadows themselves seemed luminous. The glittering nights are 
merrier than the brightest of sunny days." Guy de Maupassant, Claire de lune 
(Paris, 1909), p. 121 ("La Nuit cauchemar"). In the last sentence, one finds the 
quintessence of the "Italian night" [T5,l] 

The cashier, by gaslight, as living image — as allegory of the cash register. [T5,2] 

Poe in the "Philosophy of Furniture": "Glare is a leading error in the philosophy 
of American household decoration. . . . We are violently enamored of gas and of 
glass. The former is totally inadmissible within doors. Its harsh and unsteady light 
offends. No one having both brains and eyes will use it." Charles Baudelaire, 
Oeuvres completes, ed. Crepet (Paris, 1937), p. 207 (Histoires grotesques et 
serieuses par Edgar Poe). r ' [T5,3] 



[Saint-Simon, Railroads] 



"Characteristic of the entire period up to 1830 is the slowness of the spread of 
machines .... The mentality of entrepreneurs, economically speaking, was still 
conservative; otherwise, the import duty on steam engines, which were not yet 
produced hy more than a handful of factories in France, could not have been 
raised to 30 percent of the value. French industry at the time of the Restoration 
was thus still, in essence, thoroughly tied to the prerevolutionary regime." Willy 
Spiihler, Der Saint-Simonismus: Lehre unci Leben von Saint-Amand Bazmrcl (Zu- 
rich, 1926), p. 12. [Ul,l] 

"Corresponding to the laborious development of large-scale industry is the slow 
formation of the modern proletariat. . . . The actual proletarianization ... of the 
working masses is effected only at the end of the 1830s and 1840s." Spiihler, Der 
Saint-Simonismus, p. 13. [Ul,2] 

"During the whole period of the Restoration . . . the Chamber of Deputies followed 
a commercial policy of the most extreme protectionism. . . . The old theory of a 
halance of trade was again in full swing, as in the days of mercantilism." Spiihler, 
Der Saint-Simonismus (Zurich, 1926), pp. 10-11. [Ul,3] 

"It was only in 1841 that a modest little law concerning child labor was approved. 
Of interest is the objection of the famous physicist Gay-Lussac, who saw in the 
intervention "an onset of Saint-Simonianism or of phalansterianism." Spiihler, 
Der Saint-Simonismus, p. 15. [Ul,4] 

"Aphrodite's hirds travel the skies from Paris to Amsterdam, and under their wing 
is clipped a list of daily quotations from the Stock Exchange; a telegraph sends a 
message from Paris to Brussels concerning the rise in 3 percent annuities; couriers 
gallop over highways on panting horses; the ambassadors of real kings bargain 
with ideal Icings, and Nathan Rothschild in London will show you, if you pay him a 
visit, a casket just arrived from Brazil with freshly mined diamonds intended to 
cover the interest on the current Brazilian debt. Isn't that interesting?" Karl 
Gutzkow, Offentliche Charaktere, part 1 (Hamburg, 1835), p. 280 ("Roth- 
schild"). [Ul,5] 



"The influence and development of Saint Simonianism, up until the end of the 
nineteenth century, had almost nothing to do with the working class. Saint-Simoni- 
anism provided an impetus and an ideal for the spirit of large-scale industry and 
for the realization of ambitious works. The Saint-Simonian Pereire brothers con- 
trolled the railroad, banking, and real estate operations of the July Monarchy and 
the Second Empire. The Suez Canal, for which Enf antin and Lambert-Bey would 
study the plans and work out the conception at a time when Ferdinand de Lesseps 
was consul in Cairo, has remained the prototype of the Saint-Simonian planetary 
enterprise. We may, without hesitation, contrast the grand bourgeois project of 
Saint-Simonianism, which is based on production and action, with the petit bour- 
geois project of the Fourierist phalanstery, which is based on consumption and 
pleasure." Albert Thihaudet, Les Idees politiques de la France (Paris, 1932), 
pp. 61-62 . □ Secret Societies D [Ul,6] 

"Girardin . . . founded La Presse in 1836; he invented the popular, low-priced 
newspaper and the roman feuilleton, or serial novel." Dubech and d'Espezel, 
Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 391. [Ul,7] 

"In the past several years, a complete revolution has occurred in the cafes of 
Paris. Cigars and pipes have invaded every corner. Formerly, there was smoking 
only in certain special establishments known as estaminets < public houses > , which 
were frequented solely by persons of low standing; today people smoke nearly 
everywhere. . . . There is one thing we cannot forgive the princes of the house of 
Orleans — namely, for having so prodigiously increased the vogue for tohacco, this 
malodorous and nauseating plant that poisons both mind and body. All the sons of 
Louis Philippe smoked like chimneys ; no one encouraged the consumption of this 
nasty product more than they. Such consumption no doubt fattened the public 
treasury — but at the expense of public health and human intelligence." Histoire 
des cafes de Paris, extraite des memoirs d'un viveur (Paris, 1857), pp. 91-92. 

[Ula.l] 

"Symbolism is so deeply rooted . . . that it is found not just in liturgical rites. In 
the previous century, didn't the disciples of Enfantin wear waistcoats that hut- 
toned in the back, so as to draw attention to the fraternal assistance which one 
man renders another?" Robert Jacquin, Notions sur le langage d'apres les 
travauxdu P<ere> Marcel Jousse (Paris, 1929), p. 22. [Ula,2] 

"In 1807, there were over 90,000 workers in Paris practicing 126 professions. 
They were subject to strict supervision: associations were prohibited, employment 
agencies were regulated, and work hours were fixed. Salaries went from 2 francs 
50, to 4 francs 20, yielding an average of 3 francs 35. The worker ate a hearty 
breakfast, a light lunch, and an evening supper." Lucien Dubech and Pierre 
d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 335. [Ula,3] 



"On August 27, 1817, the steamship he Genie du commerce, invented by the Mar- 
quis de Jouffroy, had sailed the Seine between the Pont-Royal and the Pont Louis 
XVI." Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, p. 359. [Ula,4] 



The national workshops' "had been created according to the proposal of a moder- 
ate, <Alexandre-Thomas> Marie, because the Revolution had guaranteed the ex- 
istence of the worker through his work, and because it was necessary to satisfy the 
demands of the extremists. . . . The workshops were organized, in a manner at 
once democratic and militaristic, into brigades, with elected chiefs." Dubech and 
d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, pp. 398-399. [Ula,5] 

The Saint-Simonians. "In the magnificent disorder of ideas that accompanied Ro- 
manticism, they had grown enough, by 1830, to abandon their loft on the Rue 
Taranne and to establish themselves on the Rue Taitbout. Here, they gave lectures 
before an audience of young men dressed in blue and women in white with violet 
scarves. They had acquired the newspaper he Globe, and in its pages they advo- 
cated a program of reforms. . . . The government, ... on the pretext of supporting 
the emancipation of women, decided to prosecute the Saint-Simonians. They came 
to the hearing in full regalia, and to the accompaniment of hunting horns. Enf an- 
tin wore written on his chest, in large letters, the two words he Pere, and he calmly 
declared to the presiding judge that he was in fact the father of humanity. He then 
tried to hypnotize the magistrates by staring into their eyes. He was sentenced to 
one year in prison, which effectively put an end to these follies." Dubech and 
d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, pp. 392-393. D Haussmann D Secret Societies □ 

[Ula,6] 

"Girardin published ... a brochure with the title, "Why a Constitution?" It was 
his idea that the entire French constitution should be replaced by a simple declara- 
tion of ten lines, which . . . would be engraved on the five-franc piece." S. Engliin- 
der <Geschichte derfranzdsischenArbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864) > , vol. 
4, pp. 133-134. [Ula,7] 

"At the time of the Revolution, anew element began to appear in Paris: large-scale 
industry. This was a consequence of the disappearance of feudal guilds; of the 
reign of unfettered liberty that followed in their wake; and of the wars against 
England, which made necessary the production of items previously procured by 
import. By the end of the Empire, the evolution was complete. From the revolu- 
tionary period on, there were factories established for the production of saltpeter, 
firearms, woolen and cotton fabrics, preserved meat, and small utensils. Mechani- 
cal spinning mills for cotton and linen were developed, with the encouragement of 
Calonne, beginning in 1785; factories for the production of bronze were con- 
structed under Louis XVI; and chemical and dying companies were founded by the 
Count d'Artois in Javel. Didot Saint-Leger ran a new machine for paper produc- 
tion on the Rue Sainte-Anne. In 1799, Philippe Lebon received a patent on a 



process for producing gas lighting. From September 22 to September 30, 1798, the 
first ' public exhibition of the products of French manufacturing and industry' was 
held on the Champ de Mars." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 
1926), p. 324. D Exhibitions D [U2,l] 

On the Saint-Simonians: "School constituted by a veritable corps of industrial 
engineers and entrepreneurs, representatives of big business underwritten by the 
power of the banks." A. Pinloche, Fourier et le socialisme (Paris, 1933), p. 47. 

[U2.2] 

"Although the worker associations were all run in exemplary fashion, ably and 
honestly, . . . members of the bourgeoisie were nevertheless unanimous in their 
disapproval. Most of the bourgeoisie would feel a certain apprehension in passing 
before one of the houses that bore the sign . . . and the emblem of a worker 
association. Though these shops were distinguished from other, similar businesses 
only by the inscription 'Association fraternelle d'ouvriers: Liberte, Egalite, 
Fraternite,' on the petit bourgeois they had the effect of snakes in the grass that 
might suddenly strike at any time. It sufficed for the bourgeois to think of the 
February Revolution, which had been the origin of these associations. . . . For 
their part, the associations of workers made every possible effort to conciliate the 
bourgeoisie, hoping to gain its support. It was for this reason that many of them 
furnished their shops in the most splendid manner, so as to draw their share of 
customers. The privations which the workers thus laid upon themselves, in an 
effort to withstand the competition, are beyond belief. While that part of the shop 
which was open to the public was fi tted out in the costliest way, the worker himself 
would be sitting on the floor of a workroom that often was totally lacking in equip- 
ment." Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen 
(Hamburg, 1864), vol. 3, pp. 106-108. □ Secret Societies D [U2,3] 

Influence of the f euilleton in its early days. "There are newspapers for one sou and 
newspapers for ten centimes. A dealer observes a solid bourgeois passing by, who, 
after carefully perusing his Constitutionnel . . . , negligently folds it and puts it in 
his pocket. The dealer accosts this plucky reader, presents him with either Le 
Peuple or La Revolution, which cost only a sou, and says to him: 'Monsieur, if you 
like, I will give you, in exchange for the paper you've just finished, Le Peuple, by 
citizen Proudhon, and its supplement containing a serial by the famous Menars- 
Senneville. ' The bourgeois allows himself to he persuaded. What good is a Consti- 
tutionnel you've already read? He gives up his newspaper and accepts the other, 
enticed, as he is, by the sovereign name of Menars-Senneville. Often he forgets 
himself, in his delight at being rid of so tedious a burden, and adds another sou 
into the bargain." A. Privat d'Anglemont, Paris inconnu (Paris, 1861), pp. 155- 
156. [U2a,l] 



The well-known principle of Villemessant: "that an incident which is completely 
ordinary, but which occurs on the boulevards or their environs, has much more 



importance, from the point of view of journalism, than an event of great conse- 
quence in America or Asia." Jean Morienval, Les Createurs de lagrande presse en 
France (Paris <1934>), p. 132. [U2a,2] 



'''L'Autographe was run hy Bourdin, 2 hecause Villemessant, like Napoleon, loved 
to apportion kingdoms. That curious man, very independent of spirit, rarely 
acted alone. He would 'collaborate.'" Jean Morienval, Les Createurs de lagrande 
presse en France (Paris), p. 142. [U2a,3] 

Poetry of Saint-Simonianism: "In the preface to the first volume of Le Producteur, 
A. Cerclet launches an urgent appeal to artists. . . . And Buchez, who later suc- 
ceeded to the leadership of the cooperative movement, appealed to the community 
of artists in similar terms. ... It was Buchez who first observed . . . that classicism 
and romanticism share equally in the world with which they — the Saint-Simoni- 
ans — are occupied, just as legitimacy and liberalism divide between themselves the 
political world. ... In 1825, a monument was erected to the builder of the Langue- 
doc Canal, Pierre Riquet. On this occasion, Soumet composed a stirring 
hymn. . . . The literary chronicler for Le Producteur, Leon Halevy, brother of the 
famous composer, hailed these verses, which he characterized as 'industrial po- 
etry.' . . . Soumet, however, only partly fulfilled the hopes which the Saint- 
Simonians had placed in him. If later on, in his Divine Epopee, one can still hear 
the hammer's clang and the noisy grinding of the gears of industrial labor, it is 
precisely here, in the poet's greatest work, that the propensity for metaphysical 
abstractions is manifest. . . . Halevy, moreover, was himself a poet. ... In 1828 
Halevy published his Poesies europeennes, . . . and in 1831 wrote an ode to Saint- 
Simon, who had died in 1825." H. Thurow, "Aus den Anfangeu der sozialistischen 
Belletristik," Die neue Zeit, 21, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1903), pp. 217-219. [U2a,4] 

On a review by Sainte-Beuve in the Revue des deux mondes, Fehruary 15, 1833: 
"The verses which Sainte-Beuve . . . reviewed were the literary remains of a poet 
hy the name of Bruheille, who died very young. . . . In his account, furthermore, 
Sainte-Beuve draws attention to a novel which bore the characteristic title La 
Saint-Simonienne, and which . . . demonstrates the triumph of the Saint-Simonian 
idea. That the author, a certain Madame Le Bassu, brings about this triumph 
through a rather improhahle course of events — namely, the transfusion of blood 
from the veins of a youth infected with Saint-Simonian doctrine into those of his 
ecclesiastically educated beloved — may be regarded in essence as an artistic expe- 
dient; at the same time, however, it brings out the mystical side of Saint-Simonian- 
ism. This mystical element had, shortly before, found stark expression during the 
sojourn by the 'family' in their last place of refuge, on the RueMenilmontant. This 
concluding episode in the life of the movement likewise engendered a correspond- 
ing literature — poems, songs, spiritual exercises in verse and prose — whose enig- 
matic symholism could he understood only by the few initiates .... Thrown off 
course by the violence of political and economic developments, Saint-Simonianism 



had run aground on metaphysics." H. Thurow, "Aus den Anfangen der sozialistis- 
chenBelletristik," DieneueZeit, 21, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1903), pp. 219-220. [U3,l] 



Utopian socialism. "The class of capitalists . . . looked on its partisans as mere 
eccentrics and harmless enthusiasts. . . . These partisans themselves, further- 
more, did all that was humanly possible ... to warrant such an impression. They 
wore clothes of a very particular cut (Saint-Simonians, for example, buttoned 
their coats in the back so as to be reminded, while dressing, of their reliance on 
their fellow man and thereby of the need for union), or else they wore unusually 
large hats, very long beards, and so on." Paul Lafargue, "Der Klassenkampf in 
Frankreich," Die neue Zeit, 12, no. 2, p. 618. [U3,2] 

"After the July Revolution, the Saint-Simonians took over even the frontline or- 
gan of the Romantics, he Globe. Pierre Leroux became the editor." Franz Died- 
erich, "Victor Hugo," Die neue Zeit, 20, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1901), p. 651. [U3,3] 

From a report on the November 1911 issue of the journal of Austrian social democ- 
racy, Der Kampf: '"On Saint-Simon's 150th birthday,' . . . Max Adler wrote: . . . 
He was known as a 'socialist' at a time when this word meant something entirely 
different from what it means today. ... As far as the class struggle is concerned, he 
sees only the opposition of industrialism to the old regime; bourgeoisie and work- 
ers he considers together as a single industrial class, whose richer members he 
calls upon to take an interest in the lot of their impoverished fellow workers. 
Fourier had a clearer view of the need for a new form of society." Review of 
Periodicals, Die neue Zeit, 29, no. 1 (1911), pp. 383-384. [U3,4] 

Engels on Feuerbach's Wesen des Christentums <Essence of Christianity) . "Even 
the shortcomings of the book contributed to its immediate effect. Its literary, 
sometimes even high-flown, style secured for it a large public and was, at any rate, 
refreshing after long years of abstract and ahstruse Hegelianizing. The same is 
true of its extravagant deification of love, which, coining after the now intolerable 
sovereign rule of 'pure reason,' had its excuse. . . . But what we must not forget is 
that it was precisely these two weaknesses of Feuerbach that 'true socialism,' 
which had been spreading like a plague in 'educated' Germany since 1844, took as 
its starting point, putting literary phrases in the place of scientific knowledge, the 
liberation of mankind by means of 'love' in place of the emancipation of the 
proletariat through the economic transformation of production — in short, losing 
itself in the nauseous fine writing and ecstasies of love typified hy Herr Karl 
Griin." Friedrich Engels, "Ludwig Feuerbach und der Ausgang der klassischen 
deutschen Philosophic," Die neue Zeit, 4 (Stuttgart, 1886), p. 150 [review of C. N. 
Starcke, Ludwig Feuerbach (Stuttgart, 1885)]. 3 [U3a,l] 

"Railroads . . . demanded, besides other impossibilities, a transformation in the 
mode of property. . . . Up until then, in fact, a bourgeois could run an industrial 
or a business concern with only his own money, or at most with that of one or two 



friends and acquaintances. . . . He managed the money himself, and was the actual 
proprietor of the factory or business establishment. But railroads had need of 
such massive amounts of capital that it could no longer be concentrated in the 
hands of only a few individuals. And so a great many bourgeois were forced to 
entrust their precious funds, which had never before been allowed out of their 
sight, to people whose names they hardly knew. . . . Once the money was given 
over, they would lose all control over its investment and could not expect to claim 
any proprietary rights over terminals, cars, locomotives, and the like. . . . They 
were entitled only to a share of the profits; in place of an object, . . . they were 
given ... a mere piece of paper that represented the fiction of an infinitely small 
and ungraspable piece of the real property, whose name was printed at the bottom 
in large letters. . . . This procedure . . . stood in such violent contrast to what the 
hourgeoisie was used to . . . that its defense could be undertaken only by people 
who . . . were suspected of wanting to overthrow the order of society — socialists, in 
short. First Fourier and then Saint-Simon extolled this mobilization of property in 
the form of paper securities." Paul Laf argue, "Marx' historischer Materialismus," 
Die neue Zeit, 22, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1904), p. 831. [U3a,2] 

"Every day, there is a riot. The students, all sons of the bourgeoisie, are fraterniz- 
ing here with the workers, and the workers believe the time has come. They are 
also seriously counting on the pupils from the Ecole Polyteehnique." Nadai', 
Quancl j'etais photographe (Paris <1900>), p. 287. [U3a,3] 

"It is not in proletarian circles, not even in democratic circles, that the initial 
impetus . . . for the establishment of labor exchanges is to be found. The idea was 
first advanced in 1842 by M. de Molinari, editor-in-chief of he Journaldes econo- 
mistes. It was Molinari himself who developed this idea in an article he . . . wrote 
entitled 'L'Avenir des chemins de fer' <The Future of the Railroads) . In order to 
indicate just how much times had changed, he referred to Adam Smith, who had 
said, in effect, that labor was the commodity most difficult to transport. Against 
this, he affirmed that labor power had now become mohile. Europe and the whole 
world now stands open to it as a market. . . . The main point of the conclusion 
which Molinari drew in 'L'Avenir des chemins de fer,' in favor of the institutions 
that were to serve as labor exchanges, was the following: the principal cause for 
the low rate of wages is the frequently recurring disproportion hetween the num- 
her of workers and the demand for work; contributing further to the problem is 
the high concentration of workers population in certain centers of production. . . . 
Give to workers the means ... by which they can change their place of residence at 
low cost; give them, too, the possibility of knowing where they will be able to find 
work in the most favorable circumstances. . . . If workers begin traveling quickly 
and, ahove all, cheaply, labor exchanges will soon arise." On the proposal to 
create a labor report: "This proposal, which was published in Le Courrier 
franqais, edited by Xavier Durrieu, turned matters directly to the workers . . . : 
'We would like ... to render a service to workers by publishing in our columns, 
next to the stock market quotations, a list of work available. . . . What is the 



purpose of stock market quotations? They report, as we know, the rate of ex- 
change of government securities and shares of stock ... on various markets 
around the world. . . . Without the aid of these market reports, the capitalists 
would often have no idea where to invest their money; without these lists, they 
would find themselves in the same situation as workers who . . . have no idea where 
to go to find work. . . . The worker is a vendor of work, and, as such, he has a very 
material interest in knowing what the market outlets are for his goods.'" Louis 
Heritier, "Die Arbeitsborsen, Die neue Zeit, 14, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1896), pp. 645- 
647. [U4,l] 

Notable difference between Saint-Simon and Marx. The former fixes the number 
of exploited as high as possible, reckoning among them even the entrepreneur 
because he pays interest to his creditors. Marx, on the other hand, includes all 
those who in any way exploit another — even though they themselves may be 
victims of exploitation — among the bourgeoisie. [U4,2] 

It is significant that the theoreticians of Saint -Simonianism are unfamiliar with the 
distinction between industrial and financial capital. All social antinomies dissolve 
in the fairyland which le p-ogres projects for the near future. [U4a,l] 

"Let us examine some of the large manufacturing cities of France. , , . Never, 
perhaps, has a defeated and retreating army presented a more lamentable specta- 
cle than the triumphant industrial army. Gaze on the workers of Lille, Reims, 
Mulhouse, Manchester, and Liverpool, and tell me if they look like victors!" 
Eugene Buret, De la Misere des classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en France 
(Paris, 1840), vol. 1, p. 67. [U4a,2] 

On the political role of intellectuals. Important: the "Letter to M. Lamartine" by 
Emile Barrault, editor of Le Itcsin des travailleurs. ["Die socialistischen und com- 
munistischen Bewegungen seit der dritten franzosischen Revolution," appendix 
to <Lorenz von> Stein, Socialumus und Communismus des heutigen Frankreichs 
(Leipzig and Vienna, 1848), p. 240.] [U4a,3] 

To ascertain: whether or not, in the preimperial age, a relatively greater propor- 
tion of the profits of capital went into consumption and a relatively lesser propor- 
tion into new investments. [U4a,4] 

1860: "Napoleon entered into a trade agreement with the English government . . . ; 
according to the provisions of this treaty, customs duties were considerably low- 
ered on French agricultural products imported by England, and on English manu- 
factured goods imported by France. This treaty was very favorable to the mass 
public. . . . On the other hand, in order to hold their own against English competi- 
tion, French industry was forced to lower the prices of its products. The immedi- 
ate consequence was ... a certain rapprochement with the opposition. Aiming to 
counter the resistance of . . . industrialists, Napoleon took steps to enlist the sup- 
port of the liberals. This led, ultimately, to the transformation of the regime and 



the emergence of the Liberal Empire." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 
1919), p. 275. (Loosening of controls on the press, so as to enable coverage of 
debates in tbe Chamber.) [U4a,5] 



Classification of the press under the Restoration. TJltras<?>: La Gazette de 
France, La Quotidienne, Le Drapeau blanc, Le Journal des debuts (until 1824). 
Independents: Le Globe, Le Minerve, and, from 1830, during the last year of the 
Restoration, Le National, Le Temps. Constitutionalists: Le Constitutionnel, Le 
Courrierfruncuis, and, after 1824, Le Journal des debuts. [U4a,6] 

Because of the rarity of newspapers, they were read by groups m the cafes. 
Otherwise, they were available only by subscription, which cost around eighty 
francs per year. In 1824, the twelve most widely circulating newspapers had, 
together, some 56,000 subscribers. For the rest, both the liberals and the royalists 
were concerned to keep the lower classes away from the newspaper. [U4a,7] 

The "law of justice and of love," rejected by the Chamber of Peers: "One detail 
suffices to demonstrate the spirit of the project: every printed sheet, be it only a 
notification card, would have been subject to a tax of one franc per copy." 
A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 56. ;f [U5,l] 

"Saint-Simon lingers over the history of the fifteenth-eighteenth centuries, and 
gives to the social classes of this period a more concrete and specifically economic 
description. Hence, it is this part of Saint-Simon's system that is of greatest impor- 
tance for the genesis of the theory of class struggle, and that exercises the strongest 
influence on its subsequent development. . . . Although, for later periods, Saint- 
Simon emphasizes the economic moment in his characterization of classes and the 
causes of their growth and decline . . . , in order to be consistent he would have 
had to see, in this economic activity, the true roots of the social classes as well. Had 
he taken this step, he would inevitably have attained to a materialist conception of 
history. But Saint-Simon never took this step, and his general conception remains 
idealist. . . . The second point that is so surprising in Saint-Simon's class theory, in 
view of its discrepancy with the actual relations among the classes of the period, is 
the representation of the class of industrialists as homogeneous. . . . The mani- 
festly essential differences that exist between proletarians and entrepreneurs are 
for him external, and their antagonism is grounded in mutual misunderstanding: 
the interests of the directors of industrial enterprises, in reality, coincide with the 
interests of the masses. . . . This entirely unfounded assertion resolves for Saint- 
Simon the very real social contradiction, salvaging the unity of the industrial class 
and, with it, the perspective on a peaceful building-up of the new social system." 
V. Volgin, "IJher die historische Stellung Saint-Simons," in Murx-Engels Archiv, 
ed. D. Rjazanov, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main <1928>), pp. 97-99. [U5,2] 

Saint-Simon: "Least of all does the industrial system require the overseeing of 
individuals, for with a system in which the immediate goal is the well-being of the 
many, there ought not to be any energy wasted on maintaining power over these 



people, who no longer threaten the existing order. . . . 'This function of maintain- 
ing order can then easily become ... a task shared by all citizens, whether it be to 
contain troublemakers or to settle disputes.' 4 Instead of an instrument for the 
domination of men, the state system becomes a system for the administration of 
things .... And the chief task of this administrative authority, whose agents will b e 
the scholars, artists, and industrialists, ... is to organize the cultivation of the 
terrestrial globe." V. Volgin, "IJher die historische Stellung Saint-Simons," in 
Marx-Engels Archiv, ed. D. Rjazanov, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), pp. 104r-105. 

[U5.3] 

On the idea of the total work of art, according to Saint-Simon, Oeuvres choisies, 
vol. 3, pp. 358-360: "Saint-Simon indulges in fantasies about the development of a 
cult through the combined efforts of prophets, poets, musicians, sculptors, and 
architects. All the arts are to be united so as to make the cult useful to society, and 
so as, through the cult, to restructure humanity in the spirit of Christian morals." 
V. V«lgin, "Uber die historische Stellung Saint-Simons," in Marx-Engels Archiv, 
vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), p. 109. [U5a,l] 

Concerning the representation of Louis Philippe. — Saint-Simon teaches that "the 
industrial system is not in contradiction with royal power. The king will become 
the First Industrial, just as he has been the First Soldier in the kingdom."^ V. Vol- 
gin, "IJher die historische Stellung Saint-Simons," in Marx-Engels Archiv, vol. 1 
(Frankfurt am Main), p. 112. [U5a,2] 

Saint-Simon was a forerunner of the technocrats. [U5a,3] 

Two passages from he Globe (October 31 and November 25, 1831), concerning the 
workers' uprising in Lyons: "we, defenders of ALL workers — from the leaders of 
industry to the humblest laborers"; and concerning the working class: "It is ago- 
nizing for us to see the workers degraded by brutality. Our heart bleeds at the sight 
of such moral privations, quite as hideous, in their way, as physical priva- 
tions. . . . We would like ... to inspire the workers with . . . our own sentiments of 
order, peace, and friendly accord." In the same publication, an expression of 
approval for the address of the Saint-Simonians from Lyons, who "have preserved 
Saint-Simonian calm." Cited in E. Tarle, "Der Lyoner Arbeiteraufstand," in 
Marx-Engels Archiv, ed. Rjazanov, vol. 2 (Frankfurt am Main, 1928), pp. 108, 
109,111. [U5a,4] 

Important material relating to the history of the railroad, and particularly of the 
locomotive, in Karl Kautsky, Die materialutuche Geschiclitsaujfkssung, vol. 1 (Ber- 
lin, 1927), pp. 645ff. What emerges is the great importance of mining for the 
railroads, not only because locomotives were first used in mines but also because 
iron rails came from there. We are thus referred back to the use that was made of 
rails (originally, no doubt, of wood) in the operation of tipcarts. [U5a,5] 



On Saint-Simon's idea of progress (polytheism, monotheism, recognition of 
many laws of nature, recognition of a single law of nature): "Gravitation is 
supposed to play the role of the universal absolute idea and replace the idea of 
God." Oeuvres chokies, vol. 2, p. 219,° cited by V. Volgin, "Dber die historische 
Stellung Saint-Simons," in Marx-Engels Archiv, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), 
p. 106. [U5a,6] 

"In the system of the Saint-Simonians, hanks not only play the part of forces that 
organize industry. They are the one antidote which the system now in place has 
developed to counter the anarchy that devours it; they arc an element of the 
system of the future . . . , one that is free of the stimulant of personal enrichment; 
they are a social institution." V. Volgiu, "IJher die historische Stellung Saint- 
Simons," in Marx-Engels Archiv, ed. Rjazanov, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), p. 94. 

[U6.1] 

"The chief task of an industrial system is said to he the establishment of a . . . plan 
of work that could be carried out by society. . . . But . . . his ideal is considerably 
closer to state capitalism than to socialism. With Saint-Simon, there is no talk of 
the abolition of private property, ol expropriations. Only up to a certain point 
does the state submit the activity of industrialists l:o the general plan. . . . 
Throughout his career Saint-Simon . . . was drawn to large-scale projects . . . , 
beginning with the plans for the Panama and Madrid canals and ending with plans 
to transform the planet into a paradise." V. Volgin, "Uher die historische Stellnng 
Saint-Simons," in Marx-Engels Archiv, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), pp. 101-102, 
116. [U6,2] 

"Stocks have been 'democratized' so that all the world can share in the benefi ts of 
modern association. For it is under the banner of 'association' that people have 
glorified the accumulation of capital in joint-stock companies, over which grand 
financiers now exercise sovereignty at the expense of the shareholders." W. Lexis, 
Gewerkvereine unci U liter nehmerverbiincle in Frankreich (Leipzig, 1879), p. 143, 
cited in D. Rjazanov, "Zur Geschichte der ersten Internationale," in Marx-Engels 
Archiv, cd. D. Rjazanov, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), p. 144. [U6,3] 



Emile Pereire, ex-Saint-Simonian, was the founder of Credit Mohilier. — Cheval- 
ier presents him, in La Religion Saint-Simonienne, as "a former student at the 
Ecole Polytechniqne." [U6,4] 

Re the history of newspapers. Differentiation according to social classes and mass 
circulation of literature, which, under Charles X, was mobilized against congre- 
gations. "Voltaire, more or less abridged, is adapted to the needs and circum- 
stances of all levels of society! There is the rich man's Voltaire, the 'Voltaire for 
owners of medium-sized property,' and the cottager's Voltaire. There are also 
editions of Tinrtujfe at three sous. There are reprints of . . . Holbach, . . . 
Duprais<?>, . . . Volney. Things are set up in such a way that . . . more than 



2,700,000 volumes were put into circulation in less than seven years." Pierre de la 
Gorce, La Restauration, vol. 2, Charles X (Paris), p. 58. [U6,5] 



Waiting for the Revelatear, who will bring on the end of the bourgeoisie and who 
"will render thanks to the father of the family for peacefully administering the 
Lord's estate." This, presumably, an allusion to Enfantin. At the beginning of the 
text, a sort of lament for the proletariat; the pamphlet also refers to this class in 
closing: "Emancipateur pacifique! Wc travels the world over, everywhere working 
for the liberation of the proletarian and of woman." The lament: "If ever you have 
visited our workshops, you have seen those chunks of molten iron which we 
draw from the furnaces and cast into the teeth of cylinders that turn more rapidly 
than the wind. These furnaces emit a liquid fire that, in its boiling and heaving, 
throws off a shower of glowing drops into the air; and from the teeth of the 
cylinder, iron emerges drastically reduced. We too, in truth, are hard pressed like 
diese masses of iron. If ever you have come to our workshops, you have seen 
those mining cables that are wound around a wheel, and that unwind in the 
search for blocks of stone or mountains of coal at a depth of twelve hundred feet. 
The wheel moans upon its axle; the cable stretches tight with the weight of its 
enormous charge. We, too, are drawn taut like the cable; but we do not moan like 
the wheel, for we are patient and strong. 'Great God! What have I done,' cries the 
voice of the people, consumed with a sorrow like that of King David. 'What have 
I done that my hardiest sons should become cannon fodder, and my loveliest 
daughters be sold into prostitution?' Michel Chevalier, "Religion Saint-Simo- 
nienne: Le Bourgeois, le revelateur" <pamphlet (Paris, 1830), pp. 3-4, i>. 

[U6a,l] 

Chevalier in 1848. He speaks of the forty-year sojourn of Israel in the wilderness, 
before it entered the Promised Land. "We, too, will have to pause for a time, 
before advancing into an era . . . of . . . prosperity for workers. Let us accept this 
season of waiting. . . . And if some persons endeavor to stir up the wrath of the 
populace ... on the pretext of hastening the advent of hetter times, . . . then let us 
emblazon the words that Benjamin Franklin, a worker who became a great 
man, . . . once spoke to his fellow citizens: 'If anyone says to you that you can come 
into wealth by some means other than industry and frugality, then pay him no 
heed: He's a viper."' Franklin, Conseils pour fairef ortune (Paris, 1848), pp. i-ii 
(preface by Michel Chevalier). 7 [U6a,2] 

The press under Charles X: "One of the members of the court, M. Sosthene de la 
Rochefoucault, . . . conceived the grand project of absorbing the opposition news- 
papers by buying them up. But the only ones that would consent to the deal had no 
influence to sell." Pierre de la Gorce, La Restauration, vol. 2, Charles X (Paris), 
p. 89. [U7,l] 

The Fourierists looked forward to mass conversions among the public after they 
introduced a feuilleton in La Phalange. See Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de 
Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, 14, no. 3 (1845), p. 432. [U7,2] 



"O Poets! You have eyes, but you do not see — and ears, but you do not hear! 
Great things are unfolding in your midst, and you give us war chants!" [There 
follows a characterization of the warlike inspiration for "La Marseillaise."] "This 
hymn to blood, these frightful imprecations bear witness not to any danger that 
might be threatening the country, but to the impotence of liberal poetry — poetry 
without inspiration beyond that of war, struggle, and endless complaint. . . . O 
people! Sing, nonetheless, sing "La Marseillaise," since your poets are silent or 
can only recite a pale imitation of the hymn of your fathers. Sing! The harmony 
of your voices will yet prolong the joy with which triumph had filled your soul; 
for you, the days of happiness are few and far between! Sing! . . . "four joy is sweet 
to those in sympathy with you! It has been so long since they heard anything but 
moans and groans from your lips!" "Religion Saint -Simonienne: La Marseillaise" 
(extract from L'Organisateur, September 11, 1830) [according to the catalogue of 
the Bibliothe«[ue Nationale, the author is Michel Chevalier], pp. 3-4. The ani- 
mating idea of this rhapsody is the confrontation of the peaceful July Revolution 
with the bloody Revolution of 1789. Hence, this observation: "Three days of 
combat sufficed to overturn the throne of legitimacy and divine right. . . . Victory 
went to the people, who live from their labors — the rabble that crowds the 
workshops, the populace that slaves in misery, proletarians who have no prop- 
erty but their hands: it was the race of men so utterly despised by salon dandies 
and proper folk. And why? Because they sweat blood and tears to get their bread, 
and never strut about in the balcony of the Comic Opera. After forcing their way 
into the heart of the palace, . . . they pardoned their prisoners . . . ; they ban- 
daged the wounded. . . . Then they said to themselves : 'Oh, who will sing of our 
exploits? Who will tell of our glory and our hopes?"' ("La Marseillaise," as 
above, p. 1). [U7,3] 

From a reply to an unfriendly review (in La Revue de Pa-is) of Charles Pradier's 
literary labors: "For three years now, we have been appearing daily on the city's 
sidewalks, and you probably think we have grown accustomed to it all. . . . Well, 
you are mistaken. In fact, every time we step up on our soapbox, we hesitate and 
look around us for excuses; we find the weather unpropitious, the crowds inat- 
tentive, the street too loud. We dare not admit that we ourselves lack daring. . . . 
And now, perhaps, you understand . . . why sometimes we exult in the thought of 
our work; . . . and why, seeing us filled with enthusiasm, . . . you — and others 
with you — could take it for undue pride." Ch. Pradier, "Reponse a La Revue de 
Paris" in Le Boheme, Charles Pradier, editor-in-chief, vol. 1, no. 8 (June 10, 
1855). The passage is entirely characteristic of the bearing — at once honest and 
uncertain — of this newspaper, which did not make it past its initial year of publi- 
cation. As early as the first issue, it marks itself off from the lax, morally emanci- 
pated boheme and makes mention of the pious Hussite sect, the Freres Bohemes, 
founded by Michel Bradacz, which it would like to ensure a literary posterity. 

[U7a,l] 

Sample of the style of the newspaper Le Boheme: "What suffers cruelly in the 
garrets is intelligence, art, poetry, the soul! . . . For the soul is a wallet containing 



only the banknotes of paradise, and the shopkeepers of this world would nail this 
money to their counter like a coin fallen from the hands of a counterfeiter." Alex- 
andre Guerin, "Les Mansardes," Le Boheme, 1, no. 7 (May 13, 1855). [U7a,2] 

From a confrontation between the underclass intellectuals and the ruling-class 
intellectuals: "You princes of thought, jewels of the intellect . . . , since you have 
moved to disown us, we in turn have abjured your paternity; we have disdained 
your crowns and impugned your coats of arms. We have cast aside the grandiose 
titles you formerly sought for your labors: we are no longer "The Elan," "The 
Star," or "The Will-o'-the-Wisp," . . . but instead are "The Pretentious Fool," 
"The Penniless," "The Promised Land," "The Enfant Terrible," "The Tragic 
Pariah," or "The Bohemian," and thus we protest . . . your egotistical authority." 
Charles Pradier, "Peres et lils," Le Boheme, 1 , no. 5 (April 29,1855). [U7a,3] 

Le Boheme, in its first issue, bears the subtitle l\ onpolitical Newspaper. [U8,l] 

"Do me the kindness of walking through the gambling dens, the little restaurants 
near the Pantheon or the Medical School. There you will fi nd . . . poets who are 
moved only by envy and all the lowest passions, the self-proclaimed martyrs of the 
sacred cause of progress, who . . . smoke many a pipe . . . without doing any- 
thing . . . ; whereas Piconel, whose beautiful lines you have cited, Piconel the 
garment worker, who earns four and a half francs a day to feed eight people, is 
registered at the charity office!! ... I have no . . . wish, paradoxical as it might 
seem, to commend the boasting of Dumas pere or to excuse the indifference of 
some of his friends toward younger writers; but I declare to you that the greatest 
enemies of those who have been deprived of a literary legacy are not the writers of 
renown, the monopolizers of the daily feuilleton, but rather the falsely disinher- 
ited, those who do nothing but hurl insults, drink, and scandalize honest people, 
and all this from the vantage point of art." Eric Isoard, "Les Faux Boheines," Le 
Boheme, 1, no. 6 (May 6, 1855). [U8,2] 

It is significant that Le Boheme, which looks after the lights of the literary proletar- 
iat — who sympathize, to some extent, with the industrial proletariat — would see 
fit, in an article entitled "Du Roman en general et du romancier moderne en 
particulier" <On the Novel in General and the Modern Novelist in Particular), by 
Paul Saulnier (vol. 1, no. 5), to condemn the practice of "slavers." Monsieur de 
Santis, as the novelist in vogue is named here, returns home after a day spent in 
idleness. "Directly upon his arrival home, Monsieur de Santis locks himself in . . . 
and goes to open a little door hidden behind his bookcase. — He finds himself, 
then, in a sort of little study, dirty and quite poorly lit. Here, with a long goose 
quill in his hand, with his hair standing on end, is a man with a face at once 
sinister and unctuous. — Oho! with this one, you can tell from a mile away he's a 
novelist — even if he is only a former employee of the ministry who learned the 
art of Balzac from the serials in Le Constitutionnel. It is the veritable author of llie 
Chamber of Skulls !h is the novelist!" [U8,3] 



"In 1852 the brothers Pereire, two Portuguese Jews, founded the first great mod- 
ern bank, Credit Mobilier, of which one said that it was the biggest gambling hell in 
Europe. It undertook wild speculations in everything — railroads, hotels, colonies, 
canals, mines, theaters — and, after fifteen years, it declared total bankruptcy." 
Egon Friedell, Kulturgeschichte der Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Munich, 1931), p. 187. 

[U8a,l] 

"Boheme <bohemian> belongs to the vocabulary in use around 1840. In the lan- 
guage of that time, it is synonymous with 'artist' or 'student' or 'pleasure seeker'; 
it means someone who is light-hearted and unconcerned with the morrow, lazy and 
boisterous." Gabriel Guillemot, he Boheme (Paris, 1868), pp. 7-8; cited in Gisela 
Freund, <"La Photographie au point de vue sociologique," manuscript, > p. 60. 

[U8a,2] 

"The roman-f euilleton < serial novel > was inaugurated in France by he Siecle in 
1836. The beneficent effects of the roman-f euilleton on the newspaper's receipts is 
revealed by the contract which he Constitutionnel and La Presse together had 
with Alexandre Dumas in 1845. . . . Dumas received an annual salary of 63,000 
francs for five years, in return for a minimum output of eighteen installments per 
year." Lavisse, Histoire de la monarchic de juillet, vol. 4 (Paris, 1892); cited, 
without page reference, in Gisela Freund. [U8a,3] 

A saying of Murger's (cited by Gisela Freund, p. 63): "The boheme: it is the train- 
ing ground for the artistic life; it is the steppingstone to the Academie, to the 
Hotel-Dien < hospital > , or to the Morgue." [U8a,4] 

Gisela Freund (p. 64) underlines the difference hetween the first generation of 
hohemians — Gautier, Nerval, Nanteuil — who were often of solid hourgeois origin, 
and the second: "Murger was the son of a concierge-tailor; Champfleury was the 
son of a secretary in the town hall of Laon; Barhara, the son of a sheet-music 
seller; Bouvin, the son of a village policeman; Delvau, the son of a tanner in the 
Faubourg Saint-Marcel; and Courbet was the son of a quasi-peasant." To this 
second generation belonged Nadar — the son of a poor printer. (He was later, for a 
long time, secretary to Lesseps.) [U8a,5] 

"M. de Martignac bequeathed ... a troubled legacy to the newspapers, with his 
law of July 1828 — a law that was more liheral, to he sure, hut which, by making 
. . . dailies or periodicals more accessible to all, burdened them with certain finan- 
cial obligations. . . . 'What will we do to cover the new expenses?' demanded the 
newspapers. 'Well, you will run advertisements,' came the response. . . . The con- 
sequences of advertising were quick to emerge and seemingly endless. It was all 
very well to want to separate, in the pages of the newspaper, that which remained 
conscientious and independent from that which hecame partisan and mercenary; 
but the houndary . . . was quickly crossed. The advertisement served as bridge. 
How could one condemn, five minutes before, . . . what five minutes afterward 



proclaimed itself the wonder of the age? The fascination of capital letters, which 
were growing ever larger, carried advertising away: it was the magnetic mountain 
that threw off the compass. . . . This wretched advertising had an influence no less 
fatal to the hook trade. . . . Advertising represented ... a doubling of ex- 
penses . . . : one thousand francs for promoting a new work. Because of this rise in 
costs, moreover, hook dealers mercdessly demanded from authors two volumes 
instead of one — volumes in octavo rather than in smaller format, for that did not 
cost anymore to advertise. . . . Advertising . . . would require a whole history unto 
itself: Swift, with his vitriolic pen, would be the one to write it." On the word 
reclame < advertisement > , the following remark: "For those who may not know the 
facts, we merely observe that the reclame is the little notice slipped into the news- 
paper near the end, and ordinarily paid for by the bookseller; inserted on the 
same day as the advertisement, or on the day following, it gives in two words a 
brief and favorable judgment that helps prepare the way for that of the review." 
Saint-Beuve, "De la Litterature industrielle," Revue des deux mondes, 19, no. 4 
(1839), pp. 682-683. [U9,l] 

"Writing and publishing will be less and less a sign of distinction. In keeping with 
our electoral and industrial customs, everyone, at least once in his life, will have 
his page, his treatise, his prospectus, his toast — will be an author. From there to 
penning a feuilleton is only a step. ... In our own day, after all, who can say to 
himself that he does not, in part, write in order to live . . . ?" Sainte-Beuve, "De la 
Litterature industrielle," Revue des deux mondes, 19, no. 4> (1839), p. 681. 

[U9,2] 

In 1860 and 1868, in Marseilles and Paris, appeared the two volumes of Revues 
parisiennes: Les Journaux, les revues, les livres, by Baron Gaston de Flotte, who 
took it upon himself to combat the thoughtlessness and unscrupulousness of the 
historical accounts in the press and, particularly, in the feuilletons. The rectifica- 
tions concern the facts and the legends of cultural, literary, and political history. 

[U9.3] 

Fees for feuilletons went as high as two francs per line. Authors would often write 
as much dialogue as possible so as to henefitfrom the blank spaces in the lines. 

[U9a,l] 

In his essay, "De la Litterature industrielle" <On Industrial Literature) , Sainte- 
Beuve discusses, among other things, the initial proceedings of the newly organ- 
ized Societe des Gens de Lettres (which originally campaigned, above all, against 
unauthorized Belgian reprints). [U9a,2] 

"In the beginning, Senef elder had thought only of facilitating the reproduction of 
manuscripts, and he publicized the new processes leading to this end in his Voll- 
stcindigen Lehrbuch der Steindruckerei < Complete Manual of Lithography), 
which appeared in 1818. Others first exploited his ideas for the technique of lithog- 
raphy itself. These methods enabled a rapidity of drawing that was nearly equal to 



that of the word. . . . They opened the way to a journalism of the graver." Egon 
Friedell, Kulturgeschichte der Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Munich, 1931), p. 95. [U9a,3] 



Overview of the revolutionary press in Paris in 1848. Curiosites revolutionnaires: 
Les Journaux rouges — Histoire critique de tous les journaux ultra-re publicains, 
by a Girondist (Paris, 1848). [U9a,4] 

"There is only one way of preventing cholera, and that is to work to elevate the 
morality of the masses. No person whose moral constitution is satisfactory has 
anything to fear from the plague. . . . There is clearly a place, today, for awaken- 
ing moral salubrity among the masses. . . . What is needed are . . . extraordinary 
measures. . . . What is needed is a coup d'etat, an industrial coup d'etat. . . . This 
action would consist in changing, by decree, the law of expropriation, so that . . . 
the interminable delays occasioned by the current legislation would be reduced to 
a few days. . . . One could thus begin operations, for instance, on some thirty sites 
in Paris, from the Rue de Louvre to the Bastille, which would clean up and reform 
the worst neighborhood of the city. . . . One could . . . start up railways at the 
barrieres. . . . The first stage of construction . . . would be accompanied by cere- 
monies and public festivals. All the official hodies of the state would he there with 
their insignia, to exhort the people. The king and his family, the ministers, the 
council of state, the court of cassation, the royal court, what is left of the two 
Chambers — all would drop by on a regular basis, wielding the shovel and pick- 
axe. . . . Military regiments would arrive on the scene to do service in full dress, 
with their military music to inspire them. . . . Theatrical performances would be 
put on there from time to time, and the best actors would consider it an honor to 
appear. The most radiant women would mix with the workers to provide encour- 
agement. Exalted thus, and made to feel proud, the population would most cer- 
tainly hecome invulnerahle to cholera. Industry would he given an impetus; the 
government. . . would be . . .established on a firm foundation." Michel Chevalier, 
"Religion Saint-Simonienne: Fin du cholera par un coup d'etat" <pamphlet> 
(Paris, 1832). The Saint-Simonians wanted to distrihute medicine free of charge. 

[U9a,5] 

"What makes working on the omnihus train into truly painful drudgery: it departs 
Paris at 7 :00 in the morning and arrives in Strasbourg at midnight. This makes for 
seventeen hours of continuous service, during which the conductor must get off at 
every station, without exception, to open the doors of the cars! . . . Surely, the 
employee who is required to climh down at each station, and to wade around in the 
snow for five or six minutes every half-hour, so as to open and close the car 
doors — and all this at twelve degrees helow freezing, or worse — must suffer cru- 
elly." A. Granveau, UOitvrier devant la societe (Paris, 1868), pp. 27-28 ("Les 
Employes et le mouvement des chemins de fer"). [U10,1] 

A remarkable apotheosis of the traveler — to some extent a counterpart, in the 
realm of sheer banality, to Baudelaire's "Le Voyage" — can be found in Benjamin 
Gastineau, La Vie en chemin de J'er (Paris, 1861). The second chapter of the book 



is called "Le Vbyageur du XIX C siecle" <The Nineteenth-Century Traveler) 
(p. 65). This voytgeur is an apotheosis of the traveler in which, in quite peculiar 
fashion, the traits of the Wandering Jew are mingled with those of a pioneer of 
progress. Samples: "Everywhere along his path, the traveler has sown the riches 
of his heart and his imagination: giving a good word to all and sundry, . . . 
encouraging the laborer, rescuing the ignorant from their gutter, . . . and raising 
up the humiliated" (p. 78). "The woman who seeks a love supreme: traveler! — 
The man who seeks a devoted woman: traveler! — . . . Artists avid for new hori- 
zons: travelers! — The mad who take their hallucinations for reaJity: trav- 
elers! — . . . Glory hunters, troubadours of drought: travelers! — Life is a journey, 
and every single being who departs the womb of woman to return to the womb 
of earth is a traveler" (pp. 79-81). "Humanity, 'tis thou who art the eternal 
voyager" (p. 84). [U10.2] 

Passage from Benjamin Gastineau, ha Vie en chemin defer (Paris, 1861): "All of a 
sudden, the curtain is lowered abruptly on the sun, on heauty, on the thousand 
scenes of life and nature which your mind and heart have savored along the way. It 
is night and death and the cemetery; it is despotism — it is the tunnel! Nothing hut 
beings that dwell in the shadows, never knowing the hright wing of freedom and 
truth! . . . Nonetheless, after hearing the cries of confusion and dismay from pas- 
sengers on the train as it enters the gloomy archway, and their exclamations of joy 
on quitting the tunnel, . . . who would dare maintain that the human creature was 
not made for light and liberty?" (pp. 37-38). [U10.3] 

Passages from Benjamin Gastineau, La Vie en chemin defer (Paris, 1861): "Hail to 
you, nohle races of the future, scions of the railway!" (p. 112). "All aboard! All 
aboard! The whistle pierces the sonorous vault of the station" (p. 18). "Before the 
creation of the railroads, nature did not yet pulsate; it was a Sleeping Beauty. . . . 
The heavens themselves appeared immutable. The railroad animated every- 
thing. . . . The sky has hecome an active infinity, and nature a dynamie heauty. 
Christ is descended from his Cross; he has walked the earth, and he is leaving, far 
hehind him on the dusty road, the old Ahasuerus" (p. 50). [Ul0a,l] 

"Michel Chevalier delighted the students [of the Ecole Polytechnique] when he 
retraced, in particular, the great historical epochs, recurring often to Alexander, 
Caesar, Charlemagne, and Napoleon, in order to emphasize the role of inventors 
and triumphant organizers." G. Pinet, Histoire de I'Ecole polytechnique (Paris, 
1887), p. 205. [Ul0a,2] 

"The disciples of Saint-Simon — recruited, for the most part, from the Ecole des 
Mines, which is to say, from among the best students of the Ecole Polytechnique — 
could not have failed to exert a considerable influence on their younger com- 
rades. . . . Nevertheless, Saint-Simonianism did not have time to garner many 
converts at the Ecole Polytechnique. The schism of 1831" dealt it a fatal hlow — the 



folJies of Menilmontant, the bizarre costumes, and the ridiculous names had killed 
it." G. Pinet, Histoire de I'Ecole polytechnique, pp. 204-205. [U10a,3] 



The idea for the Suez Canal goes back to Enfantin, who had sought a concession 
from the viceroy of Egypt, Muhammad Ah, and wanted to move there with forty 
pupils. England made sure that the concession was denied him. [U10a,4] 

"Saint-Simon attempted to found an association to take advantage of the easy- 
terms mandated by the decree . . . of November 2, 1789, which made it possible 
to acquire national lands at a price that was payable in twelve annual installments 
by means of assignats. These terms allowed for the acquisition, with modest 
capital, of a considerable spread of rural properties. . . . 'Every financial specula- 
tion is based upon an investment of industry and an investment of funds. The 
returns on a financial speculation should be divided in such a way that industry 
and capital have shares proportionate to the influence they exercised. In the 
speculation I entered on with M. de Redern, capital played only a secondary 
role.'" The author cites a letter from Saint-Simon to Boissy-d'Anglas, dated No- 
vember 2, 1807; it contains indications as to his theory of the relations between 
capital, labor, and talent. Maxime Leroy, Les Speculations foncieres de Saint-Simon 
et ses querelles d'tiffaires avec son associe, le comte de Redern (Paris <1925>), pp. 2, 23. 

[U11.1] 



"Saint-Simon believed in science. . . .But whereas, at the beginning of his studies, 
the mathematical and physical sciences . . . had almost exclusive claim on his 
attention, it was now from the realms of the natural sciences that he would seek the 
elusive key to those social problems that so vexed him. 'I distanced myself, in 
1801, from the Ecole Polytechnique, 1 he writes, 'and I established myself in the 
vicinity of the Ecole de Medicine, where I was able to associate with the physiolo- 
gists.'" Maxime Leroy, La Vie veritable du comte Henri de Saint-Simon (Paris, 
1925), pp. 192-193. — The Ecole Polytechnique, at the time Saint-Simon lived 
near it, was housed in the Palais Bourbon. [UU,2] 



"The Nave of the Grand Cafe Parisien" reads the caption under an engraving 
from 1856. The view of the public offered here does, in fact, resemble the one 
seen in the nave of a church, or in an arcade. Visitors are mostly standing in place 
or wandering about — that is, among the billiard tables which are set up in the 
nave. [U11.3] 



Hubbard says — referring, with doubtful justification, to Saint-Simon's tears on 
parting from his wife at the time of their divorce: 9 "Perpetual sacrifice of the 
tender and compassionate being to the being that thinks and understands." 
Cited in Maxime Leroy, La Vie veritable du comte Henri de Saint-Simon (Paris, 
1925), p. 211. [U11.4] 



"Let us put an end to honors for Alexander; and hail Archimedes!" Saint-Simon, 
cited in Leroy, La Vie veritable du comte Henri de Saint-Simon, p. 220. [Ull,5] 

Comte worked for four years by the side of Saint-Simon. 10 [Ull,6] 

Eugene Sue's Juif errant < Wandering Jew> in he Constitutionnel as a replacement 
for Thiers's Histoire du Consulat et de V Empire, which Veron had originally 
planned to publish there. [Ull,7] 

Saint-Simon: "Considerations surles mesures a prendre pour terminer la Revolu- 
tion" < 1820> . — Introduction to Les Travaux scientijiques du XIX" siecle. 

[Ulla.l] 

Saint-Simon invented revolutionary playing cards: four geniuses (war, peace, art, 
commerce) as kings; four liberties (religion, marriage, the press, the professions) 
as queens; four equalities (duties, rights, dignities, colors) as jacks. Leroy, La Vie 
veritable du comte Henri de Saint-Simon (Paris, 1925), p. 174. [Ulla,2] 

Saint-Simon dies in May 1825. His last words: "We are carrying on with our 
work." Leroy, p. 328. [Ul la,3] 

On Saint-Simon: "As much as he astonishes us with his foresight in matters of 
labor and society, he nonetheless gives us the impression that he was lacking some- 
thing: ... a milieu, his milieu, the proper sphere in which to extend the optimistic 
tradition of the eighteenth century. Man of the future, he had to do his thinking 
almost entirely by himself, in a society that had been decapitated, bereft of its 
foremost minds by the Revolution. . . . Where was Lavoisier, founder of modern 
experimental science? Where was Condorcet, the leading philosopher of the age, 
and Chenier, the leading poet? They would have lived, in all likelihood, had 
Robespierre not had them guillotined. It was left to Saint-Simon to carry out, 
without their help, the difficult work of organization which they began. And faced 
with this immense and solitary mission, ... he took upon himself too many tasks; 
he was obliged to be at once the poet, the experimental scientist, and the philoso- 
pher of the newborn age." Maxime Leroy, La Vie veritable du ctmte Henri de 
Saint Simon (Paris, 1925), pp. 321-322. [Ulla,4] 

A lithograph by Pattel represents "Engraving Doing Battle with Lithography." 
The latter seems to be getting the upper hand. Cabinet des Estampes. [Ulla,5] 

A lithograph of 1842 depicts "The Divan of the Algerians in Paris" as "The Cafe 
Mauresque." In the background of a coffeehouse, in which exotic figures walk by 
the side of Europeans, three odalisqnes are sitting, pressed close together on a tiny 
divan beneath a mirror, and smoking water pipes. Cabinet des Estampes. 

[Ulla,6] 



Graphics from 1830 display readily, and often allegorically, the conflict of the 
newspapers among one another. They love to show, in this same period, what 



happens when several people have to share in reading one newspaper. They 
picture the struggle that arises on this occasion, whether it be over possession of 
the paper or over the opinions it purveys. Cabinet des Estampes, a plate from 
1817: "The Love of News, or Politicomania." [Ulla,7] 

"At the Stock Exchange, one Saint-Simonian is worth two Jews." "Paris-Bour- 
sier," Les Petits-Paris: Par les auteurs des memoires de Bilboquet [Taxile Delord] 
(Paris, 1854), p. 54. [U12,l] 

An uncommonly telling expression of the heyday of boulevard journalism. 
"What do you mean by the word 'wit'? — I mean something which, it is said, 
travels the streets but only very rarely enters the houses." Louis Lurine, Le 
Treizieme Arrondusement de Paris (Paris, 1850), p. 192. [U12,2] 

The idea that newspaper advertisements could be made to serve the distribution 
not only of books but of industrial articles stems from Dr. Veron, who by this 
means had such successes with his Pate de Regnauld, a cold remedy, that an 
investment of 17,000 francs yielded him a return of 100,000. "One can say, 
therefore, . . . that if it was a physician, Theophraste Renaudot, who invented 
journalism in France . . . , it was Dr. Veron who, nearly half a century ago, 
invented the fourth-page newspaper advertisement." Joseph d'Arcay, La Salle a 
manger du docteur Veron (Paris, 1868), p. 104. [U12,3] 

The "emancipation of the flesh," in Enfantin, should be compared to the theses 
of Feuerbach and the insights of Georg Biichner. The anthropological material- 
ism is comprised within the dialectical. [U12,4] 

Villemessant: "Initially, he ran a business inribhons. This concern . . . led the . . . 
young man to start up a fashion journal. . . . From there, Villemessant . . . soon 
moved into politics, rallied to the Legitimist party and, after the Revolution of 
1848, turned himself into a political satirist. He organized three different newspa- 
pers in succession, among them the Paris Chronicle, which was suppressed by 
imperial decree in 1852. Two years after this, hefounded Le Figaro." Egon Caesar 
Conte Corti, Der Zauberer von Homburg and Monte Carlo (Leipzig <1932>), 
pp. 238-239. [U12,5] 

Francois Blanc was one of the first great advertisers. Through contacts in the 
press, he had placed advertisements for the Homburg Casino in Le Siecle and 
L'Assemblee nationale. "He also personally arranged for entire series of eight- 
een — even lifty — advertisements to appear in newspapers . . . like La Presse, Le 
National, La Patrie, and Le Galignani." Egon Caesar Conte Corti, Der Zauberer 
von Homburg und Monte Carlo (Leipzig), p. 97. [U12,6] 



In Saint-Simon's day: "Independently of the New Jerusalem of Emanuel 
Swedenborg, advocated by Baron Portal, . . . there was the phalanstery of 
Charles Fourier. There was also the so-called Eglise Franchise of Abbe Chatel, 



Primate of the Gauls; there was the restoration of the Order of the Templars, 
organized by M. Fabre-Palaprat; and there was the cult of Evadamism created by 
theMapah." 11 Philibert Audehrand, Michel Chevalier < Paris, 1861 >, p. 4. 

[U12.7] 

Saint-Simonian propaganda. "One of the followers of the doctrine, who was 
asked, one day, what his duties were, replied: 'I am a man about town, a respected 
speaker. I am elegantly dressed so that I can be presented everywhere; gold is put 
into my pocket so that I am ready to play whist. How can I fail?'" Philihert 
Audebrand, Michel Chevalier, p. 6. [U12a,l] 

The split in the ranks of the Saint-Simonians forced adherents of the doctrine to 
choose between Bazard and Enf antin. [U12a,2] 

At Menilmontant, the members of the Saint-Simonian sect shared responsibility 
for the various departements of housekeeping: cooking (Simon and Rochette), 
tableware (Talebot), cleaning (d'Eicbtel, Lambert), shoeshine (Barrault). 

[U12a,3] 

The Saint-Simonians at Menilmontant: "A great musician of the future, 
M. Felicien David, composer of The Desert, of The Pearl of Brazil and of Hercu- 
laneum, was director of their orchestra. He composed the melodies they sang . . . , 
notably those which preceded and followed the meals." Philibert Audehrand, 
Michel Chevalier <Paris, 1861>, p. 11. [U12a,4] 

General celibacy, up until the marriage of Enf antin, was the rule at Menilmontant. 

[U12a,5] 

After the dissolution of Menilmontant, and after being sentenced to a year in 
prison, Chevalier was dispatched by Thiers to America. It is likewise Thiers who 
later sends him to England. After the February Revolution, which costs him his 
position, he becomes a reactionary. Under Napoleon, he is made senator. 

[U12a,6] 

By the end of the 1850s, he Siecle, with 36,000 subscribers, had the largest circu- 
lation. — Milland founds he Petit Journal, which he sells on the streets for one sou. 

[U12a,7] 

Balzac, commenting onAux Artistes: Du Passe et de Vavenir des beaux-arts — Doc- 
trine de Saint-Simon (Paris: Mesnier): "Apostleship is an artistic mission, hut the 
author of this pamphlet has not shown himself worthy of that august title. The 
main idea of his work is truly important; what he has given us is inconsider- 
able. . . . Saint-Simon was a remarkahle man, one who is yet to he understood. 
This fact has caused the leaders of his school to engage in the practice of prosely- 
tizing hy speaking, like Christ, a language attuned to the times and to the men of 
those times, a language calculated to appeal less to the mind than to the heart." In 



this same text, with reference to Saint-Simon: "There, perhaps, lies the truth." 
Honore de Balzac, Critique litteraire, ed. Louis Lumet (Paris, 1912), pp. 58, 60 



The immediate cause for the schism among the Saint-Simonians was Enfantin's 
doctrine of the emancipation of the flesh. To this was added the fact that others, 
like Pierre Leroux, had earlier already bridled at holding public confession. 



The press under Charles X: "The newspapers did not sell single copies to individu- 
als. Newspapers were read only by subscribers, and subscription was expensive. It 
was a luxury, in fact, reserved for the nobility and the haute hourgeoisie. The total 
numher of copies rose, in 1824, to only 56,000 (of which 41,000 were for the 
opposition newspapers)." Charles Seignohos, Histoire sincere de la nation 
franqaise (Paris, 1933), pp. 411-412. Over and above that, the newspapers had to 
pay large deposits. [U13,3] 

Girardin, as editor of La Presse, introduces advertisements, feuilletons, and sales 
of single copies. [U13.4] 

"Newspaper salesmen have great difficulty procuring their stock. In order to get 
their supply, they have to stand in line — in the street, no less! — for part of the 
night." Paris sous la Republique de 1848: Exposition de la Bibliotheque et des 
Travau.x historiques de la Ville de Paris (1909), p. 43. [U13,5] 

Around 1848, the Cafe Chantant opens up: The founder is Morel. [U13,6] 

Picture sheets: "Occupations of the Saint-Simonian Ladies According to Their 
Capacities" (Imagerie populaire, 1832). Colored prints, in which red, green, and 
yellow predominate: "Saint-Simonian Ladies Preaching the Doctrine," "This 
Bouquet Cannot Be Too Beautiful for Our Brother," "Saint Simonienne Dreaming 
of the Hunt," and so forth. Illustrations in Henry-Rene d'Allemagne, Les Saint- 
Simoniens, 1827—1837 (Paris, 1930), opposite p. 228. A pendant to this: "Func- 
tions of the Apostles of Menil-Montant According to Their Capacity" (illustration, 
ibid., opposite p. 392). See in this context (ibid., opposite p. 296) the etiquette for 
launching a food item: "Liquor of the Saint-Simonians." A group of Enfantin's 
disciples; at center, Enfantin and the Republic waving a tricolored flag. Everyone 
raises a glass. [U13,7] 



("Le Feuilleton des journaux politiques"). 



[U12a,8] 



[U13.1] 



The Saint-Simonians had little sympathy for democracy. 



[U13.2] 



In 1831, Bazard, Chevalier, and a few others refuse, as members of the "clergy" of 
the Saint-Simonian church, to serve in the Garde Nationale. Twenty-four hours' 
imprisonment. [U13,8] 



Le Globe (October 31, 1831), with regard to the uprising in Lyons, held that a raise 
in pay could place that city's industry in jeopardy: "Don't you see that, even if a 
direct intervention in the affairs of industry ... is required of you, . . . you can- 
not, for some brief period, alleviate the suffering of one class of society without 
perhaps oppressing another? Let us now commend the benefits of competition, of 
that laissez-faire . . . which the liberal orators of late have once again been tout- 
ing." H.-R. d'Allemagne, Les Saint-Simoniens (Paris, 1930), p. 140. [U13.9) 

The Saint-Simonians : a salvation army in the midst of the bourgeoisie. [U13a,l] 

Chevalier, writing to Hoart and Bruneau, on November 5, 1832: "Listen to that 
voice from Lyons! Lyons is calling you, is calling us, with a roar. Lyons is tottering. 
Lyons is trembling. What energy those proletarians have! They are descendants of 
Spartacus!" Henry-Rene d'Allemagne, Les Saint-Simoniens, 1827-1837 < Paris, 
1930>,p. 325. [U13a,2] 

Revealing: 

Ibis people, whose head and hand you fear, 
Must march, must march — no halting! 
It's when you stop their steps 
7bey notice die holes in their shoes. 

Leon Halevy, "La Chaussure," Fables nouvelles (Paris, 1855), p. 133; cited in de 
Liefde, Le Saint-Simonisme dans la poe'sie francaise <Haarlem, 1927), p. 70. 

[U13a,3] 



"Sappers of the army of peace" — a Saint-Simonian formula for the entire corps of 
workers. [U13a,4] 

A piece from Pierre Lachambeaudie's Fables et poesies diverses (Paris, 1851), 
"Fumee": smoke from the foundry meets with incense in the air, and they mingle 
at God's behest. This conception extends forward as far as Du Camp's poem on 
the locomotive, with its "sacred smoke." [U13a,5] 



Le Globe — at least for a time — was distributed gratis in Paris. [U13a,6] 

"The feminine and masculine element which they discover hi God, and which they 
aim to revive in the priestly marriage, has not heen celehrated in the poetry of the 
sect. We have found only one allusion to these doctrines . . . : 

God of male and female virtue. This world laeks all conviction; 
It yet doubts, and feels not the Father's iron affliction! 
The Mother — God above! — will be the saving grace 
That, in his joy, he'll hurry to embrace!" 



Jules Mercier, "Dieu nous le rendra," in La Foi nouvelle, p. 15; cited in C. L. de 
Liefde, Le Saint-Simonisme dans la poesiefranqaise <Haarlem, 1927>, pp. 146- 
147. [U13a,7] 



George Sand, for whom love entails the unification of the classes, understands the 
matter in this way: "A young man of humble station, but genial and good looking, 
marries a beautiful and perfect young noblewoman, and voila: the merger of the 
classes. . . . In Le Meunier d'Angiba.ult, Lemor, the artisan hero, refuses the hand 
of a patrician widow becanse she is rich . . . , and then the widow rejoices at the 
fire which brings about her ruin, removing thus the last obstacle in the way of 
union with her lover." Charles Brnn, Le Roman social en France au XIX" siecle 
(Paris, 1910) pp. 96-97. [U13a,8] 

Enfantin assumes that priests, artists, tradespeople, and so on will exhihit, in 
their different capacities, entirely different physical constitutions (and different 
ailments as well). [U13a,9] 

Girardin's style: "Indentation with each new sentence, each sentence being hut a 
line; the antithesis of ideas enveloped in the similitude of words; rhyme in 
prose . . . ; all nouns capitalized, enumerations that recall Rabelais, definitions 
that often recall nothing at all." Edouard Drumont, Les Heros et les piti es (Paris 
<1900>), p. 131 ("Emile de Girardin"). [U14.1] 

Drumont on Girardin: "To get this result — heing forgotten eight days after his 
death — he rose all his life at five o'clock in the morning." Edouard Drumont, Les 
Heros et les pitres (Paris < 1900>), p. 134-135 ("Emile de Girardin"). [Ul4,2] 

According to certain calculations, the Saint-Simonians distributed, hetween 1830 
and 1832, some 18 million printed pages among the population. See Ch. Benoist, 
"LTIomme de 1848," Revue des deux mondes (July 1, 1913). [U14,3] 

With their didactic contrast between worker bees and drones, the Saint-Simoni- 
ans hark back to Mandeville's fable of the bees. [U14.4] 

Regarding the movement within Saint-Simonianism: from the letters addressed to 
Lambert by Claire Demar and Perret Desessarts, hefore their joint suicide. Claire 
Demar: "But if his voice has not drawn me on, if it is not he who has come to invite 
me to this last festivity, at least I have not hastened his voyage: he has been ready 
for a long time." Desessarts: "The office and the officer are extinguishing them- 
selves at the same time, as we have often said they must; for the one cannot depart 
without the other! Alas, I, who have always heen a man of adversity and of soli- 
tude — I, who have always marched alone and apart, . . . protesting vigorously 
against order and unity — what could he surprising in my withdrawal, enacted at 
the very moment, it would seem, when the peoples are ahout to join in a religious 



federation, when their hands are now linked up to form that imposing chain. . . . 
Lambert, I do not doubt humanity, . . . nor do I doubt of Providence . . . ; but in 
the time in which we live, everything is sacred — even suicide! . . . Woe betide the 
man who does not bare his head before our cadavers , for he is truly impious! 
Adieu. August 3, 1833, at ten o'clock in the evening." Claire Demar, Ma Loi 
d'avenir, 12 work published posthumously by Suzanne (Paris: at the offices of La 
Tribune desfemmes, and in association with all marchands de nouveautes, 1834), 
pp. 8, 10-11. [U14,5] 

Statistics on the annual publication of newspapers, monthly periodicals, and fort- 
nightly reviews. Included are new publications only: 

1833: 251 joumaux 1838: 184 journaux 

1834: 180 11 1840: 146 

1835: 165 " 1841: 166 " 

1836:151 " 1842:214 

1837: 158 11 1845: 185 " 

Charles Louandre, "Statistique litteraire: De la Production intellectuelle en 
France depuis quinze ans," Revue des deux mondes (November 1, 1847), p. 442. 

[U14.6] 

Toussenel remarks of Enfantin that, in order to make up for his conviction in 
court, and to console himself for the failure of his fascination on this occasion, he 
turned to speculation. Toussenel provides, moreover, the following portrait of 
him: "There was among them a man of godlike comportment who was named 
Enfantin. He was no less celebrated for the puissant maneuvers of his cue stick, in 
the noble game of billiards, than for the frequency and decisiveness with which he 
doubled the stakes at gaming. Relying on the faith of several charming women, . . . 
he passed himself off as someone ideally suited to a leading role, and had himself 
proclaimed the Father. . . . And since it was the aftermath of the July Revolu- 
tion, . . . this man did not lack for followers." A. Toussenel, Les Juifs rois de 
Vepoqu.e, 3rd edition, ed. Gabriel de Gonet (Paris <1886>), vol. 1, p. 127. 

[Ul4a,l] 

At the time of the cholera epidemics <in 1832?>, people laid the blame for the 
infection on liquor dealers. [U14a,2] 

he Journal des debuts introduces the foreign correspondent: "Since M. Bertin sent 
Michel Chevalier on a diplomatic mission to the United States (which gained for his 
newspaper the publication of the famous Lettres sur VAmerique du Nord), the 
latter has acquired a taste for these governmentally sponsored assignments. . . . 
Following the Lettres sur VAmerique du Nord . . . came the Lettres sur VEspagne 
. . . ; then there had to he Lettres sur la Chine." A. Toussenel, Les Juifs roi de 
Vepoque (Paris), vol. 2, pp. 12-13. [Ul4a,3] 



The Saint-Simonians looked for a female messiah (La Mere), who was to marry 
with their high priest, Le Pere. [U14a,4] 



"Lepere Olinde <Rodrigues> : '. . . If you are a Saint-Simonian woman, be advised 
that it is not the republic that we want.'" Firmin Maillard, La Legende de la 
femme emanci pee (Paris), p. 111. [Ul4a,5] 

Heine dedicated Deutschland to Enfantin. Enfantin responded with a letter that 
was published in 1835, by Duguet, in a reprint, Heine a Prosper Enfantin, en 
Egypt, whose jackethore the lineDe VAllemagne. — 8" M. Piece 3319 <call numher 
ill the Bibliotheque Nationale>. The letter admonishes Heine to temper his sar- 
casm, above all in things religious. Heine should write books not about German 
thought but rather about the German reality, the heart of Germany — which, for 
Enfantin, was essentially an idyll. [U14a,6] 

The conversion of Julie Fanfernot to Saint-Simonianism (she turned later to 
Fourierism) was made the subject of a theatrical work by the Saint-Simonians. 
Extracts from this publication, wlrich appeared in the group's journal, are to be 
found in Firmin Maillard, La Legende de la.femme emancipee (Paris), pp. 115ff. 

[U15,l] 

Saint-Simon on the Rue Vivienne: "Dinners and evening parties followed one after 
another without interruption. . . . There were, in addition, some late-night scenes 
of amorous effusion, in wliich certain of the guests, it is reported, ... let them- 
selves be carried away in Anacreontic transports, while, from deep in his easy 
chair, a calm and impassive Saint-Simon looked on, taking no part at all in the 
conversation, hut nonetheless taking it all in, and preparing himself withal to 
transform the human race." Firmin Maillard, La Legende de la femme emancipee 
(Paris), p. 27. [U15.2] 

Many believed that the female messiah — who, according to Duveyrier, could issue 
as well from the ranks of the prostitutes as from any other stratum of society — 
would have to come from the Orient (Constantinople). Barrault and twelve com- 
rades, therefore, set out for Constantinople to look for "the Mother." [U15,3] 

Apropos of the schism among the Saint-Simonians: "Bazard . . . had been mortally 
wounded in consequence of the famous general confession, where he learned from 
his wife herself that, in spite of all the sympathy . . . which she had for him, she 
could never sec him come up to her without feeling an instinctive repugnance. It 
was 'Hercules enchained,' as someone had said on seeing him struck by apoplexy." 
Firmin Maillard, La Legende de lafemme emancipee (Paris), p. 35. [U15,4] 

"Everyone knows about the retreat at Menilmontant. . . . There they lived in celi- 
hacy so as to demonstrate that their ideas on marriage, and on the emancipation of 



women, were in no way the outcome of an epicurean design." Firmin Maillard, La 
Legende de lafemme emancipee (Paris), p. 40. [Ul5,5] 



Proudhon was a fierce opponent of Saint-Simonianism; he speaks of "Saint- 
Simonian rottenness." [U15.6] 

"The arts can nourish only as conditioned within an organic age <epoque or- 
ganique>, and inspiration is strong and salutary only when it is social and relig- 
ious." Thus E. Barrault speaks out, in Aux artistes: Du Passe et de Favenir des 
beaux-arts (Paris, 1830), p. 73, against the barren "critical ages." [U15,7] 

Last echo of the idea that inaugurated Saint-Simonianism: "One can compare the 
zeal and the ardor displayed by the civilized nations of today in their estab- 
lishment of railroads with that which, several centuries ago, went into the building 
of cathedrals. . . . If it is true, as we hear, that the word 'religion' comes from 
religare, "to bind" . . . , then the railroads have more to do with the religious spirit 
than one might suppose. There has never existed a more powerful instrument for 
. . . rallying the scattered populations." Michel Chevalier, "Chemins de fer," in 
Dictionnaire de I'economie politique (Paris, 1852), p. 20. [U15a,l] 

"The government wanted, on its own, to construct the railway system. There were 
various disadvantages to this course of action, . . . but, in the end, it would have 
given us railroads. The idea occasioned a terrific explosion; political rivalries 
dominated the scene. Science itself . . . came out in support of the spirit of system- 
atic opposition. An illustrious savant was vain enough to lend the authority of his 
name to the plot against the railways. Construction by the state was thus rejected 
by an overwhelming majority. This occurred in 1838. Favorably disposed, as it 
was, toward the project, the government now turned to private industry. Take 
these marvelous thoroughfares, it said; I am offering you the concession for them. 
And no sooner were these words out than a new storm arose. What! The bankers, 
the capitalists are going to reap a fortune from this venture! ... It is feudalism 
reborn from its own ashes! — The plans to offer concessions to companies were 
accordingly withdrawn, ... or else spiked with clauses that made acceptance im- 
possible for serious investors. We continued like this up until 1844." Michel 
Chevalier, "Chemins de fer," excerpt from Dictionnaire de Feconomie politique 
(Paris, 1852), p. 100. [U15a,2] 

Chevalier already sets up, for the transport of war materials in railroad cars, the 
equation: forty men equal six horses. See Michel Chevalier, "Chemins de fer," in 
Dictionnaire de I'economie politique (Paris, 1852), pp. 47-48. [U15a,3] 

Theory of art in Saint-Simonianism. It rests on the division of liistory "into Or- 
ganic or religious ages and Critical or irreligious ages. . . . The course of history 
treated in this work comprises two organic ages — the first constituted under the 
reign of Greek polytheism, the second under that of Christianity — and, in the 



wake of these organic ages, two critical ages, of which one extends from the era of 
Greek philosophy to the advent of Christianity, and the other from the end of the 
fifteenth century to the present." [E. Barrault,] Aux artistes: Du Passe et de 
Vavenir des beaux-arts (Paris, 1830), p. 6. <SeeN10,5.> [U15a,4] 

Universal history appears, to the Saint-Simonian Barrault, as the new work of 
art: "Shall we venture to compare the last of the tragic or comic authors of Rome 
with the Christian orators intoning their eloquent sermons? No, Corneille, Ra- 
cine, Voltaire, and Moliere will not come back to life; dramatic genius has accom- 
plished its mission. ... In the end, the novel will fail no less in respect of what it 
has in common with these two genres as in its relations to the history of which it 
is the counterfeit. . . . History, in fact, will again take on a powerful charm . . . ; it 
will no longer be only a little tribe of the Orient that will make for sacred history; 
the history of the entire world will merit this title. Such history will become a 
veritable epic, in which the story of every nation will constitute a canto and the 
story of every great man an episode." [E. Barrault,] Aux artistes: Du Passe et de 
I'avenir des beaux-arts (Paris, 1830), pp. 81-82. The epic belongs to the organic 
age; the novel and drama, to the critical. [U16,l] 

Barrault already has a vague idea of the importance, for art, of secularized cultic 
elements, although he puts the emphasis on periods that are consolidated 
through cult: "Although Greece never fostered a religious caste system like that of 
the Orient, its epic represented nothing less than an initial separation of poetry 
from cult. . . . Should orthodox movements survive into the critical periods, the 
course of these periods is imperceptibly drawn back into the bosom of ortho- 
doxy." [E. Barrault,] Aux artistes: Du Passe et de I'avenir des beaux-arts (Paris, 
1830), pp. 25-26. [U16.2] 

Saint-Simon points with satisfaction to the fact that precisely those men who 
benefited humanity most decisively — Luther, Bacon, Descartes — were given to 
passions. Luther, the pleasures of eating; Bacon, money, Descartes, women and 
gambling. See E. R. Curtius, Balzac <Bonn, 1923>, p. 117. [U16.3] 

With reference to Guizot, whose brochure, "Du Gouvernement de la France et 
du ministere actuel" (Paris, 1820) presents the accession of the bourgeoisie as the 
centuries-old struggle of a class (of course, his work De la Democratie [Paris, 1849] 
sees in the class struggle, which has meanwhile arisen between bourgeoisie and 
proletariat, only a misfortune), Plekhanov portrays the visions of the socialist 
Utopians as, "theoretically no less than practically," a great step backward. "The 
reason for this lay in the weak development of the proletariat at that time." 
Georgi Plekhanov, "Uber die Anfange der Lehre vom Klassenkampf," Die neue 
Zeil, 21, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1903), p. 296. [U16,4] 

Augustin Thierry, an "adopted son" of Saint-Simon. According to Marx, he de- 
scribes very well how "from the first, or at least after the rise of the towns, the 



French bourgeoisie gains too much influence by constituting itself the Parliament, 
the bureaucracy, and so on, and not, as in England, merely through commerce 
and industry." Karl Marx to Friedrich Engels, London, July 27, 1854 [Karl Marx 
and Friedrich Engels, Ausgewiihlte Briefe, ed. V. Adoratski (Moscow and Lenin- 
grad, 1934), p. 60]. !;i [Ul6a,l] 

Aftereffects of Saint-Simonianism: "Pierre Leroux — who is represented, in en- 
gravings of the period, with hands clasped and eyes upraised in ecstasy — did his 
best to have an article on God published in La Revue des deux mondes. . . . We 
recall that Louis Blanc delighted Ruge with a lecture attacking the atheists. 
Quinet, along with Michelet, struggled furiously against the Jesuits, while pri- 
vately harboring the wish to reconcile his compatriots with the Gospel." C. Bougie, 
Chezles prophetes socialistes (Paris, 1918), pp. 161-162. [U16a,2] 

Heine's Deutschland is dedicated to Enf'antin. [U16a,3] 

Schlabrendorf reports that Saint-Simon wanted to make physics, and nothing but 
physics, the true religion. "Teachers of religion were supposed to deliver lectures 
in church on the mysteries and wonders of nature. There, I imagine, they would 
have set up electrical apparatus on the altar and stimulated the faithful with 
galvanic batteries." Graf Gustav von Schlabrendorf in Paris iiber Ereignisse und 
Personen seiner Zeit [in Carl Gustav Jochmann, Reliquien: Aus seinen nachgelas- 
senen Papier en, ed. Heinrich Zschokke, vol. 1 (Hechingen, 1836), p. 146]. 

[U16a,4] 

Enfantin hailed the coup d'etat of Louis Napoleon as the work of providence. 

[U16a,5] 

1846: enthusiastic reception, on its debut, of Felicien David's he Desert. The 
project of the Suez Canal was then the order of the day. "Its theme was a poet's 
eulogy of the desert as the image of eternity, coupled with his pity for the townsman 
imprisoned between stone walls." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach und das Paris 
seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 1937), p. 133." he Desert was parodied by Offenbach. 

[U16a,6] 

"Among the dream architecture of the Revolution, Ledoux's projects occupy a 
special position. . . . The cubic form of his "House of Peace" seems legitimate to 
him because the cube is the symbol of justice and stability, and, similarly, all the 
elementary forms would have appeared to him as intelligible signs of intrinsic 
moment. The ville naissante, the city in which an exalted . . . life would find its 
abode, will be circumscribed by the pure contour of an ellipse. . . . Concerning the 
house of the new tribunal, the Pacifere, he says in his Architecture: 'The building 
drawn up in my imagination should be as simple as the law that will be dispensed 
there."' Emil Kaufmann, Von Ledoux bis Le Corbusier: Ursprung und Entwick- 
lung der autonomen Architektur (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933), p. 32. [U17.1] 



Ledoux, Temple de Memoire (House of Women): "The narrative relief on the 
triumphal columns at four corners of a country house was intended to celebrate 
the glory of the hestowers of life, the mothers, in place of the customary monu- 
ments consecrated to the bloody victories of generals. With this unusual work, the 
artist wished to render thanks to the women he had come to know in his life." Emil 
Kaufmann, Von Ledoux bis he Corbusier (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933), p. 38. 

[U17.2] 

On Ledoux: "Once the distinctions of rank within architecture fall by the wayside, 
then all architectural orders are of equal value. . . . The earlier thematic eclecti- 
cism, which was taken up almost exclusively with churches, palaces, the 'better' 
domiciles, and of course military fortifications, retreats before the new architec- 
tural universalism. . . . The revolutionary process of the suhurbanizing of domes- 
tic housing parallels the disappearance of the baroque assemblage as art form. . . . 
A more extended complex, apparently conceived as a development at the entrance 
to the city, consists in a number of two- to four-room dwellings ranged around a 
square courtyard; each of these residences possesses the necessary closet space, 
while kitchen, pantries, and other utility rooms are located in a building at the 
center of the courtyard. We have here, probably, the earliest instance of the type 
of dwelling that is current today in the form of the apartment with shared 
kitchen." Emil Kaufmann, Von Ledoux bis Le Corbusier (Vienna and Leipzig, 
1933), p. 38. [U17.3] 

"The Orient had been discovered, and some journeyed there to seek the Mother — 
La Men; — a representative figure of this century, covered with breasts like the 
Diana of Ephesus." Adrienne Monnier, "La Gazette des Amis des Livres," La 
Gazette des Amis des Livres, 1 (January 1, 1938) (Paris), p. 14. [U17,4] 

"Mare remembers the Past; Woman divines the Future; the Couple sees the Pre- 
sent.' 1 '' Saint-Simonian formula, in Du Camp, Souvenirs litteraires, vol. 2 (Paris, 
1906), p. 93. [Ul7a,l] 

"La Mere": "She was to he lafemme libre. . . . This independent woman had to he 
a thinking woman, one who, . . . having fathomed the secrets of the feminine psy- 
che, . . . would make confession for all her sex. . . . The quest for . . . the Mother 
was not an innovation of Enfantin's; well hef ore him, Saint-Simon himself, during 
the period when Augustin Thierry was his secretary, had made an attempt to 
discover this . . . wonder . . . and evidently thought to have found her in Madame 
de Stael." The latter declined an invitation to beget a messiah for humanity with 
Saint-Simon (pp. 91-93). — "The niission to locate La Mere now formed, and was 
off. The pilgrims numbered twelve, including Barrault, the leader of the expedi- 
tion. Their ultimate destination was Constantinople, . . . though they had no 
money. Dressed in white (as a sign of the vow of chastity they had taken on leaving 
Paris), staffs in hand, they begged their way from place to place, in the name of the 
Mother. In Burgundy, they hired themselves out to help with the harvest; in Lyons, 



they arrived on the clay before an execution and, the following morning, demon- 
strated against the death penalty in front of the gallows. They embarked in Mar- 
seilles, and worked as sailors aboard a merchant vessel whose second mate was 
Garibaldi. . . . They slept in the Great Champ des Morts, L;> protected by cypresses 
from the morning dew; they wandered through the bazaars, occasionally stopping 
to preach the doctrines of Saint-Simon, speaking French to Turks who could not 
understand them" (pp. 94-95). They are arrested, then released. They set their 
sights on the island of Rotnma, in the South Pacific, as the place to seek the 
Mother, hut they get only as far as Odessa, whence they are sent back to Turkey. 
According to Maxime Du Camp, Souvenirs litteraires, vol. 2 (Paris, 1906). 

[U17a,2] 

"Gaudissart demanded an indemnity of five hundred francs for the week he had to 
spend in boning up on the doctrine of Saint-Simon, pointing out what efforts of 
memory and brain would be necessary to enable him to become thoroughly con- 
versant with this article." Gaudissart canvasses for he Globe (and he Journcd des 
enfants). H. de Balzac, Ulllustre Gaudissart, ed. Calmann-Levy (Paris), p. II. 1 * 

[U18.1] 

The Continental system 17 was, as it were, the first test for the example of Saint- 
Simonianism. Heine [Samtliche Werke [Hamburg, 1876], vol. 1, p. 155 — "Franzo- 
sische Zustande") calls Napoleon I a Saint-Simonian emperor. [U18.2] 

In the Saint-Simonian jacket that buttoned in back, we may discern an allusion to 
the androgynous ideal of the school. But it has to be assumed that for Enfantin 
himself it remained unconscious. [U18,3] 

Constantin Pecqueur, adversary of the Saint-Simonians , responds "to the ques- 
tion posed in 1838 by the Academie des Sciences Morales: 'How to assess . . . the 
influence of the . . . currently emerging means of transportation on . . . the state of 
a society ...?'" "The development of the railroads, at the same time that it in- 
duces travelers to fraternize in the cars, will overexcite . . . the productive activity 
of people." Pierre-Maxime Schuhl, Machinisme et philosophic (Paris, 1938), 
p. 67. [U18,4] 

The historical signature of the railroad may be found in the fact that it represents 
the first means of transport — and, until the big ocean liners, no doubt also the 
last — to form masses. The stage coach, the automobile, the aii-plane carry pas- 
sengers in small groups only. [U18.5] 



"The anemic pallor of our civilization, as monotonous as a railway line," says 
Balzac. La Peau de chagrin, ed. Flammarion (Paris), p. 45. 1I! [U18,6] 



[Conspiracies, Compagnonnage] 



"Those agents provocateurs who, during the Second Empire, often mingled with 
rioters were known as 'white smocks.'" Daniel Halevy, Decadence de la liberte 



"In 1848, Louis Philippe had in Paris a security force of some 3,000 men, in place 
of the 950 gendarmes serving under Charles X, and some 1,500 police agents in 
place of 400. The Second Empire had great affection for the police, and it ar- 
ranged magnificent installations for them. They owe to the Second Empire that 
vast edifice — at once barracks, fortress, and office building — which occupies the 
center of the Cite between the Palais de Justice and Notre Dame, and which, 
although larger and less beautiful, recalls those palaces in Tuscan cities where the 
podestas resided." Daniel Halevy, Decadence de la liberte (Paris), p. 150. 



"The secret files in police headquarters inspire a certain awe and a certain dread. 
When a new police commissioner first takes office, his personal file is hrought up to 
him. He alone enjoys this privilege; neither the ministers nor even the president of 
the republic get to see their dossiers, which are shelved and maintained in archives 
that no one is permitted to examine." Daniel Halevy, Decadence de la liberte 



"Turning back toward the Quartier Latin, one ran into the virgin forest of the Rue 
d'Enfer, which extended between the Rue du Val-de-Grace and the Rue de l'Abbe- 
de-FEpee. There, one found the garden of an old hotel, abandoned and in ruins, 
where plane trees, sycamores, chestnut trees, and intertwined acacias grew hap- 
hazardly. In the center, a deep shaft gave access into the catacombs. It was said 
that the place was haunted. In reality, it served for the romantic gatherings of the 
Carbonari and of the secret society Aide-Toi, le Ciel t'Aidera <God Helps Him 
Who Helps Himself >." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), 



(Paris <1931>), p. 152. 



[V1.1] 



[Vl,2] 



(Paris), pp. 171-172. 



[V1.3] 



p. 367. D Gardens, The Seine 0 



[V1.4] 



"The Garde Nationale was no laughing matter. Positioned between the royal 
troops and the popular insurgents, the armed bourgeoisie of Paris was the great 



mediating power, the good sense of the nation. . . . From 1830 to 1839, the bour- 
geois Garde Nationale lost 2,000 of their own in confrontation with the barricades, 
and it was due more to them than to the army that Louis Philippe was able to 
remain on his throne. . . . Whatever the reason — whether simple old age or a 
species of lassitude — it was always the bourgeoisie that wearied of this wasteful life 
which made it necessary, every six months, for hosiers and cabinetmakers to take 
up arms and shoot at each other. The hosiers, peaceful men, grew tired before the 
cabinetmakers. This remark would suffice to explain the February Revolution." 
Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, pp. 389-391. [VI, 5] 

June Insurrection. "It was enough to have the appearance of poverty to be treated 
like a criminal. In those days there was something called 'a profile of the insur- 
gent,' and anyone fitting the description was arrested. . . . The Garde Nationale 
itself had most certainly determined the outcome of the February Revolution, 1 but 
it never occurred even to them to give the name 'insurgents' to men struggling 
against a king. Only those who had risen up against property . . . were known as 
insurgents. Because the Garde Nationale . . . 'had saved society,' they could do at 
that time whatever they wanted, and no doctor would have dared refuse them 
entry into a hospital. . . . Indeed, the blind fury of the Guardsmen went so far that 
they would scream 'Silence!' to the fever patients speaking in delirium and would 
have murdered these people if the students had not stopped them." Engliinder 
<Geschichte der franzdsischenArbeitei-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864), > vol. 2, 
pp. 320,327-328, 327. [Vl,6] 



"It goes without saying that the worker associations lost ground with the coup 
d'etat of December 2, 1851. . . . All the associations of workers, those who had 
received subsidies from the government as well as the others, began by promptly 
removing their signs, on which symbols of equality and the words 'Liberty, Frater- 
nity, Equality' were inscribed; it was as though they had been shocked by the 
blood of the coup. Hence, with the coup d'etat, there were still unquestionably 
worker associations in Paris, but the workers no longer risked displaying this 
name. ... It would be difficult to trace the remaining associations, for it is not only 
on the signboards hut also in the city's directory of addresses that the name 
'Workers Association' is missing. Worker associations survive, after the coup 
d'etat, only in the guise of ordinary commercial concerns. Thus, the former fra- 
ternal association of masons is now going under the trade name 'Bouyer, Cohadon 
& Co.,' the association of gilders that likewise once existed as such now operates as 
the firm of 'Dreville, Thihout & Co.,' and, hy the same token, in every surviving 
association of workers it is the managers who give their names to the business. . . . 
Since the coup d'etat, not one of these associations has admitted a new memher; 
any new memher would he regarded with undisguised suspicion. If even the cus- 
tomers were each time received with distrust, this was because one everywhere 
sensed the presence of the police — and was the more justified in doing so as the 
police themselves would often show up officially on one pretext or another." Sig- 



mund Englantler, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Ham- 
burg, 1864), vol. 4, pp. 195, 197-198, 200. [Vla,l] 



In regard to Cahet. "After the February Revolution, someone had discovered . . . , 
in the files of Toulouse's chief of police, a letter from Gouhenant, delegate or 
president of the first vanguard, who in 1843, during the trial in Toulouse, 2 had 
offered his services as police agent to the government of Louis Philippe. It was 
known that this poison of espionage in France had penetrated even into all the 
pores of family life; but that a police agent, this most disgusting excrescence of the 
old society, could have found his way to the leader of the vanguard of Icarians in 
order to cause his ruin, and at the risk of going under himself, aroused consider- 
able surprise. Hadn't police spies been seen in Paris fighting and dying on the 
barricades, doing hattle with the government in whose pay they stood!" Sigmund 
Englander, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen, vol. 2, pp. 159- 
160. D Utopians 0 [Vla,2] 

"With the development of proletarian conspiracies, the need arose for a division of 
labor. The members were divided into occasional conspirators, conspirateurs 
d'occasion — that is, workers who engaged in conspiracy alongside their other em- 
ployment, merely attending meetings and holding themselves in readiness to ap- 
peal' at the place of assemhly at the leaders' command — and professional 
conspirators, who devoted all their energy to the conspiracy and made their living 
from it. . . . The social situation of this class determines its entire character from 
the outset. Proletarian conspiracy naturally affords them only very limited and 
uncertain means of subsistence. They are therefore constantly obliged to dip into 
the cash boxes of the conspiracy. A number of them also come into direct conflict 
with civil society as such, and appear before the police courts with a greater or 
lesser degree of dignity. Their precarious livelihood, dependent in individual cases 
more on chance than on their activity, their irregular lives whose only fixed ports- 
of -call are the taverns of the marchands de vin (the conspirators' places of rendez- 
vous), their inevitable acquaintance with all kinds of dubious people, place them 
in that social category which in Paris is known as the boheme. These democratic 
hohemians of proletarian origin are therefore either workers who have given up 
their work and have as a consequence become dissolute, or characters who have 
emerged from the lumpenproletariat and bring all the dissolute habits of that class 
with them into their new way oflife. . . . The whole way of life of these professional 
conspirators has a most decidedly hohemian character. Recruiting sergeants for 
the conspiracy, they go from marchand de vin to marchand de vin, feeling the 
pulse of the workers, seeking out their men, cajoling them into the conspiracy and 
getting either the society's treasury or their new friends to foot the bill for the liters 
inevitably consumed in the process. Indeed, it is really the marchand de vin who 
provides a roof over their heads. It is with him that the conspirator spends most of 
his time; it is here he has his rendezvous with his colleagues, with the members of 
his section and with prospective recruits; it is here, finally, that the secret meetings 
of sections (groups) and section leaders take place. The conspirator, highly san- 



guine in character anyway like all Parisian proletarians, soon develops into an 
absolute bmmbocheur <hoozer> in this continual tavern atmosphere. The sinister 
conspirator, who in secret session exhibits a Spartan self-discipline, suddenly 
thaws and is transformed into a tavern regular whom everybody knows and who 
really understands how to enjoy his wine and women. This conviviality is further 
intensified hy the constant dangers the conspirator is exposed to; at any moment 
he may he called to the barricades, where he may be killed; at every turn the police 
set snares for him which may deliver him to prison or even to the galleys. ... At 
the same time, familiarity with danger makes him utterly indifferent to life and 
liberty. He is as at home in prison as in the wine shop. He is ready for the call to 
action any day. The desperate recldessness which is exhibited in every insurrec- 
tion in Paris is introduced precisely by these veteran professional conspirators, 
the homines de coups de main. They are the ones who throw up and command the 
first barricades, who organize resistance, lead the looting of weapon-shops and the 
seizure of arms and ammunition from houses, and in the midst of the uprising 
carry out those daring raids which so often throw the government party into 
confusion. In a word, they are the officers of the insurrection. It need scarcely be 
added that these conspirators do not confine themselves to the general organizing 
of the revolutionary proletariat. It is precisely their business to anticipate the 
process of revolutionary development, to hring it artificially to the crisis point, to 
launch a revolution on the spur of the moment, without the conditions for a revo- 
lution. For them, the only condition for revolution is the adequate preparation of 
their conspiracy. They are the alchemists of the revolution, and are characterized 
by exactly the same chaotic thinking and blinkered ohsessions as the alchemists of 
old. They leap at inventions which are supposed to work revolutionary miracles: 
incendiary hombs, destructive devices of magic effect, revolts which are expected 
to be all the more miraculous and astonishing in effect as t heir basis is less ra- 
tional. Occupied with such scheming, they have no other purpose than the most 
immediate one of overthrowing the existing government, and they have the pro- 
foundest contempt for the more theoretical enlightenment of the proletariat ahout 
their class interests. Hence their pleheian rather than proletarian irritation at the 
habits noirs ("hlack frock coats") — people of a greater or lesser degree of educa- 
tion who represent that aspect of the movement, hut from whom they can never 
make themselves quite independent, since they are the official representatives of 
the party. The habits noirs also serve, at times, as their source of money. It goes 
without saying that the conspirators are ohliged to follow willy-nilly the develop- 
ment of the revolutionary party. . . . The chief characteristic of the conspirators' 
way of life is their hattle with the police, to whom they have precisely the same 
relationship as thieves and prostitutes." At another point in this article, we read 
(in reference to Chenu's report on Lucien de La Hodde that follows): "As we see, 
this spy . . . turns out to be a political prostitute of the vilest kind who hangs ahout 
in the street in the rain for the payment of his 'tip' hy the first officer of the peace 
who happens to come along." '"On one of my nocturnal excursions,' recounts 
Chenu, 'I noticed de La Hodde walking up and down the Quai Voltaire. ... It was 
raining in torrents, a circumstance which set me thinking. Was this dear fellow de 



La Hodde also helping himself from the cash box of the secret funds, by any 
chance? . . . "Good evening, de La Hodde, what on earth are you up to here at this 
hour and in this fearful weather?" "I am waiting for a rascal who owes me some 
money, and since he passes this way every evening at this time, he is going to pay 
me, or else" — and he struck the parapet of the embankment violently with his 
stick.' De La Hodde attempts to get rid of him and walks toward the Pont du 
Carrousel. Chenu departs in the opposite direction, but only to conceal himself 
under the arcades of the Institut <de Franco. ... 'A quarter of an hour later, I 
noticed the carriage with two little green lamps. ... A man got out; de La Hodde 
went straight up to him. They talked for a moment, and I saw de La Hodde make a 
movement as though putting money into his pocket. "' Marx and Engels, review of 
Chenu, Les Conspirateurs (Paris, 1850) and de La Hodde, La Naissance de la 
Republique (Paris, 1850), published in the Neuen rheinischen Zeitung <1850>, 
rpt. in <Die neue Zeit,> 4 (Stuttgart, 1886), pp. 555-556, 552, 551/' [V2;V2a] 

The workers of 1848 and the great Revolution: "Although the workers suffered 
under the conditions created by the Revolution, they did not blame it for their 
misery; they imagined that the Revolution had failed to bring about the happiness 
of the masses because intriguers had perverted its founding principle. According 
to their thinking, the great Revolution was good in itself, and human misery could 
be eliminated only if people were to resolve on a new 1793. Hence, they turned 
away distrustfully from the socialists and felt drawn to the bourgeois republicans, 
who conspired with the aim of establishing a republic by revolutionary means. The 
secret societies in existence during the reign of Louis Philippe recruited a great 
many of their most active members from the working class." Paul Laf argue, "Der 
Klassenkampf in Frankreich," Die neue Zeit, 12, no. 2 (1894), p. 615. [V3,l] 

Marx on the "Communist League": "'As far as the secret doctrine of the League is 
concerned, it underwent all the transformations of French and English socialism 
and communism, as well as their German versions. . . . The secret form of the 
society goes back to its Paris origins. . . . During my first, stay in Paris (from late 
October 1843 to February 1845), I established personal contact with the leaders of 
the League living there, as well as with the leaders of the majority of the secret 
French worker associations — without, however, becoming a member of any of 
them. In Brussels, . . . the London Central Authority entered into correspondence 
with us and . . . sent ... a watchmaker called Joseph Moll ... to invite us to join 
the League. Moll allayed our doubts ... by revealing that the Central Authority 
intended to convoke a Congress of the League in London. . . . Accordingly, we 
joined it. The Congress . . . took place, and, after heated debate over several 
weeks, it adopted the Manifesto of the Communist Party, written by Engels and 
myself.' At the time Marx wrote these lines, he described their content as compris- 
ing 'histories long past and half forgotten.' ... In 1860 the workers' movement, 
suppressed by the counterrevolution of the 1850s, was dormant throughout 
Europe. . . . One misunderstands the history of the Communist Manifesto if one 
sees the date of its publication as marking the commencement of the European 



workers' movement. In point of fact, the manifesto represented the close of this 
movement's first period, which stretched from the July Revolution to the Febru- 
ary Revolution. . . . The most they could attain was theoretical clarification. ... A 
secret league of workers that, over the years, could accompany and intellectually 
stimulate the English and French socialism of the day, as well as the reigning 
German philosophy, will have displayed an energy of thought that deserves the 
highest respect." "Ein Gedenktag des Kommunismus," Die neue Zeit, 16, no. 1 
(Stuttgart, 1898), pp. 354—355. The passage from Marx is taken from the polemi- 
cal pamphlet against Vogt. 4 [V3,2] 

"The practical programs of the communist conspirators of the period . . . set them 
apart advantageously from the socialist Utopians, thanks to the firm conviction 
that the emancipation of the working class ('the people') is unthinkable without 
struggle against the upper classes ('the aristocracy'). Of course, the struggle of a 
handful of men who have hatched a conspiracy in the name of popular interests 
can in no case be considered a class struggle. If, nevertheless, the majority of these 
conspirators have come from the working class, then the conspiracy can be said to 
constitute the germ of the revolutionary struggle of that class. And the conception 
which the Society of Seasons'' has of the 'aristocracy' shows how closely the ideas 
of the revolutionary communists in France, at that time, were connected to the 
ideas of the bourgeois revolutionaries of the eighteenth century and the liberal 
opposition during the Restoration. . . . Like Augustin Thierry, the French revolu- 
tionary communists began with the idea that the struggle against the aristocracy 
was necessarily in the interests of all the rest of society. But they rightly point out 
that the aristocracy of birth has heen replaced by an aristocracy of money, and 
that, as a result, the struggle . . . must be waged against the bourgeoisie." Georgi 
Plekhanov, "Uber die Anfange der Lehre vom Klassenkampf" (from the introduc- 
tion to a Russian edition of the Communist Manifesto), part 3 , "Die Anschauungen 
des vormarxistischen Sozialismus vom Kassenkampf," Die neue Zeit, 21, no. 1 



1851: " A decree of December 8 authorized the deportation, without hearing, . . . 
of any person presently or formerly belonging to a secret society. This was under- 
stood as referring to any society at all, whether a society for mutual aid or a 
literary society, that met — even in broad daylight — without the express permis- 
sion of the prefect of police." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), 



"Following the assassination attempt by Orsini . . . , the imperial government im- 
mediately voted into law a general security measure giving it the power to arrest 
and deport, without hearing, ... all persons previously punished on the occasion 
of the June Days of 1848 and the events of December 1851 .... The prefect of each 
depurtement was ordered to designate immediately a specific number of victims." 



(1903), p. 297. 



[V3a,l] 



p. 264. 



[V3a,2] 



A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 273. 



[V3a,3] 



"The Independents had their secret society, the Charbonnerie <Carbonari>, or- 
ganized at the beginning of 1821 on the model of the Italian Carbonari. The 
organizers were a wine merchant, Dugied, who had spent time in Naples, and a 
medical student, Bazard. . . . Every member was required to contribute one franc 
a month, to possess a gun and fifty bullets, and to swear to carry out blindly the 
orders of his superiors. The Charbonnerie recruited among students and soldiers 
in particular; it ended up numbering 2,000 sections and 40,000 adherents. The 
Charbonniers wanted to overthrow the Bourbons, who had been 'brought back 
by foreigners,' and 'to restore to the nation the free exercise of its right to choose 
a suitable government.' They organized nine plots during the first six months of 
1822; all failed." A. Malet and P. Grille:, XIX Steele (Paris, 1919), p. 29. The 
uprisings of the Carbonari were military revolts; they had, perhaps, a certain 
analogy to those of the Decembrists. [V4,l] 

April 29, 1827: dissolution of the Garde Nationale by order of Villele, on account 
of a demonstration which it had organized against him. [V4,2] 

About sixty students from the Ecole Polytechnique at the head of the July Revolu- 
tion. [V4,3] 

March 25, 1831: reinstatement of the Garde Nationale. "It named its own officers, 
except for the military chiefs. . . . The Garde Nationale constituted ... a veritable 
army, numbering some 24,000 men . . . ; this army was a police force. . . . Also, 
care was taken to separate out the workers. . . . This was achieved by requiring 
the Garde Nationale to wear uniforms and to pay its own expenses. . . . This bour- 
geois guard, moreover, did its duty bravely in all circumstances. As soon as the 
drums had sounded the call, each man would leave his place of work, while the 
shopkeepers closed their stores, and, dressed in uniform, they would all go out to 
join their battalion, not needing to muster." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle 
(Paris, 1919), p. 77, 79. [V4,4] 

"The republicans had belonged, for the most part, to the Charbonnerie; against 
Louis Philippe, they multiplied the number of secret societies. The most important 
. . . was that of the Droits de l'Homme < Rights of Man>. Founded in Paris (where 
it quickly grew to nearly 4,000 members), and modeled on the Charbonnerie, it 
had branches in most of the major cities. It was this secret society that organized 
the great insurrections in Paris and Lyons in June 1832 and April 1834. The 
principal republican newspapers were La Tribune and he National, the first di- 
rected by Armand Marrast and the second by Armand Carrel." Malet and Grillet, 
XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 81. [V4,5] 

Declaration of December 19, 1830, issued by students at the Ecole Polytechnique 
to the editorial office of Le Constitutionnel: "'If any man among the agitators,' they 
say, 'is found wearing the uniform of the Ecole, that man is an impostor. . . . ' And 
so they had these men tracked down wherever they appeared in the faubourgs in 



the uniform of Polytechnicians, seeking to usurp the latter's influence. The best 
way to recognize them, according to Bosquet, was to ask them the differential of 
sine x or of log x; 'if they respond appropriately, they are former students; if not, 
we have them jailed.'" G. Pinet, Hutoire de I'Ecole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), 
p. 187. Disturbances took place in connection with the trial against the ministers 
of Charles X. 6 Pinet adds: "In supporting the interests of the bourgeoisie, those 
with republican convictions seemed to fear they would be accused of deserting 
the cause of the people" (p. 187). In a further proclamation, the school came out 
decisively in favor of universal suffrage. [ V4a,l] 

"The students go to their student societies, whether publicly or secretly organized, 
to get the watchword of the day. . . . There, they learn what actions are being 
planned. . . . With all this going on, the Ecole Polytechnique has begun to view 
itself as a fourth estate within the nation. ... It was the moment when the Repub- 
lican party, which counted in its ranks the artillery of the Garde Nationale, the 
student, the proletariat, the worker, and the veteran of July, resumed ... its 
activity; the moment when popular societies — like Les Amis du Peuple, Les Droits 
de 1' Homme, and La Gauloise — were recruiting heavily; the moment when the 
Garde Nationale failed to maintain the peace; when the Saint-Simonians threat- 
ened to unsettle the order of society; . . . and when . . .he National and La Trib- 
une waged a daily struggle against those in power." G. Pinet, Histoire de I'Ecole 
polytechnique (Paris, 1887), pp. 192-193. [V4a,2] 

During the cholera epidemic, the government was accused of having poisoned the 
fountains. For example, in the Faubourg Saint- Antoine. [V4a,3] 

"Young people in the schools had adopted the red beret; and members of the secret 
societies looked forward to the next time, when the national razor would be well 
honed." Charles Louandre, Les Idees subversives de notre temps (Paris, 1872), 
p. 85. [V4a,4] 

The secret societies of the democrats were chauvinistic. They wanted interna- 
tional propaganda for the republic by means of war. [ V5 , 1 ] 

"Response afterward made by a prisoner before the Court of Peers: / 'Who was 
your chief?' / 'I knew none, and I recognized none. '" Victor Hugo, Oeuvres com- 
pletes, novels, vol. 8 (Paris, 1881), p. 47 (Les Miserables, "Faits d'ou l'histoire 
sort et que l'histoire ignore"). 7 [V5,2] 

"From time to time, men 'disguised as bourgeois, and in fine coats' came, 'causing 
embarrassment,' and, having the air 'of command,' gave a grip of the hand to the 
most important, and went away. They never stayed more than ten minutes." Vic- 
tor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 8 (Paris, 1881), pp. 42-43 (Les 
Miserables, "Faits d'oii l'histoire sort et que l'histoire ignore")." [V5,3] 



The Societe cles Droits cle l'Homme < Society of the Rights of Man) employs, in its 
pamphlets, the calendar of the great Revolution. In the month of Pluviose," year 
42 of the Republican era, it counts 300 branch establishments throughout France, 
163 in Paris alone, of which every one had its particular name. The wooing of the 
proletarians by the bourgeoisie had the benefit "that, instead of enlisting them 
through humiliation or material services, through the offer of money or other 
forms of assistance, it was by various attentions and tokens of respect, by joining 
together in balls and fetes, that the leaders of the bourgeoisie worked to form 
attachments with the workers." Charles Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," part 1, 
Revue des deux mondes (July 1, 1913), pp. 148-149. [V5,4] 

The Societe de Propagande <Society of Propaganda): "To this organization we 
owe, in part, the strike at the end of 1833, which extended to typographers, me- 
chanics, stonecutters, rope makers, hackney drivers, camberers, glovers, saw- 
yers, wallpaperers, hosiers, and locksmiths, and which involved no less than 
'8,000 tailors, 6,000 shoemakers, 5,000 carpenters, 4,000 jewelers, and 3,000 
bakers.'" Ch. Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," part 1, Revue des deux mondes (July 
1,1913), p. 151. [V5,5] 

The Comite Invisible < Invisible Committee) — name of a secret society in Lyons. 

[V5,6] 

Ouly after 1832, but above all around 1834 and 1835, did revolutionary propa- 
ganda gain a foothold in the proletariat. [V5,7] 

In the tightened organization of the secret societies after 1835, the mystagogic 
element was intensified. The names of the days of the week and of the months 
became codewords for assault detachments and commandos. An initiation cere- 
mony influenced by freemasonry and reminiscent of the Vehme <medieval crimi- 
nal tribunals) was introduced. According to de La Hodde, this ceremonial 
already includes, among other things, the t[uestion: "Must one make a political 
revolution, or a social revolution?" 10 See Ch. Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," part 
1, Revue des Deux Mondes, 7, no. 1 (1913), pp. 1959-1961. [V5,8] 

"It was all up with the Jacobins by 1840, just as with the Montagnards, the secret 
societies, the conspiracies, the journals, the ceremonial parades, and the raids. 
The 'communists' now held center stage. . . . The workers took part in the ban- 
quet in Belleville, at wliich the clockmaker Simard gave a speech. The great strike 
of 1840, during which, in Paris alone, 30,000 men stopped work, tightened their 
federation. . . . Heinrich Heine has given us, in ten passages of his Lutece, a vivid 
picture of . . . the powerful hold which communism had on the workers from the 
Paris suburbs. Heine had the honor, in his letters to the Augsburg Gazette, of 
unveiling communism to the communists. . . . But . . . there are communists and 
communists. I transcribe, from L'Almanach Icarien of 1843, this notice . . . : 
'Today, the communists can be divided into two main categories: communists pure 



and simple, . . . who want to abolish marriage and the family, and Icarian commu- 
nists, . . . who wish to preserve the family and marriage, hut would do away with 
secret societies, wanton violence, riots, and other such felonies." Charles Benoist, 
"L'Homme de 1848," part 2, Revue des deux mondes (February 1, 1914), 
pp. 638-641. [V5a,l] 

In the mid-Thirties, a crisis broke out in the traditions of the journeymen and 
traveling artisans. The hierarchies handed down from the time of the guilds 
began to lose their authority; many of the work songs had come to seem old-fash- 
ioned. An effort was made to elevate the intellectual and moral level of the 
associations. Agricol Perdiguier put together a sort of journeyman's primer, with 
songs and didactic or devotional readings. This document shows that the mori- 
bund customs of the trade guilds were a breeding ground for secret societies. 

[V5a,2] 

Cenacles after 1839: La Goguette des Fils du Diable < Revels of the Sons of Satan >, 
Les Communistes Materialistes <The Materialist Communists). [V5a,3] 



Network of wine merchants: "The current law gives them freedom, whereas the 
Empire, in point of fact, had deprived them of freedom. Napoleon III looked on 
the taverns as 'meeting places for the secret societies,' and the Code annote [a 
pamphlet by Julien Goujon, Code annote des limonadiers] accuses him of having 
wanted to 'strike with terror,' in order to 'transform three hundred thousand 
inhabitants and their families into official watchmen.' Three hundred thousand 
taverns — that is, political taverns (what Balzac calls 'the people's parliament') — 
were thus consolidated . . . under the July Monarchy and the government of 
1848." Maurice Talmeyr, "LeMarchand de vins," Revue des deux mondes (August 
15, 1898), pp. 877-878. [V5a,4] 

Varia from Agricol Perdiguier, he Livre du compagnonnage (Paris: by the author, 
1840): "In 1830, the Aspirants Menuisiers <Apprentice Joiners) and the Aspirants 
Serruriers <Apprentice Locksmiths) in Bordeaux revolted against their fellow 
compagnons, or tradesmen, and formed among themselves the core of a new soci- 
ety. Since then, in Lyons, Marseilles, and Nantes, other apprentices have revolted 
and formed societies. . . . These various societies corresponded with one another, 
and the Societe de l'Union ou des Independants was horn. ... It is distinguished 
by no mystery, no initiation, no hierarchy. . . . All members of this society are 
equal" (pp. 179-180). Customs: "When a compagnon goes to the house where the 
society lodges, eats, and congregates, he says: 'I am going to the Mother's house'" 
(pp. 180-181). Names: "The Rose of Carcassonne, the Resolved of Tournus, and 
many others" (p. 185). Greeting — a prescribed form of introduction for trade- 
guild members on first meeting: "They ask one another what side they are on or 
what allegiance they hold to. If it is the same, there is a fete, and they drink from a 
shared flask. . . . If not, there are insults to start with, and then blows" (p. 187). 
Variously colored ribbons, worn in different ways, are insignia of the individual 



trades. Common, as well, are earrings with distinctive little pendants on them 2 
(horseshoes, hammers, standard gauges, and the like), to which the different 
trades lay exclusive claim. "The T-square and compass are emhlems of all the ^ 
trade guilds, all compagnonnage, for it is thought . . . that the word compagnon q 
derives from compas <compass>. u . . . The shoemakers and bakers have several g 
times paid dearly for the honor of wearing the compass; all the compagnons with 
allegiance to other professions set upon them" (p. 189). "In the trade-guild socie- 
ties, the word monsieur is never used. . . . The French, Spanish, Italians, and 
Swiss, whenever they happen to meet, address one another as countries — Country >3 
of Spain, Country of Italy, Country of Switzerland, and so on. . . . Since they all o| 
reside under the same starry vault, and tread the same ground, they are — and g 
they call themselves — countries; the world for them, is one great country!" ^ 
(p. 41). — Perdiguier was on the staff of L'Atelier (1840-1850), founded by 
Buchez. It went under in 1850 hecause it could not make a bail payment of 18,000 
francs. [V6,l] 

The July Days brought about an upsurge in secret societies, in consequence of a 
rapprochement between the republican bourgeoisie and the proletariat. [V6,2] 

The Society of the Tenth of Decemher. "On the pretext of establishing a charitable 
association, Louis Napoleon divided the Parisian lumpenproletariat, after his 
election to the presidency, into numerous secret sections, which were headed by 
Bonapartist agents." Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der europciischen Volker (Mu- 
nich <1921>), vol. 2, p. 102. [V6,3] 

The tavern on the Place Belhomme. "Under Louis Philippe, it was run by an 
individual connected with the police. Its clientele was composed, in large part, of 
all the conspirators of the day, who assemhled there twice a week, on Mondays and 
Thursdays. The names of confederates were proposed on Thursday, and they were 
admitted on Monday." A. Lepage, Les Cafes politiques et litteraires de Paris (Paris 
<1874>),p. 99. [V6a,l] 

From a secret report, cited in Pokrowski, by the Russian informer Jakov Tolstoi, 
concerning his conversation with the director of the English colonial hank, Camp- 
hell, an agent of Prince Louis Napoleon: "The prince had apprised him of the 
difficulties of his situation, given that he has to hattle against he National {that is , 
against Cavaignac — M.N. P.}, no less than against the red republicans {that is, 
Ledru-Rollin — M.N. P.}, who have enormous sums at their disposal(l). . . . After- 
ward, ... he asked me whether or not the Russian government was likely to en- 
trust the prince with such a sum [which was needed for the electoral campaign and 
could not he raised in England] .... It hecame clear to me then that Mr. Camphell 
was a sort of emissary of Prince Louis and so, in order to divert his attention and 
to put an end to the conversation, I treated the whole affair as a joke. I asked him 
what Louis Napoleon could give to Russia in return for the million he requires. — 
'Every possible concession,' answered Mr. Campbell, getting worked up. 'Then 



Russia can huy the head of the Republic?' I asked. 'And for only a million francs? 
Distributed over the four years of his presidency, this comes to 250,000 a year. You 
will admit that it is not a great deal of money.' — 'I guarantee you that, for this 
price, he will he entirely at your service. ' — 'Will he, at the very least, exert his full 
authority to rid France of Polish and Russian emigrants?' — 'I say to you that he 
will make a formal commitment in this regard, for he presently finds himself in the 
most difficult situation that in general can befall a man!"' M. N. Pokrowski, His- 
torische Aufsiitze (Vienna and Berlin <1928>), p. 120 ("Lamartine, Cavaignac, 
und Nikolaus I"). [V6a,2] 

"The old journeymen's association of compagnons, the beginnings of which go 
hack to the fourteenth, perhaps . . . the twelfth century ... (a number of histori- 
ans derive the Carbonari movement from it) ... , must have especially interested 
Balzac. . . . The compagnons themselves . . . trace their origin to the construction 
of Solomon's temple. ... In the preface to the Histoire des Treize, Balzac makes 
allusion to the compagnons, who even today would have their partisans among the 
French people." Ernst Rohert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), p. 34. [V7,l] 

"In France, it was above all the secret society known as La Congregation that 
furnished the public with materials for all sorts of thrilling and gruesome stories. 
The writers of the Restoration, in particular, ascribed to it the hlackest machina- 
tions. The Comte d'Artois, the future Charles X, moved in its orbit. . . . With his 
History of Secret Societies in the Army, Charles Nodier enthralled his readers. He 
himself belonged to the Societe des Philadelphes, founded in 1797. . . . Equally 
harmless was the Societe du Cheval Rouge <Society of the Red Horse >, which 
Balzac founded with Gautier and some others in the firm conviction that, by 
influencing the salons, its members . . . would garner power and glory for one 
another. ... A secret alliance of prison convicts is the Societe des Grands Fanan- 
dels, whose organization forms the hackground for . . . Vautrin." Ernst Robert 
Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), pp. 32-34. [V7,2] 

The Faubourg Saint-Antoine and the Temple precinct owe their importance for 
handicraft to the fact that the laws which prohibited workers from establishing a 
residence before completing their term as journeymen were not in effect there. 
The journeyman's tour de France required three to four years. [V7,3] 

Along with many other particulars concerning the compagnons, Chaptal reports 
of the enemy clans: "The tools of their trade were always their weapons of war." 
<Jean-Antoine-Claude> Chaptal, De Vlndustrie francaise (Paris, 1819), vol. 2, 
p. 314. [V7,4] 

"Apart from . . . meeting at night in small groups, the German craftsmen in Paris, 
in those years, liked to get together on Sundays with kith and kin in a restaurant 
on the outskirts of town. In January 1845, a former officer of the Garde Nationale, 
Adalbert von Bornstedt, who at that time was spying on radical writers and arti- 



Flora Tristan attempted to free the workers from the terms of their journeyman's 
contract. [V7a,2] 

Schlabrendorf gives an account of the popular comedian Bobeche, who could be 
seen on the Boulevard du Temple. "His stage is so narrow, however, that he has no 
room to gesticulate when his brother-in-law, with whom he performs, is up there 
with him. So he has to stick his hands in his pockets. The other day he exclaimed, 
with reason: I must have a place, I absolutely must have a place! — But you surely 
know that a place must be filled, that you must do some work and earn your 
place? — Filled? You fill just one part of it and the rest is filled hy others. — So what 
place do you want? — The Place Vendome. — The Place Vendome! It will surely he 
difficult for you to have that. — Nothing easier. I shall denounce the Column." 
Graf Gustav von Schlabrendorf in Paris iiber Ereignisse unci Personen seiner Zeit 
[in Carl Gustav Jochmann, Reliquien: Aus seinen Nachgelassenen Papieren, ed. 
Heinrich Zschokke, vol. 1 (Hechingen, 1836), pp. 248-249]. [V7a,3] 

The Carhonari looked on Christ as the first victim of the aristocracy. [V7a,4] 

"The police spies in Paris recognize one another by a hadge bearing the so-called 
eye of providence." Carl Gustav Jochmann, Reliquien, ed. Heinrich Zschokke, 
vol. 3 (Hechingen, 1838), p. 220. [V7a,5] 

"For the work of Balzac ... to appear authentically mythic, it suffices to recall 
that, even during the author's lifetime, there were groups of men and women in 
Venice and in Russia who would assume the parts of characters from his Comedie 
humaine and try to live like them." Roger Caillois, "Paris, my the moderne," 
ISouveUe Revue frmncaise, 25, no. 284 (May 1, 1937), p. 698. [V7a,6] 

"As for Balzac, one need only . . . recall that he is the man whose earliest work (or 
nearly his earliest) happens to be his Histoire impartiale des Jesuites, which he 
considered an homage to 'the most beautiful society ever formed,' and that he is, 
at the same time, the creator of Vautrin and the author of the Histoire des Treize." 
Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Mouvelle Revue francaise, 25, no. 284 



sans in Paris for the Prussian government, described to the latter, in a report 2 

denouncing Marx and Hess, a gathering of this sort in the Avenue de Vincennes, _^ 

where regicide, hatred of the rich, and the aholition of private property were ^ 

openly advocated. " Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1 , Friedrich Engels in q 

seiner Friihzeit (Berlin <1933>), p. 252. [V7,5] | 

1 

"Adalbert von Bornstedt . . . was ... a spy ... of the Prussian government. g»' 

Engels and Marx made use of him, knowing well enough, however, whom they were gj 

dealing with." Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner <%. 
Friihzeit, second edition (Berlin), p. 386. [V7a,l] 



(May 1, 1937), pp. 695-696. The Jesuits, like the Assassins, play a role in the 
imaginative world of Balzac, as in that of Baudelaire. [V8,l] 



"Ten French regiments, were they to descend into the catacombs, could not have 
laid a hand on a single Carbonaro, so many were the turns of those dark and 
dismal underground passages, leading to inaccessible retreats. It may be men- 
tioned, furthermore, that the catacombs were admirably mined in five or six 
places, and a spark would have been enough ... to blow up the entire Left Bank." 
A. Dumas, Les Mohicans de Paris, vol. 3 (Paris, 1863), p. 11. [V8,2] 

The conspirators of 1830 were rigorously classical in orientation and bitter foes 
of Romanticism. Blanqui remained true to this type throughout his life. [V8,3] 

Heine on a meeting of Les Amis du Peuple, at which over 1,500 in attendance 
listened to a speech by Blanqui. "The meeting had the odor of an old copy — much 
perused, greasy, and worn — of he Moniteur of 1793." Cited in Gel'froy, L'Enferme 
<ed. 1926 >, vol. 1, p. 59. [V8,4] 

Secret societies after the July Revolution: Ordre et Progres, Union des Condam- 
nes Politiques, Reclamants de Juillet, Francs Regeneres, Societe des Amis du 
Peuple, Societe des Families. [V8,5] 

Organization of the Societe des Saisons, successor to the Societe des Families: At 
the top, four seasons, of which the chief is spring. Each season has three months, 
the chief month being July. The month has four weeks, and their chief is Sun- 
day. — The chiefs are not present at the meetings (or are not recognizable). See 
Geffroy, L'Enferme <ed. 1926 >, vol. 1, p. 79. [V8,6] 

The sections of the Carbonari were known as ventes 12 (the name "Carbonari" goes 
back to a conspiracy organized in the house of a charcoal dealer during the strug- 
gle of the Ghibellines against the Guelphs). Supreme vente, district ventes, local 
ventes. Among the founders of the French section was Bazard. [V8,7] 

J. J. Weiss on the Club des Halles: "The club met in a little room on the second 
floor ahove a cafe; it had few members, and these were serious and thoughtful. 
Think of the atmosphere of the Comedie Frangaise on days when Racine or Cor- 
neille is performed; compare the audience on those days to the crowd that fills a 
circus where acrobats are executing perilous leaps, and you will understand the 
impression made on someone who ventured into this revolutionary club of Blan- 
qui, compared with the impression made hy the two clubs in vogue with the party 
of order, the club of the Folies-Bergere and that of the Salle Valentino. It was like 
a chapel consecrated to the orthodox creed of classical conspiracy, where the 
doors were open to all, but where you never felt like returning unless you helieved. 
After the sullen parade of the oppressed who, every night, would present them- 
selves at this tribunal in order always to denounce someone or something — the 



conspiracy of hankers, an office manager, an administrator of the railroad — the 
priest of the place would rise to his feet and, on the pretext of addressing the 
sorrows of his congregation, the people (represented by the half-dozen furious 
imbeciles who had just been heard), would clarify the situation. His appearance 
was distinguished, his bearing irreproachable; his countenance was delicate, fine, 
and composed, with a fierce and sinister flash that sometimes lit the small and 
piercing eyes, which, in their usual state, were more benevolent than harsh. His 
words were measured, colloquial, and precise; it was, along with that of M. Thiers, 
the least declamatory way of speaking I have ever heard. As to the content of his 
speech, almost everything in it was just. . . . 'Where, then, did Corneille learn the 
art of war?' cried the Grand Conde at the first performance of Sertorius. Blanqui, 
I would surmise, had no more studied war than had Corneille. But possessing, as 
he did, the political faculty to a superlative degree, he could manage, . . . even in 
military matters, all the signals that, when duly heeded, would have called forth 
a salute." Cited in Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1897), pp. 346-348. 

[V8a] 

January 1870, after the murder of Victor Noir: Blanqui has the Blanquists, pre- 
sented by Granger, file by before him, without letting the fact be known. "He went 
out, armed, bidding farewell to his sisters, and took up his post on the Champs- 
Elysees. It was there, as Granger had announced to him, that he would find, 
parading before him, the army of which he was the mysterious general. He recog- 
nized the squadron leaders, as they came into view, and, behind each of them, he 
saw the men grouped geometrically and marching in step, as though in regiments. 
It was all done according to plan. Blanqui held his review — strange spectacle — 
without arousing the slightest suspicion. Leaning against a tree, surrounded by the 
crowd of onlookers, the vigilant old man saw his comrades pass by, orderly amid 
the surging of the people, silent amid the steadily mounting uproar." Gustave 
Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1897), pp. 276-277. [V9,l] 

On the influence of Machiavelli, which Blanqui felt at Sainte-Pelagie: "In contrast 
to the French Blanqui — so lucid, so intelligent, so ironic — there appeared, from 
time to time, this old Italian Blanqui, denizen of Florence or of Venice, who put his 
faith in tenebrous schemes and in the possible success of an act of force." Gustave 
Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1897), pp. 245-246. [V9,2] 

A type of conspirator characteristic of the 1840s: Daniel Borme, a journeyman, 
half crazy, but above all ambiguous. He worked on assignment from Vidocq, 
who, for his part, took his orders from Caussidiere as much as from Louis 
Napoleon. Bonne put the regiment of the Vesuviemies on their feet; in 1848, he 
was granted an audience, in the company of several Vesuviennes, with Mine, de 
Lamartine. Lamartine himself refused to have any dealings with the Vesuvien- 
nes. There seems to have been a plan to set up workshops for them. Boraie 
makes an appeal to the citoyennes on a poster dated February 28, 1848: 

"To female citizens and patriots, my sisters in the Republic: ... I have asked 



the Provisional Government to register you under the title of \£suviennes. The 
engagement will be for one year; to enlist, you must be between fifteen and 
thirty, and unmarried. Apply at 14 Rue Sainte-Appoline, from noon to four 
o'clock." Cited in Roger Devigne, "Des 'Milicieimes' de 1937 aux 'Vesuviennes' 
de 1848," Vendredi (May 21, 1937). [V9,3] 

Baudelaire, in Ids review of Les Martyrs ridicules, by Leon Cladel: "The man of 
intelligence molds the people, and the visionary creates reality. I have known some 
poor wretches whose heads were turned by Ferragus XXIII and who seriously 
planned to form a secret coalition in order to share, like a rabhle dividing up a 
conquered empire, all the functions and the wealth of modern society." Baude- 
laire, L 'Art romantique (Paris), p. 434. 13 [V9a,l] 

Charles Proles, in Les Homines de la revolution de 1871 <Paris, 1898 >, p. 9, on 
Raoul Rigault, Blanquist and prefect of police during the Commune: "In all 
things, . . . even in his fanaticism, he had a remarkahle sang-froid, an indefinable 
air of the sinister and impassive mystificateur. " Cited in Georges Laronze, Histoire 
de la Commune de 1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 45. In the same text, p. 38, on Rigault's 
specialty, the unmasking of police spies: "Under the Empire, especially, he had 
thrived, . . . keeping his notebook up to date, denouncing, on their arrival, the 
disconcerted agents. 'So how are things with the boss?' And, with a sneer, he 
would announce their names. Blanqui saw in such perspicacity the mark of a 
serviceable talent. He let fall from his lips, one day, this unexpected word of 
praise: 'He is nothing but a gamin, but he makes a first-rate policeman. '" [V9a,2] 

Doctrine of the Blanquists during the Commune: "To issue decrees for the nation 
was to repudiate the Utopia of federalism and . . . , from Paris as the ahiding 
capital, to appear to govern France." Georges Laronze, Histoire de la Commune 
de 1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 120. [V9a,3] 

The Blanquists venerated the memory of Hebert. [ V9a,4] 

"Several editorial offices and boulevard cafes, in particular the Cafe de Suede, 
were the centers ... of conspiracy. From there, the web spread out. It encom- 
passed in its linkages the entire Commune, redoubtable less for the results ob- 
tained (these were effectively nullified by the profusion of plots) than for the 
atmosphere ... of suspicion it produced. At the Hotel de Ville, there were inces- 
sant leaks. No deliberation, no secret decision took place that was not immediately 
known by Thiers." Georges Laronze, Histoire de la Commune de 1871 (Paris, 
1928), p. 383. [V9a,5] 



Marx caps a detailed account of the Society of the Tenth of Decemher, as an 
organization of the lumpenproletariat, with these words: "in short, the whole, 
indefinite, disintegrated mass, thrown hither and thither, which the French term 



la 6o/ie>»e." Karl Marx, Der achtzehnte Brumaire des Louis Bonaparte, eel. 



Re Balzac: "Sainte-Beuve . . . recounts an anecdote stranger , . , than all the 
others. At one point, a whole society meeting in Venice (one of the more aristo- 
cratic of the societies) decided to assign its members different roles drawn from the 
Comedie humaine, and some of these roles, adds the critic mysteriously, were 
taken to the very extreme. . . . This occurred around 1840." Anatole Cerfberr and 
Jules Christophe, Repertoire de la Comedie humaine de H. de Balzac (Paris, 
1887), p. v (Introduction de Paul Bourget). [V10,2] 

In 1828 The Conspiracy of Equals, by Buonarroti, appears in Brussels. "Very 
quickly, his book becomes the breviary of conspirators." Title: <History of Ba- 
beuf's> Conspiracy for Equality, 60,000 copies sold in only a few days. In 1837, 
15,000 people at Buonarroti's interment. Michelet's father had a relation to the 
beginnings of Babeuf; Michelet, to Buonarroti. See Andre Monglond, Le Pre- 
romantisme franqais, vol. 2, he Maitre des dmes sensibles (Grenoble, 1930), 



Rjazanov (Vienna and Berlin <1927>), p. 73. 14 



[V10.1] 



pp. 154-155. 



[V10.3] 



w 



[Fourier] 

Seas they fathom! Skies they reveal! 
Each of these seekers after God 
Takes an infinity upon bis wing: 
Fulton the green, Herschel the blue; 
Magellan sails, Fourier soars. 
The frivolous and ironical crowd 
Sees nothing of their dreams. 

— V'ictor Hugo, L'Annee terrible: Les Precttrseurs, Epigraph 
to the brochure by Pellarin, 104' anniversaire natal de 
Fourier (Paris, 1876), cited in A. Pinloche, Fourier et 
le socialisme (Paris, 1933), supplement 



"The words of Jean Paul which I put at the head of this biography of Fourier — 'Of 
the libers that vibrate in the human soul he cut away none, but rather harmonized 
all' — these words apply admirably to this socialist, and in their fullest resonance 
apply only to him. One could not find a better way to characterize the phalanste- 
rian philosophy." Ch. Pellarin, Notice bibliographique (1839), p. 60, cited in 
A. Pinloche, Fourier et le socialisme (Paris, 1933), pp. 17-18. [Wl,l] 

Fourier on his business career: "My best years were lost in the workshops of 
falsehood, where from all sides the sinister augury rang in my ears: 'A very honest 
boy! He will never be worth anything in business.' Indeed, I was duped and 
robbed in all that I undertook. But if I am worth nothing when it comes to practic- 
ing business, I am worth something when it comes to unmasking it." Charles 
Fourier, 1820, Publication des manuscrits, vol. 1, p. 17, cited in A. Pinloche, 
Fourier et le socialisme (Paris, 1933), p. 15.' [Wl,2] 

Fourier wanted "every woman to have, first of all, a husband with whom she could 
conceive two children; second, a breeder (geniteur) with whom she could have 
only one child; then, a lover (favorit ) who has lived with her and retained this 
title; fourth and last, mere possessors (possesseurs ), who are nothing in the eyes of 
the law. ... A man who expressly says that a girl of eighteen who has not yet found 
a man is entitled to prostitute herself; a man who directs that all girls be divided 
into two classes, the juveniles (under eighteen) and the emancipated (over eight- 



een), which last would have the right to take a lover and bear illegitimate children; 
a man who . . . maintains that unmarried young women who give themselves up to 
pleasure possess qualities superior to those of married women, . . . and describes 
in great detail how an entire army of women should enter into prostitution under 
the supervision of matrons — such a man does not understand the eternal bases of 
humanity." Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associa- 
tionen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 1, pp. 245, 261-262. — In the same vein: "What are 
we to say of a system in -whichfilles publiques are given the name bacchantes and in 
which it is argued that they are just as necessary as vestal virgins, and that they 
. . . exercise the virtue of fellowship? A system which describes in what manner 
innocent young people are supposed to lose their innocence?" (ibid., pp. 245-24.6). 

[Wl,3] 

"Around 1803 or 1804, Fourier, who practiced the profession of commercial trav- 
eler — or 'shop-sergeant,' as he preferred to call it — found himself in Paris. Hav- 
ing before him a four-month wait for a position he had been promised, he looked 
around for some means of occupying his time and hit upon the idea of searching 
for a way to make all men happy. It was not with the expectation of obtaining any 
practical results that he entered on this project, but purely as a jeu d'esprit." 
Charles-M. Limousin, LeFourierisme (Paris, 1898), p. 3. [Wl,4] 

"Fourier is so prodigal in his invention and his crazy descriptions that Lerminier 
justifiably compares him to Swedenborg. . . . Fourier, too, was at home in all skies 
and on all planets. After all, he calculated mathematically the transmigration of 
the soul, and went on to prove that the human soul must assume 810 different 
forms until it completes the circuit of the planets and returns to earth, and that, in 
the course of these existences, 720 years must be happy, 45 years favorable, and 45 
years unfavorable or unhappy. And has he not described what will happen to the 
soul after the demise of our planet, and prophesied, in fact, that certain privileged 
souls will retire to the sun? He reckons further that our souls will come to inhabit 
all other planets and worlds, after spending 80,000 years on planet Earth. He 
calculates, in addition, that this termination of the human race will occur only 
after it has enjoyed the benefits of the boreal light: for 70,000 years. He proves that 
by the influence, not of the boreal light, to be sure, hut of the gravitational force of 
labor, . . . the climate of Senegal will become as moderate as summers in France 
are now. He describes how, once the sea has turned to lemonade, men will trans- 
port fish from the great ocean to the inland seas, the Caspian, Aral, and Black 
Seas, given that the horeal light reacts less potently with these salty seas; and so, in 
this way, saltwater fish will accustom themselves gradually to the lemonade, until 
finally they can be restored to the ocean. Fourier also says that, in its eighth 
ascending period, humanity will acquire the capacity to live like fish in the water 
and to fly like hirds in the air, and that, by then, humans will have reached a 
height of seven feet and a life span of at least 144 years. Everyone, at that point, 
will be able to transform himself into an amphibian; for the individual will have 
the power of opening or closing at will the valve that connects the two chambers of 



the heart, so as to bring the blood directly to the heart without having it pass 
through the lungs. . . . Nature will evolve in such fashion, he maintains, that a time 
will come when oranges blossom in Siberia and the most dangerous animals have 
been replaced by their opposites. Anti-lions, anti-whales will be at man's service 
then, and the calm will drive his ships. In this way, according to Fourier, the lion 
will serve as the best of horses and the shark will be as useful in fishing as the dog 
is in hunting. New stars will emerge to take the place of the moon, which already, 
by then, will have begun to rot." Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der franzo- 
sischenArbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 1, pp. 240-244. [Wla] 

"Fourier, ... in his last years, . . . wanted to found a phalanstery that would be 
inhabited exclusively by children aged three to fourteen, of which he aimed to 
assemble 12,000; but his appeal went unheeded and the project was never real- 
ized. In his writings he left a detailed plan, which specifically describes how the 
children must be raised so as to further the idea of association. From the moment 
a child begins to walk, an attempt must be made to identify its tastes and passions, 
and, by this means, to discover its vocation. Children who show a liking for life in 
the street, who make a racket and refuse to learn neatness and cleanliness, are 
placed by Fourier in small bands which have charge of the more unpleasant tasks 
of the association. On the other side there are children in whom the taste for 
elegance and luxury is inborn; these again Fourier arranges in a group, so that by 
their presence on the scene the phalanx will not be lacking in luxury. . . . The 
children are to become . . . great artists of song. Every phalanx, Fourier says, will 
have 700 to 800 actors, musicians, and dancers, and the poorest canton in the Alps 
or the Pyrenees will have an opera company at least as good as the Grand Opera of 
Paris, if not much better. In order to foster the general sense for harmony, Fourier 
would have the children already singing duets and trios in the nursery." Sigmund 
Englander, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 
1864), vol. 1 , pp. 242-243. [ W2,l] 

"Among the disciples of Fourier, one of the most entertaining was this Alphonse 
Toussenel, who, in 1847 and 1852 respectively, published those works so popular 
in their day, L 'Esprit des betes and he Monde des oiseaux. . . . Like Fourier, . . . 
he sees in nature only animate beings: 'The planets,' he affirms, 'have great duties 
to fulfill, first as members of the solar system, then as mothers of families.' And he 
voluptuously describes the amours of the Earth and the Sun: 'As the lover dresses 
in his most beautiful robes, and glosses his hair, and perfumes his language for the 
visit of his love, thus every morning the Earth indues her richest attire to meet the 
rays of her star beloved .... Happy, thrice happy the Earth, that no council of the 
stars has yet thundered its anathema against the immorality of the kisses of the 
Sun!' . . . 'Professors of the officially sanctioned physical sciences dare not speak 
of the two sexes of electricity; they find it more moral to speak of its twopo/es. . . . 
Such absurdities are beyond me. ... If the fire of love did not kindle all beings, 
metals and minerals as well as others, where, I ask, would be the reason for those 
ardent affinities of potassium for oxygen, of hydrochloric acid for water?'" 



<Toussenel,> L'Espritdes betes <6th edition) (Paris, 1862), pp. 9, 2-3, 102-106. 2 
Cited in Rene de Planhol, Les Utopistes de V amour (Paris, 1921), pp. 219—220. 

[W2,2] 



"Our planet goes into material decline once its inhabitants begin to hackslide down 
the social scale. It is like a tree whose leaves the caterpillars have been allowed to 
devour over a period of years: the tree languishes and dies." From Fourier, 
Theorie en abstrait ou negative, p. 325. "Our vortex is young, and a column of 
102 planets is presently on course for an entry into our universe, which is on the 
point of advancing from the third to the fourth power." From Fourier, Theorie des 
quatre inouvements (1808), pp. 75, 462, and Theorie mixte ou speculative et Syn- 
thase routiniere de V association, pp. 260, 263. Cited in E. Silherling, Dictionnaire 
de sociologie phalansterienne (Paris, 1911), pp. 339, 338. [W2a,l] 

Gay's newspaper, he Communiste: "What was noteworthy, in his case, was that he 
championed the view that communism could not possibly be achieved without a 
complete alteration in sexual relations. . . . 'In a communist society . . . , not only 
would all men and women enter into a great many intimate relationships with 
persons of the opposite sex, but even at their first encounter a genuine sympathy 
would spring up hetween them.'" Englander, Geschichte der franzosischen Ar- 
beiter-Associationen, vol. 2, pp. 93-94. [W2a,2] 

On Cabet: "The cry was not: Let us emigrate to America and there, with utmost 
exertion, found a colony in the wilderness. . . . Rather, Cabet was saying: 'Let us 
go to Icaria! ' . . . Let us enter boldly into this novel, let us give life to Icaria, let us 
free ourselves from all privations . . . ! Every article in his newspaper would refer 
henceforth to Icaria; this went so far that he would describe, for example, how 
several workers were injured by the explosion of a steam engine in La Villette and 
conclude his account with the words, 'Let us go to Icaria!'" Englander, vol. 2, 
pp. 120-121. [W2a,3] 

On Cahet: "Most of the correspondents write as though they have escaped the 
general destiny of humanity by journeying to America." [This pertains to the 
correspondents for he Populaire.] Englander, vol. 2, p. 128. [W2a,4] 

"Cahet, whom the radical republican party attacked because they considered him 
an opiate-monger," had to "remove to Saint-Quentin ... so as to defend himself 
from accusations of revolutionary agitation. The accusation was to the effect that, 
even if the Icarians should embark with Cabet, they would disembark at another 
point on the coast of France, in order to begin the revolution." Englander, vol. 2, 
p. 142. D Secret Societies D [W2a,5] 

"Mercury taught us to read. He brought us the alphabet, the declensions, and 
finally the entire grammar of the unitary Harmonian language, as spoken on 



the sun and the harmonized planets." Citation from Fourier, in Maurice Har- 
mel, "Charles Fourier," Portraits d'hier, vol. 2, no. 36 (Paris, 1910), p. 184.. 

[W2a,6] 



"Among all the contemporaries of Hegel, Charles Fourier was the only one who 
saw through bourgeois relations as clearly as he himself did." G. Plekhanov, "Zu 
Kegels sechzigstem Todestag," Die neue Zeit, 10, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1892), p. 243. 

[W2a,7] 

Fourier speaks "of the ascendancy of the principle of 'industrial passion' (fougue 
industrielle), the universal enthusiasm that is ruled by the laws ... of the 'com- 
posite' or the 'coincident.' On a cursory inspection, it might appear as though we 
had reached this stage today. Industrial passion is represented by the rage to 
speculate and the impulse to accumulate capital; the passion coi'ncidente (drive 
toward incorporation), by the consolidation of capital, its increasing concentra- 
tion. But even though the elements discovered by Fourier are present in this 
relation, they are neither articulated nor regulated in the manner he envisioned 
and anticipated." Charles Bonnier, "Das Fourier'sche Prinzip der Anziehung," 
Die neue Zeit, 10, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1892), p. 648. [W3,l] 

"We can see from his works that Fourier expected his theory to be accomplished 
beginning in the year of their publication. In his Prolegomenes, he designates . . . 
1822 as the year when the establishment of the experimental colony of the Harmo- 
nian association was to be prepared. This colony was supposed to be actually 
founded and put into practice the following year, whereupon 1824 would necessar- 
ily see its general imitation by the rest of the civilized world." Charles Bonnier, 
"Das Fourier'sche Prinzip der Anziehung," Die neue Zeit, 10, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 
1892), p. 642. [W3,2] 

Aftereffects: "In Zola's powerful novel he Travail <Lahor>, the great Utopian was 
supposed to celebrate his resurrection. . . . Leconte de Lisle, later the famous 
leader of the Parnassian school, was, in his Sturm-und-Drang period, a singer of 
Fourierist socialism. A contributor to La Revue socialiste . . . [see the November 
1901 issue] informs us that, at the invitation of the editors of La Democratic 
pacifique, . . . the poet contributed first to this latter journal and then briefly to 
La Phalange.'''' H. Thurow, "Aus den Anfiingen der sozialistischen Belletristik," 
Die neue Zeit, 21, no. 2 (Stuttgart, 1903), p. 221. [W3,3] 

"The political economists and politicians from whom the pre-1848 socialists had 
learned were, in every case, opposed to strikes. They explained to the workers that 
a strike, even though successful, would bring them no advantage, and that the 
workers should put their money into cooperatives for production and consump- 
tion rather than into plans for a strike." Proudhon "had . . . the ingenious idea of 
inciting the workers to strike in order not to increase their wages but to lower 
them. ... In this way, the worker obtains two or three times more as a consumer 



than he earns as a producer." <Paul> Lafargue, "Der Klassenkampf in Frank- 
reich," Die neue Zeit, 12, no. 2 (1894), pp. 644, 616. [W3,4] 



"Fourier, Saint-Simon, and other reformers recruited their followers ahnost ex- 
clusively from the ranks of the artisans . . . and from the intellectual elite of the 
bourgeoisie. With a few exceptions, it was educated people who gathered around 
them, people who thought they had not received from society consideration 
sufficient to their merits. ... It was the declasses, those who had transformed 
themselves into daring entrepreneurs, shrewd businessmen, or speculators. . . . 
M. Godin, for example, . . . founded in Guise (in the departement of Aisne) a 
familistere according to Fourier's principles. In handsome buildings surrounding 
a spacious, glass-covered square courtyard, he provided accommodations for nu- 
merous workers from his plate-enameling factory; here they found, besides a 
home, all necessary articles for daily use . . . , entertainments in a theater, con- 
certs, schools for their children, and so on. In short, M. Godin saw to all their 
physical and spiritual needs, and moreover realized . . . enormous profits. He 
earned the reputation of being a benefactor of mankind, and died a multimillion- 
aire. "Paul Lafargue, "Der Klassenkampf in Frankreich," Die neue Zeit, 12, no. 2 
(Stuttgart, 1894), p. 617. [W3a,l] 

Fourier on stocks and bonds: "In his Traite de V unite universelle, Fourier enu- 
merates . . . the advantages which this form of property offers the capitalists: 'It 
does not run the danger of being stolen or damaged through fire or earthquake. 
... A minor never risks being taken advantage of in the administration of his 
money, since that administration is the same for him as for every other share- 
holder . . . ; a capitalist can realize his property at any moment, even though he 
owned a hundred million'; and so forth. . . . On the other hand, 'the poor man, 
though he have but one taler, can participate in the holding of public stock, which 
is divided up into quite small portions, . . . and hence . . . can speak of our pal- 
aces, our storehouses, our wealth.' Napoleon III and his cohorts in the coup d'etat 
were very taken with these ideas; . . . they democratized state revenue, as one of 
them put it, by making it possible to purchase bonds for five francs or even one 
franc. By such methods, they thought to interest the masses in the solidity of 
public credit and preclude political revolutions." Paul Lafargue, "Marx' histor- 
ischer Materialismus," Die neue Zeit, 22, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1904), p. 831. [W3a,2] 

"Fourier is not only a critic; his imperturbably serene nature makes him a satirist, 
and assuredly one of the greatest satirists of all time." Engels, 3 cited in Rudolf 
Franz, review of E. Silberling's Dictionnaire de sociologie phalanstetienne (Paris, 
1911), Die neue Zeit, 3t, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1912), p. 333. [W3a,3] 

The propagation of the phalanstery takes place through an "explosion." Fourier 
speaks of an "explosion du phalanstere." [W3a,4] 

In England, the influence of Fourier combined with that of Swedenborg. 

[W3a,5] 



"Heine was well acquainted with socialism. He could still see Fourier in person. In 
his articles entitled FranzosiscJie Zustdnde <French Affairs >, he writes at one 
point (June 15, 1843): 'Yes, Pierre Leroux is poor, just as Saint-Simon and 
Fourier were poor, and by the providential poverty of these great socialists the 
world was enriched. . . . Fourier likewise had recourse to the charity of friends. 
How often have I seen him scurrying past the columns of the Palais-Royal in his 
shabby gray coat, both pockets laden so that out of one was peeping the neck of a 
bottle and out of the other a long loaf of bread. The friend of mine who first 
pointed him out to me drew my attention to the indigence of the man, who had to 
fetch drink for himself at the wineshop and bread at the bakery."' 4 Cited in "Heine 
an Marx," Die neue Zeit, 14, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1896), p. 16; passage originally in 
<Heine,> Sdmtliche Werlee, ed. Bilsche (Leipzig), vol. 5, p. 34 ["Kommunismus, 
Philosophie, und Klerisei," part 1]. [W4,l] 

"In his glosses to the memoirs ofAnnenkov, Marx writes: '. . .Fourier was the first 
to mock the idealization of the petty bourgeoisie."' Reported by P. Anski, "Zur 
Charakteristik von Marx," Russkaia Mysl (August 1903), p. 63; in N. Rjasanof'f, 
"Marx unci seine russischen Bekannten in den vierziger Jahren," Die neue Zeit, 



"Herr Griin finds it an easy matter to criticize Fourier's treatment of love; he 
measures Fourier's criticism of existing amorous relationships against the fanta- 
sies by which Fourier tried to get a mental image of free love. Herr Griin, the true 
German phiJistine, takes these fantasies seriously. Indeed, they are the only thing 
which he does take seriously. It is hard to see why, if he wanted to deal with this 
side of the system at all, Griin did not also enlarge upon Fourier's remarks con- 
cerning education; they are by far the best of their kind, and contain some mas- 
terly observations. . . . 'Fourier is the very worst expression of civilized egoism' 
(p. 208). He supplies immediate proof of this hy relating that, in Fourier's world 
order, the poorest memher eats from forty dishes every clay, that five meals are 
eaten daily, that people live to the age of 144, and so on. With a naive sense of 
humor, Fourier opposes a Gargantuan view of man to the unassuming mediocrity 
of the men [in Das Westphcilische Dampfboot, the following words . . . inserted 
after 'men': 'the infinitely small — Beranger'] of the Restoration period; hut Herr 
Griin sees in this merely a chance of moralizing in his philistine way upon the most 
innocent side of Fourier's fancy, which he abstracts from the rest." Karl Marx 
writing about Karl Griin as historian of socialism (in an article originally publish- 
ed in Das Westphiilische Dampfboot, August— Septemher 1847), reprinted in Die 



The phalanstery can be characterized as human machinery. This is no reproach, 
nor is it meant to indicate anything mechanistic; rather, it refers to the great 
complexity of its structure <AuJiau>. The phalanstery is a machine made of 



31, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1913), p. 764. 



[W4,2] 



neue Zeit, 18, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1900), pp. 137-138."' 



[W4,3] 



human beings. 



[W4,4] 



Fourier's point of departure: the reflection on small business. Compare, in this 
connection, the following: "When one considers the number of people in Paris 
whose lives depend on small business — the size of this formidable army exclu- 
sively occupied with measuring, weighing, packaging, and transporting from one 
end of town to the other — one is rightly alarmed. ... It must be recalled that, in 
our industrial cities, a shop is generally run by three or four families. . . . 'Sordidi 
etiam qui mercantur a mercatoribus quod statim vendant; nihil enim proficiunt 
nisi admodum mentiantur. Nec vero quicquam est turpius vanitate' (De Officii*)? 
. . . The current president of the Chamber of Commerce last year formally 
requested once again, as a remedy for commercial anarchy, the reestablishment 
of guilds." Eugene Buret, De la Misere des classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en 
France (Paris, 1840), vol. 2, pp. 216-218. [W4a,l] 

"The modern proletariat's lack of history, the detachment of the first generation of 
factory workers from every historical tradition of class and profession, and the 
diversity of its origin — in handicrafts, small landholdings, agrarian labor, and 
domestic concerns of every sort — made this category of economic man receptive to 
a vision of the world that would improvise ex novo a new state, a new economy, and 
a new morality. The novelty of what was to he achieved corresponded logically to 
the novelty of the situation in which the new men and women found themselves." 
Robert Michels, "Psychologie der antikapitalistischen Massenhewegungen," 
p. 313 [Grundriss der Sozialokonomik, vol. 9, no. 1, Die gesellsclmftliche 
Schichtung im Kapitalismus (Tiihingen, 1926)]. [W4a,21 

"Grandville's life is unremarkable enough: peaceful, remote from all excess, at the 
periphery of dangerous enthusiasms. . . . His youth was that of an honest clerk in 
a respectable shop, where, on rows of spotless shelves, were arrayed — not without 
malice — the various images that corresponded to the need for criticism which an 
'average Frenchman' might feel in 1827." <Pierre> MacOrlan, "Grandville le 
precurseur," Arts et metiers graphiques, 44 (December 15, 1934) <p. 20>. 

[W4a,3] 

Fourier and Saint-Simon: "Fourier is more interesting and more diversified in his 
economic analysis and in his critique of the existing social order. But, then, Saint- 
Simon has the advantage over Fourier in his representations of future economic 
development. Obviously, this development had to move ... in the direction of a 
global economy . . . , and not in the direction of many self-sufficient little econo- 
mies, such as Fourier imagined. Saint-Simon conceives the capitalist order ... as 
a step . . . , while Fourier rejects it in the name of the petty bourgeoisie." V. Volgin, 
"Uher die historische Stellung Saint-Simons," in (Marx-Engels Archiv, vol. 1 
<Frankfurt am Main, 1928 > , p. 118. [W4a,4] 

"In an exchange of views with the writer Camille Mauclair, . . . Zola . . . declared 
unequivocally that he hore no love for collectivism; he found it smallhearted and 
Utopian. He was an anarchist rather than a socialist. . . . Utopian socialism, ... as 



he saw it, took its rise from the individual workshop, proceeded to the idea of the 
association of producers, and aimed to achieve a communism of the general com- 
munity. This was before 1848. . . . Zola, however, wanted to revive the method of 
this period; he . . . took up the . . . ideas of Fourier, which were conditioned by the 
embryonic relations of capitalist production, and attempted to ally them to the 
modern form of this production, which had grown to gigantic proportions." Franz 
Diederich, "Zola als Utopist" (on Le Travail ), Die neue Zeit, 20, no. 1 (Stuttgart), 
pp. 326-327, 329. [W5,l] 

Fourier (in Le Nouveau Monde industriel et societcdre, 1829) disapproves of the 
contempt for gastronomy. "This gaucherie is yet another of those exploits of 
morality calculated to rum us into enemies of our own senses, and into friends of 
that commercial activity which serves merely to provoke the abuses of sensual 
pleasure." E. Poisson, Fourier [contains selected texts] (Paris, 1932), p. 131. Thus, 
Fourier here views immoral businesses as a complement to idealist morality. To 
both he opposes his hedonistic materialism. His position recalls, from afar, that of 
Georg Biichner. The words t[uoted above might have been spoken by Biichner's 
Danton. [W5,2] 

"A phalanx does not sell a thousand quintals of flour of indifferent quality; it sells 
a thousand quintals classified according to a scale of five, six, or seven varieties of 
flavor, which it has tested in a hakery and distinguished in terms of the field where 
it was harvested and the method of cultivation. . . . Such an agricultural mecha- 
nism will contrast sharply with the practices of our backward world, our civiliza- 
tion so in need of perfecting. . . . We see among ourselves, furthermore, 
merchandise of inferior quality that is twenty times more abundant and more 
easily sold than better-quality goods. ... As a result of this circumstance, we can 
no longer even recognize the inferior quality; morality accustoms the civilized to 
eating the good and the bad indiscriminately. From this coarseness of taste follow 
all the knaveries of mercantilism." Theorie des quatre mouvements (1828), cited 
in E. Poisson, Fourier (Paris, 1932), pp. 134-135.' — Already children are taught 
to "clean their plates." [W5,3] 

"Knowing . . . that sometimes, in the region of the North Pole, there is generated 
an electrical discharge which lights up those lands plunged in darkness for six 
months of the year, Fourier announces that, when the earth shall have been ra- 
tionally cultivated in all its parts, the aurora borealis will be continuous. Is this 
absurd?" The author endeavors, following this, to provide an explanation: the 
transformed earth will absorb less electricity from the sun, and whatever is not 
absorbed will encircle it as a ring of Northern Lights. Charles-M. Limousin, Le 
Fourierisme: Reponse a un article de Edmond ViUey intitule "Fourier et son oeu- 
vre" (Paris, 1898), p. 6. [W5a,l] 



"There would be nothing very surprising in the fact that Fourier had been associ- 
ated . . . with a Martinist lodge, or at the very least had felt the influence of a 



milieu in which such ideas flourished." Charles-M. Limousin, he Fourierisme 
(Paris, 1898), p. 9. [W5a,2] 



Worthy of note is the fact — to which Limousin adverts — that, with Fourier, the 
desire for possession is not a "passion." This same commentator defines the 
concept of passion mecanisante as that passion which governs the play of the 
others. He remarks further (p. 15): "Fourier was surely wrong to make a joke of 
duty." Certainly apt is his observation (p. 17) that Fourier is more an inventor 
than a scientist. [W5a,3] 

"In Fourier, occult science acquires a new form — that of industry." Ferrari, "Des 
Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, 11, no. 3 (1845), p. 405. 

[W5a,4] 

On Fourier's machinal mode of conception. The table entitled "Mesh of the Lodg- 
ments of Harmony" establishes, for apartments in street-galleries, twenty differ- 
ent categories of rentals, priced from 50 to 1,000 francs, and offers, among others, 
the following justification: "This meshing of the six series is a law of the twelfth 
passion. The simple progression, whether constantly increasing or decreasing, 
would have very serious drawbacks. In principle, it would he false and deleteri- 
ous, insofar as it was simple. ... In application, it would he injurious, insofar as 
... it gave to the hody of dwellings in the wings . . . the appearance of an inferior 
class. Care must be taken to avoid this arrangement, which would be simple and 
therefore detrimental to the meshing of the different classes."' 1 Thus, within a 
single section of the street-galleries, lodgers of different social standing will reside 
together. "I put off discussion of the stables . . . , about which I shall furnish . . . 
ample details in special chapters to follow. For now, our concern is with lodg- 
ments, of which one part alone — the street-gallery, the hall of universal linkage — 
conclusively proves that, after 3,000 years of research into architecture, civilized 
men have yet to learn anything about the bond of unity." Cited in E. Poisson, 
Fourier [anthology] (Paris, 1932), pp. 145-146. [W5a,5] 

Aspects of Fourierist number mysticism, according to Ferrari, "Des Idees et de 
l'ecole de Fourier" (Revue des deux mondes, 14., no. 3 [Paris, 1845]): "Everything 
indicates that Fourierism bases itself on the Pythagorean harmony. ... Its science 
was the science of the ancients" (p. 397). "Number reproduces its rhythm in the 
evaluation of earnings" (p. 398). The inhabitants of the phalanstery comprise 2 X 
810 men and women; for "the number 810 gives them a complete series of chords 
corresponding to the multitude of cabalist assonances" (p. 396). "If, with Fourier, 
the science of the occult takes on a new form, that of industry, it should not be 
forgotten that form per se counts for nothing in this airy poetry of the mys- 
tagogies" (p. 405). "Number groups all heings according to its symbolic laws; it 
develops all the groups through series; the series distributes the harmonies 
throughout: the universe. . . . For the series ... is perfect throughout all of na- 
ture. . . . Man alone is unhappy; hence, civilization inverts the number which 



should govern him. Let us rescue it from civilization. . . . The order that domi- 
nates physical movement — organic movement, animal movement — will thus radi- 
ate in . . . passional movement; nature itself will organize the association" 
(p. 395-396). [W6,l] 

Foreshadowing of the bourgeois Icing in Fourier: "He speaks of kings who devote 
themselves to locksmithery, to woodworking, to selling fish, to the manufacture 
of sealing wax." Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux 
mondes, 14, no. 3 (1845) p. 393. [W6,2] 

"All his life, Fourier was engaged in thinking; but he never once asked himself 
where his ideas came from. He portrays the human being as a machine passion- 
nelle; his psychology begins with the senses and ends with the composite, without 
presupposing . . . the intervention of reason in the solution of the problem of 
happiness." Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, 
no. 3 (1845), p. 404. [W6,3] 

Utopian elements: "The combined order comprises 'the glory of the arts and sci- 
ences, the spectacle of knight-errantry, gastronomy combined in a political 
sense, . . . and a politique galante for the levy of troops" (Ferrari, p. 399). "The 
world turns to its antitype, as dangerous and savage animals enter the service of 
mankind: lions are used for delivering the mail. The aurora borealis reheats the 
poles; the atmosphere, at the earth's surface, becomes clear as a mirror; the seas 
grow calm; and four moons light up the night. In short, the earth renews itself 
twenty-eight times, until the great soul of our planet (now enfeebled, exhausted) 
passes on, with all its human souls, to another planet" (Ferrari, p. 401). [W6,4] 

"Fourier excels in the observation of animality, whether in beasts or in men. He 
has a genius for common matters." Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," 
Revue des deux mondes, 14, no. 3 (1845), p. 393. [ W6a,l] 

A Fourierist formula: "Nero will be more useful than Fenelon" (in Ferrari, 
p. 399). [W6a,2] 

In the following scheme of twelve passions, the four in the second group represent 
the passions groupantes, the three in the third group the passions seriantes: "first 
the live senses; then love, friendship, family feeling, ambition; third, the passions 
for intrigue, for mutability, for union — in other words, the cabalist, the butterfly, 
the composite; a thirteenth passion, 'unityism,' absorbs all the others." Ferrari, 
"Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, 14, no. 3 (1845), 
p. 394. [W6a,3] 

From Fourier's last work, La Fausse Industrie <1835-1836>: "The celebrated 
American hoax associated with Herschel's discoveries ahout the world of the 
moon' had raised in Fourier, once the hoax was revealed as such, the hope of a 
direct vision of the phalanstery on other planets. . . . Here is Fourier's response: 



'The American hoax,' he declares, 'proves, first, the anarchy of the press; second, 
the harrenness of storytellers concerned with the extraterrestrial; third, man's 
ignorance of the atmospheric shells; fourth, the need for a megatelescope. '" Fer- 
rari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, 14, no. 3 
(1845), p. 415. [W6a,4] 

Allegorical specimens from La Fausse Industrie: "On earth Venus creates the 
mulberry hush, symhol of morality, and the raspherry filled with verse, symhol of 
the countermorality preached in the theaters." Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de 
Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, no. 3 (1845), p. 416. [W6a,5] 

"According to Fourier, the phalanstery should he ahle to earn, merely from spec- 
tators alone, 50 million francs in two years." Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de 
Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, no. 3 (1845), p. 412. [W6a,6] 

"The phalanstery, for Fourier, was a veritable hallucination. He saw it every- 
where, hoth in civilization and in nature. Never was he lacking for a military 
parade; the drilling of soldiers was for him a representation of the all-powerful 
play of the group and of the series inverted for a work of destruction." Ferrari, 
"Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, no. 3 (1845), p. 409. 

[W6a,7] 



Fourier, in connection with a proposal for a miniature pedagogical colony: "Ful- 
ton was supposed to have constructed or merely drawn up plans for a delicate little 
launch that would have demonstrated, on a miniature scale, the power of steam. 
This skiff was to have transported from Paris to Saint-Cloud — without sails or 
oars or horses — a half-dozen nymphs, who, on their return from Saint-Cloud, 
would have publicized the prodigy and put all the Parisian beau monde in a flut- 
ter." Ferrari, "Des Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, no. 3 
(1845), p. 414. [W7,l] 

"The plan to encircle Paris with fortifications would squander hundreds of mil- 
lions of francs for reasons of defense, whereas this magician, with only a million, 
would root out forever the cause of all wars and all revolutions." Ferrari, "Des 
Idees et de l'ecole de Fourier," Revue des deux mondes, 14, no. 3 (1845), p. 413. 

[W7.2] 



Michelet on Fourier: "Singular contrast between his boast of materialism and his 
self-sacrificing, disinterested, and spiritual life!" J. Michelet, he Peuple (Paris, 
1846), p. 294. 1() [W7,3] 

Fourier's conception of the propagation of the phalansteries through "explo- 
sions" may be compared to two articles of my "politics": the idea of revolution as 
an innervation of the technical organs of the collective (analogy with the child 
who learns to grasp by trying to get hold of the moon), and the idea of the 
"cracking open of natural teleology." <See W8a,5 and Xla,2.> [W7,4] 



Fourier, Oeuvres, vol. <3>, p. 260: "List of charges to he hrought against God, on 
the hypothesis of a gap in the divine social code." [W7,5] 



A take on the ideas of Fourier: "King Clodomir, restored hy harmony to his natu- 
ral vocation, is no longer that ferocious Merovingian who has his confrere Sigis- 
mond thrown into a pit. 'He is a friend of flowers and of verse, an active partisan 
of musk roses, of golden plums and fresh pineapples, and many another growing 
thing. . . . He weds the vestal Antigone and follows her as trouhadour to join the 
Hippocrene phalanx.' And Louis XVI, instead of filling so pitiably the job of king 
for which he was hardly cut out, makes magnificent door locks." Charles Louan- 
dre, Les Idees subversives de notre temps (Paris, 1872), p. 59 [citation given with- 
out indication of source]. [W7,6] 

Delvau, in Les Lions du jour (Paris, 1867), p. 5, speaks of Fourier's "ingenious 
argot." [W7,7] 

"It is easy to understand that every 'interest' on the part of the masses . . . goes far 
beyond its real limits in the 'idea' or 'imagination' when it first comes on the scene, 
and is confused with human interest in general. This illusion constitutes what 
Fourier calls the 'tone' of each historical epoch." Marx and Engels, Die heilige 
Familie, in Dec historische Materialismus, vol. 1 <Leipzig, 1932>,p. 379." 

[W7,8] 

Augustin-Louis Cauchy is mentioned by Toussenel (L'Esprit des betes [Paris, 
1884], p. Ill) 12 as a mathematician with Fourierist leanings. [W7a,l] 

In a passage concerned with Malthusianism, Toussenel explains that the solution 
to the problem resides in the double (= filled?) rose of Rhodes, whose stamen- 
filaments have heen transformed into petals, "and which consequently hecomes 
harren hy exuberance of sap and of richness. In other words, ... so long as misery 
shall continue increasing, the fecundity of the female sex will follow the same 
course; and there is but one method of curhing this continual prolification — 
namely, to surround all women with the delights of luxury. . . . Except through 
luxury . . . , except through general riches, no salvation!" A. Toussenel, L'Esprit 
des betes: Zoologie passionnel (Paris, 1884), p. 85. 1:1 [W7a,2] 

On the feminism of the Fourierist school: "On Herschel and Jupiter, hotany 
courses are taught hy young vestals of eighteen to twenty. . . . When I say 'eighteen 
to twenty,' I speak the language of Earth, since the years on Jupiter are twelve 
times longer than ours, and the vestalate hegins only toward the hundredth year." 
A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 1884), p. 93." [W7a,3] 

A model of Fourierist psychology in Tbussenel's chapter on the wild boar. "Now, 
surrounding the dwellings of humanity are great quantities of broken glass bot- 
tles, rusty nails, and candle ends, which would be completely lost to society if 



some careful and intelligent hand did not charge itself with the collection of all 
these valueless relics, to reconstruct out of them a mass susceptible of being 
reworked and made fit for consumption again. This important task evidendy 
belongs among the attributes of the miser. . . . Here the character and mission of 
the miser perceptibly rise: the pinch-penny becomes a ragpicker, a salvage opera- 
tor. . . . The hog is the great salvager of nature; he fattens at nobody's expense." 
A. Toussenel, L'Esprit des betes (Paris, 1884), pp. 249-250. 15 fW7a,4] 

Marx characterizes the insufficiency of Fourier, who conceived "a particular form 
of labor — lahor leveled down, parceled, and therefore unf ree — . . . as the source 
of private property's perniciousness and of its existence in estrangement from 
men," instead of denouncing lahor as such, as the essence of private property. 
Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig 
< 1932>), vol. 1, p. 292 ("Nationalokonomie und Philosophic"). 1 * [W7a,5] 

Fourierist pedagogy, like the pedagogy of Jean Paul, should be studied in the 
context of anthropological materialism. In this, the role of anthropological mate- 
rialism in France should be compared with its role in Germany. It might turn out 
that there, in France, it was the human collective that stood at the center of 
interests, while here, in Germany, it was the human individual. We must note, as 
well, that anthropological materialism attained sharper definition in Germany 
because its opposite, idealism, was more clearly delineated over there. The his- 
tory of anthropological materialism stretches, in Germany, from Jean Paul to 
Keller (passing through Georg Biichner and Gutzkow) ; in France, die socialist 
Utopias and the physiologies are its precipitate. [W8,l] 

Madame de Cardoville, a grande dame in Le J uif errant <The Wandering Jew >, is 
a Fourierist. [W8,2] 

In connection with Fourierist pedagogy, one should perhaps investigate the dia- 
lectic of the example: although the example as model (in the moralists' sense) is 
pedagogically worthless, if not disastrous, the gestic example can become the 
object of a controllable and progressively assimilable imitation, one that pos- 
sesses the greatest significance. [W8,3] 

"La Phalange, journal de la science sociale (1836-184 3), which appears three 
times a week, . . . will fade from the scene only when it can cede its place to a daily, 
La Democratic pacifi que (1843-1851). Here, the main idea ... is 'the organization 
of labor' through the association." Charles Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," part 2, 
Revue des deux mondes (February 1, 1914), p. 645. [W8,4] 

From Nettement's discussion of Fourier: "In creating the present world, God re- 
served the right to change its outward aspect through subsequent creations. These 
creations are eighteen in number. Every creation is brought about by a conjunc- 
tion of austral Uuid and boreal fluid." The later creations, following on the first, 



can eventuate only in Harmony. Alfred Nettement, Histoire de la litterature 
franqaise sous le gouvernement dejuillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 2, p. 58. [W8,5] 



"According to him <Fourier>, souls transmigrate from body to body, and even 
from world to world. Each planet possesses a soul, which will go to animate some 
other, superior planet, carrying with it, as it does so, the souls of those people who 
have inhabited it. It is thus that, before the end of our planet earth (which is 
supposed to endure 81,000 years), the human souls upon it will have gone through 
1,620 existences; they will have lived a total of 27,000 years on earth and 54,000 
years on another planet. ... In the exertions of its earliest infancy, the earth was 
struck by a putrid fever that eventually spread to the moon, which died as a result. 
But once organized in Harmony, the earth will resuscitate the moon." Nettement, 
Histoire de la litterature franqaise sous le gouvernement dejuillet, vol. 2, pp. 57, 



The Fourierist on the subject of aviation: "The buoyant aerostat ... is the chariot 
of fi re, which . . . respects above all the works of God; it does not need to aggrade 
the valleys or tunnel through mountains in imitation of the murderous locomotive, 
which the speculator has dishonored." A. Toussenel, Le Monde des oiseaux, vol. 1 



"It is impossible . . . that zebras, quaggas, hemiones, and pygmy ponies, who know 
they are destined to serve as steeds for the children's cavalry of the future, are 
sympathetic with the policy of our statesmen, who treat as merely Utopian the 
equestrian institutions where these animals are to hold a position of honor. . . . 
The lion likes nothing better . . . than having its nails trimmed, provided it is a 
pretty girl that wields the scissors." A. Toussenel, Le Monde des oiseaux: Orni- 
thologie passionnelle, vol. 1 (Paris, 1853), pp. 19-20. The author sees in woman 
the intermediary between human and animal. [W8a,2] 

Memorable letter from Victor Cousin to Jean Journet, in response to writings 
sent liim by the latter. It is dated October 23, 1843, and concludes: "When you 
are suffering, think not of social regeneration but of God, . . . who did not create 
man only for happiness but for an end quite otherwise sublime." The prefacer 
adds: "We would have consigned this little anecdote to oblivion, had not this 
poor letter . . . , a true masterpiece of perfect ignorance, summed up . . . the 
political science ... of a coterie that, for the past twenty-one years, has overseen 
. . . the fortunes of our country." Jean Journet, Poesies et chants harmoniens (Paris, 
1857), pp. xxvi-xxvii (editor's preface). [W8a,3] 

"The history of the . . . human races on Jupiter and Saturn teaches us that civili- 
zation ... is on its way to guarantism ... by virtue of the political equality be- 
tween man and woman, and from guarantism to Harmony through the recognition 
of the superiority of woman." A. Toussenel, Le Monde des oiseaux, vol. 1 (Paris, 



59. 



[W8,6] 



(Paris, 1853), p. 6. 



[W8a,l] 



1853), p. 131. 



[W8a,4] 



Fourier's long-tailed men became the object of caricature, in 1849, with erotic 
drawings by Emy in Le Rire. For the purpose of elucidating the Fourierist extrava- 
gances, we may adduce the figure of Mickey Mouse, in which we find carried 
out, entirely in the spirit of Fourier's conceptions, the moral mobilization of 
nature. Humor, here, puts politics to the test. Mickey Mouse shows how right 
Marx was to see in Fourier, above all else, a great humorist. The cracking open of 
natural teleology proceeds in accordance with the plan of humor. ( W8a,5] 

Affiliation of anti-Semitism with Fourierism. In 1845, Les Juifs rois <The Jewish 
Kings>, by Toussenel, appears. Toussenel is, moreover, the partisan of a "demo- 
cratic royalty." [W8a,6] 

"The line . . . generally associated with the family group is the parabola. This 
postulate is demonstrated in the work of the Old Masters, and above all in 
Raphael. . . . From the approximation of this grouping to the parabolic type, there 
results, in the oeuvre of Raphael, a hymn to the family, . . . masterful and . . . 
divine. . . . The master thinker, who determined the analogies of the four conic 
sections, has recognized the correspondence of the parabola and of familyism. 
And here we find the confirmation of this proposition in the prince of painters, in 
Raphael." D. Laverdant, De la Mission de I'art et du role des artistes: Salon de 
1845 (Paris, 1845), p. 64. [W9,l] 

Delvau (Les Dessous de Paris < Paris, 1860 >, p. 27) sees connections between 
Fourier and Restif de La Bretonne. [W9,2] 

Highly characteristic of the relation of the Fourierists to the Saint-Simonians is 
Considerant's polemic against the railroads. Tliis polemic relies, for the most 
part, on Hoene Wronski, Sur la Barbarie des chemins de fer et sur la reforme 
scientifique de la locomotion. Wronski's first objection is directed against the system 
of iron rails; Considerant indicts "the process operating under the name 'railway 
system,' that is to say, the construction of very long flat roads equipped with 
metallic rails and requiring enormous amounts of money and labor — a process 
'not only opposed to the actual progress of civilization, but contrasting all the 
more strongly with this progress in that it presents something truly ridiculous: 
the barbarous contemporary reproduction of the massive and inert roadways of 
the Romans' (Petition aux Chambres, p. 11)." Considerant opposes the "barbarous 
means," which is "simplistic," to the "scientific means," which is "composite" 
(pp. 40-41). At another point, he says explicitly: "For this simplisme has led, just 
as one would expect, to a result that is completely barbarian: that of the ever 
more ineluctable leveling of roads" (p. 44). By the same token: "Horizontality is a 
proper condition when it is a question of communications over water. The sys- 
tem of terrestrial locomotion, on the other hand, evidently ought to be capable of 
putting . . . different elevations in communication with one another" (p. 53). A 
second and related objection of Wronski's is directed against travel on wheels, 
which he describes as "a well-known and extremely vulgar process . . . , in use 



since the invention of the chariot." Here, too, he stresses the lack of any genuine 
scientific and complex character. Victor Considerant, Deraison et dangers de I'en- 
gouement pour les chemins en fer (Paris, 1838). The contents first appeared, in large 
part, in La Phalange. [W9,3] 

Considerant argues that the work of engineers should he focused not on the im- 
provement of the track hut on the improvement of the means of transport. Wron- 
ski, to whom he refers, appears to be thinking primarily of an improved form of 
wheel or of its replacement by something else. Thus, Considerant writes: "Is it not 
clear . . . that the discovery of a machine that would facilitate locomotion over 
ordinary routes, and increase . . . the present speed of transportation on these 
routes, would devastate, from top to hottom, the entire enterprise of the rail- 
roads? . . . Hence, a discovery not only possible but indeed probable can annihi- 
late, at one blow and forever, the extraordinary amounts of capital that some 
people have proposed be sunk into the railway system!" Victor Considerant, 
Deraison et dangers de Vengouement pour les chemins en fer (Paris, 1838), p. 63. 

[W9a,l] 



"The operation of railroads . . . forced humanity into the position of comhating 
nature's works everywhere on earth, of filling up valleys and hreaching moun- 
tains, . . . of struggling finally, by means of a general system, against the natural 
conditions of the planet's terrain, . . . and replacing them universally by the oppo- 
site sort of conditions." Victor Considerant, Deraison et dangers de Vengouement 
pour les chemins en fer (Paris, 1838), pp. 52-53. [W9a,2] 

Charles Gide on the "divinatory genius" of Fourier : "When he writes: 'A certain 
vessel from London arrives in China today; tomorrow the planet Mercury, having 
been advised of the arrivals and movements of ships by the astronomers of Asia, 
will transmit the list to the astronomers of London,' and if we transpose this 
prophecy into current vernacular so that it reads, 'When a ship arrives in China, 
the T. S. F. will transmit the news to the Eiffel Tower or to London,' then it is clear, 
I believe, that we have here an extraordinary anticipation. For what he means to 
say is precisely this: the planet Mercury is there to represent a force, as yet un- 
known, which would enahle the transmission of messages — a force of which he has 
had a presentiment." Charles Gide, Fourier precurseur de la cooperation (Paris 
<1924>),p. 10-11." [W9a,3] 

Charles Gide on Fourier's nonsensical astrological speculations: "He tells us that 
the planets Juno, Ceres, and Pallas each produce a species of gooseherry, and that 
there ought to he a fourth and still more excellent kind, of which we are deprived 
because the planet Phoebe (the moon), which would have generated it, is unfortu- 
nately dead." Charles Gide, Fourier precurseur de la cooperation (Paris), p. 10. 111 

[W9a,4] 



"When he speaks ... of a celestial army which the Sidereal Council has resolved to 
send to the aid of Humanity, an army already dispatched some 1,700 years ago and 



having bef ore it more than 300 years of travel until it arrives in the conn nes of our 
solar system, ... we shudder a little at the hint of Apocalypse. In other places this 
lunacy is more amiable, bordering often on wisdom, abounding in fine and witty 
observations, a bit like the harangues on the topic of the Golden Age that Don 
Quixote in the Sierra Morena addressed to the astonished goatherds." Charles 
Gide, Fourier precurseur de la cooperation (Paris), p. II. 19 [WU,1] 

"One could say, and he says it himself, that his observatory — or his laboratory, if 
you prefer — is the kitchen. It is his point of departure for radiating into all the 
domains of social life." Charles Gide, Fourier precurseur de la cooperation 



On the theory of attraction: "Bernardin de Saint-Pierre denied the force of grav- 
ity .. . because it signified an infringement on the free exercise of providence; and 
the astronomer Laplace struggled ... no less violently . . . against the fanciful 
generalizations of this force. But that did not prevent the doctrines of an Azais and 
like-minded others . . . from finding their imitators. Henri de Saint-Simon . . . was 
occupied for years with the elaboration of a system of 'universal gravitation,' and 
in 1810 he came out with the following credo: 'I believe in God. I believe that God 
created the universe. I believe that God made the universe subject to the law of 
gravitation.' Fourier likewise founded . . . his . . . system on the 'force of universal 
attraction,' of which sympathy between one man and another is said to be but a 
special case." Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), p. 45 (Azai's, 1766- 
1845, Des Compensations dans les destinees humaines). [Wl0,3] 

Relation of the Communist Manifesto to the draft by Engels: "The organization of 
labor (a concession to Louis Blanc) and the construction, on state-owned lands, of 
large communal palaces designed to bridge the gap between city and country (a 
concession to the Fourierists of the Democratic Pacifique) were items which de- 
rived from Engels' draft and which the final version of the manifesto left out." 
Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner Friihzeit, 2nd 



Engels on Fourier: '"It is Morgan's work which throws into bold relief the whole 
hrilliance of Fourier's critique of civilization,' he announced to Kautsky while 
working on his Ursprungder Familie. In this book itself, however, he wrote: 'The 
lowest interests . . . usher in the new, civilized society, the class-based society. The 
most outrageous means . . . topple the old, classless, gentile society."' Cited in 
Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 2, Engels unci der Aufstieg der Arbeiter- 
bewegung in Europa (Berlin <1933>), p. 439. a0 [WlOa,l] 

Marx on Proudhon, in a letter to Kugelmann, October 9, 1866: "His sham criti- 
cism and sham opposition to the Utopians (he himself is only a petty-bourgeois 
Utopian, whereas in the Utopias of a Fourier, an Owen, and others, there is the 
anticipation and imaginative expression of a new world) attracted and corrupted 
first the jeunesse brilliante, the students, and then the workmen, particularly 



(Paris), p. 20. 



[W10.2] 



cd. (Berlin <1933>), p. 288. 



[W10.4] 



those of Paris, who, as workers in luxury trades, are strongly attached, without 
knowing it, to the old ruhhish." Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Ausgeiviihlte 
Brief, ed. Adoratski (Moscow and Leningrad, 1934) <p. 174> . 21 [Wl0a,2] 



"When property has been abolished throughout Germany, these ultra-clever Ber- 
liners will set up a Democratic Pacifique on the Hasenheide. . . . Watch out! A new 
Messiah will presently arise in the Uckermark — a Messiah who will tailor Fourier 
to accord with Hegel, erect a phalanstery upon the eternal categories, and lay it 
down as an eternal law of the self -developing idea that capital, talent, and labor all 
have a definite share in the product. This will be the New Testament of Hegelian- 
ism; old Hegel will be the Old Testament; the 'state,' the law, will be a 'taskmaster 
over Christ'; and the phalanstery, in which the privies are located in accordance 
with logical necessity, will be the 'new Heaven' and the 'new Earth,' the new 
Jerusalem descending from heaven decked out like a bride." Engels to Marx, 
Barmen, November 19, 1844, in Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Briefivechsel, 
vol. 1, 1844-1853, ed. Marx-Engels-Lenin Institut (Moscow and Leningrad, 1935), 
p. II. 22 [W10a,3] 

Only in the summery middle of the nineteenth century, only under its sun, can 
one conceive of Fourier's fantasy materialized. [W10a,4] 

"Cultivate in children the sharp ears of a rhinoceros or a cossack." Ch. Fourier, 
he Nouveau Monde industriel et societaire, ou Invention du procede d'industrie 
attrayante et naturelle distribute en series passionnees (Paris, 1829), p. 207. 

[W10a,5] 

One readily grasps the importance of the culinary in Fourier; happiness has its 
recipes like any pudding. It is realized on the basis of a precise measuring out of 
different ingredients. It is an effect. Landscape, for example, signifies nothing to 
Fourier. He has no feeling for its romantic aspect; the miserable huts of the 
peasantry arouse his indignation. But let "composite agriculture" move into the 
area, let the little "hordes" and the little "bands" 33 spread out across it, let the 
noisy military marches of the industrial army play over its surface, and we have 
arrived at that proportion of elements needed for happiness to result. [Wll,l] 

The kinship between Fourier and Sade resides in the constructive moment that is 
proper to all sadism. Fourier conjoins the play of colors of the imagination in a 
unique way with the play of numbers of his idiosyncrasy. It must be emphasized 
that Fourier's harmonies are not dependent on any of the traditional number- 
mysticisms, like that of Pythagoras or of Kepler. They are altogether his concep- 
tion, and they give to the harmony something inaccessible and protected: they 
surround the hartnoniens as though with barbed wire. The happiness of the 
phalanstery is a bonheur barbele. On the other hand, Fourierist traits can be 
recognized in Sade. The experiences of the sadists, as presented in his 120 Jours 
de Sodome, are, in their cruelty, exactly that extreme that is touched by the 



extreme idyllic of Fourier. Les extremes se touclient. The sadist, in his experiments, 
could chance on a partner who longs for just those punishments and humiliations 
which his tormentor inflicts. All at once, he could be standing in the midst of one 
of those harmonies sought after by the Fourierist Utopia. ( Wl 1 ,2] 

Simplism appears in Fourier as the mark of "civilization." ( Wll,3] 

According to Fourier, the people in the vicinity of Paris, Blois, and Tours are 
especially suited to put their children into the trial phalanstery. The lower classes 
there are particularly well bred. See Le Nouveau Monde, p. 209. [ Wlla,l] 

Fourier's system, as he himself explains, rests on two discoveries: that of attrac- 
tion and that of the four movements (material, organic, animal, and social). 

[Wlla,2] 

Fourier speaks of a transmission miragique which will make it possible for London 
to have news from India within four hours. See Fourier, La Fausse Industrie 
(Paris, 1836), vol. 2, p. 711. [Wlla,3] 

"The social movement is the pattern for the three others. The animal, organic, and 
material movements are coordinated with the social movement, which is primary. 
This means that the properties of an animal, a vegetable, a mineral, or even a 
vortex of stars represent an effect of the human passions in the social order, and 
that everything, from atoms to stars, is an image of the properties of the human 
passions." Charles Fourier, Theorie des quatre mouvements (Paris, 1841), p. 47. 21 

[Wlla,4] 

The contemplation of maps was one of Fourier's favorite occupations. [Wlla,5] 

Messianic timetable: 1822, preparation of the experimental canton; 1823, its open- 
ing and trial run; 1824, its imitation in all civilized nations; 1825, recruitment of 
the barbarians and savages; 1826, organization of the spherical hierarchy; 1826, 
dispatching of colonial squadrons. — The phrase hierarchie spherique should be 
taken to mean the "distribution of the scepters of sovereignty" (according to 
E. SiJherling, Dictionnaire de sociologie phalansterienne [Paris, 1911], p. 214 ). 

[Wlla,6] 

The model of the phalanstery comprises 1,620 persons — in other words, a male 
and a female exemplar of each of the 810 characters that, according to Fourier, 
exhaust all possibilities. [Wl la, 7] 

In 1828, the poles were to become ice free. [Wlla,8] 



"The soul of man is an emanation of the great planetary soul, his body a portion of 
the planet's body. When a man dies, his body dissolves into the body of the planet 



and his soul fades into the planetary soul." F. Armand and R. Mauhlanc, Fourier 
(Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 111. [Wlla,9] 



"All children have the following dominant tastes: (1) Ferreting, or the penchant 
for handling things, exploring, running around, and constantly changing activi- 
ties. (2) Industrial din, the taste for noisy jobs. (3) Aping, or the imitative mania. 
(4) Working on a miniature scale, the taste for little workshops. (5) Progressive 
enticement of the weak by the strong." Charles Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde indus- 
triel et societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 213. 25 [ W12,1] 

Two of the twenty-four "Sources for the blossoming of vocations": (3) The lure of 
hierarchical ornaments. A plume already suffices to bewitch one of our villagers to 
such an extent that he is ready to sign away his liherty. What, then, wiJl be the 
effect of a hundred honorific adornments in the effort to enroll a child in the 
pleasurahle association with his fellows? . . . (17) Harmony of materiel, or the uni- 
tary maneuver — something unknown in the workshops of civilization, but prac- 
ticed in those of Harmony, where it is performed by the ensemble of soldiers and 
choreographers in a manner delightful to all children." Charles Fourier, Le Nou- 
veau Monde industriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), pp. 215, 216. [W12,2] 

Very characteristic that Fourier wants much more to keep the father away from 
the education of his children than the mother. "Disobedience toward the father 
and the teacher is ... a perfectly natural impulse; and the child wants to com- 
mand rather than obey the father." Charles Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde industriel 
et societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 219. 26 [W12.3] 

Hierarchy of children: juveniles, gymnasians, lyceans, seraphim, cherubs, ur- 
chins, imps, weanlings, nurslings. The children are the only one of the "three 
sexes" that can enter "straightaway into the heart of harmony." [W12,4] 

"Among the imps, we do not distinguish the two sexes by means of contrasting 
attire, like trousers and petticoat; that would be to risk stunting the growth of 
vocations and falsifying the proportion of the two sexes in each function." Fourier, 
Le Nouveau Monde industriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), pp. 223-224 (imps: ages 
one and a half to three; urchins: ages three to four and a half). [W12,5] 

Tools in seven sizes. Industrial hierarchy of children: officers of various types, 
licentiates, bachelors, neophytes, aspirants. [W12,6] 

Fourier conceives the departure for work in the fields as a sort of country outing, 
hi large wagons and with music. [W12,7] 

Qualifying examination for the choir of cheruhim: (1) Musical and choreographic 
audition at the Opera. (2) Washing of 120 plates in half an hour, without breaking 
one. (3) Peeling of half a quintal of apples in a given space of time, without allowing 



the weight of the fruit to drop helow a certain level. (4) Perfect sifting of a quantity 
of rice or other grain in a fi xed period of time. (5) Skill in kindling and screening a 
fire with intelligence and celerity." Charles Fourier, Le NouveauMonde industriel 
et societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 231. [W12a,l] 

Fourier unveils "the prospect of attaining, at the age of twelve or thirteen, to a post 
of high dignity, such as commanding ten thousand men in a military or parade 
maneuver." Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde industriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), 
p. 234. [W12a,2] 

Names of children in Fourier: Nysas, Enryale. The educator: Hilarion. [W12a,3] 

"And so it is that, from his childhood on, a man is not compatible with simple 
nature; there is needed, for his education, a vast array of instrnments, a multi- 
grade and variegated apparatus, and this applies from the moment he lirst leaves 
the cradle. J .-.J. Rousseau has denounced this prison in which the infant is pin- 
ioned, but he could not have known of the system of elastic mats, of the combined 
attentions and distractions, that would be enlisted in support of this method. 
Thus, the philosophers, in the face of evil, know only to oppose their sterile decla- 
mations, instead of building a road to the good — a system of roads that, far re- 
moved from simple nature, results only from composite methods." Fourier, Le 
Nouveau Monde industriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 237. The "distractions" 
involve, among other things, letting neighboring children play with one another in 



hammocks. [W12a,4] 

Napoleon III belonged to a Fourierist group in 184.8. [W12a,5] 

The Fourierist colony founded hy Baudet-Dulary in 1833 still exists today in the 
form of a family-run pension. Fourier had disavowed it in his day. [W12a,6] 

Balzac knew and admired Fourier's work. [W12a,7] 



The flag of the phalanstery displayed the seven colors of the rainbow. Note by 
Rene Maublanc: "The colors are analogous to the passions. ... By juxtaposing a 
series of tables wherein Fourier compares the passions to colors, to notes of the 
scale, to natural rights, to mathematical operations, to geometric curves, to met- 
als, and to heavenly bodies, one linds, for example, that love corresponds to hlue, 
to the note mi, to right of pasture, to division, to the ellipse, to tin, and to the 
planets." F. Armand and R . Mauhlanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, pp. 227-228. 

[W12a,8] 

Re Toussenel: "Fourier . . . claims to 'join together and enframe, within a single 
plan, the societary mechanics of the passions with the other known harmonies of 
the universe,' and for that, he adds, 'we need only have recourse to the amusing 
lessons to be drawn from the most fascinating objects among the animals and 



plants.'" Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 227; citing 
Fourier, Traite de Vassociation domestique-agricole (Paris and London, 1822), 
vol. 1, pp. 24—25, and Theorie de Vunite universelle (1834), p. 31. [W13,1] 



Fourier reproaches Descartes with having, in his doubt, spared "that tree of lies 
one calls civilization." See he Nouveau Monde, p. 367. [W13,2] 

Stylistic quirks reminiscent of Jean Paul. Fourier loves preambles, cisamhles, 
transambles, postambles, introductions, extroductions, prologues, interludes, 
postludes, cismediants, mediants, transmediants, intermedes, notes, appendixes. 

[W13,3] 

Fourier appears very suggestive before the background of the Empire in this 
note: "The combined order will, from the outset, be as brilliant as it has been 
long deferred. Greece, in the age of Solon and Pericles, was already in a position 
to undertake it, having a degree of luxury sufficient to proceed to this form of 
organization." Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, pp. 261-262; 
citing Iraite de ['association domestique-agricole (Paris and London, 1822), vol.1, 
pp. lxi-lxii; Theorie de Vunite universelle (1834), vol.1, p. Ib'f [W13,4] 

Fourier recognizes many forms of collective procession and cavalcade: storm, 
vortex, swarm, serpentage. [W13,5] 

With 1,600 phalansteries, the association is already deployed in all its combina- 
tions. [W13.6] 

"Fourier put himself body and soul into his work because he could not put into it 
the needs of a revolutionary class, which did not yet exist." F. Armand and 
R. Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 83. It should be added that Fourier 
appears, at many points, to prefigure a new type of human being, one conspicu- 
ous for its harmlessness. 28 [W13,7] 

"In his room, there was ordinarily but one free pathway, right in the middle, 
leading from door to window. The rest of the space was entirely taken up hy his 
flowerpots, which offered in themselves the spectacle of a progressive series of 
sizes, shapes, and even qualities; there were pots of common clay, and there were 
pots of Chinese porcelain." Charles Pellarin, Vie de Fourier (Paris, 1871), pp. 32- 
33. [W13.8] 



Charles Pellarin, Vie de Fourier (Paris, 1871) reports (p. 144) that Fourier would 
sometimes go six or seven nights without sleeping. This happened hecause of ex- 
citement over his discoveries. [ Wl3a,l] 



"The phalanstery will be an immense lodging house." (Fourier had no conception 
of family life.) F. Armand and R. Manblanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol.1, p. 85. 

[Wl3a,2] 

The cabalist, the composite, and the butterfly form appear under the rubric "dis- 
tributives," or <passions> mecanisantes. <SeeW15a,2.> [W13a,3] 

"The cabalist spirit always brings selfish motives into play with passion. All is 
calculation with the intriguer — the least gesture, a wink of the eye. Everything is 
done on reflection and with alacrity." Theorie de I'unite universelle (1834), vol. 1, 
p. 145. 2(! This remark shows very clearly how Fourier takes account of egoism. 
(In the eighteenth century, workers who agitated were called cabaleurs) 

[Wl3a,4] 

"The earth copulating with itself engenders the cherry; with Mercury, the straw- 
berry; with Pallas, the black currant; with Juno, the raisin; and so on." Armand 
and Manblanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p . 114. [ Wl3a,5] 

"A series is a regular classification of a genus, species, or group of beings or of 
objects, arranged symmetrically with respect to one or several of their properties, 
and on both sides proceeding from a center or pivot, according to an ascending 
progression on one side, descending on the other, like two flanks of an army. . . . 
There are 'open' series, in which the world (!) of subdivisions is not determined, 
and 'measured' series, which comprehend, at various levels, 3, 12, 32, 134, 404 
subdivisions." Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 127. 

[Wl3a,6] 

According to Fourier, every passion corresponds to an organ of the human body. 

[Wl3a,7] 

"In Harmony . . . the relations arising from the series are so dynamic that one has 
little time for remaining in one's room." Cited in Armand and Maublanc, Fourier 
(Paris, 1937), vol. 2, p. 211. [Wl3a,8] 

The four "sources of virtue" in the Little Hordes: "These sources are the penchant 
for dirt, and the feelings of pride, impudence, and insubordination." Fourier, he 
Nouveau Monde industriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 246. 30 [W14,1] 

Work signal of the Little Hordes: "The charge of the Little Hordes is sounded in an 
uproar of bells, chimes, drums, and trumpets, a howling of dogs and a bellowing of 
bulls. Then the Hordes, led by their Khans and Druids, rush forward with a great 
shout, passing before the priests, who sprinkle them with holy water. . . . The 
Little Hordes should be associated with the priesthood as members of a religious 
brotherhood. When performing their work, they should wear a religious symbol 



... on their clothing." "Although the Little Hordes perform the most difficult 
tasks . . . , they receive the least remuneration. They would accept nothing at all if 
that were permitted in association. . . . All authorities, even monarchs, owe the 
first salute to the Little Hordes. With their pygmy horses, the Little Hordes com- 
prise the globe's foremost regiments of cavalry; no industrial army can begin a 
campaign without them. They also have the prerogative of initiating all work done 
in the name of unity." Charles Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde industrielet societaire 
(Paris, 1829), p. 247-248 and 244-246. :tl [W14,2] 

"Manoeuvre tartare — or curvilinear mode" of the Little Hordes, in contrast to the 
"manoeuvre moderne — or rectilinear mode" of the Little Bands. "The Horde re- 
sembles a square bed of variegated tulips: one hundred cavaliers will together 
display two hundred colors, artistically contrasted." Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde, 
p. 249." [W14.3] 

"Whoever shall abuse quadrupeds, birds, fish or insects, either by hard usage or 
by unnecessary cruelty, will he liable to the tribunal of the Little Hordes. And 
whatever his age may he, he would be brought before this tribunal of children, and 
treated as inferior in moral sentiment to children themselves." Fourier, Le Nou- 
veau Monde (Paris, 1829), p . 248/™ [ W14,4] 

The Little Hordes are obliged to look after the Concorde sociale; the Little Bands, 
the charme social. [W14,5] 

"The Little Hordes will come to the beautiful by way of the good, by speculative 
defilement." Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde, p. 255. M [W14.6] 

"Just as the Little Hordes have their Druids and Druidesses, the Little Bands have 
their own adult associates, who are known as Coryhants. They also have their own 
allies among the groups of voyagers who travel about Harmony. Whereas the Little 
Hordes are allied to the big hordes of Adventurers and Adventuresses, who belong 
to the industrial armies, the Little Bands are associated with the big hands of 
Knights and Ladies Errant, who are dedicated to the fine arts." Fourier, Le Nou- 
veau Monde (Paris, 1829), p. 254. :ir> [ W14 a ,l] 

The Little Bands have jurisdiction over offenses against meadows and gardens, 
and over questions of language. [W14a,2] 

"If the vestalate is called upon to mislead the minds of the children concerning 
sexual relations, the tact manifest in the use of two sets of genital-urinary appara- 
tus leaves the child in complete ignorance of sex." E. Silberling, Dictionnaire de 
sociologie phalansterienne (Paris, 1911), p. 424 (s.v. "tact"). Likewise, the cour- 
tesy of the hoys toward the girls in the Little Bands is designed to mask the meaning 
of gallant behavior among adults. [W14a,3] 



"Under the term 'opera' I comprehend all choreographic exercises, including 
those of the rifle and the censer." Fourier, Le Nouveau Monde industriel et so- 
cietaire (Paris, 1829), p . 260. [ W14a,4] 



The phalanstery is organized like a land of milk and honey. Even amusements 
(hunting, fishing, making music, growing flowers, performing in theatricals) are 
remunerated. [W14a,5] 

Fourier does not know the concept of exploitation. [W14a,6] 

In reading Fourier, one is reminded of the sentence by Karl Kxaus: "I preach wine 
and drink water." [W14a,7] 

Bread plays only a small role in the diet of the Harmoniens. [W14a,8] 

"The initiation of barbarians in the use of tactics is one of the signs of the degen- 
eration ... of civilization." E. Silberling, Dictionnaire de sociologie phalan- 
sterienne (Paris, 1911), p. 424 (s.v. "tactics"). [W14a,9] 

"The savage enjoys seven natural rights . . . : hunting, fishing, harvesting, pas- 
ture, external theft (that is, pillaging of what helongs to other tribes), the federal 
league (the intrigues and cabals internal to the tribe), and insouciance." Armand 
and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 2, p. 78. [W14a,li] 

The poor man speaks: "I ask to be advanced the necessary tools . . . and enough to 
live on, in exchange for the right to steal which simple nature has given me." Cited 
in Armand and M aublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 2, p. 82. [W15.1] 

In the phalanstery, a caravansary is outfitted for the reception of foreigners. A 
structure characteristic of the phalanstery is the "tower of order." ITiis building 
houses the optical telegraph, the control center for the signal lights, and the 
carrier pigeons. [W15.2] 

The circulation of works useful to all the phalansteries amounts to 800,000 copies. 
Fourier thinks, above all, of publishing an Encyclopaedic naturologique calu- 
minee. [W15,3] 

Fourier loves to clothe the most reasonable sentiments in fanciful considerations. 
His discourse resembles a higher flower language. 3 " [W15,4] 

Fourier would like to see the people who serve no useful purpose in civilization — 
those who merely gad about in search of news to communicate — circulating 
among the tables of the Hannonians, so as to keep people there from losing time 
in reading newspapers: a divination of radio, born from the study of human 
character. [W15.5] 



Fourier: "Every calling has its countermorality and its principles." Cited in Ar- 
mand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 2, p. 97. Fourier mentions, as 
examples, le monde galant and the world of domestic servants. [W15,6] 



"After three generations of Harmony, two-thirds of the women will he unfruitful, 
as is the case with all flowers which, by the refinements of cultivation, have been 
raised to a high degree of perfection." Fourier, La Fausse Industrie (Paris, 1835- 
1836), vol. 2, pp. 560-561. 37 [W15,7] 

The voluntary submissiveness of the savage, with his seven natural rights, would 
be, according to Fourier, the touchstone of civilization. It is something first ob- 
tained in Harmony. [W15,8] 

"The individual ... is a being essentially false, for neither by himself alone nor 
with another can he bring about the development of the twelve passions, since 
these comprise a mechanism of 810 keys and their complements. It is therefore 
with the passional vortex alone that the scale begins, and not with the individual 
person." Publication des manuscrits de Fourier, 4 vols. (Paris, 1851-1858), 1857- 
1858, p. 320. [W15,9] 

After 70,000 years comes the end of Harmony, in the form of a new period of 
civilization, in descending tendency, which once more will give way to "obscure 
limbs." Thus, with Fourier, transience and happiness are closely linked. Engels 
observes: 'Just as Kant introduced into natural science the idea of the ultimate 
destruction of the earth, Fourier introduced into historical science that of the 
ultimate destruction of the human race." Engels, Anti-Diihring, part 3, p. 12. 38 

[Wl5a,l] 

The mechanics of the passions: "The tendency to harmonize the five sensual pas- 
sions — (1) taste, (2) touch, (3) sight, (4) hearing, (5) smell — with the four affective 
passions — (6) friendship, (7) ambition, (8) love, (9) paternity. This harmony takes 
place through the medium of three little-known and abused passions, which I shall 
call: (10) the cabalist, (11) the butterfly, (12) the composite." Cited from Le Nou- 
veau Monde, in Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 242. M 

[Wl5a,2] 



"A large number of universes (since one universe, along with man and planet, 
constitutes the third echelon, . . . Fourier calls it a "tri-verse") go to form a quatri- 
verse; and so on, up to the octi- verse, which represents . . . nature as a whole, the 
totality of the heings of Harmony. Fourier enters into some minute calculations 
and announces that the octi-verse is composed of 10 90 universes." Armand and 
Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 112. [Wl5a,3] 

On "beautiful agriculture": "This plow that today is so despised will be taken up 
hy the young prince, just as by the young pleheian; they will together compete in a 



sort of industrial tournament, where each of the athletes will test his vigor and 
dexterity, and where each can show off to an audience of lovelies, who will hring 
the festivities to a close by serving lunch or a snack." Charles Fourier, Traite de 
I'association domestique-agricole (Paris and London, 1822), vol. 2, p. 584. To this 
beau agricole belong, further, the steles that are raised on flower-covered pede- 
stals and the busts of deserving farm laborers or agriculturists placed on altars 
that are scattered through the fields. "These are the mythological demigods of the 
industrial sect or series." Cited in Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), 
vol. 2, p. 206. Offerings of incense are made to them through the Coryhants. 

[Wl5a,4] 

Fourier recommends gearing the experiment, in the trial phalanx, toward pre- 
cisely the most eccentric characters. [ Wl6,l] 

Fourier was a chauvinist: he hated Englishmen and Jews. He saw the Jews not as 
civilized people but as barbarians who maintained patriarchal customs. [W16,2] 

Fourier's apple — the pendant to that of Newton — which, in the Parisian restau- 
Kint Fevrier, costs a hundred times more than in the province where it is grown. 
Proudhon, too, compares himself to Newton. [Wl6,3] 

To the Harmonians, Constantinople is the capital of the earth. [ W16,4] 

Harmonians need very little sleep (like Fourier!). They live to the age of 150 at the 
very least. [W16,5] 

"The 'opera' stands at the forefront of educational directives. . . . The opera is a 
school of morality in outline: it is there that young people are imbued with a 
horror of anything prejudicial to truth, precision, and unity. At the opera, no 
favor can excuse the one whose note is false, whose timing, step, or gesture is off. 
The prince's child who has a part in the dance or the choir must endure the truth, 
must listen to the criticisms arising from the masses. It is at the opera that he 
learns, in every move he makes, to subordinate himself to unitary proprieties, to 
general accords." Cited in F. Armand and R. Mauhlanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), 
vol. 2, pp. 232-233. [Wl6,6] 

"No one ever dreamed, in civilization, of perfecting that portion of our dress we 
call 'atmosphere.' . . . It does not suffice to change it merely in the rooms of certain 
idlers. . . . Wc must modify the atmosphere in general and systematically." Cited 
in F. Armand and R. Mauhlanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 2, p. 145. [W16,7] 

Fourier's texts are rich in stereotypical locutions comparable to the gr*.dus ad 
parnassum. 19 Almost every time he speaks of the arcades, it is to say that, under 
present circumstances, even the king of France gets wet when he steps into his 
carriage during a rainstorm. [W16,8] 



Ten million francs would be needed for the erection of the complete phalanstery; 
three million, for the trial phalanstery. [Wl6,9] 



All flower beds of the Harmonians are "shielded" from too much sun and rain. 

[W16.10] 

Of the beauties of agriculture among the Harmonians, Fourier gives an account 
that reads like a description of color illustrations in children's books: "The socie- 
tary state will be able to establish, down to the most unsavory functions, a 
species-specific luxury. The gray overalls of a group of plowmen, the bluish 
overalls of a group of mowers, will be enhanced by the borders, belts, and plumes 
of their uniform, by glossy wagons and inexpensively adorned harnesses, all 
carefully arranged to protect die ornaments from the grime of work. If we should 
see, in a pretty vale of the medleyed English sort, all these groups in action, well 
sheltered by their colored tents, working in disseminated masses, circling about 
with flags and instruments, singing hymns in chorus while marching; and should 
the region be sprinkled with manor houses and belvederes enlivened by colon- 
nades and spires, instead of with thatched cottages, we would verily believe that 
the landscape was enchanted, that it was a fairyland, an Olympian abode." Even 
the rape cutters, who lack high standing with Fourier, have a part in the splendor, 
and are found "at work in the hills, raising their pavilions above thirty belvederes 
crowned with golden rape." Cited in Annand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 
1937), vol. 2, pp. 203, 204. [Wl6a,l] 

Forming a mesh — for example, between herding, plowing, and gardening: "It is 
not necessary that this interchange be total — say, that all of the twenty men en- 
gaged in tending Hocks from 5:00 to 6:30 go off as a group to work in the iields from 
6:30 to 8:00. All that is necessary is for each series to provide the others with 
several members taken from its different groups. The exchange of a few members 
will suffice to establish a linkage or meshing between the different series." Cited in 
Armand and Maublanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 2, pp. 160-161 ("Essor de la 
'papillomas'").-" [Wl6a,2] 

It is not just the despotism but also the moralism diat Fourier hates in the great 
Revolution. He presents the subde division of labor among Harmonians as the 
antidiesis of egalite, and their keen competition as an alternative to fraternite. 

[Wl6a,3] 

In Le Nouveau Monde industriel (pp. 281-282), Fourier's rancor against Pestalozzi 
is very evident. He says he took up Pestalozzi's "intuitive method" in his Traite 
<de I 'association domestique-agricole> of 1822 because of the great success it had had 
with the public. Lacking such popular success, it would have created an unfavor- 
able impression on its readers. — Of Yverdon he recounts, at best, tales of scandal 
calculated to prove diat institutions of harmony cannot be introduced with impu- 
nity into civilization. [Wl7,l] 



Under the heading "Le Garantisme d'oui'e" <The Guaranteeism of Hearing) , and 
in conjunction with the amelioration of popular speech habits and of the musical 
education of the people (worker-choirs of the theater of Toulouse!), Fourier treats 
of measures to he taken against noise. He wants the workshops isolated and, for 
the most part, transferred to the suburbs. [W17,2] 

Town-Planning: "A man who wishes to have a briJJiant drawing room is keenly 
aware that the heauty of the principal room cannot do without that of the avenues. 
What is one to think of an elegant salon that requires the visitor, on his way there, 
first to pass through a courtyard littered with refuse, a stairwell full of rubbish, 
and an antechamber provided with old and uncouth furnishings? . . . Why is it, 
then, that the good taste evinced by each individual in the decoration of his private 
abode is not met with, as well, in our architects responsible for those collective 
abodes known as cities? And why hasn't one of the myriad princes and artists . . . 
ever had the idea of adorning, in appropriate degree, the three components: fau- 
bourgs, annexes, and avenues . . . ?" Charles Fourier, Cites ouvrieres: Modifica- 
tions a introduire dans V architecture des villes (Paris, 1849), pp. 19-20. Among 
many other prescriptions for urban planning, Fourier imagines some that would 
allow one to recognize, from the increasing or decreasing decoration on the build- 
ings, whether one was approaching or moving away from a city. (W17,3] 

Barbarian, civilized, and harmonian town planning: "A harharian town is formed 
of buildings haphazardly assembled . . . and confusedly grouped along streets that 
are tortuous, narrow, hadly constructed, unsafe, and unhealthy. Such, in general, 
arc the cities of France. . . . Civilized towns have a monotonous, imperfect order, 
a checkerboard pattern, as in . . . Philadelphia, Amsterdam, Nancy, Turin, the 
new parts of London and Marseilles, and other cities which one knows by heart as 
soon as one has looked at three or four streets. Further inspection would be 
pointless and dispiriting." In contrast to this: "neutral harmony," "which recon- 
ciles incoherent order with a combined order." Fourier, Cites ouvrieres, pp. 17- 



18. [W17,4] 

The Harmonians neither acknowledge nor desire any holidays. [Wl7a,l] 

[n Die heilige Familie (where?) 42 Marx refers to Fourier. [Wl7a,2] 

Toussenel, in 1848, was among the founders of the Societe Rcpublicaine Centrale 
(Blauqui's club). [Wl7a,3] 



Claude-Nicolas Ledoux: "Like all the communal dwellings envisioned for Chaux, 
the hospice (a low-rise structure ringed by arcades and enclosing a square court- 
yard) has the task of furthering the moral elevation of humankind, insofar as it 
carefully tests the people it shelters, allows the good their freedom, and detains the 
bad for compulsory labor. To what extent the artist was gripped by the reformist 
ideas of those days can be seen in the peculiar project of the 'oikema.' Already 



quite eccentric in its outward aspect, this elongated building with its Greco-Roman 
vestibule and windowless walls was to be the place where a new sexual ethic was 
pioneered. To reach the goal of higher sexual morality, the spectacle of human 
dissipation in the oikema, in the house of uninhibited passions, was supposed to 
lead to the path of virtue and to 'Hymen's altar.' Later, the architect decided that 
it would be better ... to grant nature its rights. ... A new, more liberated form of 
marriage was to be instituted in the oikema, which the architect wanted to situate 
in the most beautiful of landscapes." Emil Kaufmann, Von Ledoux bis Le Cor- 
busier: Ursprung unci Entivicklung der autonomen Architektur (Vienna and 
Leipzig, 1933), p. 36. [Wl7a,4] 

"During a large part of his life, Grandville was much preoccupied with the general 
idea of Analogy." Ch. Baudelaire, Oeuvres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2 < Paris, 1932 >, 
p. 197 ("Quelques caricaturistes francais"). 4:l [Wl7a,5] 

H.J. Hunt, Le Socialisme et le Romantume en France: Etude de la presse socialiste de 
1830 a 1848 (Oxford, 1935), provides, on p. 122, a notably concise and felici- 
tous statement of the main lines of Fourier's doctrine. The Utopian element 
recedes into the background, and the proximity to Newton becomes clear. Pas- 
sion is the force of attraction as experienced in the subject; it is what makes 
"work" into a process as natural as the fall of an apple. [Wl7a,6] 

"In contrast to the Saint-Simonians, Fourier has no use for mysticism in aesthetic 
matters. In his general doctrine he is certaiidy mystical, Utopian, messianic if you 
will, but in speaking of art he never once utters the word 'priesthood.' . . . 'Vanity 
takes over and impels artists and scientists to sacrifice their fortune [which they 
would have needed to preserve their independence] to the phantoms of pride.'" 
H. J. Hunt, Le Socialisme et le Romantisme en France (Oxford, 1935), pp. 123- 
124. [W18] 



[Marx] 



The man who buys and sells reveals something about himself 
more direct and less composed than the man who discourses 
and battles. 

— Maxime Leroy, Les Speadations foncieres de Saint-Simon 
et ses querelles d'affaires avec son associe, le comte de Redern 
(Paiis<1925>),p. 1 



"We see how the history of industry and the established objective existence of 
industry are the open hook of man's essential powers. . . . Hitherto this was con- 
ceived not in its inseparable connection with man's essential being, but only in an 
external relation of utility. . . . Industry is the actual historical relationship of 
nature — and therefore of natural science — to man." Karl Marx, "Nationalokono- 
mie und Philosophic" (1844) [Karl Marx, Dev historische Materialismus, ed. 
Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig <1932>), vol. 1, pp. 303-304]. 1 [XI, 1] 

"Not only wealth hut, likewise, the poverty of man — under the assumption of 
socialism — receives, in equal measure, a human and therefore social significance. 
Poverty is the positive bond which causes the human being to experience the 
greatest wealth — the other human heing — as need." Karl Marx, "Nationalokono- 
mie und Philosophie" [Karl Marx, Dev historische Materialismus, ed. Landshut 
and Mayer (Leipzig), vol. 1 , p. 305]. 2 [Xl,2] 

"The conclusion Marx draws for the capitalist economy: with the purchasing 
power given him in the form of salary, the worker can purchase only a certain 
amount of goods, whose production required just a fraction of the lahor he himself 
has provided. In other words, if the merchandise he produces is to be sold by his 
employer at a profit, he must always he expending surplus lahor." Henryk Gross- 
mann, "Fiinfzig Jahre Kampf um den Marxismus," Worterbuch dev Volkswirt- 
schaft, 4th ed., ed. Ludwig Elster, vol. 3 (Jena, 1933), p. 318. [Xl,3] 

Origin of false consciousness: "Division of lahor hecomes truly such only from the 
moment when a division of material and mental lahor appears. . . . From this 
moment onward, consciousness can really Hatter itself that it is something other 



than consciousness of existing practice, that it really represents something without 
representing something real." "Marx unci Engels iiber Feuerbach: Aus dem liter- 
arischen Nachlass von Marx unci Engels," in Marx-Engels Archiv, ed. D. Rjaza- 
nov, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main <1928>), p. 248. 1 [Xl,4] 

A passage on the Revolution as a "Last Judgment" opposed to the one Bruno 
Bauer dreamt of — one that would usher in the victory of critical consciousness: 
"The holy father of the church will be greatly surprised when judgment day over- 
takes him , . . . a day when the reflection of burning cities in the sky will mark the 
dawn; when together with the 'celestial harmonies' the tunes of "La Marseillaise" 
and "Carmagnole" will echo in his ears accompanied hy the requisite roar of 
cannon, with the guillotine beating time; when the infamous 'masses' will shout, 
"£a ira, ca ira!" and suspend <aufhebt> 'self-consciousness' by the lamppost." 
"Marx und Engels iiber Feuerhach: Aus dem literarischen Nachlass von Marx und 
Engels," in Marx-Engels Archiv, ed. D. Rjazanov, vol. 1 (Frankfurt am Main), 
p. 258." [Xl,5] 

Self -alienation: "The worker produces capital; capital produces him — hence, he 
produces himself, and . . . his human qualities exist only insofar as they exist for 
capital alien to him. . . . The worker exists as a worker only when he exists for 
himsel f as capital; and he exists as capital only when some capital exists for him. 
The existence of capital is his existence, . . . since it determines the tenor of his life 
in a manner indifferent to him. . . . Production . . . produce[s] man as a . . . 
dehumanized being." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus: Die Friih- 
schriften, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig), vol. 1, pp. 361-362 ("National- 
okonomie und Philosophic"). 5 [Xla,l] 

On the doctrine of revolutions as innervations of the collective: "The transcen- 
dence of private property is . . . the complete emancipation of all human 
senses . . . , but it is this emancipation . . . because . . . the senses and minds of 
other men have become my own appropriation. Besides these direct organs, there- 
fore, social organs develop . . . ; thus, for instance, activity in direct association 
with others . . . has become an organ for expressing my own life, and a mode of 
appropriating human life. It is obvious that the human eye enjoys things in a way 
different from that of the crude, nonhuman eye; the human ear different from the 
crude ear; and so on." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus: Die Friih- 
schriften (Leipzig), vol. 1, pp. 300-301 ("Nationalokonomic und Philosophic"). 6 

[Xla,2] 

"The nature which develops in human history — the genesis of human society — is 
man's real nature; hence, nature as it develops through industry, even though in 
an estranged form, is true anthropological nature." Karl Marx, Der historische 
Materialismus: Die Friihschriften, eel. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig), vol. 1, 
p. 304 ("Nationalokonomie und Philosophic"). 7 [Xla,3] 



Point of departure for a critique of "culture": "The positive transcendence of 
private property, as the appropriation of human life, is . . . the positive transcen- 
dence of all estrangement; that is to say, the return of man from religion, family, 
state, and so on, to his human — that is, social — existence." Karl Marx, Der his- 
torische Materialismus, ed. Mayer and Landshut (Leipzig), vol. 1, p. 296 ("Na- 
tionalokonomie und Philosophie")." [Xla,4] 

A derivation of class hatred that draws on Hegel: "The annulling of objectivity in 
the form of estrangement (which has to advance from indifferent foreignness to 
real, antagonistic estrangement) means equally or even primarily, for Hegel, that 
it is ohjectivity which is to be annulled, because it is not the determinate character 
of the ohject but rather its ohjective character that is offensive and constitutes 
estrangement for self -consciousness." Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus 
(Leipzig), vol. 1, p. 335 ("Nationalokonomie und Philosophie"). [Xla,5] 

Communism "in its first form." "Communism is . . ., in its first form, only a gener- 
alization and consummation of this relationship [that is, of private property] .... 
For it, the sole purpose of life and existence is direct, physical possession. The task 
of the laborer is not done away with, but extended to all men. It wants to do away 
by force with talent, and so forth. ... It may be said that this idea of the commu- 
nity of women gives away the secret of this as yet completely crude and thoughtless 
communism. Just as woman passes from marriage to general prostitution, so the 
entire world of wealth . . . passes from the relationship of exclusive marriage with 
the owner of private property to a state of universal prostitution with the commu- 
nity. . . . How little this annulment of private property is really an appropriation is 
. . . proved by the abstract negation of the entire world of culture and civilization, 
the regression to the unnatural simplicity of thepoor and undemanding man, who 
has not only failed to go beyond private property, but has not yet even reached it." 
Karl Marx, Der historische Materialismus, ed. Landshut and Mayer (Leipzig), 
vol. 1, pp. 292-293 ("Nationalokonomie und Philosophie"). 1 " [X2,l] 

It would be an error to deduce the psychology of the bourgeoisie from the 
attitude of the consumer. It is only the class of snobs that represents the stand- 
point of the consumer. The foundations for a psychology of the bourgeois class 
are much sooner to be found in the following sentence from Marx, which makes 
it possible, in particular, to describe the influence which this class exerts, as model 
and as customer, on art: "A certain stage of capitalist production dictates that the 
capitalist be able to devote the whole of the time during which he functions as a 
capitalist — that is, as personified capital — to the appropriation and therefore con- 
trol of the labor of others, and to the selling of the products of this labor." Karl 
Marx, Das Kapital, <vol. 1,> ed. Korsch (Berlin <1932>), p. 298. n [X2,2] 

From Marx, Kapital, vol. 3, part 1 (Hamburg, 1921), p. 84: "The advice of the 
hanker . . . more valuable than that of the priest. " Cited in Hugo Fischer, Karl 
Marx und sein Verhaltnis zu Staat und Wirtschaft (Jena, 1932), p. 56. 12 [X2,3] 



Time in technology: "As in a genuine political action, the choice ... of the right 
moment is crucial. 'That a capitalist should command on the field of production is 
now as indispensable as that a general should command on the field of battle' (vol. 
1, p. 278). 11 . . . 'Time' has here, in technology, a meaning different from the one it 
has in the historical events of the era, where . . . the 'actions all unfold on the same 
plane.' 'Time' in technology . . . also has a meaning different from the one it has in 
modern economics, which . . . measures labor-time in terms of the clock." Hugo 
Fischer, Karl Marx unci sein Verhaltnis zu Staat unci Wirtschaft (Jena, 1932), 
p. 42; citation from Kapital <vol. 1 > (Berlin, 1923). [X2,4] 

"If you recall that Coin-not died in 1877, and that his principal works were con- 
ceived during the Second Empire, you will recognize that, after Marx, he was one 
of the most lucid minds of his day. . . . Cournot goes well heyond Comte, who is 
misled by the dogma of his Religion of Humanity; beyond Taine, who is misled by 
the dogma of Science; and well beyond the nuanced skepticism of Renan. . . . He 
utters this admirahle sentence: 'From heing the king of creation, man has fallen — 
•r risen (depending on how one understands it) — to the role of concessionaire for 
a planet.' The mechanized civilization of the future in no way represents for him 
'the triumph of mind over matter' . . .; rather, it represents the triumph of the 
rational and general principles of things over the energy and qualities proper to 
the living organism." Georges Friedmann, La Crise du progres (Paris <1936>), 
p. 246. [X2a,l] 

"The dead matter was an advance over living lahor power; second, it is consumed 
in the latter's hlaze; and third, it once again takes its place on the throne. . . . For 
even hefore the entrance of the worker 'into the process of production, his own 
lahor is estranged from him, appropriated by the capitalist, and incorporated into 
capital; and during the process, it is continually materialized as an alien product.' 
. . . The deadly thing that assails technology from all directions is economics. 
Economics has, for its ohject, the commodity. 'The process of production' that 
hegins in a hlaze, as lahor engages its products, 'is extinguished in the commodity. 
The fact that labor power was expended in its fabrication now appears as a mate- 
rial property of the commodity, as the property of possessing value' (vol. 2, 
p. 361). . . . The action of a man, as the unique and 'entire connected act of pro- 
duction' (vol. 2, p. 201), is already more than the agent of this action. . . . The 
action already takes place in a higher sphere, which has the future for itself, the 
sphere of technics, while the agent of this action, as isolated individual, remains in 
the sphere of economics, and his product is likewise hound to tliis sphere. . . . 
Across the European continent, technology as a whole forms a single simultaneous 
action, insofar as it takes effect as technology; the physiognomy of the earth is 
from the outset transformed within the sphere of technics, and the gulf hetween 
city and country is ultimately spanned. But if the deadly force of economics should 
gain the upper hand, then the repetition of homologous magnitudes through abso- 
lutely interchangeable existences, the production of commodities through the 
agency of the worker, prevails over the singularity of the technological action." 



Hugo Fischer, Karl Marx unci sein Verhiiltnis zu Staat unci Wirtschaft (Jena, 
1932), pp. 43-45; the citations are from Kapital <vol. 2> (Hamburg, 1921). 14 

[X2a,2] 

"'The same spirit that constructs philosophic systems in the hrain of philosophers 
huilds railroads with the hands of workers.' ... In the desert of the nineteenth 
century, according to Marx, technology is the only sphere of life in which the 
human being moves at the center of a thing." Hugo Fischer, Karl Marx unci sein 
Verhiiltnis zu Staat unci Wirtschaft (Jena, 1932), pp. 39--40; the citation of Marx is 
apparently from Marx and Engels, Gesammelte Schriften, 1841-1850 (Stuttgart, 
1902), vol. l,p. 259. 15 [X3,l] 

On the divine forebears of the charlatan: "The various divine ancestors had by 
now [at the end of the eighteenth century] revealed not only prescriptions for 
elixirs of life hut also methods of dyeing, indications for spinning silk, and secrets 
of firing clay. The industry was mythologized." Grete de Francesco, Die Macht cles 
Charlatans (Basel <1937>), p. 154. [X3,2] 

Marx emphasizes "the decisive importance of the transformation of value and 
price of lahor power into the form of wages, or into the value and price of labor 
itself. This phenomenal form, which makes the actual relation invisible, and, 
indeed, shows the direct opposite of that relation, forms the basis of all the juridi- 
cal notions of both laborer and capitalist, of all the mystilications of the capitalis- 
tic mode of production, of all its illusions as to liberty." Karl Marx, Das Kapital 
<vol. 1>, ed. Korsch (Berlin <1932>), p. 499. 1( ' [X3,3] 

"Had we gone further, and inquired under what circumstanees all or even the 
majority of products take the form of commodities, we should have found that this 
can happen only with production of a very specific kind: capitalist production." 
Karl Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1>, ed. Korseh, p. 171. 17 [X3,4] 

"This race of peculiar commodity-owners," as Marx at one point calls the prole- 
tariat (Kapital <vol. 1 > , ed. Korsch, p. 173). Compare: "Natural instinct of the 
commodity-owners" (ihid., p. 97).'" [X3,5] 

Marx opposes the idea that gold and silver are only imaginary values. "The fact 
that money can, in certain functions, be replaced by mere symbols of itself gave 
rise to that other mistaken notion: that it is itself a mere symbol. Nevertheless, 
under this error lurked a presentiment that the money-form of an object is not an 
inseparable part of that object hut is simply the form under which certain social 
relations manifest themselves. In this sense, every commodity is a symhol, since, 
insofar as it is value, it is only the material envelope of the human labor spent upon 
it. But if it he declared that . . . the material forms assumed hy the social qualities 
of lahor under the regime of a definite mode of production are mere symbols, it is 
in the same breath also declared that these characteristics are arhitrary fictions 



sanctioned by the so-called universal consent of mankind." Note after "spent upon 
it": '"If we consider the concept of value, we must look on the thing itself as only a 
symbol; it counts not as itself but as what it is worth' (Hegel, Rechtsphilosophie, 
addition to paragraph 63)." Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1 > , ed. Korsch, pp. 101-102 
("Der AustauschprozeB"). 19 [X3,6] 

Private property as origin of the alienation of human beings from one another: 
"Objects in themselves are external to man, and consequently alienable by him. In 
order that this alienation may be reciprocal, it is only necessary for men, by a tacit 
understanding, to treat one another as private owners of those alienable objects, 
and by implication as independent individuals. But such a state of reciprocal 
independence has no existence in a primitive society based on property in com- 
mon. . . . The exchange of commodities, therefore, first begins on the boundaries 
of such communities." Karl Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1>, eel. Korsch (Berlin, 
1932), p. 99 ("Der AustauschprozeB"). 20 [X3a,l] 

"In order that . . . objects may enter into relation with one another as commodi- 
ties, their guardians must place themselves in relation to one another, as persons 
whose will resides in those objects." Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1>, ed. Korsch 
(Berlin, 1932), p. 95 ("Der AustauschprozeB"). 21 [X3a,2] 

Marx recognizes a climax in the development, and in the transparency, of the 
fetish character of the commodity: "The mode of production in which the product 
takes the form of a commodity, or is produced directly for exchange, is the most 
general and most embryonic form of bourgeois production. It therefore makes its 
appearance at an early date in history, though not in the same predominating and 
characteristic manner as nowadays. Hence, its fetish character is relatively easily 
seen through. But when we come to more concrete forms, even this appearance of 
simplicity vanishes." Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1 > , ed. Korsch (Berlin, 1932), p. 94 
("Fetischcharakter"). 22 [X3a,3] 

The model according to which the polytechnical education demanded by Marx- 
ism must orient itself: "There are . . . states of society in which one and the same 
man does tailoring and weaving alternately, in which case these two forms of 
labor are mere modifications of the labor of the same individual, and not special 
and fixed functions of different persons" (Marx, Kapital, p. 57). These various 
modified acts of labor on the part of one individual are not compared with one 
another quantitatively, in terms of duration; to the abstraction "mere labor," 
which we can educe from them, corresponds nothing real; they stand within a 
unique concrete labor-context, the results of which bring no advantage to the 
owner of commodities. Compare the following: "For a society based upon the 
production of commodities, in which the producers in general enter into social 
relations with one another by treating their products as commodities . . . , 
whereby they reduce their individual private labor to the standard of homogene- 
ous human labor — for such a society, Christianity with its cult us of abstract man 



. . . is the most fitting form of religion." Marx, Kapital, p. 91 ("Fetischcharak- 
ter"). 23 [X3a,4] 



"Tlie body of the commodity, which serves as the equivalent, figures as the 
materialization of human labor in the abstract, and is at the same time the 
product of some specifically useful concrete labor. This concrete labor becomes, 
therefore, the medium for expressing abstract human labor." In this latter is 
contained, as Marx believes, all the misery of the commodity-producing society. 
(The passage is from Kapital, p. 70 ["Die Wertform oder der Tauschwert"].) 24 In 
addition, it is very important that Marx immediately after this (p. 71) refers to 
abstract human labor as the "opposite" of the concrete. — To formulate differ- 
ently the misery at issue here, one could also say: it is the misery of the commod- 
ity-producing society that, for it, "labor directly social in character" (p. 71) is 
always merely abstract labor. If Marx, in his treatment of the equivalent form, 
lays weight on the fact "that the labor of private individuals takes the form of its 
opposite, labor directly social in form" (p. 71), then this private labor is precisely 
the abstract labor of the abstract commodity-owning man. [X4,l] 

Marx has the idea that labor would be accomplished voluntarily (as travail 
passionne) if the commodity character of its production were abolished. The 
reason, according to Marx, that labor is not accomplished voluntarily would 
therefore be: its abstract character. [X4,2] 

"Value . . . converts every product into a social hieroglyphic. Later on, men try to 
decipher the hieroglyphic, to get behind the secret of their own social products; for 
the definition of the object of utility as value is just as much their social product as 
language." Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1>, p. 86 ("Der Fetischcharakter der Ware 
und sein Geheimnis"). 25 [X4,3] 

"The general value-form, which represents all products of labor as mere congela- 
tions of undifferentiated human labor, shows by its very structure that it is the 
social expression of the commodity world. Thus, it reveals that within this world 
the generally human [that is, the impoverished and abstract] character of the 
labor constitutes at the same time its distinguishing feature as social labor." Marx, 
Das Kapital <vol. 1>, p. 79 ("Die Wertform oder der Tauschwert"). 26 — The ab- 
stract nature of the social labor and the abstract nature of the human being who 
relates to fellow humans as an owner correspond to each other. [X4,4] 

"How are we to express the fact that weaving creates the value of the linen not by 
virtue of being weaving, as such, but by reason of its general property of being 
human labor? Simply by opposing to weaving that other particular form of con- 
crete labor (in this instance tailoring), which produces the equivalent of the prod- 
uct of weaving. Just as the coat in its bodily form became a direct expression of 
value, so now does tailoring, a concrete form of labor, appear as the direct and 
palpable embodiment of human labor generally" (Kapital <vol. 1>, p. 71). 27 This 



is what Marx is referring to when he writes in the sentence preceding this passage: 
"In the value-expression of the commodity, the tables are turned." At this point a 
note: "This inversion, whereby the sensuous-concrete counts only as a phenome- 
nal form of the abstract-general — rather than the abstract-general as a property 
of the concrete — is characteristic of the expression of value. ... If I say: Roman 
law and German law are both systems of law, my statement is perfectly self-evi- 
dent. But if I say: the law, that abstract concept, realizes itself in Roman law and 
in Germanlaw, those concrete legal systems, my context becomes mystical" (p. 71) 
("Die Wertform oder der Tauschwert"). [X4a,l] 

"When I state that coats or boots stand in a relation to linen because linen is the 
universal incarnation of abstract human labor, the absurdity of the proposition is 
manifest. Nevertheless, when the producers of coats and boots compare those 
articles with linen, or, what is the same thing, with gold or silver, as the universal 
equivalent, they express the relation between their own private labor and the 
collective labor of society in precisely this absurd form." Karl Marx, Das Kapital, 
<vol. 1 > , ed. Korsch (Berlin, 1932), p. 88 ("Fetischcharakter"). 2l! [X4a,2] 

"Political economy has . . . never . . . asked the question why labor is represented 
by the value of its product, and labor-time by the magnitude of that value. These 
formulas, which bear it stamped upon them in unmistakable letters that they 
belong to a state of society in which the process of production has the mastery over 
man, instead of being controlled by him — such formulas appear to the bourgeois 
intellect to be as much a self-evident necessity imposed by nature as productive 
labor itself." Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1>, ed. Korsch, p. 92-93 ("Der 
Fetischcharakter der Ware mid sein Geheimnis"). 29 [X4a,3] 

An extremely important passage relating to the concept of the "creative" is 
Marx's comment on the beginning of the first paragraph of the Gotha Program, 
"Labor is the source of all wealth and all culture": "The bourgeois have very 
good grounds for falsely ascribing supernatural creative power to labor, since pre- 
cisely from the fact that labor depends on nature, it follows that the man who 
possesses no other property than his labor power must, in all conditions of 
society and culture, be the slave of other men who have made themselves owners 
of the material conditions of labor." Karl Marx, Randglossen mm Programm der 
deutschen Arbeiterpartei, ed. Korsch (Berlin and Leipzig, 1922), p. 22. 3 ° [X5,l] 

"Within the cooperative society based on common ownership of the means of 
production, the producers do not exchange their products; just as little does the 
labor employed on the products appear here at the value of these products, as a 
material quality possessed by them, since now, in contrast to capitalist society, 
individual labor exists no longer in an indirect fashion, but directly as a compo- 
nent part of the total labor. The phrase 'proceeds of labor' . . . thus loses all 
meaning." The passage refers to the demand for "a fair distribution of the pro- 



ceeds of labor." Marx, Raiidglossen zum Programm der deutschen Arbeiter partei 
(Berlin and Leipzig, 1922), pp. 25, 24. :il [X5,2] 



"In a higher phase of communist society, after the enslaving subordination of the 
individual to the division of labor, and therewith also the antithesis between men- 
tal and physical labor, has vanished; after labor has become not only a means of 
life but life's chief necessity; after the productive forces have also increased with 
the all-round development of the individual . . . — only then can the narrow hori- 
zon of bourgeois right be crossed in its entirety and society inscribe on its banners: 
'From each according to his ability, to each according to his needs!'" Marx, 
Raiidglossen zum Programm der deutschen Arbeiter partei (Berlin and Leipzig, 
1922), p. 27. 32 [X5,3] 

Marx in his critique of the Gotha Program of 1875: "Lassalle knew the Communist 
Manifesto by heart. ... If, therefore, he has falsified it so grossly, he has done so 
only to put a good face on his alliance with absolutist and feudal opponents against 
the bourgeoisie." Marx, Raiidglossen zum Programm der deutschen Arbeiter- 
partei, <ed. Korsch,> p. 28.'^ [X5,4] 

Korsch directs attention to a "scientific insight that is fundamental to the overall 
understanding of Marxist communism, though today it is often looked upon by the 
adversaries of Marxism, and even by many of its proponents, as 'meaningless' — 
the insight, namely, that iheivages of labor are not, as bourgeois economists like to 
think, the value (or price) of the labor, but 'only a masked form of the value (or 
price) of the labor power, which is sold as a commodity on the labor market well 
before its productive utility (as labor) begins in the operation of the capitalist 
proprietor." Karl Korsch, Introduction to Marx, Raiidglossen zum Programm 
der deutschen Arbeiter partei, ed. Korsch (Berlin and Leipzig, 1922), p. 17. 

[X5a,l] 

Schiller: "Common natures pay with what they do; noble natures, with what 
they are." :w The proletarian pays for what he is with what he does. [X5a,2] 

"In the course of the labor process, labor passes continually out of a state of unrest 
into a state of being, out of the form of motion into the form of objectivity. At the 
end of one hour's spinning, that act is represented by a definite quantity of yarn; 
in other words, a definite quantity of labor, namely that of one hour, has been 
objectified in the cotton. We say 'labor' because the work of spinning counts here 
only insofar as it is the expenditure of labor power in general, and not insofar as it 
is the specific work of the spinner. . . . Raw material and product appear here [in 
the production of surplus value] in quite a new light, very different from that in 
which we viewed them in the labor process pure and simple. The raw material 
serves now merely as an absorbent of a definite quantity of labor. . . . Definite 
quantities of product, these quantities being determined by experience, now rep- 
resent nothing but definite quantities of labor, definite masses of crystallized labor 



time. They are notlungmore than the materialization of so many hours or so many 
clays of social labor." Karl Marx, Das Kapital <vol. 1>, ed. Korsch (Berlin 
<1932>), p. 191 ("WertbildungsprozeB"). 35 [X5a,3] 



The petty-bourgeois-idealist theory of labor is given an unsurpassed formulation 
in Sinunel, for whom it figures as the theory of labor per se. And with this, the 
moralistic element — here in antimaterialist form — is registered very clearly. 
"One may . . . assert in very general terms that . . . the distinction between mental 
and manual labor is not one between mental and material nature; that, rather, the 
reward is ultimately required in the latter case only for the internal aspect of 
work, for the aversion to exertion, for the conscription of will power. Of course, 
this intellectuality, which is, as it were, the thing-in-itself behind the appearance of 
work . . . , is not really intellectual but resides in emotion and the will. It follows 
from this that it is not coordinated with mental labor but rather is its basis. For at 
first the objective content . . . , the result . . . , the demand for reward is produced 
not in it but in . . . the expenditure of energy that it requires for the production of 
this intellectual content. In that an act of the soul is revealed to be the source of 
value . . . , physical and 'mental' labor contain a common (one might say, mor- 
ally) value-grounding base, through which the reduction of labor value as such to 
physical labor loses its philistine and brutal materialistic appearance. This is 
roughly the case with theoretical materialism, which acquires a completely new 
and more seriously discussible basis if one emphasizes that matter itself is also a 
conception, not an essence which, ... in the absolute sense, stands opposed to the 
soul but which in its cognizability is completely determined by the forms and 
presuppositions of our intellectual organization." Of course, with these reflec- 
tions (<Philosophie des Geldes (Leipzig, 1900), > pp. 449-450), Sinunel is playing 
devil's advocate, for he does not want to admit the reduction of labor to physical 
labor. Indeed there is also, according to him, a valueless labor that still requires 
an expenditure of energy. "This means, however, that the value of labor is 
measured not by its amount but by the utility of its result!" Sinunel goes on to 
reproach Marx, as it appears, for confusing a statement of fact with a demand. 
He writes: "socialism, in fact, strives for a . . . society in which the utility value of 
objects, in relation to the labor time applied to them, forms a constant" (<ibid.,> 
p. 451). "In the third volume of Capital, Marx argues that the precondition of all 
value, of the labor theory too, is use value. Yet this means that so many parts of 
the total social labor time are used in each product as come in relation to its 
importance in use. . . . The approximation to this completely Utopian state of 
affairs seems to be technically possible only if, as a whole, nothing but the . . . 
unquestionably basic life necessities are produced. For where this is exclusively 
the case, one work activity is of course precisely as necessary and useful as the 
next. In contrast, however, as long as one moves into the higher spheres in which, 
on the one hand, need and estimation of utility are inevitably more individual 
and, on the other, the intensity of labor is more difficult to prove, no regulation of 
the amounts of production could bring about a situation in which the relation- 
ship between need and labor applied was everywhere the same. On these points, 



all the threads of the deliberations on socialism intertwine. At this point, it is clear 
that the . . . difficulty . . . increases in relation to the cultural level of the prod- 
uct — a difficulty whose avoidance, of course, must limit production to that of the 
most primitive, most essential, and most average objects." Georg Simmel, Philoso- 
phic des Geldes (Leipzig, 1900), pp. 451-453. 36 With this critique, compare the 
counter-critique of this standpoint by Korsch, X9,l. [X6;X6a] 

"The individual signilicance of different objects of equal value is degraded 
through their exchangeability — however indirectly or imaginary this may be. . . . 
The disparagement of the interest in the individuality of a commodity leads to a 
disparagement of individuality itself. If the two sides to a commodity arc its quality 
and its price, then it seems logically impossible for the interest to be focused on 
only one of these sides; for 'cheapness' is an empty word if it does not imply a low 
price for a relatively good quality. . . . Yet this conceptual impossibility is psycho- 
logically real and effective. The interest in the one side can be so great that its 
logically necessary counterpart completely disappears. The typical instance of one 
of these cases is the 'fifty-cent bazaar.' The principle of valuation in the modern 
money economy fi nds its clearest expression here. It is not the commodity that is 
the center of interest here but the price — a principle that in former times not only 
would have appeared shameless but would have been absolutely impossible. It has 
heen rightly pointed out that the medieval town . . . lacked the extensive capital 
economy, and that tbis was the reason for seeking the ideal of the economy, not so 
much in the expansion (which is possihle only through cheapness) as in the quality 
of the goods offered." Georg Simmel, Philosophic des Geldes (Leipzig, 19M), 



"Political economy is now no longer a science of commodities. ... It becomes a 
direct science of social labor": "in its present unambiguous, and definite, form of 
labor producing a commodity for another person — that is, of lahor formally paid 
to its full value but actually exploited . . . , actually collective labor performed hy 
proletarian wage laborers ... to whom . . . the productive power of what would he 
under otherwise similar conditions the produce of an isolated worker, now in- 
creased a thousandfold hy the social division of labor, stands opposed in the form 
of capital." <Karl> Korsch <Karl Marx, manuscript), vol. 2, p. 47. :,s Compare 



On the bungled reception of technology. "The illusions in this sphere are 
reflected quite clearly in the terminology that is used in it, and in which a mode of 
thinking, proud of its . . . freedom from myth, discloses the direct opposite of 
these features. To think that we conquer or control nature is a very childish 
supposition, since ... all notions of . . . conquest and subjugation have a proper 
meaning only if an opposing will has been broken. . . . Natural events, as such, 
are not subject to the alternatives of freedom and coercion. . . . Although . . . this 
seems to be just a matter of terminology, it does lead astray those who think 
superficially in the direction of anthropomorphic misinterpretations, and it does 



pp. 411-112." 



[X7,l] 



Xll,l. 



[X7,2] 



show that the mythological mode of thought is also at home within the natural- 
scientific worldview." Georg Simmel, Philosophic des Geldes (Leipzig, 1900), 
pp. 520-521. 39 It is the great distinction of Fourier that he wanted to open the 
way to a very different reception of technology. [X7a,l] 

"The . . . doctrine of 'surplus value,'' already largely anticipated ... by the classic 
hourgeois economists and their earliest socialist adversaries, . . . and the reduc- 
tion of the 'free labor contract' of the modern wage laborer to the sale of the 
'commodity labor-power,' first acquire their real efficacy through the transfer of 
economic thought from the field of the exchange of commodities ... to the field of 
material production . . . — that is, through the transition from . . . surplus value, 
existing in the form of goods and money, to . . . surplus labor, performed by real 
workers in the workshop under the social domination exerted upon them by the 
capitalist owner of the workshop." Korsch <Karl Marx, manuscript), vol. 2, 
pp. 41-42." [X7a,2] 

Korsch, vol. 2, p. 47, cites a phrase from Marx <Das Kapital, vol. 1, 4th ed. 
(Hamburg, 1890), pp. 138-139>". "the hidden haunts of production, on whose 
threshold we are faced with the inscription: 'No admittance except on busi- 
ness."" 1 Compare Dante's inscription on the Gate of Hell, and the "one-way 
street." [X7a,3] 

Korsch defines surplus value as the "particularly 'deranged' form which the gen- 
eral fetishism attached to all commodities assumes in the commodity called 'lahor- 
power.'" Karl Korsch, Karl Marx, manuscript, vol. 2, p. 53. 12 [X8,l] 

"What Marx . . . terms the 'fetishism of the world of commodities' is only a scien- 
tific expression for the same thing that he had described earlier ... as 'human 
self -alienation.' . . . The most important substantive difference between this philo- 
sophical critique of economic 'self -alienation' and the later scientific exposition of 
the same problem consists in the fact that, in Das Kapital, Marx . . . gave his 
economic critique a deeper and more general significance by tracing back the 
delusive character of all other economic categories to the fetish character of the 
commodity. Though even now that most obvious and direct form of the 'self -al- 
ienation of the human being,' which occurs in the relation hetween wage labor and 
capital, keeps its decisive importance for the practical attack on the existing order 
of society, the fetishism of commodity labor power is, at this stage, for theoretical 
purposes regarded as a mere derivative form of the more general fetishism which is 
contained in the commodity itself. ... By revealing all economic categories to be 
mere fragments of one great fetish, Marx ultimately transcended all preceding 
forms and phases of bourgeois economic and social theory. . . . Even the most 
advanced classical economists remained caught in the . . . world of bourgeois ap- 
pearance, or fell back into it, because they had never succeeded in extending their 
critical analysis either to the derived forms of economic fetishism [unmasking of 
the gold and silver fetishes, the physiocratic illusion that rent grows out of the 



earth, the interpretation of interest and rent as mere fractions of industrial profit] 
or to that general fundamental form which appears in the value-form of the labor 
products as commodity and in the value-relations of the commodities themselves." 
Korsch, Karl Marx, <vol. 2,> pp. 53-57. " [X8,2] 

"From the bourgeois point of view, the individual citizen thinks of 'economic' 
things and forces as of something entering into his private life from without. . . . 
According to the new conception, however, individuals in all they do are moving, 
from the outset, within definite social circumstances that arise from a given stage 
in the development of material production. . . . Such high ideals of bourgeois 
society as that of the free, self -determining individual, freedom and equality of all 
citizens in the exercise of their poJitical rights, and equality of all in the eyes of the 
law are now seen to be nothing but correlative concepts to the fetishism of the 
commodity. . . . Only by keeping the people unconscious of the real contents of 
those basic relations of the existing social order . . . , only through the f etishistic 
transformation of the social relations between the class of capitalists and the class 
of wage laborers, resulting in the 'free and unhampered' sale of the 'commodity 
labor-power' to the owner of 'capital,' is it possible in this society to speak of 
freedom and equality." Korsch, Karl Marx, <vol. 2,> pp. 75-77 ,' M [X8a,l] 

"The individual and collective bargaining over the conditions of sale of the com- 
modity labor-power still belongs entirely to the world of fetishistic appearance 
<Schein>. Socially considered, and together with the material means of produc- 
tion, the propertyless wage laborers selling, through a 'free labor contract,' their 
individual labor-powers for a certain time to a capitalist entrepreneur are, as a 
class, from the outset and forever, a common property of the possessing class, 
which alone has the real means of labor at its disposal. It was therefore not the 
whole truth that was revealed by Marx in the Communist Manifesto when he said 
that the bourgeoisie had . . . replaced the veiled forms of exploitation practiced 
during the . . . Middle Ages by an altogether 'unveiled exploitation.' The bourgeoi- 
sie replaced an exploitation embroidered with religious and political illusions by a 
new and more refined system of concealed exploitation. Whereas in earlier epochs 
the openly proclaimed relations of domination and servitude appeared as the 
immediate springs of production, in the bourgeois period it is ... , conversely, 
production that is . . . the pretext . . . for the . . . exploitation of laborers." 
<Korsch,> Karl Marx, <vol. 2,> pp. 64-65. * 5 [X8a,2] 

On the doctrine of value: "The idea that there is an 'equality' inherent in all kinds 
of labor, by which economists are entitled to regard qualitatively different kinds 
of labor ... as quantitatively different portions of a total quantity of 'general 
labor,' which forms the basis of the economic concept of value, is so little the 
discovery of a natural condition underlying the production and exchange of 
commodities that this 'equality' is, on the contrary, brought into existence by the 
social fact that, under the conditions prevailing in present-day capitalist 'com- 
modity production,' all labor products are produced as commodities for such 



exchange. In fact, this 'equality' appears nowhere else than in the 'value' of the 
commodities so produced. The full development of the economic theory of 'labor 
value' coincided with a stage of the historical development when human labor, 
not just as a category but in reality, had long ceased to be, as it were, organically 
connected with either the individual or with small productive communities and, 
the barriers of the guilds having fallen under the new bourgeois banner of 'free- 
dom of trade,' every particular kind of labor was treated henceforth as equivalent 
to every other particular kind of labor. It was precisely the advent of these 
historical and political conditions that was expressed (unconsciously, of course) 
by the classical economists when they traced back the 'value' appearing in the 
exchange of commodities to the quantities of labor incorporated therein, though 
most of them believed they had thus disclosed a natural law. . . . Those minor 
followers in the wake of the great scientific founders of political economy, no 
longer accustomed to such audacity of scientific thought, who have later patheti- 
cally bewailed the 'violent abstraction' by which the classical economists and 
Marxism, in tracing the value relations of commodities to the amounts of labor 
incorporated therein, have 'equaled the unequal,' must be reminded of the fact 
that this 'violent abstraction' results not from . . . economic science but from the 
real character of capitalist commodity production. The commodity is a born leveler." 
Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 2, pp. 66-68. In "reality," of course, the "particular kinds 
of labor performed in the production of the various useful things are, according 
to Marx, effectively different also under the regime of the law of value" (ibid., 
p. 68). 40 This in opposition to Simmel; compare X6a. [X9] 

"Marx and Engels . . . pointed out that the equality-idea resulting from the epoch 
of bourgeois commodity-production and expressed in the economic 'law of value' 
is still bourgeois in its character. It is therefore only ideologically incompatible 
with the exploitation of the working class through capital, but not in actual prac- 
tice. The socialist Ricardians, ... on the basis of the economic principle that 'it is 
labor alone which bestows value,' . . . wanted to transform all men into actual 
workers exchanging equal quantities of labor. . . . Marx replied that 'this equali- 
tarian relation ... is itself nothing but the reflection of the actual world; and that 
therefore it is totally impossible to reconstitute society on the basis of what is 
merely an embellished shadow of it. In proportion as this shadow takes on sub- 
stance again, we perceive that this substance, far from being the transfiguration 
dreamt of, is the actual body of existing society."' The citation from La Misere de 
la philosophic, in Korsch, vol. 2, p. 4. 47 [X9a,l] 

Korsch: In the bourgeois epoch, "the production of the products of labor is pretext 
and cover for the . . . exploitation and oppression of the laborers. The scientific 
method of concealing this state of affairs is called political economy." Its function: 
to shift "responsibility for all the waste and hideousness which is already found at 
the present stage of development of the productive forces of society, and which 
emerges catastrophically during economic crises, from the realm of human action 



to the sphere of so-called immutable, nature-ordained relations between things." 
Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 2, p. 65. "' [X9a,2] 



"The distinction between use value and exchange value, in the abstract form in 
which it had been made by the bourgeois economists, . . . did not provide any 
useful starting point for an . . . investigation of bourgeois commodity produc- 
tion. . . . With Marx, . . . use value is not defined as a use value in general, but as 
the use value of a commodity. This use value inherent in commodities ... is, 
however, not merely an extra-economic presupposition of their 'value.' It is an 
element of the value. . . . The mere fact that a thing has utility for any human 
being — say, for its producer — does not yet give us the economic definition of use 
value. Not until the thing has . . . utility 'for other persons' . . . does the economic 
definition of use value apply. Just as the use value of the commodity is economi- 
cally defined as a social use value (use value 'for others'), so is the . . . labor which 
goes into the production of this commodity defined economically as . . . labor 'for 
others.' Thus, Marx's commodity- producing labor appears as social labor in a 
twofold sense. It has . . . the general social character of being a 'specifically useful 
labor,' which goes to the production of a definite kind of social use value. It has, on 
the other hand, the specific historical character of being a 'generally social labor,' 
which goes to the production of a definite quantity of exchange value. The capacity 
of social labor to produce definite things useful to human beings . . . appears in the 
use value of its product. Its capacity for the production of a value and a surplus 
value for the capitalist (a particular characteristic of labor which derives from the 
particular form of the social organization of the labor process . . . within the 
present historical epoch) appears in the exchange value of its product. The fusion 
of the two social characteristics of commodity-producing labor appears in the 
'value-form' of the product of labor, or the form of commodity. " Korsch, Karl 
Marx <vol. 2 > , pp. 42-44.** [X10] 

"The earlier bourgeois economists, when speaking of labor as a source of wealth, 
had likewise thought of 'labor' in terms of the various forms of real work, though 
they did so only for the reason that their economic categories were still in the 
process of separation from their original material contents. . . . Thus, the Mercan- 
tilists, the Physiocrats, and so on successfully declared that the true source of 
wealth lies in the labor expended in the export industries, in trade and shipping, in 
agricultural labor, and the like. Even in Adam Smith — who, from the different 
branches of labor, definitely advanced to the general form of commodity-produc- 
ing labor — we find that concrete aspect retained, along with the new and more 
formalistic definition which is also expressed in bis system and was later to become 
the exclusive definition of value in the work of Ricardo, and by which labor is 
defined as an abstract and merely quantitative entity. This same abstract form of 
labor, which he correctly defined as exchange-value-producing labor, he at the 
same time . . . declared to be the only source ... of the material wealth of the 
community, or use value. This doctrine, which still obstinately persists in 'vulgar' 
socialism ... is, according to Marx, economically false." By its assumptions, "it 



would he difficult to explain why, in present day . . . society, just those persons are 
poor who hitherto have had that unique source of all wealth at their exclusive 
disposal, and even more difficult to account for the fact that they remain unem- 
ployed and poor, instead of producing wealth hy their labor. . . . But ... in prais- 
ing the creative power of 'labor,' Adam Smith was thinking not so much of the 
forced lahor of the modern wage laborer, wliich appears in the value of commodi- 
ties and produces capitalistic profit, as of the general natural necessity of human 
labor. . . . Likewise, his naive glorification of the 'division of labor' achieved in 
these 'great manufactures,' hy which he understood the whole of modern capital- 
ist production, refers not so much to the extremely imperfect form of contempo- 
rary capitalistic division of labor ... as to the general form of human labor 
vaguely fused with it in his theoretical exposition." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 2, 



•ecisive passage on surplus value, the final statement no doubt standing in need 
of further clarification: "Similarly, the doctrine of surplus value, which is usually 
regarded as the more particularly socialist section of Marx's economic theory, is 
neither a simple economic exercise in calculation which serves to check a fraudu- 
lent statement of value received and expended by capital in its dealing with the 
workers, nor a moral lesson drawn from economics for the purpose of reclaiming 
from capital the diverted portion of the 'full product of the worker's labor.' The 
Marxian doctrine, as an economic theory, starts rather from the opposite princi- 
ple — that the industrial capitalist under 'normal' conditions acquires the labor- 
power of the wage laborers by means of a respectable and businesslike bargain, 
whereby the laborer receives the full equivalent of the 'commodity' sold by him, 
that is, of the 'labor-power' incorporated in himself. The advantage gained by the 
capitalist in this business derives not from economics but from his privileged 
social position as the monopolist owner of the material means of production, 
which permits him to exploit, for the production of commodities in his work- 
shop, the specific use value of a labor-power which he has purchased at its eco- 
nomic 'value' (exchange value). Between the value of the new commodities produced 
by the use of the labor-power in the workshop, and the prices paid for this labor to its 
sellers, there is, according to Marx, no economic or other rationally determinable relation 
whatever. The measure of value produced by the workers in the shape of their 
labor products over and above the equivalent of their wages (that is, the mass of 
'surplus labor 1 expended by them in producing this 'surplus value') and the quan- 
titative relation between this surplus labor and the necessary labor (that is, the 
'rate of surplus value' 1 or the 'rate oj Sexploitation' holding good for a particular time 
and a particular country) do not result from any exact economic calculation. 
They result from a battle between social classes." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 2, 



pp. 44-46. 50 



[XlOa] 



pp. 71-72. 51 



[Xll] 



"The ultimate meaning of this law of value, as shown in its workings hy Marx, . . . 
does not consist ... in supplying a theoretical basis for the practical calculations 
of the businessman seeking his private advantage, or for the economic-political 



measures taken hy the hourgeois statesman concerned with the general mainte- 
nance and furtherance of the capitalist surplus-making machinery. The final 
scientific purpose of the Marxian theory is, rather, L to reveal the economic laiv of 
motion of modern society, and this means, at the same time, the law of its historical 
development. "' Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 2, p. 70. 32 [Xlla,l] 

"Complete determination of the actual social character of that fundamental proc- 
ess of modern capitalist production which is one-sidedly presented by the hour- 
geois economists, as hy their adversaries from the camp of vulgar socialism, 
sometimes as production of consumer goods, and sometimes, hy contrast, as pro- 
duction of value or as simple profitmaking": a "production of surplus value by 
means of the production of value hy means of the production of consumer goods — 
in a society in which the material goods of production enter as capital into the 
process of production run by the capitalists, while the actual producers enter as 
the commodity labor-power." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, pp. 10-11. [Xlla,2] 

The experience of our generation: that capitalism will not die a natural death. 

[Xlla,3] 

The confrontation of Laf argue with Jaures is very characteristic for the great 
form of materialism. [ X 1 1 a,4] 



Sources for Marx and Engels: "From the bourgeois historians of the French Resto- 
ration, they took the concept of social class and of class struggle; from Ricardo, 
the economic basis of the class antagonism; from Proudhon, the proclamation of 
the modern proletariat as the only real revolutionary class; from the feudal and 
Christian assailants of the new economic order . . . , the ruthless unmasking of the 
liberal ideas of the bourgeoisie, the piercing hate-filled invective. Their ingenious 
dissection of the unsolvahle contradictions of the modern mode of production they 
took from the petty-bourgeois socialism of Sismondi; the humanism and the phi- 
losophy of action, from earlier companions among the left Hegelians, especially 
from Feuerbach; the meaning of political struggle for the working class, from the 
contemporary labor parties, French Social Democrats and English Chartists; the 
doctrine of revolutionary dictatorship, from the French Convention, and from 
Blanqui and his followers. Finally, they took from Saint-Simon, Fourier, and 
Owen the entire content of their socialist and communist agenda: the total up- 
heaval of the foundations of existing capitalist society, the aholition of classes . . . , 
and the transformation of the state into a mere administration of production." 
Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, p. 101 . 53 [X12,l] 

"Through Hegel, the new materialism of proletarian theory linked itself to the sum 
of hourgeois social thought of the preceding historical period. It did so in the same 
antithetical form in which, on a practical level also, the social action of the prole- 
tariat continued the previous social movement of the bourgeois class." Korsch, 
Karl Marx, vol. 3, p. 99. M [X12,2] 



Korsch says very justly (and one might well tlfink of de Maistre and Bonald in 
this connection): "To a certain extent, that . . . 'disenchantment' which, alter the 
conclusion of the great French Revolution, was first proclaimed hy the early 
French theorists of the counterrevolution and by the German Romantics . . . has 
in fact exerted a considerable influence upon Marx mainly through Hegel, and 
has thus directly entered into the . . . theory of the modern workers' movement." 
Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 2, p. 365' [X12,3] 

Concept of productive force: '"Productive force' is, in the first place, nothing else 
than the real earthly lahor-power of living men: the force ... by which . . . they 
produce . . . , under capitalistic conditions, 'commodities.' . . . Everything that 
increases the productive effect of human lahor-power ... is a new social 'produc- 
tive force.' To the material forces of production belong nature, technology, and 
science; hut to these forces helong, above all, the social organization itself and the 
. . . social forces created therein by cooperation and the industrial division of 
lahor." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, pp. 54-55. 56 [X12a,l] 

Concept of productive force: "The Marxian concept of 'social' productive forces 
has nothing in common with the idealistic abstractions of the old and new 'techno- 
crats,' who imagine they can define and measure the productive powers of society 
... in terms of natural science and technology. . . . 'Technocratic' prescriptions 
are not sufficient in themselves to remove the material ohstacles which oppose any 
important change in present-day capitalistic society. . . . There is more power of 
resistance in the mute force of economic conditions . . . than well-meaning techno- 
crats have ever dreamt of." Korsch, Karl Marx, vol. 3, pp. 59-60." [X12a,2] 

In Marx — "Das philosophische Manifest der historischen Rechtsschule," Rhein- 
ische Zeitung, 221 (1842) — there appears, as a point of inference, "the correct 
idea . . . that the primitive conditions are naive 'Dutch pictures' of the true condi- 
tions." Cited in Korsch, vol. I , p. 35. 5!l [X12a,3] 

Against Proudhon, who looks on maclfine and division of labor as antithetical to 
each other, Marx emphasizes how much the division of labor has been refined 
since the introduction of machinery. Hegel, for his part, emphasized that the 
division of labor, in a certain sense, opened the way for the introduction of 
machinery. "This parceling out of their content . . . gives rise to the division of 
labor. . . . The labor which thus becomes more abstract tends, on one hand, by its 
uniformity, to make labor easier and to increase production; on another, to limit 
each person to a single kind of technical skill, and thus produce more uncondi- 
tional dependence on the social system. The skill itself becomes in tliis way 
mechanical, and becomes capable of letting the machine take the place of hu- 
man labor." Hegel, Enzyklopadie der philosophuchen Wissenschqften im Grundrisse 
(Leipzig, 1920), p 436 (paragraphs 525-526) :* [X12a,4] 

The critique carried out hy the young Marx on the "rights of man," as separated 
from the "rights of the citizen." "None of the so-called rights of man goes heyond 



egoistic man. . . . Far from the rights of man conceiving of man as a species-being, 
species-life itself, society, appears as a framework exterior to individuals. . . . The 
only bond that holds them together is natural necessity, need and private interest, 
the conservation of their property and egoistic person. It is . . . paradoxical . . . 
that citizenship, the political community, is degraded by the political emancipa- 
tors to a mere means for the preservation of these so-called rights of man; that the 
citizen is declared to be the servant of egoistic man; that the sphere in which man 
behaves as a communal being is degraded below the sphere in which man behaves 
as a partial being; finally that it is not man as a citizen but man as a bourgeois who 
is called the real and true man. . . . The riddle has a simple solution. . . . What was 
the character of the old society? . . . Feudalism . The old civil society had a directly 
political character. . . . The political revolution . . . abolished the political charac- 
ter of civil society. It shattered civil society ... on the one hand into individuals, 
on the other hand into the material and spiritual elements that make up the . . . 
civil position of these individuals. . . . The formation of the political state and the 
dissolution of civil society into independent individuals, who are related by law 
just as the estate and corporation men were related by privilege, is completed in 
one and the same act. Man as member of civil society, unpolitical man, appears 
necessarily as natural man. The rights of man appear as natural rights, because 
self-conscious activity is concentrated upon political action. Egoistic man is the 
passive, given result of the dissolved society, ... a natural object. Political revolu- 
tion's . . . attitude to civil society, to the world of need, to work, private interests, 
and private law, is that they are ... its natural basis. Finally, man as a member of 
civil society counts for true man, for man as distinct from the citizen, because he is 
man in his sensuous . . . existence, while political man is only the abstract . . . 
man. . . . The abstraction of the political man is thus correctly described by Rous- 
seau: 'He who dares to undertake the making of a people's institutions ought to 
feel himself capable ... of changing human nature, of transforming each individ- 
ual, who is by himself a complete and solitary whole, into part of a greater whole 
from which he . . . receives his life and being' (Contrat social [London, 1782], vol. 
2, p. 67)." Marx, "Zur Judenfrage," in Marx and Engels, Gesamtausgabe, vol. 1, 
section 1 , 1 (Frankfurt am Main, 1927), pp. 595-599. 60 [X13] 

The property appertaining to the commodity as its fetish character attaches as 
well to the commodity-producing society — not as it is in itself, to be sure, but 
more as it represents itself and thinks to understand itself whenever it abstracts 
from the fact that it produces precisely commodities. The image that it produces 
of itself in this way, and that it customarily labels as its culture, corresponds to the 
concept of phantasmagoria (compare "Eduard Fuchs, Collector and Historian," 
section 3). fil The latter is denned by Wiesengrund "as a consumer item in which 
there is no longer anything that is supposed to remind us how it came into being. 
It becomes a magical object, insofar as the labor stored up in it comes to seem 
supernatural and sacred at the very moment when it can no longer be recognized 
as labor" (T. W. Adorno, "Fragmente fiber Wagner," £eitschrtft Jiir Sozialfor- 
schung, 8, nos. 1-2 [1939], p. 17). In connection with this, from the manuscript on 
Wagner (pp. 46-47) : "The art of Wagner's orchestration has banished . . . the 



role of the immediate production of sound from the aesthetic totality. . . . Anyone 
fully able to grasp why Haydn doubles the violins with a flute in piano might well 
get an intuitive glimpse into why, thousands of years ago, men gave up eating 
uncooked grain and began to bake bread, or why they started to smooth and 
polish their tools. All trace of its own production should ideally disappear from 
the object of consumption. It should look as though it had never been made, so as 
not to reveal that the one who sells it did not in fact make it, but rather appropri- 
ated to himself the labor that went into it. The autonomy of art has its origin in 
the concealment of labor." 62 [X13a] 




[Photography] 

Sun, look out for yourself! 

—A.J. Wiertz, Oeuvres litteraues (Paris, 1870), p. 374 

If one day the sun should sputter out, 
'Twill be a mortal who rekindles it. 

— Laurencin and Clairville, Le Roi Dagobert a I 'exposition de 1844, 
Theatre du Vaudeville, April 19, 1844 (Paris, 1844), p. 18 [lines 
spoken by the Genius of Industry] 



A prophecy from the year 1855: "Only a few years ago, there was horn to us a 
machine that has since become the glory of our age, and that day after day amazes 
the mind and startles the eye. / This machine, a century hence, will be the hrush, 
the piilctte, the colors, the craft, the practice, the patience, the glance, the touch, 
the paste, the glaze, the trick, the relief, the finish, the rendering. / A century 
hence, there will he no more hricklayers of painting; there will he only architects — 
painters in the full sense of the word. / And are we really to imagine that the 
daguerreotype has murdered art? No, it kills the work of patience, hut it does 
homage to the work of thought. / When the daguerreotype, this titan child, will 
have attained the age of maturity, when all its power and potential will have been 
unfolded, then the genius of art will suddenly seize it hy the collar and exclaim: 
'Mine! You are mine now! We are going to work together.'" A. J. Wiertz, Oeu vres 
litteraires (Paris, 1870), p. 309. From an article, "La Photographie," that ap- 
peared for the first time in June 1855, in La Nation, and ended with a reference to 
the new invention of photographic enlargement, which makes it possible to pro- 
duce life-size photos. Bricklayer-painters are, for Wiertz, those "who apply them- 
selves to the material part only," who are good at "rendering." [Yl,l] 

Industrialization in literature. On Scribe. "Although he made fun of thebig indus- 
trialists and moneymen, he picked up the secret of their success. It did not escape 
hi s eagle eye that, in the last analysis, all wealth rests on the art »f getting others to 
work for us. So then, groundbreaking genius that he was, he transferred the 
principle of the division of lahor from the workshops of tailors, cahinetmakers, 
and manufacturers of pen nibs to the ateliers of dramatic: artists, who, before this 



reform, working with only their one head and one pen, had earned merely the 
proletarian wages of the isolated worker. An entire generation of theatrical gen- 
iuses were in his debt for their training and development, their awards, and, not 
infrequently, even their riches and reputation. Scribe chose the subject, sketched 
out the main lines of the plot, indicated the places for special effects and briJliant 
exits, and his apprentices would compose the appropriate dialogue or verses. Once 
they had made some progress, their name would appear on the title page (next to 
that of the firm) as a just recompense, until the best would break away and begin 
turning out dramatical works of their own invention, perhaps also in their turn 
recruiting new assistants. By these means, and under the protection afforded by 
the French publishing laws, Scribe became a multimillionaire." Friedrich Kreys- 
sig, Studien zur franzdsischen Cidtur- und Liter aturgeschichte (Berlin, 1865) 
<pp. 56-57 >. [Yl,2] 



Beginnings of the revue. "The French fairy plays 1 currently in vogue are practi- 
cally all of recent origin; they derive, for the most part, from the revues which 
were customarily put on during the first fortnight of the new year, and which were 
a sort of fantastic retrospective of the year preceding. The character of these 
theatricals was initially quite juvenile; they were tailored specifically to schoolchil- 
dren, whose new year's festivities woidd be enlivened by productions of this kind." 
Rudolf Gottschall, "Das Theater und Drama des Second Empire," Unsere Zeit: 
Deutsche Revue — Monatsschrift zum Konversationslexikon (Leipzig, 1867), 
p. 931. [Yl,3] 

From the start, to keep this thought in view and to weigh its constructive value: 
the refuse- and decay-phenomena as precursors, in some degree mirages, of the 
great syntheses that follow. These worlds <?> of static realities are to be looked for 
everywhere. Film, their center. D Historical Materialism D [Yl ,4] 



Fairy plays: "Thus, for example, in Parisiens « Londres (1866), the English indus- 
trial exhibition is brought to the stage and illustrated by a bevy of naked beauties, 
who naturally owe their appearance to allegory and poetic invention alone." 
Rudolf Gottschall, "Das Theater und Drama des Second Empire," Unsere Zeit: 
Deutsche Revue — Monatsschrift zum Konversationslexikon (Leipzig, 1867) 
p. 932. D Advertising D [Yla,l] 



"'Fermenters' are catalytic agents which provoke or accelerate the decomposition 
of relatively large quantities of other organic substances. . . . These 'other organic 
substances,' however, in reaction to which the fermenting agents manifest their 
destructive power, are the historically transmitted stylistic forms." "The fermen- 
ters . . . are the achievements of modern technology. They . . . can be grouped 
according to three great material divisions: (1) iron, (2) the art of machinery, (3) 
the art of light and fire." Alfred Gotthold Meyer, Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 1907), 
from the preface (unpaginated). [Yla,2] 



The photographic reproduction of artworks as a phase in the struggle between 
photography and painting. [Yl a,3] 



"In 1855, within the framework of the great exhibition of industry, special sections 
on photography were opened, making it possible for the fi rst time to familiarize a 
wider public with the new invention. This exhibition was, in fact, the overture to 
the industrial development of photography. . . . The public at the exhibition 
thronged before the numerous portraits of famous and noted personalities, and we 
can only imagine what it must have meant to that epoch suddenly to see before it, 
in so lifelike a form, the celebrated fi gures of the stage, of the podium — in short, of 
public life — who, up until then, could be gazed at and admired only from afar." 
Gisela Freund, "Entwicklung der Photographie in Frankreich" [manuscript]. 



Worthy of mention in the history of photography is the fact that the same Arago 
who made the famous expert report in favor of photography submitted, in that 
same year (?), 1838, an unfavorable report on the railroad construction planned 
by the government: "In 1838, when the government sent them the bill autho- 
rizing construction of railroad lines from Paris to Belgium, to le Havre, and to 
Bordeaux, the parliamentary reporter Arago recommended rejection, and his 
recommendation was approved by a vote of 160 to 90. Among other arguments, 
it was claimed that the difference in temperature at the entrance and exit of the 
tunnels would bring on mortal chills and fevers." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire 



Some successful stage plays from midcentury: Dennery, La Nuufrage <Ship- 
wreck> de La Perouse (1859), Le Tremblement de terre de Martinique (1843), Les 
Bohemiens de Paris (1843); Louis Franfois Clairville, Les Sept Chateaux du di- 
able (1844), Les Pommes de terre malades (1845), Rothomago (1862), Cendrillon 
<Cinderella> (1866). Others by Duveyrier, Dartois. A Kaspar Hauser by Den- 
nery? 2 [Yla,6] 

"The most fantastic creations of fairyland are near to heing realized before our 
very eyes. . . . Each day our factories turn out wonders as great as those produced 
by Doctor Faustus with his book of magic." Eugene Buret, De la Misere des classes 
laborieuses en France et en Angleterre (Paris, 184 0), vol. 2, pp. 161-162. [Y2,l] 

From Nadar's splendid description of bis photographic work in the Paris cata- 
combs: "With each new camera setup, we had to test our exposure time empiri- 
cally; certain of the plates were found to require up to eighteen minutes. — 
Remember, we were still, at that time, using collodion emulsion on glass nega- 
tives. ... I had judged it advisahle to animate some of these scenes by the use of 
a human figure — less from considerations of picturesqueness than in order to 
give a sense of scale, a precaution too often neglected by explorers in this medium 
and with sometimes disconcerting consequences. For these eighteen minutes of 



D Exhibitions D 



[Yla,4] 



de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 386. 



[Yla,5] 



exposure time, I found it difficult to obtain from a human being the absolute, 
inorganic immobility I required. I tried to get round this difficulty by means of 
mannequins, which I dressed in workman's clothes and positioned in the scene 
with as little awkwardness as possible; this business did nothing to complicate 
our task. . . . This nasty ordeal of photographing in the sewers and catacombs, it 
must be said, lasted no less than three consecutive months. . . . Altogether, I 
brought back a hundred negatives. ... I made haste to offer the first hundred 
prints to the collections of the City of Paris put together by the eminent engineer 
of our subterranean constructions, M. Belgrand." Nadar, Quand j'etais photo- 
graphe (Paris <1900>), pp. 127-129.- 1 [Y2.2] 

Photography by artificial light with the aid of Bunsen elements. "I then had an 
experienced electrician install, on a solid part of my haleony overlooking the 
Boulevard des Capucines, the fifty medium-sized elements I'd been hoping for and 
which proved sufficient. . . . The regular retnrn, each evening, of this light (so 
little utilized at that time < 1860-1861 >) arrested the crowd on the boulevard and, 
drawn like moths to the (lame, a good many of the curious — both the friendly and 
the indifferent — came to climb up the stairs to our studio to find out what was 
going on there. These visitors (some well known or even famous) represented every 
social class; they were the more welcome insofar as they furnished us with a free 
supply of models, variously disposed toward the novel experience. It was thus that 
I managed to photograph, during these evening affairs, Nicpce de Saint- 
Victor, . . . Gustave Dore, . . . the financiers E. Pereire, Mires, Halphen, and 
many others." Nadar, Quand j'etais photographe (Paris), pp. 113, 115-116. 

[Y2,3] 

At the end of the grand prospectus Nadar offers on the state of the sciences: "Here 
we are, well beyond even the admirable assessment of Fourcroy, at the hour su- 
preme when the genius of the nation, in mortal danger, calls for discoveries." 
Nadar, Quand j'etais photographe , p. 3. [Y2,4] 

Nadar reproduces the Balzacian theory of the daguerreotype, which in turn 
derives from the Democritean theory of the eidola. (Nadar seems to be unac- 
quainted with the latter; he never mentions it.) Gautier and Nerval would have 
conformed to Balzac's opinion, "but even while speaking of specters, both of 
them . . . were among the very first to pass before our lens." Nadai", Quand j'etais 
photographe, p. 8. <Compare Y8a,l.> [Y2a,l] 

From whom does the conception of progress ultimately stem? From Condorcet? 
At any rate, by the end of the eighteenth century it does not yet appear to have 
taken very firm root. In the course of his eristic, among various suggestions for 
disposing of an adversary, Herault de Sechelles includes the following: "Lead 
him astray through questions of moral freedom and progress to the infinite." 
Herault de Sechelles, Theorie de ('ambition (<Paris,> 1927), p. 132. [Y2a,2] 



1848: "The revolution . . . arose in the midst of a very severe economic crisis, 
provoked, on the one hand, hy the speculations occasioned by railroad construe- 



tion and, on the other hand, by two consecutive bad harvests, in 1846 and 1847. 
Once again the city of Paris, . . . as far out as the faubourg Saint-Antoine, was torn 
hy hunger riots." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 245. 

[Y2a,3] 

Declaration regarding Ludovic Halevy: "You may attack me on any grounds you 
like — but photography, no, that is sacred." Jean Loize, "Emile Zola photogra- 
phe," Arts et metiers graphiqu.es, 45 (Fehruary 15, 1935) <p. 35>. [Y2a,4] 

"Whoever, at some point in his life, has had the chance to slip his head under the 
magic mantle of the photographer, and has peered into the camera so as to catch 
sight of that extraordinary miniature reproduction of the natural image — such a 
person will necessarily . . . have asked himself what is likely to come of our modern 
painting once photography has succeeded in fixing colors on its plates as well as 
forms." Walter Crane, "Nachahmung und Ausdruck in der Kunst," < trans. Otto 
Wittich,> Die neue Zeit, 14, no. 1 (Stuttgart < 1895-1896 >), p. 423. [Y2a,5] 

The effort to launch a systematic confrontation between art and photography 
was destined to founder at the outset. It could only have been a moment in <the> 
confrontation between art and technology — a confrontation brought about by 
history. [Y2 a ,6] 

The passage on photography from Lemercier's Lampelie et Daguerre: 

As, menaced by the hirdcatcher's pitiless nets, 
The meadowlark, rousing the muses of morning, 
Flutters and foolishly comes to alight on a 
Lark-mirror, reef of its dalliances, 
So Lampelie's (= sunlight's) flight is cut short 
By the chemical snare of Baguerre. 
The face of a crystal, convex or concave, 
Will reduce or enlarge every object it marks. 
Its fine, lucid rays, through the depths of the trap, 
Catch the aspect of places in rapid inscription: 
The image imprisoned within the glass plate, 
Preserved from all threatening contact, 
Retains its bright life; and certain reflections 
Break through to the most distant spheres. 

Nepomucene Lemercier, Sur la Decouverte de I'ingenieux peintre du diorama 
[Annual Puhlic Session of the Five Academies, Thursday, May 2, 1839 (Paris, 
1839), pp. 30-31], < Compare Q3a,l. > [Y3,l] 

"Photography . . . was first adopted within the dominant social class . . . : manu- 
facturers, factory owners and bankers, statesmen, men of letters, and scientists." 
Gisela Freund, "La Photographie au point de vue sociologique" (manuscript, 
p. 32). Is this accurate? Shouldn't the sequence be reversed? [Y3,2] 



Among the inventions that predate photography one should mention, in particu- 
lar, the lithograph (invented in 1805 by Alois Senef elder and introduced into 
France some years later by Philippe de Lasteyrie) and the physionotrace, which, 
for its part, represents a mechanization of the process of cutting silhouettes. 
"Gilles Louis Chretien, ... in 1786, . . . successfully invented an apparatus which 
. . . combined two different modes of making portraits : that of the silhouette and 
that of the engraving. . . . The physionotrace was based on the well-known prin- 
ciple of the pantograph. A system of parallelograms was articulated in such a way 
as to be capable of transfer to a horizontal plane. With the aid of a dry stylus, the 
operator traces the contours of a drawing. An inked stylus traces the lines of the 
first stylus, and reproduces the drawing on a scale determined by the relative 
position of the two styluses." Gisela Freund, "La Photographie au point de vue 
sociologique" (manuscript, pp. 19-20). The apparatus was equipped with a 
viewfinder. Life-size reproductions could be obtained. [Y3,3] 

The reproduction time with the physionotrace was one minute for normal sil- 
houettes, three minutes for colored ones. It is characteristic that the beginnings of 
the technologizing of the portrait, as instanced in this apparatus, set back the art 
of the portrait qualitatively as much as photography later advanced it. "One can 
see, on examining the quite enormous body of work produced with the 
physionotrace, that the portraits all have the same expression: stiff, schematic, 
and featureless. . . . Although the apparatus reproduced the contours of the face 
with mathematical exactitude, this resemblance remained expressionless because 
it had not been realized by an artist." Gisela Freund, "La Photographie au point 
de vue sociologique" (manuscript, p. 25). It would have to be shown here just 
why this primitive apparatus, in contrast to the camera, excluded "artistry." 

[Y3a,l] 

"In Marseilles, around 1850, there were at most four or five painters of mini- 
atures, of whom two, perhaps, had gained a certain reputation hy executing fifty 
portraits in the course of a year. These artists earned just enough to make a 
living. ... A few years later, there were forty to fifty photographers in Mar- 
seilles. . . . They each produced, on the average, between 1,000 and 1,200 plates 
per year, which they sold for 15 francs apiece; this made for yearly receipts of 
18,000 francs, so that, together, they constituted an industry earning nearly a 
million. And this same development can be seen in all the major cities of France." 
Gisela Freund, "La Photographie au point de vue sociologique" (manuscript, 
pp. 15-16), citing Vidal, Memoire de la seance du 15 novembre 1868 de la Societe 
Statistique de Marseille. Reproduced in the Bulletin de la Societe franqaise de 
Photographie (1871), pp. 37, 38, 40. [Y3a,2] 

On the interlinking of technological inventions: "When he wanted to experiment 
with lithography, Niepce, who lived in the country, ran into the greatest difficulties 
in procuring the necessary stones. It was then that he got the idea of replacing the 
stones with a metal plate and the crayon with sunlight." Gisela Freund, "La Pho- 



tographie au point de vue sociologique" (manuscript, p. 39), in reference to Victor 
Fouque, Niepce: La Verite sur Vinvention de la photographie (Chalons sur Saone, 
1867). [Y3a,3] 



Following Arago's report to the Chamher: "A few hours later, opticians' shops 
were hesieged; there were not enough lenses, not enough camera ohscuras to sat- 
isfy the zeal of so many eager amateurs. They watched with regretful eye the 
setting sun on the horizon, as it carried away the raw material of the experiment. 
But on the morrow, during the first hours of the day, a great number of these 
experimenters could he seen at their windows, striving, with all sorts of anxious 
precautions, to capture on a prepared plate the image of a dormer-window oppo- 
site, or the view of a group of chimneys." Louis Figuier, La Photographie: Exposi- 
tion et histoire des principales decouvertes scientifiques modemes (Paris, 1851); 
cited, without page reference, hy Gisela Freund (manuscript, p. 46). [Y4,l] 

In 1840, Maurisset puhlished a caricature of photography. [Y4,2] 

"In the area of portraiture, a concern with 'situation' and the 'position' of a man, 
a concern that demands from the artist the representation of a 'social condition' 
and an 'attitude, 1 can he satisfied, in the end, only with a full-length portrait." 
Wilhelm Watzold, Die Kunst des Portrats (Leipzig, 1908), p. 186; cited in Gisela 
Freund (manuscript, p. 105). [Y4,3] 

Photography in the age of Disderi: "The characteristic accessories of a photo- 
graphic studio in 1865 are the pillar, the curtain, and the pedestal table. Posed 
there, leaning, seated, or standing up, is the subject to be photographed: full- 
length, half-length, or bust. The background is rilled, according to the social rank 
of the model, with other paraphernalia, symbolic and picturesque." Further on 
comes a very characteristic extract (without page reference) from L'Art de la 
photographie (Paris, 1862), by Disderi, who says, among other things: "In making 
a portrait, it is not a question only ... of reproducing, with a mathematical 
accuracy, the fonns and proportions of the individual; it is necessary also, and 
above all, to grasp and represent, while justifying and embellishing, . . . the inten- 
tions of nature toward this individual." Gisela Freund, "La Photographie au 
point de vue sociologique" (manuscript, pp. 106, 108). — The pillars: emblem of 
a "well-rounded education." D Haussmannization 0 [Y4,4] 

Gisela Freund (manuscript, pp. 116-117) provides the following citation from Dis- 
deri's L'Art de la photographie: "Could not the photographer who was a master of 
all the effects of lighting, who had at his disposal a large and perfectly equipped 
studio with hlinders and reflectors, who was provided with hackdrops of all kinds, 
with settings, properties, costumes — could he not, given intelligent and skillfully 
dressed models, compose tableaux de. genre, historical scenes? Could he not aspire 
to sentiment, like Scheffer, or to style, like Ingres? Could he not treat of history, 



like Paul Delaroche in his painting The Death of the Due de Guise?" At the world 
exhibition of 1855, there were some photographs of this sort produced in England. 

[Y4a,l] 

The paintings of Delacroix escape the competition with photography, not only 
because of the impact of their colors, but also (in those days, there was no instant 
photography) because of the stormy agitation of their subject matter. And so a 
benevolent interest in photography was possible for him. [Y4a,2] 

What makes the first photographs so incomparable is perhaps this: that they 
present the earliest image of the encounter of machine and man. [Y4a,3] 

One of the — often unspoken — objections to photography: that it is impossible 
for the human countenance to be apprehended by a machine. Tliis the sentiment 
of Delacroix in particular. [Y4a,4] 

"Yvon, . . . pupil of Delaroche, . . . decided, one day, to reproduce the Battle of 
Solf erino. . . . Accompanied by the photographer Bisson, he goes to the Tuileries, 
gets the emperor to strike the right sort of pose, has him turn his head, and bathes 
everything in the light he wishes to reproduce. The painting that resulted in the 
end was acclaimed under the title The Emperor in a Kepi." Following this, a 
courtroom battle between the painter and Bisson, who had put his photo on the 
market. He is convicted. Gisela Freund, "La Photographie au point de vue soci- 
ologique" (manuscript, p. 152). [Y4a,5] 

Passing by the house of Disderi, Napoleon III halts a regiment he is leading down 
the boulevard, goes upstairs, and has himself photographed. [Y4a,6] 

In his capacity as president of the Societe des Gens de Lettres, Balzac proposed 
that all of the works of the twelve greatest living French authors should automat- 
ically he bought by the state. (Compare Daguerre.) [Y4a,7] 

"At the Cafe Hamelin, . . . some photographers and night owls." Alfred Delvau, 
Les Heures parisiennes (Paris, 1866), p. 184 ("Une Heure du matin"). [Y5,l] 

On Nepomucene Lemercier: "The man who spoke this pedantic, absurd, and bom- 
bastic idiom certainly never understood the age in which he lived. . . . Could any- 
one have done a better job of distorting contemporary events with the aid of 
outmoded images and expressions?" Alfred Michiels, Histoire des idees litteraires 
en France au XlX e siecle (Paris, 1863), vol. 2, pp. 36-37. [Y5,2] 

On the rise of photography. — Communications technology reduces the informa- 
tional merits of painting. At the same time, a new reality unfolds, in the face of 
which no one can take responsibility for personal decisions. One appeals to the 
lens. Painting, for its part, begins to emphasize color. [Y5,3] 



"Steam" — "Last word of him who died on the Cross!" Maxime Du Camp, Les 
Chants modernes (Paris, 1855), p. 260 ["La Vapeur"]. [Y5,4] 



In "La Vapeur," part 3, Du Camp celebrates steam, chloroform, electricity, gas, 
photography. Maxime Du Camp, Les Chants modernes (Paris, 1855), pp. 265- 
272. "La Faulx" <The Scythe) celebrates the reaper. [Y5,5] 

The first two stanzas, and the fourth, from "La Bobine" < The Bobbin> : 

INear the cascading river — 

Each of its breakwaters 

A swirling relay station — 

In the midst of green meadows, 

And the flowering alfalfa, 

They have raised up my palace — 

My palace of a thousand windows, 
My palace of rustic vines 
Which climb to the rooftops, 
My palace where, without repose, 
The nimble wheel booms out its song, 
The wheel of rackety voice! 

Like those vigilant elves of Norway 

Who waltz across the snows 

To escape the sprite that stalks them, 

I turn, I turn, I turn! 

Through the hours of day, never resting, 

I turn, and I turn through the night! 

Maxime Du Camp, Les Chants modernes (Paris, 1855), pp. 285-286. [Y5,6] 

"La Locomotive": "One day I shall be named a saint." Maxime Du Camp, Les 
Chants modernes (Paris, 1855), p. 301. This poem, like others, from the cycle 
"Chants de la matiere." [Y5,7] 

"The press, that immense and sacred locomotive of progress." Victor Hugo, 
speech at the banquet of September 16, 1862, organized by the publishers of Les 
Miserables in Brussels. Cited in Georges Batault, Le Pontife de la demagogic 
Victor Hugo (Paris, 1934), p. 131. [Y5,8] 

It is a century that does us honor, 
The century of inventions; 
Unfortunately, it is also 
The century of revolutions. 

<Louis> Clairville and Jules Cordier, Le Palais de Cristal, on Les Pmrisiens a 
Londres, Theatre de la Porte Saint-Martin, May 26, 1851 (Paris, 1851), p. 31. 

[Y5a,l] 



Self-portrait by Nadar. Courtesy of the J. Paul Getty Museum, Los Angeles. See Y5a,5. 

A locomotive pulling "several elegant coaches" appears on the stage. Clairville the 
elder and Delatour, 1837 aux enfers, Theatre du Luxemhonrg, Decemher 30, 1837 
(Paris, 1838) <p. 16>. [Y5a,2] 

lb be demonstrated: the influence of lithography on the literary genre of pano- 
ramas. What, in the case of the lithograph, is perfunctory individual charac- 
terization often becomes, with the writer, equally perfunctory generalization. 

[Y5a,3] 



Fournel, in 1858 ("Ce qu'on voit dans les rues de Paris"), reproaches the da- 
guerreotype for being unable to embellish. Disderi is waiting in the wings. On 



the other hand, Fournel condemns the conventional poses that relied on props 
such as Disderi had introduced. [Y5a,4] 



Without indicating his source, Delvau cites this description of Nadar's appear- 
ance: "His hair has the reddish glow of a setting sun; its reflection spreads across 
his face, where bouquets of curly and contentious locks spill this way and that, 
unruly as fireworks. Extremely dilated, the eyehall rolls, testifying to a truly un- 
appeasable curiosity and a perpetual astonishment. The voice is strident; the 
gestures are those of a Nuremberg doll with a fever." Alfred Delvau, Les Lions du 
jour (Paris, 1867), p. 219. [Y5 a ,5] 

Nadar, speaking of himself: "A born rebel where all bondage is concerned, impa- 
tient of all proprieties, having never been able to answer a letter within two years, 
an outlaw in all houses where you cannot put your feet up before the fire, and 
finally — so that nothing should be lacking, not even a last physical defect, to 
complete the measure of all these amiable qualities and win him more good 
friends — nearsighted to the point of blindness and consequently liable to the most 
insulting amnesia in the presence of any face which he has not seen more than 
twenty-five times at a distance of fifteen centimeters from his nose." Cited in Al- 
fred Delvau, Les Lions dujour (Paris, 1867), p. 222. [Y5a,6] 

Inventions from around 1848: matches, stearin candles, steel pens. [Y5a,7] 

Invention of the mechanical press in 1814. It was first utilized by the Times. 

[Y5a,8] 

Nadar's self-characterization: "Formerly a maker of caricatures . . ., ultimately a 
refugee in the Botany Bay of photography." Cited in Alfred Delvau, Les Lions du 
jour (Paris, 1867), p. 220. [Y6,l] 

On Nadar: "What will remain, one day, of the author of Le Miroir aux alouettes 
<Lark-Mirror> , of La Robe de Dejanire, of Quand j'etais etudiant? I do not 
know. What I do know is that, on a cyclopean pile on the island of Gozo, a Polish 
poet, Czeslaw Karski, has engraved in Arabic, but with Latin letters, 'Nadar of 
the fi ery locks passed in the air above this tower,' and that the inhabitants of the 
island very likely still have not left off worsluping him as an unknown God." 
Alfred Delvau, Les Lions du jour (Paris, 1867), pp. 223-224. [Y6,2] 

Genre photography: the sculptor Callimachus, on viewing an acanthus plant, in- 
vents the Corinthian capital. — Leonardo paints the Mona Lisa. — La Gloire et le 
pot aufeu <Glory and Beef Stew > . Cabinet des Estampes, Kc 164a, 1. [Y6,3] 




An English etching of 1775, a genre scene, shows an artist making a silhouette of 
<her> model by following the shadow which the latter casts on the wall. It is 
entitled The Origin of Painting. Cabinet des Estampes, Kc 164a, 1. [Y6,4] 



NADAR eievari: !a PhotG^raphie a k bmlm k 1'Art 

Nadar in his balloon. Lithograph by Honore Daumier, 1862. The caption reads: 
"Nadar raising photography to the level of art." See Y6,2. 

There is a certain relation between the invention of photography and the inven- 
tion of the mirror-stereoscope by Wheatstone in 1838. "It displays two different 
images of the same object: to the right eye, an image representing the object in 
perspective as it would be seen from the viewpoint of the right eye; to the left eye, 
an image of the object as it would appear to the left eye. This gives rise to the 
illusion that we have . . . before us a three-dimensional object" (Egon Friedell, 
Kulhtrgeschichte der Neuieit, vol. 3 [Munich, 1931], p. 139). The exactness re- 



quired of the images forming the material for this stereoscope would correspond 
more readily to photography than to painting. [Y6,5] 

The apparent affinity between Wiertz and Edgar Quinet needs to be studied. 

[Y6,6] 

"The lens is an instrument like the pencil or the brush, and photography is a 
process like drawing or engraving; for what the artist creates is the emotion and 





The Origin of Fainting. Etching by an English artist, 1775. Courtesy of the Bibliotheque 
Nationale de France. See Y6,4. 



not the process. Whoever possesses the necessary skills and happy inspiration will 
be able to obtain the same effects from any one of these means of reproduction." 
Louis Figuier, La Photographie au Salon de 1859 (Paris, 1860), pp. 4-5. [Y6,7] 



"M. Quinet . . . seemed to want to introduce into poetry the sort of genre that the 
English painter <John> Martin inaugurated in art. . . . The poet . . . did not 
shrink from having the cathedrals kneel before the sepulcher of Our Lord, and 
showing the towns absorbed in combing out upon their shoulders, with a comh of 
gold, their tresses of blond columns, while the towers danced a strange roundelay 
with the mountains." Alfred Nettement, Histoire de la litterature francaise sous le 
gouvernement de Juillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 1, p. 131. [Y6a,l] 

"At the world exhibition of 1855, photography, despite its lively claims, could gain 
no entry into the sanctuary of the hall on the Avenue Montaigne; it was condemned 
to seek asylum in the immense bazaar of assorted products that filled the Palais de 
lTndustrie. In 1859, under growing pressure, the museum committee . . . ac- 
corded a place in the Palais de lTndustrie for the exhibition of photography; the 
exhibition site was on a level with that made availahle to painting and engraving, 
but it had a separate entrance and was set, so to speak, in a different key." Louis 
Figuier, La Photographie au Salon de 1859 (Paris, 1860), p. 2. [Y6a,2] 

"A skillful photographer always has a distinctive style, just like a draftsman or a 
painter; . . . and, what's more, . . . the distinctive character of the artistic spirit of 
each nation is clearly revealed ... in the works produced in different coun- 
tries. ... A French photographer could never be confused . . . with one of his 
colleagues from across the Channel." Louis Figuier, La Photographie au Salon de 
1859 (Paris, 1860), p. 5. [Y6a,3] 

The beginnings of photomontage come out of the attempt to ensure that images 
of the landscape retain a painterly character. "M. Silvy has an excellent system 
for producing his pictures. . . . Instead of imposing, on all his landscapes indiffer- 
ently, one and the same sky formed from a uniform negative, he takes the 
trouble, wherever possible, of separately enhancing, one after the other, the view 
of the landscape and that of the sky which crowns it. Here resides one of the 
secrets of M. Silvy." Louis Figuier, La Photographie au Salon de 1859 (Paris, 
1860), p. 9. [Y6a,4] 

It is significant that Figuier's booklet on the Salon of Photography of 1859 begins 
with a review of landscape photography. [Y6a,5] 

At the Salon de Photographie of 1859, numerous "voyages": to Egypt, to Jerusa- 
lem, to Greece, to Spain. In his account, Figuier observes: "Hardly had the prac- 
tical processes of photography on paper come to be understood than a whole band 
of operators rushed forth ... in all directions, to bring us back views of monu- 
ments, buildings, and ruins taken in all known lands of the world." Hence the new 



voyages photo graphiques. Louis Figuier, La Photographie au Salon de 1859, 
p. 35. [Y6a,6] 



Among the works of reproduction to which Figuier gives special attention, in his 
Photographie au Salon, are the reproduction of the Raphael cartoon from Hamp- 
ton Court — "the work . . . that dominates the entire photographic exhibition of 
1859" (p. 51) — and that of a manuscript of Ptolemy's Geography dating from the 
fourteenth century and kept, at that time, in the monastery of Mount Athos. 

[Y7,l] 

There were portraits specifically designed to be viewed through the stereoscope. 
This fashionwas current in England, above all. [ Y7,2] 

Figuier (pp. 77-78) does not omit to mention the possibility that "microscopic 
photographs" could be used in time of war to transmit secret messages (in the form 
of miniature telegrams). [Y7,3] 

"One thing . . . made clear by a careful inspection of the exhibition , , . is the 
present perfection ... of the positive proof. Five or six years ago, photography 
was almost exclusively concerned with the negative, . . . and it was rare indeed 
that anyone gave thought to the utility of printing from a positive image." Louis 
Figuier, La Photographie au Salon de 1859 (Paris, 1860), p. 83. [Y7,4] 

Symptom, it would seem, of a profound displacement: painting must submit to 
being measured by the standard of photography: will be in agreement with 
the public in admiring . . . the fine artist who . . . has appeared this year with a 
painting capable of holding its own, in point of delicacy, with daguerrian prints." 
This assessment of Meissonnier is from Auguste Galimard, Examen du Salon de 
1849 (Paris <1850>), p. 95. [Y7,5] 

"Photography in verse" — synonym for a description in verse. Edouard Fournier, 
Chroniques et le.gendes des rues de Paris (Paris, 1864), pp. 14-15. [Y7,6] 

"The world's fi rst movie theater opened on December 28, 1895, in the basement of 
the Grand Cafe, 14 Boulevard des Capucines, in Paris. And the first receipts for a 
brand of spectacle that would later net billions amounted to the considerable sum 
of thirty-live francs!" Roland Villiers, Le Cinema et ses merveilles (Paris <1930>), 
pp. 18-19. [Y7,7] 

"The year 1882 must be mentioned as a turning point in the history of photo- 
graphic reportage. It was the year in which the photographer Ottomar Anschiitz, 
from Leszno in Poland, invented the focal-plane shutter and thus made possible 
truly instantaneous photography." Europaische Dokumente: Historische Photos 
aus den Jahren 1840-1900, eel. Wolfgang Schade (Stuttgart, Berlin, Leipzig), 
p. [v]. [Y7.8] 



The first photographic interview was conducted hy Nadar with the ninety-seven- 
year-old French chemist Chevreul, in 1886. Europaische Dokumente: Historische 
Photos aus den Jahren 1840-1900, ed. Wolfgang Schade (Stuttgart, Berlin, 
Leipzig), p. 8-9. ' [Y7,9] 

"The first experiment to launch research into scientifically produced motion . . . 
was that of Doctor Pares in 1825. The details are well known: on one side of a small 
square of cardhoard, he had drawn a cage, and on the other side, a bird; by 
turning the piece of cardhoard briskly on an axis, ... he cansed the two images to 
appear in succession, yet the bird seemed to be in the cage, just as though there 
had been only one drawing. This phenomenon, which in itself is the basis of all 
cinema, depends on the principle of the persistence of retinal impressions. . . . 
Once this principle is admitted, it is easy to understand that a movement decom- 
posed, and presented in a rhythm of ten images or more per second, is perceived 
by the eye as a perfectly continuous movement. The first apparatus that actually 
wrought the miracle of artificial motion is the Phenakistiscope, constructed by the 
Belgian physician Plateau as early as 1833. Still known today as an optical toy, 
this apparatus . . . consisted of a disk on which were mounted drawings repre- 
senting the successive phases of an action, whieh could be observed as the disk was 
rotated. . . . There ... is an obvious relation here to the animated cartoons of 
today. . . . Researchers quickly saw . . . the interest in having ... a succession of 
photographs substituted for the drawings. Unfortunately, . . . only images running 
at the minimum speed of a tenth of a second could work with such a design. For 
this, we had to await the gelatinobromide plates that permitted the first instanta- 
neous exposures. It was astronomy that initially provided an occasion for testing 
chronophotography. On December 8, 1874, thanks to the passage of the planet 
Venus past the sun, the astronomer <Pierre> Janssen was able to try out his 
invention of a photographic revolver, which took a picture every seventy sec- 
onds. . . . But the process of chronophotography was soon to become much more 
rapid. ... It was . . . when Professor Marey entered the lists with his photographic 
rifle . . . that the result of twelve images per second was obtained. . . . All these 
experiments were, up to then, purely scientific (!) in character. The researchers 
who conducted them . . . saw in chronophotography a simple 'means for analyzing 
the movements of humans and animals.' ... At this point, in 1891, we meet with 
. . . Edison, who had constructed two devices. One, the Kinetograph, was for 
recording; the other, the Kinetoscope, was for projection. . . . Meanwhile, in 1891, 
Marey's collaborator, < Georges> Demeny, had built a machine that allowed for the 
recording of pictures and sound at the same time. His Phonoscope . . . was the first 
talkie." Roland Villiers, he Cinema et ses merveilles (Paris <1930>), pp. 9-16 
("Petite Histoire du cinema"). [Y7a, 1] 

"Let us take as an example of technical progress, which actually is regress, the 
perfection of photographic devices. They are much more sensitive to light than the 
old boxes with which daguerreotypes were produced. One hardly need concern 
oneself about lighting when operating them now. They have a number of other 



advantages to boot, especially where photographing faces is concerned, although 
the portraits which one makes with them are doubtless much poorer than before. 
With the older, less light-sensitive apparatus, multiple expressions would appear 
on the plate, which was exposed for rather long periods of time; hence, on the final 
image there would be a livelier and more universal expression, and this had its 
function as well. Nevertheless, it would most certainly be false to regard the new 
devices as worse than the older ones. Perhaps something is missing from them 
which tomorrow will be found, and one can always do other things with them 
besides photographing faces. Yet what of the faces? The newer devices no longer 
work to compose the faces — but must faces be composed? Perhaps for these de- 
vices there is a photographic method which would decompose faces. But we can be 
quite sure of never linding this possibility realized . . . without fi rst having a new 
function for such photography." Brecht, Versuche <8-10 (Berlin, 1931)>, p. 280 
("Der Dreigroschenprozefi" <The Threepenny Lawsuit>). [Y8,l] 

The Bisson brothers, on the occasion of the visit by Napoleon III to their photo- 
graphic studio on December 29, 1856 — a visit which they say coincided with the 
eleventh anniversary of the opening of their business — published in pamphlet 
form a poem entitled, "Souvenir de la visite de Leurs Majestes l'Empereur et 
lTmperatrice aux magasins de Messieurs Bisson freres." The pamphlet comprises 
four pages. The first two pages contain another poem, "La Photographic." Both 
texts are unrelievedly fatuous. [Y8,2] 

"It is worth noting that the better photographers of our day are not concerned to 
belabor the question . . . : 'Is photography an art?' ... By their aptitude for 
creating the evocative shock, [these photographers] prove their power of expres- 
sion, and that is their revenge for the skepticism of Daumier." George Besson, La 
Photographief ran^aise (Paris <1936>), pp. 5-6. [Y8,3] 

The famous statement by Wiertz on photography can very likely be elucidated 
through the following statement by Wey (of course, it becomes clear by this that 
Wiertz's prognosis was mistaken): "In reducing to naught whatever is inferior to 
it, the heliograph predestines art to new forms of progress; in recalling the artist 
to nature, it links him with a source of inspiration whose fecundity is unlimited." 
Francis Wey, "Du Naturalisme dans 1'art" [La Lwniere, April 6, 1851]; cited in 
Gisele Freund, La Photographic en France an XIX' siecle (Paris, 1936), p. 111. 

[Y8,4] 

"If we consider only the practical side of divination, then to believe that previous 
events in a man's life . . . can be directly represented by the cards he shuffles and 
cuts, antl which are then stacked by the fortuneteller in accordance with some 
mysterious laws, is to believe the absurd. But this criterion of absurdity once ruled 
out the harnessing of steam; it still rules out aerial navigation; it ruled out many 
inventions: gunpowder, printing, the telescope, engraving, and also the most re- 
cent great discovery of our time, the daguerreotype. If anyone had come and told 
Napoleon that a man or a building is incessantly, and at all hours, represented by 



an image in the atmosphere, that all existing objects have there a kind of specter 
which can be captured and perceived, he would have consigned him to Charenton 
as a lunatic. . . . Yet that is what Daguerre's discovery proved." Honore de Balzac, 
he Cousin Pons, in Oeuvres completes, vol. 18, La Comedie humaine: Scenes de la 
vie parisienne, 6 (Paris, 1914), pp. 129-130. "Just as physical objects in fact 
project themselves onto the atmosphere, so that it retains this specter which the 
daguerreotype can fix and capture, in the same way ideas . . . imprint themselves 
on what we must call the atmosphere of the spiritual world, . . . and live on in it 
spectrally (one must coin words in order to express unnamed phenomena). If that 
be granted, certain creatures endowed with rare faculties are perfectly capahle of 
discerning these forms or these traces of ideas" (ibid., p. 132). 5 [Y8a,l] 

"Degas was the lirst to attempt, in his pictures, the representation of rapid move- 
ment such as we get in instantaneous photography." Wladimir Weidle, Les Abeilles 
d'Aristee (Paris <1936>), p. 185 ("L' Agonic de Tart"). [Y8a,2] 

What author is being cited by Montesquiou in the following passage, which is taken 
from a handwritten text forming part of a richly ornamented volume of memora- 
hilia shown in a display case at the Guys exhibition, in Paris, in the spring of 1937? 
"And that, in a few hasty words, is how it was: the first exhibition of Constantin 
Guys — newest surprise to be served up to us from his treasure-box of malice by 
M. Nadar,' 1 the famous aeronaut and (should I say?) illustrious photographer. 
Surely, this ingenious spirit, steeped in the past, has a right to that title, in its 
noblest acceptation, and according to the admirable definition provided hy a pow- 
erful and subtle thinker, in the course of some sublime pages: 'Humanity has also 
invented, in its evening peregrinations — that is to say, in the nineteenth century — 
the symbol of memory; it has invented what had seemed impossible; it has invented 
a mirror that remembers. It has invented photography. '" <Ernest Hello, L 'Homme 
(Paris 1872), p. 172> [Y8a,3] 

"At no time in the past has art responded to aesthetic exigencies alone. The 
Gothic sculptors served God in working for his faithful; the portraitists aimed at 
verisimilitude; the peaches and the hares of a Chardin had their place in the 
dining room, above the family dinner table. Individual artists in certain cases 
(and they were few and far between, to be sure) may have suffered from this state 
of affairs; art as a whole could only profit from it. This is the way it has been 
throughout all the great artistic epochs. In particular, the naive conviction that 
they were only 'copying nature' was as salutary for the painters of those fortu- 
nate epochs as it was theoretically unjustifiable. The old Dutch masters looked 
upon themselves less as artists than as photographers, so to speak; it is only 
today that the photographer is absolutely determined to pass for an artist. For- 
merly, an engraving was above all a document, less exact (on the average) and 
more artistic than a photograph, but having the same function, fulfilling by and 
large the same practical role." Together with this important insight we have, from 
this author, another no less important, according to which the photographer is 
distinguished from the graphic artist not through the fundamentally greater real- 



ism of his works, but through a more highly mechanized technique, which does 
not necessarily diminish his artistic activity. None of this prevents the author 
from going on to say: "What is unfortunate [my italics] is not that today's photog- 
rapher believes himself an artist; what is unfortunate is that he actually has at 
his disposal certain resources proper to the art of the painter." Wladimir Weidle, 
Les Abeilles d'Amtee (Paris), pp. 181-182, 184 ("LAgonie de l'art"). Compare 
Jochmann on the epic poem: "The general interest which such a poem excites, 
the pride with wliich an entire people repeats it, its legislative authority over 
opinions and sentiments — all this is grounded in the fact that it is nowhere taken 
as a mere poem." [Carl Gustav Jochmaim,] Uber die Sprache (Heidelberg, 1828), 



In the period around 1845, illustrations arc already appearing in advertisements. 
On Jnly 6 of this year, the Societe Generale des Annonc.es, which handled publicite 
for he Journal des debats, he Constitutionnel, and La Presse, puhlishes a pro- 
spectus that says: "We call . . . your attention to the illustrations which, for some 
years now, a great many husinesses have heen in the hahit of joining to their 
announcements. The power of captivating the eye hy the form and disposition of 
the letters is perhaps less decisive than the advantage to be gained hy filling ont an 
often arid exposition with drawings and designs." P. Datz, Histoire de la publicite, 



In his "Morale du joujou" <Philosophy of Toys>, Baudelaire mentions, together 
with the stereoscope, the phenakistiscope. "The phenakistiscope, which is older, is 
less well known. Imagine some movement or other — for example, a dancer's or a 
juggler's performance — divided up and decomposed into a certain numher of 
movements. Imagine that each one of these movements — as many as twenty, if you 
wish — is represented by a complete figure of the juggler or dancer, and that these 
are all printed round the edge of a circular piece of cardhoard." Baudelaire then 
describes the mirror mechanism that enahles the viewer to see, in the twenty 
openings of an outer circle, twenty little figures moving rhythmically in a continu- 
ous action. Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), p. 146.' Compare Y7a,l. 



It was the pantograph, whose principle is equally at work in the physiognotrace, 
that undertook to transcrihe automatically a linear scheme originally traced on 
paper to a plaster mass, as required hy the process of photosculpture. Serving as 
model in this process were twenty-four simultaneous views taken from different 
sides. Gautier foresees no threat to sculpture from this process. What can prevent 
the sculptor from artistically enlivening the mechanically produced figure and its 
ground? "But there is more: for all its extravagance, the century remains economi- 
cal. Pure art seems to it something expensive. With the cheekiness of a parvenu, it 
sometimes dares to haggle over masterworks. It is terrified of marble and 
hronze. . . . But photosculpture is not so daunting as statuary. . . . Photosculpture 
is used to modest proportions and is content with a set of shelves for pedestal, 




[Y9.1] 



vol. 1 (Paris, 1.894), pp. 216-217. 



[Y9,2] 



[Y9a,l] 



happy to have faithfully reproduced a beloved countenance. ... It does not dis- 
dain an overcoat, and is not embarrassed by crinolines; it accepts nature and the 
world as they are. Its sincerity accommodates everything, and though its plaster 
casts of stearin can be transposed into marble, into terracotta, into alabaster, or 
into bronze, ... it never asks, in return for its work, what its elder sister would 
demand in payment; it requests only the cost of materials." Theophile Gautier, 
"Photosculpture: 42 Boulevard de 1'Etoile," <Le Moniteur universeb (Paris, 
< January 4,> 1864), pp. 10-11. The essay includes, at the end, a woodcut with 
photosculptures, one of which portrays Gautier. [ Y9a,2] 

"He refined the iJlusionary art of the panorama and invented the diorama. He 
joined forces with another painter, and on July 11, 1822, on the Rue de Sanson in 
Paris . . . , he opened an exhibition whose fame quickly spread. . . . This inventor 
and entrepreneur . . . was dubbed a knight in the Legion of Honor. Midnight Mass, 
the Temple of Solomon, Edinburgh in the sinister glow of a conllagration, and 
Napoleon's Tomb transfigured naturally by the aureole of a rosy sunset: such are 
the wonders that were shown here. A translator of Daguerre's own account of his 
two inventions (1839) portrays very nicely the multiplicity of lights involved, great 
and small, splendid, secret, and terrifying: 'The spectator sits in a small amphi- 
theater; the stage seems to liim covered by a curtain which is still bathed in dark- 
ness. Gradually, however, this darkness yields to a twilight . . . : a landscape or 
prospect emerges more clearly; the dawn is beginning. . . . Trees stand out from 
the shadows; the contours of mountains, of houses, become visible . . . ; the day 
has broken. The sun climbs ever higher; through the open wintlow of a house one 
sees a kitchen stove slowly llaming up, while in a corner of the landscape a group of 
campers is ranged round a cooking pot, under which the campfi re is beginning to 
blaze; a forge becomes visible, its furnace giving off sparks as though . . . from 
continuous stoking. After a while, . . . the daylight begins to wane, and the reddish 
luster of the artificial flame grows stronger; once again there is advancing twilight, 
and finally nocturnal gloom. Soon, however, the moonlight asserts its rights, and 
the region is visible anew in the soft tints of the illuminated night: a mariner's 
lantern Hares up on board a ship that is anchored in the foreground of a harbor; in 
the background of an admirahle perspective of a church, the candles on the altar 
are lighted, and the previously invisihle parishioners are now illuminated by the 
rays streaming down from the altar; or grief-stricken men are standing at the edge 
of a landslide, its devastations lit up hy the moon at the very spot where, shortly 
before, the Ruffiherg had formed the hackground to the lovely Swiss landscape 
of Goldau."' Cited as "Ubersetzer von Daguerres Schrift iiher seine beiden Er- 
findungen (1839)," in Dolf Sternherger, "Das wunderhare Licht: Zum 150 Ge- 
hurtstag Daguerres," Frankfurter Zeitung <21>, November 1937. [Y10,l] 

The entrance of the temporal factor into the panoramas is brought about 
through the succession of times of day (with well-known lighting tricks). In this 
way, the panorama transcends painting and anticipates photography. Owing to 
its technological formation, the photograph, in contrast to the painting, can and 



must be correlated with a well-defi ned and continuous segment of time (exposure 
time). In this chronological specifiability, the political significance of the photo- 
graph is already contained in mice. [ Y10,2] 



"In these deplorable times, a new industry has developed, which has helped in no 
small way to confirm fools in their faith and to ruin what vestige of the divine might 
still have remained in the French mind. Of course, this idolatrous multitude was 
calling for an ideal worthy of itself and in keeping with its own nature. In the 
domain of painting and statuary, the present-day credo of the worldly-wise ... is 
this: 'I believe . . . that art is, and can only be, the exact reproduction of na- 
ture. . . . Thus, if an industrial process could give us a result identical to nature, 
that would be absolute art.' An avenging God has heard the prayers of this multi- 
tude. Daguerre was his messiah. And then they said to themselves: 'Since photog- 
raphy provides us with every desirable guarantee of exactitude' (they believe that, 
poor madmen!), 'art is photography.' From that moment onward, our loathsome 
society rushed, like Narcissus, to contemplate its trivial image on the metallic 
plate. A form of lunacy, an extraordinary fanaticism, took hold of these new 
sun-worshippers. Strange abominations manifested themselves. By bringing to- 
gether and posing a pack of rascals, male and female, dressed up like carnival- 
time butchers and washerwomen, and in persuading these 'heroes' to 'hold' their 
improvised grimaces for as long as the photographic process required, people 
really believed they could represent the tragic and charming scenes of ancient 
history. ... It was not long before thousands of pairs of greedy eyes were glued to 
the peepholes of the stereoscope, as though they were the skylights of the infinite. 
The love of obscenity, which is as vigorous a growth in the heart of natural man as 
self-love, could notlet slip such a glorious opportunity for its own satisfaction. . . . 
[p. 223] ... I am convinced that the badly applied advances of photography — like 
all purely material progress, for that matter — have greatly contributed to the 
impoverishment of French artistic genius, already so rare. . . . Poetry and pro- 
gress are two ambitious men who hate each other with an instinctive hatred, and 
when they meet along the same road one of them must give way." Charles Baude- 
laire, Oeuvres <cd. Le Danteo, vol. 2 <Paris, 1932>, pp. 222-224 ("Salon de 
1859: Le Public moderne et la photographie"). 8 [YlOa.l] 

Baudelaire speaks, in "Quelques Caricaturistes frangais" (apropos of Monnier), 
of "the cruel and surprising charm of daguerreotypes." Charles Baudelaire, Oeu- 
vres, ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 197." [Yl0a,2] 

"Poetry and progress are two ambitious men who hate each other with an instinc- 
tive hatred, and when they meet along the same road, one of them must give way. If 
photography is allowed to supplement art in some of its functions, it will soon have 
supplanted or corrupted it altogether, thanks to the stupidity of the multitude 
which is its natural ally. It is time, then, for it to return to its true duty, which is to 
he the servant of the sciences and arts — hut the very humhle servant, like printing 
or shorthand, which have neither created nor supplemented literature. Let it 



hasten to enrich the tourist's album and restore to his eye the precision which his 
memory may lack; let it adorn the naturalist's library, and enlarge microscopic 
animals; let it even provide information to corroborate the astronomer's hypothe- 
ses. In short, let it be the secretary and clerk of whoever needs absolute factual 
exactitude in his profession — up to that point nothing could be better. Let it rescue 
from oblivion those tumbling ruins, those books, prints, and manuscripts which 
time is devouring, precious things whose form is dissolving and which demand a 
place in the archives of our memory — it will be thanked and applauded. But if it 
be allowed to encroach upon the domain of the impalpable and the imaginary, 
upon anything whose value depends solely upon the addition of something of a 
man's soul, then it will be so much the worse for us!" Charles Baudelaire, Oeuvres, 
ed. Le Dantec, vol. 2, p. 224 ("Salon de 1859: Le Public moderne et la pho- 



Cocteau's Les Manes de la tour Eiffel 11 can perhaps be considered a "critique of 
the snapshot," insofar as in this piece the two aspects of shock — its technological 
function in the mechanism and its sterilizing function in the experience — both 



tographie"). 10 



[Yll.l] 



come into play. 



[Y11.2] 



[The Doll, The Automaton] 

I was always, among human beings, the only doll 1 with a heart. 

— Amalie Winter, Memoiren einer Berliner Puppe,Jiir Kinder v*n 5 bis 10 
Jahren imd fur deren Mutter (Leipzig, 1852), p. 93 

Where, instead of the clock, the eyes indicate the hours. 

— Franz Dingelstedt, Ein Roman; cited in Adolf Strodtmann, Dichter- 
prtfile, vol. 1 (Stuttgart, 1879), p. Ill 



"The clever Parisiennes . . . , in order to disseminate their fashions more easily, 
made use of an especially conspicuous reproduction of their new creations — 
namely, tailors' dummies. . . . These dolls, which still enjoyed considerable impor- 
tance in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, were given to little girls as 
playthings when their career as fashion figurines had ended." Karl Groher, Kin- 
derspielzeug aus alter Zeit (Berlin, 1927), pp. 31-32. D Fashion □ Advertising D 

[Zl.l] 



They are the true fairies of these arcades (more salable and more worn than the 
life-sized ones): the formerly world-famous Parisian dolls, which revolved on 
their musical socle and bore in their arms a doll-sized basket out of which, at the 
salutation of the minor chord, a lambkin poked its curious muzzle. When Hack- 
lander made use of this "newest invention of industrial luxury" for one of his 
fairy tales, he too placed the marvelous dolls in the dangerous arcade which sister 
Tinchen, at the behest of the f airy Concordia, has to wander in order finally to 
rescue her poor brothers. "Fearlessly, Tinchen stepped across the border into the 
enchanted land, all the while thinking only of her brothers. At first she noticed 
nothing unusual, but soon the way led through an enormous room entirely filled 
with toys. She saw small booths stocked with everything imaginable — carousels 
with miniature horses and carriages, swings and rocking horses, but above all the 
most splendid dollhouses. Around a small covered table, large dolls were sitting 
on easy chairs ; and as Tinchen turned her gaze upon them, the largest and most 
beautiful of these dolls stood up, made her a gracious bow, and spoke to her in a 
little voice of exquisite refinement." The child may not want to hear of toys that 



are bewitched, but the evil spell of this slippery path readily takes the form, even 
today, of large animated dolls. □ Advertising D [Zl,2] 



"The fashion is supposed to have been invented by Longchamps. I've not seen 
anything new, but tomorrow in their bulletins all the "Friendly Sprites," all the 
"Petits Couriers des Dames," all the "Psyches" will report on new attire that was 
already designed and available hefore Longchamps ever came on the scene. I 
strongly suspect that in many of the coaches, instead of the lady who would seem to 
he seated inside, there was only a dummy which the owners of these line vehicles 
had dressed according to their own taste in shawls and satins and silks." Karl 
Gutzkow, Btiefe am Par is (Leipzig, 1842), vol. 1, pp. 119-120. [Zl,3] 

From the Ombres Chinoises <Chinese Shadows) of the Palais-Royal: "A . . . 
demoiselle gave birth on stage, and the children could immediately scamper about 
like moles. There were four of them, and they danced together a few moments after 
the hirth in a pleasant quadrille. Another young woman started tossing her head 
vigorously, and in the twinkling of an eye a second demoiselle had stepped fully 
clothed from out of her head. This latter at once began dancing hut, the next 
minute, was seized in turn with head-shaking; these were lahor pains, and a third 
demoiselle stepped out of her head. She, too, immediately began dancing but soon 
took to tossing her head like the others, and out of her arose the fourth demoiselle. 
It continued in this manner until eight generations were there on the stage — all 
related to one another through spontaneous generation, like lice." J. F. Benzen- 
berg, Briefe geschrieben auf einer Reise nach Paris (Dortmund, 1805), vol. 1, 
p. 294. [Zl,4] 

At a certain point in time, the motif of the doll acquires a sociocritical sig- 
nificance. For example: "You have no idea how repulsive these automatons and 
dolls can become, and how one breathes at last on encountering a full-blooded 
being in this society." Paul Lindau, Der Abend (Berlin, 1896), p. 17. [Zl,5] 

"In a shop on the Rue Legendre, in Batignolles, a whole series of female busts, 
without heads or legs, with curtain hooks in place of arms and a percaline skin of 
arbitrary hue — bean hrown, glaring pink, hard black — are lined up like a row of 
onions, impaled on rods, or set out on tables. . . . The sight of this ehb tide of 
bosoms, this Musee Curtius of breasts, puts one vaguely in mind of those vaults in 
the Louvre where classical sculptures are housed, where one and the same torso, 
eternally repeated, beguiles the time for those who look it over, with a yawn, on 
rainy days. . . . How superior to the dreary statues of Venus they are — these dress- 
makers' mannequins , with their lifelike comportment; how much more provoca- 
tive these padded husts, which, exposed there, hring on a train of reveries: 
lihertine reveries, inspired by ephebic nipples and slightly hruised huhs; charita- 
ble reveries, recalling old breasts, shriveled with chlorosis or hloated with fat. — 
For one thinks of the sorrows of women who . . . experience the growing 
indifference of a husband, or the imminent desertion of a lover, or the final dis- 



arming of those charms which allowed them once to conquer, in the unavoidable 
battles they wage for the closed-up wallet of the man." J.-K. Huysmans, Croquis 
parisiens (Paris, 1886), pp. 129, 131-132 ("L'Etiage" <Ebb Tide>). [Zla,l] 



"Not long before the end of the Empire, a very special question arose: that of the 
Pupazzi. People wanted these wooden marionettes to perform Le Roi Prudhomme 
at the Theatre des Varietes. The cast of characters for this playlet included the 
Emperor, Emile Olivier, ... V. Hugo, . . . Gamhetta, . . . and Rochefort. . . . The 
piece had been performed in drawing rooms and even in the Tuileries. But these 
private performances did not in the least prepare for the effects of any public 
performance, and the authorities refused to allow . . . the theater to embark on 
this path." Victor Hallays-Dabot, La Censure dramatique et le theatre (1850- 
1870) (Paris, 1871), p. 86. [Zla,2] 

"In the competitions surrounding the material ornament ... of attire, the popu- 
larity of dolls is put to use. . . . The Little Bands (in which girls make up the 
majority) are entrusted with the presentation of dolls and mannequins, among 
which a choice is to be made." Charles Fourier, Le NouveauMon.de industriel et 
societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 252. [Zla,3] 

While writing Les Travailleurs de la mer <The Toilers of the Sea > , Victor Hugo 
kept before him a doll dressed in the antique garb of a Guernsey woman. Someone 
had procured it for him; it served as a model for Deruchette. [Zla,4] 

Marx explains that "the two material bases on which the preparations for ma- 
chine-operated industry proceeded within manufacture during the period from 
the sixteenth to the middle of the eighteenth century (the period in which manufac- 
ture was developing from handicraft into large-scale industry proper) were the 
clock and the mill (at first the corn mill, specifically, the water null). Both were 
inherited from the ancients. . . . The clock was the lirst automatic device applied 
to practical purposes; the whole theory of the production of regular motion was 
developed through it. Its nature is such that it is hased on a combination of semiar- 
tistic handicraft and direct theory. Cardanus, for instance, wrote ahout (and gave 
practical formulas for) the construction of clocks. German authors of the six- 
teenth century called clockmaking 'learned (nonguild) handicraft' and it would he 
possible to show from the development of the clock how entirely different the 
relation between science and practice was in the context of handicraft from what it 
is, for instance, in modern large-scale industry. There is also no doubt that in the 
eighteenth century the idea of applying automatic devices (moved by springs) to 
production was first suggested by the clock. It can be proved historically that 
Vaucanson's experiments along these lines had a tremendous influence on the 
imagination of English inventors. On the other hand, from the very beginning, as 
soon as the water mill was invented, the mill possessed the essential elements of the 
organism of a machine. The mechanical motive power. First, the motor, on which 
it depends; then the transmission mechanism; and finally the working machine, 



which deals with the material — each element existing independently of the others. 
The theory of friction, and with it the investigations into the mathematical forms 
of gear-wheels, cogs, and so forth, were all developed in connection with the mill; 
the same applies to the theory of measurement of the degree of motive power, of the 
best way of employing it, and so on. Almost all the great mathematicians since the 
middle of the seventeenth century, so far as they dealt with practical mechanics 
and worked out its theoretical side, started from the simple water-driven corn 
mill. And indeed this was why the name Miihle, 'mill,' which arose during the 
manufacturing period, came to be applied to all mechanical forms of motive power 
adapted to practical purposes. But in the case of the mdl, as in that of the press, 
the forge, the plough, and other implements, the work proper — that of beating, 
crushing, grinding, pulverizing, and so on — has been performed from the very 
first without human labor, even though the moving force was human or animal. 
This kind of machinery is therefore very ancient. . . . Hence, it is practically the 
only machinery found in the manufacturing period. The industrial revolution 
begins as soon as mechanisms are employed where, from ancient times, the final 
result has required human labor; hence not where, as with the tools mentioned 
above, the material actually to be worked up has never been dealt with by the 
human hand." Marx to Engels, January 28, 1863, from London [in Karl Marx and 
Friedrich Engels, Ausgewdhlte Briefe, ed. V. Adoratski (Moscow and Leningrad, 
1934), pp. 118-119]. 2 [Z2] 

In his study "La Mante religieuse: Recherches sur la nature et la signification du 
mythe" <The Praying Mantis: Investigations into the Nature and Meaning of 
Myth> , Caillois refers to the striking automatism of reflexes in the praying mantis 
(there is hardly a vital function that it does not also perform decapitated). He links 
it, on account of its fateful significance, with the baneful automatons known to us 
from myths. Thus Pandora: "automaton fahricated by the blacksmith god for the 
ruin of humankind, for that 'which all shall / take to their hearts with delight, an 
evil to love and embrace' (Hesiod, Works and Days, line 58). 3 We encounter some- 
thing similar in the Indian Krtya — those dolls, animated by sorcerers, which bring 
about the death of men who embrace them. Our literature as well, in the motif of 
femmes f atales, possesses the concept of a woman-machine, artificial, mechanical, 
at variance with all living creatures, and above all murderous. No douht psycho- 
analysis would not hesitate to explain this representation in its own terms by 
envisaging the relations hetween death and sexuality and, more precisely, by 
finding each amhiguously intimated in the other." Roger Caillois, "La Mante re- 
ligieuse: Recherches sur la nature et la signification du mythe," Mesures, 3, no. 2 
(April 15, 1937), p. 110. [Z2a,l] 



Baudelaire, in the section, "Les Femmes etles filles" < Women and Prostitutes) in 
his essay on Guys, cites the words of La Bruyere: "Some women possess an ar- 
tificial nobility which is associated with a movement of the eye, a tilt of the head, a 
manner of deportment, and which goes no further." Compare Baudelaire's "Le 



Mensonge." — In the same section, Baudelaire cites the concept of "the femina 
simplex of the Roman satirist" {L'Art romantique [Paris], p. 109). '' [Z2a,2] 

Beginnings of large-scale industry: "We find great numbers of peasants emigrating 
to the cities, where steam energy permits the concentration of factories that for- 
merly were scattered along the banks of rivers." Pierre-Maxime Schuhl, Ma- 
chinisme et philosophic (Paris, 1938), pp. 56-57. [Z2a,3] 

"Aristotle declares that slavery would cease to he necessary if only the shuttles and 
plectruins could set themselves going on their own. The idea accords admirably 
with his definition of the slave as animated instrument. ... By the same token, the 
ancient poet Pherecydes of Syros had told how the Dactyls, after huilding a new 
house for Zeus, had fashioned for him male and female servants as well. We are in 
the realm of fable. . . . Yet hefore three centuries have passed, an Anthology poet, 
Antiphilos of Byzantium, offers a response to Aristotle by singing of the invention 
of the water mill, which liberates women from the arduous task of grinding: 'Spare 
the hand that grinds the corn, 0 miller girls, and softly sleep. Let Chanticleer 
announce the morn in vain! Demeter has commanded that the girls' work be done 
by Nymphs, and now they skip lightly over the wheels, so that the shaken axles 
revolve with their spokes and pull round the load of revolving stones. Let us live 
the life of our fathers, and let us rest from work and enjoy the gifts that Demeter 
sends us." (Note: "Anthologie Palatine, vol. 9, p. 418. This epigram . . . has al- 
ready been related to the text of Aristotle, and for the first time, it would seem, hy 
Marx" — presumably, in Kapital, vol. 3 <trans. Molitor [Paris, 1924]>, p. 61.) 
Pierre-Maxime Schuhl, Machinisme et philosophic (Paris, 1938), pp. 19-20. ;> 

[Z3] 



[Social Movement] 

Reveal to these depraved, 
O Republic, by foiling their plots, 
Yout great Medusa face 
Ringed by red lightning. 

— French workers' song around 1850, cited in Adolf Stahr, £wei 
Monate in Pans (Oldenburg, 1851), vol. 2, p. 199 

Rabble of the faithless, the soulless, the rootless, 
Who want to wipe out every art and industry, 
lb crush underfoot the cult of the Cross, 
And drown in an ocean of blood and flames 
— Its waves have risen round the flanks of Paris — 
Temples, palaces, priests, peoples, and kings! 

— Edouard d'Angiemont, L Internationale (Paris, 1871), p. 7 
Palermo has Etna; Paris, lapemee. 

— Victor Hugo, Paris [Litterature et philosophie melee (Paris, 1867), 
pp. 466-467], cited in Georges Batault, Le Pontife de la demagogie: 
Victor Hugo (Paris, 1934), p. 203 



"Since the Surrealists constantly confuse moral nonconformism with proletarian 
revolution, they attempt, instead of following the course of the modern world, to 
relocate themselves to a historical moment when this confusion was still possible, 
a moment anterior to the Congress of Tours, anterior even to the development of 
Marxism: the period of the 1820s, '30s and '40s." Emmanuel Berl, "Premier 
Pamphlet," Europe, 75 (March 15, 1929), p. 402. And that is certainly no acci- 
dent. For, on the one hand, we have here elements — anthropological materialism, 
hostility toward progress — which are refractory to Marxism, while, on the other 
hand, the will to apocatastasis speaks here, the resolve to gather again, in revolu- 
tionary action and in revolutionary drinking, precisely the elements of the "too 
early" and the "too late," of the first beginning and the final decay. [al,l] 

It is really imperative that we understand, in precisely its polemical bearing, the 
apotheosis of organization and of rationalism which the Communist party has to 



promote unceasingly in the face of feudal and hierarchical powers, and that we be 
clear about the fact that the movement itself comprehends mystical elements as 
well, although of an entirely different sort. It is even more important, naturally, „ 
not to confuse these mystical elements, which pertain to corporality, with relig- v> 
ious elements. [al,2] sr 



Episode of the February Revolution. On the twenty-third, at eleven o'clock in the 
evening, a fusillade on the Boulevard des Capucines: twenty-three dead. "The 
corpses are immediately paraded through the streets in a masterly, romantic mise 
en scene. 'Midnight is about to sound. The boulevards arc stiJl faintly lighted by 
the fading illumination [the celebratory illumination occasioned by the retreat of 
Guizot]. The doors and windows of the houses and shops are shut, everyone 
having returned home with heavy hearts. . . . All of a sudden, a muffled rumbling 
is heard on the paving stones, and some windows are cautiously opened. ... In a 
cart drawn by a white horse, with a bare-armed worker holding the reins, five 
cadavers are arranged in horrible symmetry. Standing on the shaft is a child of the 
working class, sallow of complexion, a fixed and ardent look upon his face, his arm 
extended, nearly immobile, as though to represent the Genius of Vengeance; lean- 
ing backward, this boy lights up, with the beams of his torch, the body of a young 
woman whose livid neck and hosom are stained with a long trail of blood. From 
time to time another worker, positioned behind the cart, raises this lifeless body 
with a muscular arm and — his torch all the while emitting sparks and flakes of 
fire — casts his savage gaze over the crowd, shouting, "Vengeance! Ven- 
geance! They are slaughtering the people!" "To Arms!" respond some voices; and 
the corpse falls back into the hottom of the cart, which continues on its way."' 
(Daniel Stern). Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 396. 
D Lighting D [al,3] 



The masses of workers mobilized by Haussmann were compared — unfavorably — 
to those incorporated in the national workshops of 1848. D Haussmann D [al,4] 

"The favorite readings of the working-class tailor are the histories of the Revolu- 
tion of 1789. He likes it when these texts develop the idea that this revolution was a 
good thing, and that it improved the condition of the working class. He is inspired 
by the aura of drama lent to men and events by several famous authors. . . . Not 
perceiving that the principal cause of his social inferiority bes within himself, he 
likes to think that these men are the models for those who, in forging a new 
progress, will preserve him from all kinds of calamities." F. Le Play, Les Ouvriers 
europeens < Paris, 1855 >, p. 277. [al,5] 



"Street warfare today has its own technique; it was perfected, after the armed 
takeover of Munich <1848?>, in a curious little confidential work published with 
great secrecy hy the government in Berlin. One no longer advances through the 
streets; they are left empty. A path is opened within the interiors of houses, hy 



breaking through walls. As soon as one has taken a street, one organizes it; lines of 
communication are laid through the holes in the walls, while, to prevent the return 
of the adversary, one immediately mines the conquered ground. . . . Perhaps the 
clearest sign of progress, here, is that one need not concern oneself at all with 
sparing houses or lives. Compared with civil wars of the future, the episode of the 
Rue Transnonain <see al0a,5> will seem quite . . . innocent and archaic." Duhech 
and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 479. □ Haussmann □ [ala,l] 

Family hudget of a Parisian ragpicker, 1849-1851, according to F. Le Play, Les 
Ouvriers europeens (Paris, 1855), pp. 274—275. An excerpt: "Section 4. Expenses 
I'mr moral improvement, recreation, and health. . . . Instruction for the children: 
school fees paid by employer, 48 francs; books purchased, 1 franc 45 centimes; 
relief and ahns (workers at this level ordinarily give no alms at all). Recreation and 
festivities: meal taken together by the entire family at one of the bai-rieres of Paris 
(eight excursions per year), including wine, bread, and fried potatoes, 8 francs; 
meal of macaroni, with butter, cheese, and wine, taken on Christmas, Mardi Gras, 
Easter, and Pentecost: expenses included in the first section; chewing tobacco for 
the worker (cigar butts collected by the worker), 6.8 kilos worth 5-34 francs; snuff 
for the wife (purchased), 2.33 kilos worth 18 francs 66 centimes; toys and other 
gifts given to the child, 1 franc. . . . Correspondence with relatives: letters from 
the worker's brothers living in Italy, on average one per year. . . . Note: The main 
resource for the family, in case of accidents, is private charity. . . . Savings for the 
year (the worker — altogether incapable of prudent habits, and desirous, above 
all, of giving his wife and little girl all the comforts they deserve — never manages to 
save anything; he spends, day by day, all he earns)." [ala,2] 

"The damage done to the morality of the improvident worker by the substitution 
of antagonism for solidarity consists precisely in the loss of all opportunity of 
exercising his natural virtues in the only way that would be practicable for him. 
The devotion displayed in the wish to do well, in the concern for the interests of the 
employer, or in the sacrifice of needs and desires irreconcilable with the regularity 
of work is, in fact, more feasible for the worker than the devotion which would 
lead to assisting his comrades with a sum of money. . . . The faculty of giving aid 
and protection of any consequence belongs to the upper classes; it can manifest 
itself among the workers as an immediate and short-lived enthusiasm, but the 
virtue most within their reach is clearly the performance of their task for the 
employer." M. F. Le Play, Les Ouvriers europeens (Paris, 1855), "Printed by 
authority of the Emperor and the Imperial Press," p. 278. [ala,3] 

The "small landowners of the suburbs." "They cultivate vines . . . that produce a 
wine of inferior quality, for which the consumption tax in effect inside the capital 
ensures a profitable market in the suburbs." F. Le Play, Les Ouvriers europeens 
(Paris, 1855), p. 271. [ala,4] 

"There is a tropical plant that for years remains unremarkable and brings forth 
no blossom, until finally, one day, an explosion resounds like a rifie shot and, some 



clays later, from out of this thicket a wonderful giant of a flower arises, whose 
growth is so rapid that one can witness its unfolding with the naked eye. Just so 
paltry and stunted remained the French working class in a corner of society, until 
suddenly the explosion of the February Revolution was heard. But with that, a 
gigantic blossom shot up from the unremarkable bushes, and this bloom fuJl of sap 
and vitality, fuJl of beauty and significance, was called the association <a term 
derived from the Saint-Simonians> ." Siginund Englander, Geschichte der fran- 
zbsischen Arbeiter-Associutionen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 4, p. 217. [a2,l] 

Organization of the state workshops (ateliers nationaux) by Thomas. "It suffices 
to mention that Emile Thomas divided the workers into brigades and companies, 
and that their cliiefs were elected by universal suffrage of the workers. Every 
company had its flag, and Emile Thomas made use, for this organization, of other 
civil engineers and of students from the Ecole Polytechnique, who, through their 
youth, exerted a moral influence on the workers. . . . Nevertheless, although the 
minister of public works ordered the state engineers to come up with proposals for 
works . . . , the engineers in charge of bridges and roads decided not to comply with 
the minister's order, for in France there had long been a great rivalry between 
state engineers and civil engineers,' and it was the latter who directed the national 
workshops. Thomas was therefore left to his own resources, and he never could 
assign to such an army of workers, whose ranks were daily swelling, any sort of 
useful work. Thus, for example, he had trees from the outskirts of Paris brought 
into the city to be planted along the boulevards, because during the struggles of 
Fehruary the old trees on the boulevard had been cut down. The workers with the 
trees paraded slowly across Paris, singing as they went. . . . Other workers, who 
had the job, for example, of cleaning the railings of bridges, became an object of 
derision for passersby, and so the majority of these workers also wound up passing 
their time in mere cardplaying, singing, and the like. . . . The national workshops 
before long became . . . the gathering place for all sorts of vagabonds and idlers, 
whose lahor consisted exclusively in marching through the streets with their stan- 
dard hearers, here and there mending the pavement or turning up earth, but on 
the whole- — singing and shouting, ragtag and unruly — doing whatever came into 
their heads. . . . One day, there suddenly appeared on the scene 600 actors, paint- 
ers, artists, and agents, who together announced that, since the republic was 
guaranteeing work to all citizens, they too were putting forward their claim. 
Thomas made them inspectors." Siginund Englander, Geschichte der franzbsi- 
schen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 2, pp. 268-271. □ Flaneur □ 

[a2,2] 



"Neither the mayors nor the police commissioners, who had to sign the certificates 
attesting to the hearers' eligibility to work in Paris, could maintain the slightest 
control in view of the threats circulating against them. In their anxiety, they even 
gave certificates to ten-year-old children, who, with these in hand, presented 
themselves for admission to the national workshops." Sigmund Englander, 
Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 1864), vol. 2, 
p. 272. [a2a,l] 



Episodes in the June Insurrection: "Women were seen pouring boiling oil or hot 
water on the soldiers while shrieking and bellowing. In many places, insurgents 
were given hrandy mixed with various ingredients, so that they would he excited to 
madness. . . . Some women cut off the sexual organs of several imprisoned guards- 
men, and we know that an insurgent dressed in woman's clothing beheaded a 
number of captured officers . . .; people saw the heads of soldiers on pikes that 
were planted atop barricades. Many things recounted were pure invention — for 
example, that the insurgents had pinioned captured guardsmen between two 
hoards and sawed them, while alive, into pieces. On the other hand, things did in 
fact occur that were no less horrihle. . . . Many insurgents used bullets of a type 
that could not be removed from wounds after shooting, hecause a wire had heen 
inserted into these bullets which sprang out from the sides of them on impact. 
Behind numerous barricades were spray guns, which were used to spray sulphuric 
acid on attacking soldiers. It would be impossible to detail all the fiendish harhari- 
ties perpetrated by both sides in this action; we shall merely ohserve that world 
history can point to nothing comparable." Englander, vol. 2, pp. 288-289. 

[a2a,2] 

June Insurrection. "On many closed shops, the insurgents would write: 'Respect 
Property! Death to Thieves!' Many flags on the barricades bore the words: 'Bread 
and Work.' On the Rue Saint-Martin, on thefi rstday, a jeweler's shop stayed open 
without being threatened by any sort of harm, while, a few steps beyond, a store 
with a supply of scrap iron was plundered. . . . Many insurgents, during the bat- 
tle, had assemhled their wives and children on the barricades, and cried: 'Since we 
can no longer feed them, we want at least to die all together!' While the men 
fought, the women made gunpowder and their children cast bullets, using every 
piece of lead or tin that fell into their hands. Often the children molded the bullets 
with thimbles. At night, while the combatants were sleeping, girls would drag 
paving stones to the harricades." Englander, vol. 2, pp. 291, 293. [a2a,3] 

Barricades of 1848: "More than 400 were counted. Many, fronted by trenches and 
battlements, reached a height of two stories." Malet and Grillet, XIX" Siecle 
(Paris, 1919), p. 249. [a2a,4] 

"In 1839, some workers in Paris founded a newspaper with the title La Ruche 
populaire. 2 . . . The editorial office of this publication was located in the poorest 
section of the city, on the Rue des Quatre Fils. It was one of the few worker-run 
newspapers to have an audience among the general population, which can be 
explained by the tendency it followed. That is, it took as its program the goal of 
hringing hidden misery to the notice of wealthy benefactors. ... In the office of 
this journal a register of misery lay open, in which every starveling could inscribe 
his name. It was imposing, this register of misfortune, and since at this period Les 
Mysteres de Paris, hy Eugene Sue, had hrought charity into fashion within high 
society, one often saw private carriages pull up hefore the dirty premises of the 
editorial office and blase ladies step forth to secure addresses of the unfortunate; 



they would then deliver alms personally to these people and, in this way, derive a o 
novel stimulus for their jaded nerves. Each number of this workers' review began _^ 
with a summary enumeration of the poor people who had registered with the g 
editor; details of their plight could be found in the register itself. . . . Even after v> 
the February Revolution, at a time when all social classes looked on one another 
with distrust, . . . La Ruche populaire continued to facilitate personal contacts g 
between rich and poor. . . . This is all the more remarkahle in light of the fact that, % 
even during this period, all articles in La Ruche populaire were written by actual g 
workers engaged in some practical occupation." Sigmund Englander, Geschichte 
derfranzosischenArbeiter-Associationen (Hamhurg, 1864), vol. 2, pp. 78-80, 82- 
83. [a3,l] 

"The expansion achieved by industry in Paris during the past thirty years has 
given a certain importance to the trade of ragpicker, which occupies the lowest 
level on the industrial scale. Men, women, and children can all easily devote them- 
selves to the practice of this trade, which requires no apprenticeship and calls for 
tools that are as simple as its methods — a basket, a hook, and a lantern comprising 
the ragpieker's only equipment. The adult ragpicker, in order to earn 25-40 sous 
per day (depending on the season), is ordinarily obliged to make three rounds, two 
during the day and one at night; the first two take place from five o'clock in the 
morning until nine o'clock, and from eleven o'clock until [here, there are four 
pages missing from the copy in the Bibliotheque Nationale!]. Like salaried work- 
ers, they have a habit of frequenting taverns. . . . Like them, and more than them, 
they make a show of the expenditures which this habit entails. Among the older 
ragpickers and particularly among the older women, spirits hold an attraction like 
nothing else. . . . The ragpickers are not always content with ordinary wine in 
these taverns; they like to order mulled wine, and they take great offense if this 
drink does not contain, along with a strong dose of sugar, the aroma produced hy 
the use of lemons." H.-A. Fregier, Des Classes dangereuses de la population 
<dans les grandes villes et des moyens de les rendre meilleures> (Paris, 1840), vol. 
1, pp. 104, 109. [a3,2] 

Fregier speaks at length about the public scriveners, 3 who must have stood in the 
worst repute, and from whose circles emerges one Lacenaire, esteemed for his 
heautiful handwriting. — "I heard tell of an old sailor endowed with a remarkable 
talent for line handwriting, who, in the depths of the winter, had nary a shirt on 
his back, and would hide his nakedness hy fastening his waistcoatwith a pin. This 
individual, who was scarcely clothed, and who was not only ragged hut nauseat- 
ingly filthy, would on occasion spend five to six francs on his dinner." H.-A. 
Fregier, Des Classes dangereuses dela population (Paris, 1840), vol. 1, pp. 117— 
118. [a3a,l] 



"If it happens that an entrepreneur reproaches a worker in the presence of his 
comrades, and in a manner he feels to he unjust, . . . then the worker lays down his 
tools and heads for the tavern. ... In many industrial establishments that are not 



rigorously monitored, the worker is not satisfied with going to the tavern before 
the hour when work begins and at his mealtimes, which are at nine o'clock and two 
o'clock; he goes there also at four «'clock and in the evening, on the way home. . . . 
There are women who have no compunctions about following their husbands to 
the barriere, in company with their children (who are already able to work), in 
order, as they say, to live it up. . . . There they spend a large portion of the income 
of the entire family, and return home Monday evening in a state bordering on 
drunkenness. Indeed, they often pretend — the children no less than their par- 
ents — to be more inebriated than they really are, so that everyone will know 
they've been drinking, and drinking well." H.-A. Fregier, Des Classes dan- 
gereuses de la population (Paris, 1840), vol. 1, pp. 79-80, 86. [a3a,2] 

On child labor among textile workers: "Unable to meet the costs of food and of 
caringf or their children on their modest salary, which often does not exceed forty 
sous per day (not even when added to the salary of the wife, who earns barely half 
that amount), . . . workers find themselves obliged ... to place their children, as 
soon as they are old enough to work (ordinarily, at age seven or eight), in the 
establishments of which we are speaking. . . . The workers keep their children 
working in the factory or mill until the age of twelve. At that point, they see that 
the children make their first Communion, and then they secure them an appren- 
ticeship in a shop." H.-A. Fregier, vol. 1, pp. 98-100. [a3a,3] 

There's brass in our pockets, 

Pierre, let's go live it up; 

On Mondays, don't you know, 

I love to knock about. 

I know of a sixpenny wine 

That's not half bad, 

So let's have some fun, 

Let's go up to the barriere. 

H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Les Refrains de la rue, de 1830 a 1870 (Paris, 1879), 
p. 56. [a3a,4] 

"And what wine! What variety — from hordeaux to burgundy, from burgundy to 
full-bodied Saint-Georges, to Liinel and the South's Frontignan, and from there to 
sparkling champagne! What a choice of whites and reds — from Petit Macon or 
chahlis to Chambertin, to Chateau Larose, to sauterne, to Vin du RoussiJlon, and 
Ai' Mousseux! Bear in mind that each of these wines produces a different sort of 
intoxication, and that with a few bottles one can pass through all the intervening 
stages from a Musard quadrille to "La Marseillaise," from the wanton pleasures of 
the cancan to the fiery ardor of revolutionary fever, thence to return, with a hottle 
of champagne, to the cheeriest carnival mood in the world! And only France has a 
Paris, a city in which European civilization attains its fullest flowering, in which 
all the nerve fibers of European history are intertwined, and from which arise, at 



regular intervals, those tremors which shake the terrestrial globe; a city whose 
population unites, like that of no other city on earth, the passion for enjoyment 
with the passion for historical action, whose inhabitants know how to live like the 
most refined of Athenian epicures and to die like the most unflinching Spartan — 
Alcibiades and Leonidas rolled up into one; a city which really is, as Louis Blanc 
says, the heart and brain of the world." Friedrich Engels, "Von Paris nach Bern: 
Ein Reisefragment," Die neue Zeit, 17, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1899), p. 10. — In his 
foreword to this publication of the posthumous manuscript, Eduard Bernstein 
writes: "Although a fragment, this travel sketch gives us, perhaps, a better picture 
of its author than does any other of his works" (ibid., p. 8). [a4,l] 



A song, "Jenny the Worker," whose refrain was inspiring to women: 

In a garden, 'neath a fragrant bower, 
You may hear a familiar bird: 
'Tis the singing of Jenny the worker, 
At heart content, content with little. 
She could be rich, but prefers 
The things she has from God. 

H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Les Refrains de la rue, de 1830 m. 1870 (Paris, 1879), 
pp. 67-68. [a4,2] 



A reactionary song, after the June Insurrection: 

See, see this funeral procession! 

It's the archbishop — friends, remove your hats; 

Victim, alas, of sacrilegious comhat, 

He is fallen for the liappiness of all."' 1 

H. Gourdon de Genouillac, Les Refrains de Im rue, de 1830 m 1870 (Paris, 1879), 
p. 78. [a4a,l] 



"The proletarians have . . . composed a terrible, bitter "Marseillaise," which they 
sing in unison in the workshops, and which may be judged by the refrain: 'Sow the 
field, all you proles; / It's the idler who will reap. '" "Die socialistischen und com- 
munistischen Bewegungen seit der dritten franzosischen Revolution," opening of 
Stein's Socialismus und Communismus des heutigen Frankreichs (Leipzig and 
Vienna, 1848), p. 210 [from V. Considerant, Theorie du droit de propriete et du 
droit de travail <1848>]. [a4a,2] 



Buret reports on a story in La Revue britannique of December 1839 (?), p. 29 (?): 
"The associated workers of Brighton consider machines to be absolutely 
beneficial. 'But,' they add, 'they are fatal as applied in the current regime. In- 
stead of dutifully serving, as the elves served the shoemaker in the German fairy 
tale, the machines have behaved like Frankenstein's monster (German legend), 
who, after acquiring life, employed it only in persecuting the man who had given it 



to him. '" Eugene Buret, La Misere des classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en 
France (Paris, 1840), vol. 2, p. 219. [a4a,3] 



"If the vices of the lower classes were limited, in their effects, to those who in- 
dulged in them, we may suppose that the upper classes would cease to concern 
themselves with all these dismal questions, and would happily leave the world at 
large to the sway of good and bad causes that rule over it. But . . . everything is 
linked together. If poverty is the mother of vices, then vice is the father of crime; 
and it is in this way that the interests of all the classes are conjoined." Eugene 
Buret, La Misere des classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en France (Paris, 1840), 
vol. 2, p. 262. [a4a,4] 

"Jenny the Worker brings to life one of the most terrible afflictions of the social 
organism: the daughter of the working class . . . constrained to sacrifice her virtue 
for her family, and to sell herself ... in order to provide bread for her loved 
ones .... As for the prologue to Jenny the Worker, it acknowledges neither the 
play's point of departure nor the details of poverty and hunger." Victor Hallays- 
Dahot, La Censure dramatique et le theatre, 1850-1870 (Paris, 1871), pp. 75-76. 

[a4a,5] 

"In the mind of the factory boss, workers are not men but forces, and expensive 
ones at that — instruments more intractable and less economical than tools of iron 
and fire. . . . Without being cruel, he can be completely indifferent to the suffer- 
ings of a class of men with whom he has no moral commerce, no sentiments in 
common. Douktless Madame de Sevigne was not an evil woman, . . . yet Madame 
de Sevigne, while detailing the atrocious punishments meted out to the people of 
Brittany who had rioted over a tax, Madame de Sevigne, the impassioned mother, 
speaks of hangings and of thrashings ... in a light, cavalier tone that betrays not 
the slightest sympathy. ... I doubt that, under the rule of the current laws of 
industry, there could be any more of a moral community between employers and 
their workers than there was, in the seventeenth century, between poor peasants 
and townsmen and a fine lady of the court." Eugene Buret, De la Misere des 
classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en France (Paris, 1840), vol. 2, pp. 269-271. 

[a5,l] 



"Many girls ... in the factories often leave the shop as early as six o'clock in the 
evening, instead of leaving at eight, and go roaming the streets in hopes of meeting 
some stranger whom they provoke with a sort of calculated hashf ulness. — In the 
factories, they call this doing one's fifth quarter of the day." Villerme, Tableau de 
Vetat physique et moral des ouvriers, vol. 1 , p. 226, cited in E . Buret, De Im Misere 
des classes laborieuses (Paris, 1840), vol. 1, p. 415. [a5,2] 

The principles of philanthropy receive a classic formulation in Buret: "Humanity, 
and indeed decency, do not permit us to allow human beings to die like animals. 
One cannot refuse the charitable gift of a coffin." Eugene Buret, De la Misere des 
classes laborieuses (Paris, 1840), vol. 1, p. 266. [a5,3] 



"The Convention, organ of the sovereign people, aims to make mendicancy and 
poverty disappear at a single stroke. ... It guarantees work for all citizens who 
need it. . . . Unfortunately, the section of the law that was designed specificaJly to 
deal with mendicancy as a crime was more easily enforced than that which prom- 
ised the benefits of national generosity to the poor. Repressive measures were 
taken, and they have remained within the letter as well as the spirit of the law, 
whereas the system of charity that motivated and justified these measures has 
never existed, except in the decrees of the Convention!" E. Buret, De la Misere des 
classes laborieuses (Paris, 1840), vol. 1 , pp. 222-224. Napoleon adopted the posi- 
tion described here with his law of July 5, 1808; the law of the convention dates 
from October 15, 1793. Those convicted three times of begging could expect depor- 
tation for eight years to Madagascar. [a5,4] 

Hippolyte Passy, ex-minister, in a letter addressed to the temperance society of 
Amiens (see he Temps, February 20, 1836): "One is led to recognize that, however 
meager the share of the poor might be, it is the art of applying that share to his real 
needs, it is the capacity to encompass the future in his thoughts, that the poor man 
lacks. His plight is due more to this lack than to any other." Cited in E. Buret, De 
la Misere des classes laborieuses (Paris, 1840), vol. 1, p. 78. [a5a,l] 

"There was a time, and it was not so long ago, when — all the while effusively 
singing the praises of work — one never let on to the worker that the means by 
which he derived his subsistence was not his freely willed labors but, in fact, a tax 
levied on him by certain persons who fattened themselves by the sweat of his 
brow. ... It is what is called the exploitation of man by man. Something of this 
sinister and deceptive doctrine has remained in the songs of the street. . . . Work is 
still spoken of with respect, but this respect has something forced about it, some- 
thing of a grimace. ... It is nevertheless true that tliis way of viewing work is an 
exception. More often, it is praised like a law of nature, a pleasure, or a benefit . . . 

Against the lazy let us always do battle — 

Great enemies of our society. 

For if they complain of sleeping on straw, 

It is only what they deserve. 

In our stockyards, our factories, our mills, 

Let us answer the call at day's dawning; 

While we work our prodigious machines, 

Let us hymn a fraternal refrain ..." 

— Antoine Reiny 

Charles Nisard, Des Chansons populaires (Paris, 1867), vol. 2, pp. 265-267. 

[a5a,2] 

"The fifteen years of the Restoration had been years of great agricultural and 
industrial prosperity. ... If we leave aside Paris and the large cities, we see that 
the institution of the press, along with the various electoral systems, engaged only 
part of the nation, and the least numerous part: the bourgeoisie. Many in this 



bourgeoisie were already fearful of a revolution." A. Malet and P. GriJJet, XIX" 
Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 72. [a5a,3] 



"The crisis of 1857-1858 . . . marked a sudden end to all the illusions of imperial 
socialism. All efforts to maintain wages at a level that would have corresponded in 
some degree to the ever-rising prices of food and housing proved futile." 
D. Rjazanov, Zur Geschichte der ersten Internationale, in Marx-Engels Archiv, 
vol. 1 [Frankfurt am Main < 1928 > ] , p. 145. [a5a,4] 

"In Lyons, the economic crisis had caused a reduction in the salary of the silk 
weavers — the famous canuts — to eighteen sous for a workday of fifteen to sixteen 
hours. The prefect had tried to induce the workers and bosses to agree to establish 
a minimum salary level. The attempt having failed, an insurrection broke out on 
November 12, 1831; it was nonpolitical in character, representing an uprising of 
the poor. 1 Live Working or Die Fighting' read the black banner which the canuts 
carried before them. . . . After two days of fighting, 5 the troops of the line, which 
the Garde Nationale had refused to support, were forced to evacuate Lyons. The 
workers laid down their arms. Casimir Perier sent an army of 36,000 men to 
reoccupy the city; furthermore, he removed the prefect from offi ce, annulled the 
tariff which the latter had succeeded in foisting upon the bosses, and disbanded 
the Garde Nationale (December 3, 1831). . . . Two years later, . . . charges brought 
against an association of Lyons workers, the Mutualists, were the occasion for an 
uprising that lasted live days." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX- Siecle (Paris, 1919), 
pp. 86-88. [a6,l] 

"A study of working conditions in the textile industry in 1840 revealed that, for 
one fifteen-and-a-half-hour day of active work, the average salary was less than 
two francs for men and barely one franc for women. The suffering . . . got worse, 
especially beginning in 1834, because, civil unrest being finally quelled, industrial 
enterprises multiplied so rapidly that, within ten years, the population of the cities 
increased by two million solely through the influx of peasants to the factories." 
A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 103. [a6,2] 

"In 1830, many believed that Catholicism in France was on its deathbed and that 
the political role of the clergy was finished for good. . . . Yet ... on February 24, 
1848, the insurgents who commenced the sacking of the Tuileries removed their 
hats in front of the Crucifix taken from the chapel and escorted it all the way to the 
Eglise Saint-Roch. With the proclamation of the Republic, universal suffrage sent 
to the National Assembly . . . three bishops and twelve priests. . . . This could 
happen because, during the reign of Louis Philippe, the clergy had gotten closer to 
the people." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX' Siecle (Paris, 1919), pp. 106, 107. 

[a6,3] 

On December 8, 1831, the precapitalist Journal des debuts takes a stand on the 
Lyons insurrection. "The article in he Journal des debuts produced a great sensa- 



tion. The enemy of the workers had brought into clear relief the international 
significance of the Lyons symptom. Neither the republican nor the legitimist press, 
however, wished to present the question in such dangerous terms. . . . The legiti- 
mists . . . protested for purely demagogic reasons, since at that moment it was the 
intention of this party to play the working class off against the liberal bourgeoisie 
in the interests of reestablishing the elder line of Bourbons; the republicans, on the 
other hand, had an interest in playing down, as far as possible, the purely prole- 
tarian cast of the movement ... in order . . . not to lose the working class as a 
future ally in the struggle against the July monarchy. Nevertheless, the immediate 
impression produced by the Lyons uprising was so wholly incommensurable, so 
painful for contemporaries, that for this reason alone it has already attained a 
special place in history. The generation which had witnessed the July Revolution 
. . . was thought, in effect, to have nerves of steel. Yet they saw in the Lyons 
insurrection something entirely new . . . , which alarmed them all the more insofar 
as the workers of Lyons themselves seemed manifestly not to see or understand this 
new dimension." E. Tarle, "Der Lyoner Arbeiteraufstand," in Marx-Engels Ar- 
chiv, ed. D. Rjazanov, vol. 2 (Frankfurt am Main, 1928), p. 102. [a6a,l] 



Tarle cites a passage from Borne on the Lyons insurrection, in which this writer 
vents his indignation over Casimir Perier because, as Tarle writes, "Perier re- 
joices at the lack of political motive for the uprising in Lyons, satisfied that this is 
only a war of the poor against the rich." The passage — in Ludwig Borne, Gesam- 
melte Schriften (Hamburg and Frankfurt am Main, 1862), vol. 10, p. 20 — runs: 
"It is said to be nothing more than a war of the poor against the rich, of those who 
have nothing to lose against those who own something! And this terrible truth 
which, hecause it is a truth, ought to have heen buried in the deepest of wells, t he 
lunatic raises aloft and Haunts before all the world!" In E. Tarle, "Der Lyoner 
Arbeiteraufstand," in Marx-Engels Archiv, vol. 2 (Frankfurt am Main, 1928), 
p. 112. [a6a,2] 



Buret was a student of Sismondi. Charles Andler credits him with an influence on 
Marx (Andler, Le Manifeste communiste [Paris, 1901]) — something which Meh- 
ring ("Ein methodologisches Problem," Die neue Zeit [Stuttgart], 20, no. 1, 
pp. 450-451) firmly denies. [a6a,3] 



Influence of Romanticism on political phraseology, explaining an attack on the 
congregations. "We are at the heginning of Romanticism, and we clearly recognize 
it by the manner in which it dramatizes everything. A cross was set up atop Mount 
Valerien: this cross ... is denounced as symbolizing the ascendancy of religious 
society over civil society. The Jesuit novitiate refers to itself only as 'the den of 
Montrouge.' A jubilee is announced for 1826, and already men of the cloth are 
thought to be looming on all sides." Pierre de la Gorce, La Restauration (Paris 
<1926-1928>),vol. 2, CharlesX, p. 57. [a7,l] 



We arc nothing but machines. 
Our Babels mount to the sky. 



Refrain: Let us love and, when we can, 

Let us meet to drink a round, 

Let the cannon fall silent or erupt — 

We drink, we drink, we drink 

To the independence of the world! 

Pierre Dupont, Le Chant des ouvriers (Paris, 1848). [a?,2] 

Last verse and refrain: 

If, in truth, a despicable mob, 
Having lire and iron in its store, 
Wants to shackle the body and soul 
Of the people, true child of God, 
Reveal to these depraved, 
O Republic, by foiling their plots, 
Your great Medusa face 
Ringed by red lightning! 



O tutelary Republic, 
•o not ascend to the skies, 
Ideal incarnated here on earth 
By universal suffrage. 

From the fourth verse: 

Ah! Let no nocturnal surprise 
Break in on the polls! 
Stand guard round the ballot box: 
'Tis the arch of our destiny. 

Pierre Dupont, Le Chant du vote (Paris, 1850). [a7,3] 

In chapters like "Le Vrai Sublime," "Le Fils de Dieu," "Le Sublime des sublimes," 
"Le Marchand de vins," "Le Chansonnier des sublimes," Poulot treats of types 
intermediate between worker and apache. The book is reformist; first published 
in 1869. Denis Poulot, Question sociale: "Le Sublime" new ed. (Paris). [a7,4] 

A proposal from Louis Napoleon's Extinction du pauperisme (p. 123), cited in 
Henry Fougere, Les Delegations ouvrieres aux expositions universelles sous le 
Second Empire (Montlu^on, 1905), p. 23: "All managers of factories or farms, all 
entrepreneurs of any kind, would be obliged by law, as soon as they had employed 
more than ten workers, to have an arbitrator who would govern their affairs, and 
to whom they would pay a salary double that of the simple workers." [a7a,l] 

"This people, victorious, who strode barefoot upon gold / Strewn across their path, 
and did not succumb" (Hegesippe Moreau). Motto of the newspaper UAimable 



Faubourien: Journal de I* cmnuille, cited in Curiosites revolutionnaires: Les 
Journaux rouges, by a Girondist (Paris, 1848), p. 26. [a7a,2] ___ 

Theory of A. Granier de Cassagnac, Histoire des classes ouvrieres et des classes q 5 

G. 

bourgeoises (Paris, 1838): the proletarians were descended from thieves and pros- el 
titutes. [a7a,3] S 

"Believe me, the wine of the barrieres has preserved the governmental framework 8 
from many a shock." Edouard Foucaud, Paris inventeur: Physiologie de Vindus- 
triefranqaise (Paris, 1844), p. I t. [a7a,4] 

Charras, from the Ecole Polytechnique, with reference to General Lobau, who 
had not wished to sign a proclamation: '"I will have him shot.' — 'What are you 
thinking of?' demanded M. Mauguin, incensed. 'Have General Lobau shot! A 
member of the Provisional Government!' — 'The very same,' responded the stu- 
dent, while leading the deputy to the window and showing him a hundred men 
outside, veterans of the lighting at the barracks in the Babylone district. 6 'And 
were I to order these brave men to shoot the Lord God, they would do it!"' 
G. Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), p. 158 [evidently a lit- 
eral citation from Louis Blanc]. [a7a,5] 

Leon Guillemin: "There are two sorts of providence, . , . God and the Ecole 
Polytechnique. If one should be found wanting, the other will be there." In 
G. Pinet, p. 161. [a7a,6] 

Lamennais and Proudhon wanted to be buried in a mass grave (Delvau, Heures 
parisiennes <Paris, 1866>,pp. 50-51). [a7a,7] 

Scene from the February Revolution. The Tuileries were plundered. "Neverthe- 
less, the crowd had stopped, as a sign of respect, in front of the chapel. A student 
took advantage of this moment to steal the sacred vessels, and in the evening he 
had them taken to the Eglise Saint-Roch. He chose to carry, hy himself, the mag- 
nificent sculpted Christ that found a place on the altar; a group of people followed 
quietly in his steps, their hats removed and heads bowed. This scene . . . was 
reproduced on a stamp that could he seen, for a long time afterward, in the 
windows of all the merchants who sell religious icons. The Polytechnician was 
represented holding the Christ in his arms, displaying it before a kneeling crowd, 
while he exclaimed: 'Here is the master of us all!' These words were not actually 
spoken, but they conform to the sentiments of the population at a time when . . . 
the clergy itself, persecuted hy the Voltairean king, greeted the revolution with 
enthusiasm." G. Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), pp. 245- 
246. [a8,l] 



The Polytechnicians "observed the proceedings of the Blanquist club thai: met in a 
hall on the ground floor, where demagogic orators, agitating for the most sinister of 



incendiary deeds, spoke already of putting the Provisional Government on trial." 
G. Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), p. 250. [a8,2] 



During the February Revolution, students from the Ecole Poly technique burned 
papers in the Tuileries which appeared to them compromising for the signatories, 
but which would have had great interest for the revolution: declarations of loy- 
alty to Louis Philippe (Pinet, p. 254). [a8,3] 

Lissagaray, in an essay on Les Miserables, in La Bataille: "One need only be in 
touch with the people to become revolutionary" [Victor Hugo devmnt Vopinion 
(Paris, 1885), p. 129]. [a8,4] 

"Around 1840, a certain number of workers formed the resolution to plead their 
cause directly before the public. . . . From that moment, . . . communism, which 
until then had been on the offensive, took prudently to the defense." A. Corbon, 
he Secret du peuple de Paris (Paris, 1863), p. 117. In question are the communist 
organ La Fratemite, which began publishing already in 184.5, the anticommunist 
L' 'Atelier, L'Union, and La Ruche populaire, wluch was the earliest. [a8,5] 

On the worker: "He is, in general, incapahle of understanding practical affairs. 
The solutions that suit him best are therefore those which seem likely to exempt 
him from incessant preoccupation with what he considers the humble sphere, the 
drudgeries of life. . . . Let us take as a virtual certainty, then, that any system 
which would tend to rivet . . . our worker ... to the factory — though it promise far 
more butter than hread — . . . would he repugnant to him." A. Corbon, pp. 186- 
187. [a8,6] 

"The question of workers, like the question of the poor, was planted at the entry- 
way to the Revolution. Since the children of the families of workers and artisans 
could not cover the needs of a lahor-starved industry, factories made use of or- 
phans as well. . . . The industrial exploitation of children and women ... is one of 
the most glorious achievements of philanthropy. Cheap food for workers, with a 
. . . view to lowering wages, was likewise one of the favorite philanthropic notions 
of the factory owners and pobtical economists of the eighteenth century. . . . When 
the French finally study the Revolution with a cold eye and without class preju- 
dice, they will realize that the ideas which made for its greatness came from Swit- 
zerland, where the bourgeoisie was already dominant: in fact, it was from Geneva 
that A. P. Candolle imported the so-called 'economic soup' . . . which created such 
a furor in the Paris of the Revolution. . . . Even the dry and unblinking Volney 
could not help being moved 'at the sight of this alliance of men of respectahle 
position eagerly occupied in supervising a pot of hoiling soup.'" Paul Laf argue, 
"Die christliche Liebestatigkeit," Die neue Zeit, 23, no. 1 (Stuttgart), pp. 148-149. 

[a8a,l] 



"Should three men happen to be in the street talking together about wages, or 
should they happen to ask the entrepreneur who has grown rich on their labor for 



a raise of one sou, then the bourgeois becomes terrified and cries out for strong 
measures. . . . Most of the time, our governments have exploited this sad progress 
of fear. . . . All I can say here is that . . . our grand Terrorists were by no means 
men of the people. They were bourgeois and nobles, men with cultivated, subtle, 
bizarre minds — sophists and scholastics." J. Michelet, he Peuple (Paris, 1846), 
pp. 153-154. 7 [a8a,2] 



Fregier, the author of Les Classes danger euses, was head clerk at the prefecture of 
police. [a8a,3] 

On the description of the February Revolution in Flaubert's Education sentimen- 
tale — which needs to be reread — one finds (with reference to Stendhal's descrip- 
tion of the Battle of Waterloo): 8 "Nothing of the general movements, nothing of 
the great clashes, but rather a succession of details which can never form a whole. 
This is the model which M. Flaubert has imitated in his depiction of the events of 
February and June 1848; it is a model of description from the standpoint of the 
idler, and of politics from the standpoint of the nihilist." J. J. Nescio, La Litter ■ attar e 
sous les deux Empires, 1804-1852 (Paris, 1874), <p. 114>. [a8a,4] 



Scene from the July Revolution. A woman donned men's clothing to fight alongside 
the others, and then afterward, as woman again, nursed the wounded who were 
lodged in the Stock Exchange. "Saturday evening, the cannoneers who were trans- 
ferring the artillery pieces remaining at the Bourse to the Hotel de Ville enthroned 
our young heroine on a cannon crowned with laurels and brought her with them. 
This evening, at around ten o'clock, they brought her back in triumph to the 
bourse by the light of torches; she was seated on an armchair decorated with 
garlands and laurels." C. F. Tricotel, Esquisse de quelques scenes de Vinterieurde 
Im Bourse pendant les jownees des 28, 29, 30 et 31 juillet dernier: Au profit des 
blesses (Paris, 1830), p. 9. [a9,l] 

Lacenaire composed an "Ode a la guillotine," in which the criminal is celebrated 
in the allegorical figure of a woman, of whom it is said: "This woman laughed 
with horrible glee, / As a crowd tearing down a throne will laugh." The ode was 
written shortly before Lacenaire's execution — that is, in January 1836. Alfred 
Delvau, Les Lions du jour (Paris, 1867), p. 87. [a9,2] 



A charity supper at the Hotel de Ville, where unemployed workers — in winter, 
above all construction workers — gathered. "The hour for the public meal has just 
sounded. And now Little Bluecoat hands his ivory-tipped cane to one of his assis- 
tants, takes from his buttonhole a silver place-setting which is attached there, dips 
the spoon into one pot after another, tastes, pays the servers, presses the out- 
stretched hands of the poor, takes up his cane, refastens his spoon, and goes 
tranquilly on his way. . . . He is gone. The serving of the food begins." Little 
Bluecoat was the nickname of the philanthropist Edme Champion, who had risen 
out of very modest circumstances. <See al2a,l.> The passage from Ch.-L. 



Chassin, La Legende du Petit Manteau Bleu, cited in AJfred Delvau, Les Lions du 
jour (Paris, 1867), p. 283. [a9,3] 



The author, in his pamphlet condemning the rural exodus, turns to the country 
girl: "Poor, lovely child! The journeyman's tour de France, which is of question- 
able utility to your brothers, is always an evil for you. Do not — if need be, until 
you are forty — let go of your mother's apron strings . . .; and should you be foolish 
enough to set out on your own, and should you find yourself sharing your unfur- 
nished room with intransigent unemployment and hunger, then call (like a virgin I 
knew once), call a last guest to your side: CHtLERA. At least in his fleshless arms, at 
least on his ghastly chest, you will no longer fear for your honor." And immedi- 
ately following this passage: "You men of conscience who will read this, I implore 
you once more, on my hands and knees, to make known, in every way possible, the 
substance of this penultimate chapter." Emile Crozat, La Maladie du siecle, ou 
Les Suites funestes du declassement social: Ouvrage ecrit sous les tristes inspira- 
tions d'un avocat sans cause, d'un notaire et d'un avoue sans clientele, d'un 
medecin sans pratiques, d'un negociant sans capitaux, d'un ouvrier sans travail 
(Bordeaux, 1856), p. 28. [a9,4] 

Insurrectionist movements under Louis Philippe: "It was then, in 1832, that the 
red Hag appeared for the first time." Charles Seignohos, Histoire sincere de la 
nation franqaise (Paris, 1933), p. 418. [a9a,l] 

"In 1848, there were only four cities with a population above a hundred thousand 
souls — Lyons, Marseilles, Bordeaux, and Rouen; and only three with a population 
of seventy-five thousand to a hundred thousand — Nantes, Toulouse, and Lille. 
Paris alone was a great metropolis with more than a million inhabitants, not count- 
ing the faubourgs (annexed in 1860). France remained a country of small towns." 
Charles Seignobos, Histoire sincere de la nation franqaise (Paris, 1933), pp. 396- 
397. [a9a,2] 

In 1840, the petty bourgeoisie makes a push toward the right to vote, by demand- 
ing it for the Garde Nationale. [a9a,3] 

National Assembly of 1848. "Mile. asks to borrow 600 francs from the Na- 
tional Assembly to pay her rent." Historical fact. Paris sous la Republique de 
1848: Exposition de la Bibliotheque et des Travaux historiques de la Ville de Paris 
(1909), p. 41. [a9a,4] 

"As soon as they heard tell of a battalion of women, the designers set about to find 
them a uniform. . . . Eugenie Niboyet, editor of La Voix des femmes, . . . pro- 
nounced on the matter: 'The title "Vesuvian,"' she writes, 'means that every one 
of these conscripts is harboring, in the core of her heart, a volcano of revolution- 
ary fires.' . . . Eugenie Niboyet then summoned her 'sisters' to the downstairs 
galleries of the Bonne-Nouvelle bazaar and to the Salle Taranne." Paris sous la 



Republique de 1848: Exposition de la Bibliotheque et des Travaux historiques de 



Social subjects occupy a very large place in lyric poetry at midcentury. They take 
all possible forms, from the innocuous variety of a Charles Coknance ("La 
Chanson des locataires" <The Tenants' Song>, "La Chanson des imprimeurs" 
<"The Printers' Song>) to the revolutionary lyrics of a Pierre Dupont. Inventions 
are a favorite theme of such chansons, and their social significance is underscored. 
Thus was born a "poem in praise of the prudent entrepreneur who first re- 
nounced the manufacture of a noxious product [white lead] to adopt 'the white of 
innocent zinc.'" Paris sous la Republique de 1848: Exposition de la Ville de Park 



Apropos of Cabet: "It is toward the end of 1848 that the discovery of the deposits 
became known in Paris, and almost immediately companies were formed to facili- 
tate the emigration of prospectors. By May 1849, fifteen such companies had 
begun to operate. The 'Compagnie Parisienne' had the honor of transporting the 
first group of travelers, and . . . these modern Argonauts entrusted themselves to a 
blind Jason who had never even seen California: one Jacques Arago, . . . whose 
account ... of a voyage round the world was in part developed from another's 
notes. . . . Newspapers were founded: La Calif ornie, a general-interest paper on 
the Pacific Ocean; the 'gold-bearing' Aurifere, monitor of the gold mines; L'Echo 
du Sacramento. Joint-stock companies offered shares of stock at exceptionally low 
prices, only five francs, on the floor of all the stock exchanges." Many cocottes 
make the trip overseas — the colonists are experiencing a shortage of women. Paris 
sous la. Republique de 1848: Exposition de la Ville de Paris (1909), p. 32. <On 
Jacques Arago, see al2,5.> [al0,l] 

There's a comparison to be drawn between Cabet and the following verse, which 
is, of course, directed against the Saint-Simonians. It comes from .Alcide Genty, A 
Monsieur de Chateaubriand: Poetes et prosateurs francais — Satire (Paris, 1838), cited 
in Carl Lodewijk de Liefde, Le Saint-Simonisme dans la poesie jrancaue entre 1825 
et 1865 <Haarlem, 1927>, p. 171: "The insinuating Rodrigues will peddle to the 
Iroquois / Bareme and some unsmoked cigarettes." [al0,2] 

Delphine Gay (Mme. E. de Girardin) shows herself, in her poem "Les Ouvriers 
de Lyons" [Poesies completes [Paris, 1856], p. 210), to be a precursor of the philoso- 
phy of innkeeping: "The poor man is happy when the rich has his fun." [al0,3] 



With two arms of iron a magnificent track 

Will begird my republic: Peking to Paris. 

A hundred different peoples, mixing their tongues, 

Will make one colossal car a Babel. 

There, with wheel of fire, humanity's coach 

Will wear to the hone the muscles of the earth. 

From atop this gleaming vessel, men, all amazed, 



la Ville de Paris (1909), p. 28. 



[a9a,5] 



(1909), p. 44. 



[a9a,6] 




Will look out on an ocean of eatables. 

The world will hccomc a fine china howl 

Filled up f«r this human menagerie; 

And the clean-shaven glohe, without beard or hair — 

A monumental pumpkin — will revolve through the skies. 



Alfred de Musset, Namouna (Paris), p. 113 ("Dupontct Durand"). 



[al0,4] 



Saint-Simonian poetry — Savinien Lapointe, shoemaker, "L'Emeute" <The 



INo, the future will dispense with barricades! 

You great ones, while your hands arc huilding scaffolds, 
Mine are scattering flowers over the graves. 
To each his mission or his painful task: 
To the poet, the song; to power, the ax! 



Olinde Rodrigues, Poesies societies des ouvriers (Paris, 1841), pp. 237, 239. 

[al0,5] 

From Alfred de Vigny, "La Maison du berger" <The Shepherd's House> , treating 
of the railroad: 



May God guide the thundering steam to its end 
'Cross the mountains traversed hy iron rails. 
Let an angel he perched on its loud-clanking hoiler 
When it heads underground or rocks bridges. 



Turn away from these tracks — they lack grace. 

Their iron lines will take y»u 

With the speed of an arrow through space, 

Shot whistling from how to bull's-eye. 

Thus hurled like a holt, human beings 

Lose their breath, lose their sight, 

In the smothering cloud rent by lightning. 



Bistancc and time arc now conquered by Science, 
Which encircles the world with its road sad and straight. 
The World is reduced by our experiment; 
The equator is now but a tight-fitting hoop. 



Alfred de Vigny, Poesies completes, new edition (Paris, 1866), pp. 218, 220-221. 

[al0a,l] 

To be compared with Cabet: the remarkable, beautiful poem "Le Havre," by 
Elise Meury, embroiderer (•linde Rodrigues, Poesies socinles des ouvriers [Paris, 
1841], p. 9). It describes an ocean steamer, contrasting the luxury cabins with the 
lower deck. [al#a,2] 



Riot>: 



Rue Transnonmn, le 15 avril 1834 (Government Reprisal on the Rue Transnonain, April 
15, 1834). Lithograph by Honore Daumier. See ala,l; al0a,5. 



"An opuscule in verse (Les Principes du Petit Manteau Bleu stir le systeme de la 
communaute <see a9,3>, by Loreux, communist [Paris, 1847]) is a species of 
dialogue between a partisan and an adversary of communism. ... In order to 
alleviate all . . . suffering, the communist Loreux appeals not to envy or to venge- 
ance, but to kindness and generosity." Jean Skerlitch, L'Opinion publique en 
France d'upres la poesie politique et sociale de 1830 a 1848 (Lausanne, 1901), 



August 1834, uprising of Mntualists in Lyons, nearly contemporaneous with the 
uprising on the Rue Transnonain. <J At Lyons: "The army reported 115 men killed 
and 360 wounded, and the workers reported 200 killed and 400 wounded. The 
government wanted to grant indemnities, and a commission was named, which 
proclaimed the following principle: 'The government does not want the triumph of 
the social order to cost any tears or regrets. It knows that time, which gradually 
effaces the anguish occasioned by the costliest personal losses, is powerless to 
redress the blows of fortune. ' . . . The whole morality of the July Monarchy can be 
found in these words." Jean Skerlitch, L'Opinion publique en France d'apres la 
poesie politique et sociale (Lausanne, 1901), p. 72. [al0a,5] 



p. 194. 



[al0a,3] 



In 1847, a famine; many poems on the subject. 



[a!0a,4] 



"I will rouse the people with my unvarnished truths; / I will prophesy on every 
street corner." Hegesippe Moreau, cited in Jean Skerlitch, L'Opinion publique en 
France d'apres la poesie politique et sociale de 1830 a 1848, p. 85. [all,l] 

"In the days immediately following the Revolution of 1830, a song made the rounds 
in Paris: 'Requete d'un ouvrier a un Juste-Milieu.' Its refrain was particularly 
expressive: 

I am hungry! 
Well, then, eat your list. 
Save the other for tomorrow. 

And that's my refrain. 

. . . Barthelemy . . . says . . . that . . . the unemployed lahorer has no choice hut to 
work in 'the yard of upheaval.' ... In Barthelemy's Nemesis . . . the pontif Roth- 
schild, with a multitude of the faithful, chants the 'Mass of stockjobbing,' sings the 
'psalm of annuity.'" Jean Skerlitch, L'Opinion publique en France d'apres la 
poesie (Lausanne, 1901), pp. 97-98, 159. [all,2] 



"During the day of June 6, a search of the sewers had been ordered. It was feared 
that they would be used as a refuge by the vanquished. Prefect Gisquet was to 
ransack the hidden Paris, while General Bugeand was sweeping the public Paris — 
a connected double operation which demanded a double strategy on the part of 
public power, represented ahove by the army and below by the police. Three 
platoons of officers and sewermen investigated the subterranean streets of Paris." 
Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 9 (Paris, 1881), p. 196 (Les 
Miser ables). [u [all,3] 

Unfolding its wings of gold, 
Million-armed industry, exultant, 
Traverses our domains 
And seeds the fields. 

The desert is peopled at the sound of its voice, 

The arid soil teems — 

And for the world's bounty 

It gives the world laws. <p. 205 > 

Refrain: All honor to us, the offspring of industry! 
Honor, honor to our works! 
In all the arts we have conquered our rivals — 
And would be the hope, the pride, of our country. <p. 204> 

Cinquante Chants francais, lyrics by various authors; set to music, with piano 
accompaniment, by Rouget de Lisle (Paris, 1825) [Bihliotheque Nationale, 
Vm7.4454], p. 202 (no. 49, "Chant des industriels," 1821, text hy de Lisle). In the 
same volume, no. 23, "La Marseillaise." [all,4] 



Revolutionary tactics and battles on the barricades, according to Les Miserables. 
The night hefore the harricade lighting: "The invisible police of the emeute 



watched everywhere, and maintained order — that is, night. . . . The eye which 
might have looked from above into that mass of shadow would have caught a 
glimpse in the distance here and there, perhaps, of indistinct lights, bringing out 
broken and fantastic lines, outlines of singular constructions, something like 
ghostly gleams coming and going among ruins; these were the barricades." Oeu- 
vres completes, novels, vol. 8 (Paris, 1881), pp. 522-523. — The following passage 
is from the chapter "Faits d'ou 1'histoire sort et que l'histoire ignore." "The meet- 
ings were sometimes periodic. At some, there were never more than eight or ten, 
and always the same persons. In others, anybody who chose to entered, and the 
room was so full that they were forced to stand. Some were there from enthusiasm 
and passion; others because 'it was on their way to work.' As in the time of the 
Revolution, there were in these wine shops some female patriots, who embraced 
the newcomers. Other expressive facts came to light. A man entered a shop, drank, 
and went out, saying: 'Wine merchant, whatever 1 owe, the revolution will pay.' 
... A worker, drinking with a comrade, made him put his hand on him to see how 
warm he was; the other felt a pistol under his vest. . . . All this fermentation was 
puhlic, we might almost say tranquil. . . . No singularity was wanting in this cri- 
sis — still subterranean, but already perceptible. Bourgeois talked quietly with 
workers about the preparations. They would say, 'How is the uprising coming 
along?' in the same tone in which they would have said, 'How is your wife?'" Vic- 
tor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 8 (Paris, 1881), pp. 43, 50-51 (Les 
Miser aides). 11 [alla,l] 



Barricade fighting in Les Miserables. From the chapter "Originalite de Paris." 
"Outside of the insurgent quartiers, nothing is usually more strangely calm than 
the physiognomy of Paris during an uprising. . . . There is firing at the streetcor- 
ners, in an arcade, in a cul-de-sac; . . . corpses litter the pavement. A few streets 
away, you can hear the clicking of hilliard halls in the cafes. . . . The carriages jog 
along; people are going out to dine. Sometimes in the very quartier where there is 
fighting. In 1831 a fusillade was suspended to let a wedding party pass hy. At the 
time of the insurrection of May 12, 1839, on the Rue Saint-Martin, a little infirm 
old man, drawing a handcart surmounted hy a tricolored rag, in which there were 
decanters filled with some liquid, went hack and forth from the harricade to the 
troops and from the troops to the barricade, impartially offering glasses of co- 
coa. . . . Nothing is more strange; and this is the peculiar characteristic of the 
uprisings of Paris, which is not found in any other capital. Two things are requisite 
for it: the greatness of Paris and its gaiety. It requires the city of Voltaire and of 
Napoleon." Victor Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 8 <Paris, 1881 >, 
pp. 429-43 1. 12 [alla,2] 

On the motif of exoticism, conjoined with that of emancipation: 

All the seraglios are opened, 
The imam finds his inspiration in wine, 
The Orient learns to read, 
Barrault crosses the seas. 



Jules Mercier, "L'Arche de Dieu," in Foi nouvelle: Chants et chansons de Bar- 
rault, Vincard . . . 1831 a 1834 (Paris, January 1, 1835), book 1, p. 28. [al2,l] 



Forge the liberty of the Orient: 
A cry of Woman, on the clay of deliverance, 
Travels from the harem by repeated echo 
To break the horrid silence of the West. 

Vincard, "Le Premier Depart pour l'Orient," in Foi nouvelle: Chants et chansons 
de Barrault, Vincard . . . 1831 a 1834 (Paris, January 1, 1835), book 1, p. 48. 

[al2,2] 



A strange stanza from "Le Depart," by Vincard: 

Cast of F from a universe of serfdom, 
The old swaddling clothes' 3 and the jargon; 
Learn the coarse and plain speech of the People, 
The light ditty and the oath. 

Foi nouvelle, 1831 a 1834 (Paris, January 1, 1835), pp. 89-90. [al2,3] 



Our flag has lost patience with the sky of France; 
Over the minarets of Egypt it now must wave. 

Then will they see us, workers adept, 

With our ribbons of iron 

Subduing the desert sands; 
Cities, like palms, will spring up everywhere. 

F. Maynard, "A l'Orient," in Foi nouvelle (Paris, January 1, 1835), pp. 85, 88. 

[al2,4] 



In Jacques Arago's pamphlet of 1848, "Auxjuges des insurges," deportation 
appears as an instrument of colonial expansion. After the author, in picturesque 
language, has summoned up in turn each of France's overseas possessions with- 
out finding a single one suited to be the land of deportation, his eye lights on 
Patagonia. He gives a very poetical description of the land and its inhabitants. 
"These men, the tallest on earth; these women, of whom the youngest are so 
alluring after an hour's swim; these antelopes, these birds, these fish, these phos- 
phorescent waters, this sky alive with clouds coursing to and fro like a flock of 
wandering hinds . . . — all this is Patagonia, all this a virgin land rich and inde- 
pendent. . . . Do you fear that England will come and tell you that you have no 
right to set foot on this part of the American continent? . . . Citizens, let England 
grumble, just let it, . . . and if it should arm, . . . then transport to Patagonia the 
men whom your laws have smitten. When the day of battle arrives, those you 
have exiled will have become staunch mobile barricades, standing implacable at 
die outposts." [al2,5] 



Edme Champion: self-made man, 14 philanthropist (1764—1852). "Whenever he 
had occasion to go across town, he would never forget to look into the morgue" — so 
reports Charles-Louis Chassin, La Legende du Petit Manteau Bleu (Paris, ca. 
1860), p. 15. Champion had been a goldsmith and, during the Revolution, pro- 
tected noble-horn former customers — which endangered his own life. [al2a,l] 

Balzac, in Eugenie Grandet, with reference to the miser's dreams of the future: 
"That future which once awaited us beyond the requiem has been transported 
into the present." 15 This is still more true with reference to poor people's fears of 
the future. [al2a,2] 

From an analysis of the situation around 1830, hy police prefect Gisquet. At issue 
are the workers: "Unlike the well-to-do classes of the bourgeoisie, they have no 
fear that, through a broader extension of liberal principles, they will be compro- 
mising an established fortune. . . . Just as the Third Estate profited from the sup- 
pression of the nobility's privileges . . . , the working class would profit today from 
all that the bourgeoisie would lose in its turn." Cited in Charles Benoist, 
"L'Homme de 1848," part 1, Revue des deux mondes (July 1, 1913), p. 138. 

[al2a,3] 

"The great mob and the holy rabble / Made a rush at immortality." From a revo- 
lutionary song around 1830. Cited in Charles Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," 
part 1, Revue des deux mondes (July 1, 1913), p. 143. [al2a,4] 

Rumford, in his economic essays, assembled recipes designed to lower the cost of 
soup-kitchen fare by using substitute ingredients. "His soups are not too expen- 
sive, seeing that for 11 francs 16 centimes, one has enough to feed 115 persons 
twice a day. The only question is whether they are being properly fed." Charles 
Benoist, "De l'Apologie du travail a Tapotheose de l'ouvrier," Revue des deux 
mondes (January 15, 1913), p. 384. Charity soups were variously introduced by 
French industries at the time of the great Revolution. [al2a,5] 

1837 — the first banquets for universal suffrage and the petition with 240,000 sig- 
natures (equivalent to the number of registered voters at that time). [al2a,6] 

Around 1840, suicide is familiar in the mental world of the workers. "People are 
talking about copies of a lithograph representing the suicide of an English worker 
in despair at not being able to earn a Irving. At the house of Sue himself, a worker 
comes to commit suicide with this note in his hand: 'I am killin g myself out of 
despair. It seemed to me that death would be easier for me if I died under the roof 
of one who loves us and defends us.' The working-class author of a little book 
much read by other workers, the typographer Adolphe Boyer, also takes his own 
life in despair." Charles Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," part 2, Revue des deux 
mondes (February 1, 1914), p. 667. [al2a,7] 



From Robert (du Var), Ilistoire de la classe ouvriere <depuis I'esclave jusqu'au 
proletairede nos jours> (1845-1848): "You have seen it witnessed in this history, 
0 worker! When, as slave, you embraced the gospel, you became, unhesitatingly, 
a serf; when, as serf, you embraced the eighteenth-century philosophes, you be- 
came a proletarian. Well, today you have taken up socialism. . . . What is to 
prevent you from becoming a partner? You are king, pope, and emperor — 
your fate, in this regard, is in your own hands." Cited in Charles Benoist, 
"L'Homme de 1848," part 2, Revue des deux mondes (February 1, 1914), p. 668. 

[al3,l] 

A comment by Tocqueville on the spirit of the 1840s: "Wealthy proprietors liked to 
recall that they had always been enemies of the bourgeois class and always been 
friends of the people. The bourgeoisie themselves recalled with a certain pride that 
their fathers had been lahorers, and if they could not trace their lineage ... to a 
worker . . . , they would at least contrive to descend from some uncouth person 
who had made his fortune on his own." Cited in Charles Benoist, "L'Homme de 
1848," part 2, Revue des deux mondes (February 1, 1914), p. 669. [al3,2] 

"The question of poverty . . . has, in a few years, passed through extremely varied 
phases. Toward the end of the Restoration, the debate turns entirely on the extinc- 
tion of mendicancy, and society tries less to alleviate poverty than to . . . forget it 
hy relegating it to the shadows. At the time of the July Revolution, the situation is 
reversed hy means of politics. The repuhlican party seizes on pauperism and 
transforms it into the proletariat. . . . The workers take up the pen. . . . Tailors, 
shoemakers, and typographers, who at that time constituted the revolutionary 
trades, march in the extreme avant-garde. . . . Around 1835, the debate is sus- 
pended in consequence of the numerous defeats dealt the repuhlican party. 
Around 1840, it resumes, . . . and bifurcates . . . into two schools, culminating, on 
the one hand, in communism and, on the other, in the associations deriving from 
the mutual interests of workers and employers." Charles Louandre, "Statistique 
litteraire: De la Production intellectuelle en France dupuis quinze ans," Revue des 
deux mondes (October 15, 1847), p. 279. [al3,3] 

The Blanquist Tridon: "O Might, queen of the barricades, . . . you who fl ash in the 
lightning and the riot, ... it is toward you that prisoners stretch their manacled 
hands." Cited in Charles Benoist, "Le 'My the' de la classe ouvriere," Revue des 
deux mondes (Marcb 1, 1914), p. 105. [al3,4] 

Against workhouses, and in favor of lowering the tax on the poor: F.-M.-L. 
Naville, De la Charite legale et specialement des maisons de travail et de la pro- 
scription de la mendicite, 2 volumes (Paris, 1836). [al3,5] 



A coinage of 1848: "God is a worker." 



[al3a,l] 



Charles Benoist claims to find in Corhon, Le Secret du peuple de Paris, the proud 
consciousness of numerical superiority over the other classes. Benoist, "Le 
'Mythe' de la classe ouvriere," Revue des deux mondes (March 1, 1914), p. 99. 

[al3a,2] 

Pamphlets from 1848 are dominated by the concept of organization. [al3a,3] 

"In 1867, it was possible to hold conferences in which 400 worker delegates, be- 
longing to 117 professions, . . . discussed . . . the organization of Chambers of 
jointly unionized workers .... Up until then, however, workers' unions had been 
very rare — though on the other side, allied with the bosses, there had been forty- 
two Chambers of unionized workers. . . . Prior to 1867, in the margins and in 
defiance of the law, there had been associations only of typographers (1839), mold- 
ers (1863), bookbinders (1864), and hatters (1865). After the meetings held in the 
Passage Raoul, . . . these syndicates multiplied." Charles Benoist, "Le 'Mythe' de 
la classe ouvriere," Revue des deux mondes (March 1, 1914), p. 111. [al3a,4] 

In 1848, Toussenel was a member of the Commission of Labor over which Louis 
Blanc presided in Luxembourg. [al3a,5] 

lb present London in its significance for Barbier and Gavarni. Gavarni's series 
Ce qu 'on voit gratis a Londres <What Can Be Seen for Free in London). [al3a,6] 

In Der achtzehnte Brumaire, Marx says of the cooperatives that in them the 
proletariat "renounces the revolutionizing of the old world by means of the latter's 
own great, combined resources, and seeks, rather, to achieve its salvation behind 
society's back, in private fashion, within its limited conditions of existence." 16 
Cited in E. Fuchs, Die Karikatur des europaischen Volker, vol. 2 <Munich, 1921 > , 
p. 472. [al3a,7] 

On Poesies sociales des ouvriers, edited by Rodrigues, La Revue des deux mondes 
writes: "You pass from a reminiscence of M. de Beranger to a coarse imitation of 
the rhythms of Lamartine and Victor Hugo" (p. 966). And the class-hound charac- 
ter of this critique emerges unabashedly when its author writes of the worker: "If 
he aims to reconcile the exercise of his profession with literary studies, he will 
discover how uncongenial to intellectual development physical exhaustion can be" 
(p. 969). In support of his point, the author rehearses the fate of a worker poet 
who was driven mad. Lerminier, "De la Litterature des ouvriers," Revue des deux 
mondes, 28 (Paris, 1841). [al3a,8] 

Agricol Perdiguier's Livre du compagnonnage seeks to make use of the medieval 
guild-forms of alliance hetween workers for the new form of association. This 
undertaking is curtly dismissed hy Lerminier in "De la Litterature des ouvriers," 
in Revue des deux mondes, 28 (Paris, 1841), pp. 955 ff. [al4,l] 



Adolphe Boyer, De VEtat des ouvriers et de son amelioration par I'organisation 
du travail (Paris, 1841). The author of this book was a printer. It was unsuccess- 
ful. He commits suicide and (according to Lerminier) calls on the workers to follow 
his example. The book was published in German in Strasbourg, in 1844. It was 
very moderate and sought to make use of compagnonnage for worker associa- 
tions. [al4,2] 

"Anyone who considers the harsh and burdensome life which the laboring 
classes have to lead remains convinced that, among the workers, the most re- 
markable men . . . are not those who hurry to take up a pen . . ., not those who 
write, but those who act. . . . The division of labor that assigns to some men 
acdon and to others thought is thus always in the nature of things." Lerminier, 
"De la Litterature des ouvriers," Revue des deux mondes, 28 (Paris, 1841), p. 975. 
And by "action" the author means, fir st of all, the practice of working overtime! 

[al4,3] 

Worker associations deposited their funds in savings banks or took out treasury 
bonds. Lerminier, in "De la Litterature des ouvriers" (Revue des deux mondes 
[Paris, 1841], p. 963), praises them for this. Their insurance institutions, he says 
further on, lighten the load of public assistance. [al4,4] 

Proudhon receives an invitation to dinner from the financier Millaud. "Proudhon 
managed to extricate himself ... by replying that he lived entirely in the bosom of 
his family and was always in bed hy nine P.M." Firmin Maillard, La Cite des 
intellectuels (Paris <1905>), p. 383. [al4,5] 

From a poem hy Dauheret on Ledru-Rollin: 

The red flag revered hy the French everywhere 
Is the rohe in which Christ was attired. 
Let us all render homage to brave Rohespierre, 
And Marat who made him admired. 

Cited in Auguste Lepage, Les Cafes politiques et litteraires de Paris (Paris <1874> , 
p. 11. [al4,6] 

Georg Herwegh, "Die Epigonen von 1830," Paris, November 1841: 

Away, away with the Tricolor, 
Which -witnessed the deeds of your fathers, 
And write on the gates as a warning: 
"Here is Freedom's Capua!" 

Georg Herwegh, Gedichte eines Lebendigen, vol. 2 (Zurich and Winterthur, 1844), 
p. 15. [al4a,l] 



Heine on the hourgeoisie during the February Revolution: "The severity with 
which the people dealt with . . . thieves who were caught in the act seemed to many 



. . . rather excessive, and certain people hecame uneasy on learning that thieves 
were shot on the spot. Under such a regime, they said to themselves, who could be 
sure of his own life in the end?" Heinrich Heine, "Die Fehruari'evolution," 
Scimtliche Werke, ed. Wilhelm Bblsche (Leipzig), vol. 5, p. 363." ' [al4a,2] 

America in the Hegelian philosophy: "Hegel . . . did not give direct expression to 
this consciousness of terminating an epoch of history; rather, he gave it indirect 
expression. He makes it known by the fact that, in thinking, he casts an eye over 
the past in 'its obsolescence of spirit,' even as he looks ahout for a possible discov- 
ery in the domain of spirit, all the while expressly reserving the awareness of such 
discovery. The rare indications concerning America — which at this period seemed 
the future land of liberty [note: A. Ruge, Aus friiherer Zeit, vol. 4, pp. 72-84. 
Fichte had already thought of emigrating to America at the time of the collapse of 
old Europe (letter to his wife of May 28, 1807).] — and concerning the Slavic world, 
envision the possibility, for universal spirit, of emigration from Europe as a means 
of preparing new protagonists of the principle of spirit that was . . . completed 
with Hegel. 'America is therefore the land of the future, where, in the ages that lie 
before us, the burden of the World's History shall reveal itself — perhaps in a 
contest hetween North and South America.' . . . But 'what has taken place in the 
New World up to the present time is only an echo of the Old World — the expression 
of a foreign Life; and as a Land of the Future, it has no interest for us here. ... In 
regard to Philosophy . . . we have to do with . . . that which is'" [Hegel, Philoso- 
phic der Geschichte, ed. Lasson, p. 200 (and 779?)]."' Karl Lowith, "L'Acheve- 
ment de la philosophie classique par Hegel et sa dissolution chez Marx et 
Kierkegaard" [Recherches philosophiques, founded by A. Koyrc, H.-Ch. Puech, 
A. Spaier, vol. 4 (Paris, 1934-1935), pp. 246-247]. [al4a,3] 

Auguste Barbier represented the doleful pendant to Saint-Simonian poetry. He 
disavows this relationship as little in his works in general as in these closing lines 
of his prologue: 

If my verse is too raw, its tongue too uncouth, 
Look to the brazen century in which it sounds. 
Cynicism of manners must defile the word, 
And a hatred of evil begets hyperbole. 
Thus, I can defy the gaze of the prude: 
My ungentle verse is true blue at heart. 

Auguste Barbier, Poesies (Paris, 1898), p. 4. (al5,l] 

Ganneau publishes "Waterloo" (Paris: Au Bureau des Publications Evadiennes, 
184 3) anonymously. The pamphlet is dedicated to the apotheosis of Napoleon — 
"Jesus the Christ-Ahel, Napoleon the Christ-Cain" (p. 8) — and concludes with the 
invocation of "Evadian Unity" (p. 15) and the signature: "In the name of the 
Grand Evadah, in the name of God on High, Mother and Father, . . . the Mapah" 
(p. 16). <SeeU12,7.> [al5,2] 



Ganneau's "Page prophetique" was published for the first time in 1840, and again 
during the Revolution of 1848. The title page of the second edition bears the 
following announcement: "This 'Prophetic Page,' seized on July 14, 1840, was 
discovered by citizen Sobrier, former deputy in the Police Department, in the 
dossier of citizen Ganneau (The Mapah). — (The official report is labeled: 'Revolu- 
tionary page, one of 3,500 copies distributed under carriage entrances.')" [al5,3] 

Ganneau's "Bapteme, mariage" inaugurates the era of the Evadah, commencing 
on August 15, 1838. The pamphlet is puhlished at 380 Rue Saint-Denis, Passage 
Lemoine. Signed: The Mapah. It proclaims: "Mary is no longer the Mother: she is 
the Bride; Jesus Christ is no longer the Son: he is the Bridegroom. The old world 
(of compression) is finished; the new world (of expansion) begins!" "Mary-Eve, 
female Genesiac unity" and "Christ-Adam, male Genesiac unity" appear "under 
the name Androgyne Evadam." [al5,4] 

"The 'Devoir Mutuel' of Lyons, which played a crucial role in the insurrections of 
1831 and 1834, marks the transition from the old Mutualite to the Resistance." 
Paul Louis, Histoire de la classe ouvriere en France de Im Revolution a nos jours 
(Paris, 1927), p. 72. [al5,5] 

On May 15, 1848, revolutionary demonstration of the Paris workers for the libera- 
tion of Poland. [al5,6] 

"Jesus Christ . . . , who gave us no vestige of a political code, left his work incom- 
plete." Honore de Balzac, he Cure de village (letter from Gerard to Grossetete), 
editions Siecle, vol. 17, p. 183. 19 [al5a,l] 

The early inquests into workers' circumstances were conducted, for the most part, 
by entrepreneurs, their agents, factory inspectors, and administrative officials. 
"When the doctors and philanthropists who were conducting the inquest went to 
visit the families of workers, they were generally accompanied by the entrepreneur 
or his representative. Le Play, for example, advises one, when visiting the families 
of workers, 'to utilize the recommendation of a carefully chosen authority.' He 
counsels the adoption of utmost diplomacy in regard to individual members of the 
family, and even the payment of small indemnities or the distribution of gifts: one 
should 'praise with discretion the sagacity of the men, the grace of the women, the 
good behavior of the children, and, in suitahle fashion, dispense little presents to 
all' (Les Ouvriers europeens [Paris], vol. 1, p. 223). In the course of the detailed 
critique of inquest procedures which Audiganne promotes in the discussions of his 
workers' circle, Le Play is spoken of in the following terms: 'Never was a falser 
path marked out, despite the best intentions. It is purely a question of the system. 
A mistaken point of view, an inadequate method of observation give rise to a 
wholly arbitrary train of thought having no relation at all to the reality of society 
and evincing, moreover, an incorrigible propensity for despotism and rigidity' 
(Audiganne, p. 61). A frequent error in the conduct of the inquests, according to 



Audiganne, is the air of ceremony with which the investigators carry out their 
visits to the homes of the workers: 'If not a single special inquest undertaken 
during the Second Empire yielded concrete results of any kind, the blame for this 
rests, in large part, on the pomp with which the investigators paraded around' 
(p. 93). Engels and Marx describe further the methods by which the workers were 
induced to express themselves on the occasion of these recherches societies and 
even to present petitions against the reduction of their work time." Hilde Weiss, 
"Die 'Enquete ouvriere' von Karl Marx" [Zeitschrift fiir Sozialforschung, ed. 
Max Horkheimer, 5, no. 1 (Paris, 1936), pp. 83-84]. The passages from Audi- 
ganne are taken from his book Memoires d'un ouvrier de Paris < Paris, 1873 > . 

[al5a,2] 

In 1854, the affair of the carpenters took place. When the carpenters of Paris 
decided to strike, proceedings were instituted against the leaders of the carpenters 
for violation of the ban on coalitions. They were defended, in the first instance and 
in the appeal, by Berryer. From his arguments before the court of appeals: "It 
cannot be this sacred resolve, this voluntary decision to abandon one's work 
rather than not derive a just income from it, that has been marked out for punish- 
ment by the law. No, it is the determination, instead, to restrain the freedom of 
others; it is the interdiction of work, the hindering of others from going to their 
place of work. ... In order, then, for there to be a coalition, in the proper sense, 
there must be some sort of restraint on the liberty of persons, a violence done to 
the freedom of others. And, in fact, if this is not the true construction of articles 
415 and 416, would there not be, in our law, a monstrous inequality between the 
condition of the workers and that of the entrepreneurs? The latter can take coun- 
sel together to decide that the cost of labor is too high. . . . The law . . . punishes 
the coalition of entrepreneurs only when their concerted action is unjust and 
abusive. . . . Without reproducing the same set of words, the law reproduces the 
same idea with respect to workers. It is by the sound interpretation of these arti- 
cles that you will consecrate the equality of condition that ought to exist between 
these two classes of individuals." <Pierre-Antoine> Berryer, Oeuvres: Plaidoyers, 
vol. 2, 1836-1856 (Paris, 1876), pp. 245-246. [al6,l] 

Affair of the carpenters: "M. Berryer concludes his plea by rising to considera- 
tions ... of the current situation, in France, of the lower classes — condemned, he 
says, to see two-fifths of their members dying in the hospital or laid out in the 
morgue." Berryer, Oeuvres: Plaidoyers, vol. 2, 1836-1856 (Paris, 1876), p. 250 
(The principals accused in the trial were sentenced to three years in prison — a 
judgment that was upheld on appeal.) [al6,2] 

"Our worker-poets of late have been imitating the rhythms of Lamartine, . . . too 
often sacrificing whatever folk originality they might have. . . . When they write, 
they wear a suit and put on gloves, thus losing the superiority that strong hands 
and powerful arms give to the people when they know how to use them." 
J. Michelet, he Peuple, 2nd ed. (Paris, 1846), p. 195. At another point (p. 107), 



the author accentuates the "peculiar character of meekness and melancholy" at- 
taching to this poetry. 2 " [al6,3] 



"In Paris . . . Engels jotted down the 'creed' wliich the local branch of the Commu- 
nist League had asked him to compose. He objected to the term 'creed,' by which 
Schapper and Moll had designated their draft, and he decided that the question- 
and-answer form which was usual in such programs, and to which Considerant 
and Cabet had ultimately had recourse as well, was no longer in place here." 
Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1 (Berlin <1933>), p. 283. 21 [al6,4] 

Legislative repression of the working class goes back to the French Revolution. 
At issue are laws which punished any assembling and unionizing on the part of 
workers, any collective demands for higher wages, and any strikes. ""Die law of 
June 17, 1791, and that of January 12, 1794, contain measures that have proved 
sufficient, up through the present, to repress these offenses." Chaptal, De I 'Indus- 
trie frangoise (Paris, 1819), vol. 2, p. 351. [al6a,l] 

"Since Marx was officially exiled from France, Engels decided, in August 1846, to 
shift his residence to the French capital so that he could meet with the German 
proletarians who were living there and recruit them for the cause of revolutionary 
communism. As it happened, however, the tailors and cahinetmakers and leather- 
workers whom Griin was trying to convert had nothing in common with the prole- 
tarian type on whom Engels was counting. . . . Paris was the headquarters of 
fashion and of the arts and crafts; most of the German workers who had come 
there to hetter their position in the trade, and then return home as master crafts- 
men, were still deeply imhued with the old spirit of the guild." Gustav Mayer, 
Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner Friihzeit, 2nd cd. (Berlin 



The Brussels "Communist Correspondence Committee" of Marx and Engels in 
1846: "'Marx and he . . . had tried in vain to convert Proudhon. Engels now under- 
took a fruitless mission to win over old Cahet, the leader of experimental Utopian 
communism on the continent, . . . for participation in the Correspondence Com- 
mittee. ... It was some months . . . hefore he established closer relations with the 
Reforme gronp, with Louis Blanc and particularly with <Ferdinand> Flocon." 
Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner Friihzeit, 2nd 



Guizot writes, after the Fehruary Revolution: "I have long heen subject to a dou- 
hle suspicion: one, that the disease is much more serious than we think and say; 
and, two, that our remedies are futile, scarcely more than skin deep. While I held 
the reins of my country and directed its affairs, this douhle awareness grew 
stronger hy the day; and precisely in proportion as I succeeded and remained in 
power, I came to feel that neither my success nor my tenure in oflice was having 
much effect, that the defeated enemy was winning out over me, and that, in order 



<1933>),pp. 249-250. 22 



[al6a,2] 



ed. (Berlin <1933>), p. 254. 2i 



[al6a,3] 



truly to defeat him, one would have had to do things which it was impossible even 
to mention." Cited in Abel Bonnard, Les Moderes, in series entitled he Drame du 
present, vol. 1 (Paris < 1936>), pp. 314-315. [al6a,4] 



"If an agitator is to achieve lasting results, he must speak as the representative of 
a body of opinion. . . . Engels must have realized this during his fi rst visit to Paris. 
On his second, he found that the doors at which he knocked opened more easily. 
French socialism stiJJ refused to have anything to do with political struggles. 
Therefore, he could look for allies in the coming battle only among those demo- 
crats connected with La Reforme who advocated state socialism in some degree. 
Under the leadership of a Louis Blanc and a Ferdinand Flocon, these men be- 
lieved, as he did, that it was necessary to garner political power through democ- 
racy before attempting any social transformation. Engels was prepared to go hand 
in hand with the bourgeoisie whenever it took a confirmed democratic direction; 
he could not refuse to associate himself with this party whose program included 
the abolition of hired labor, although he must have known to what extent its 
parliamentary leader, Ledru-Rollin, was averse to communism. . . . He had 
learned from experience; he presented himself to Blanc as 'the official delegate of 
the German democrats in London, in Brussels, and on the Rhine' and 'the agent of 
the Chartist movement.'" Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich 
Engels in seiner Friihzeit (Berlin < 1933>), pp. 280-281. 24 [al7,l] 

"Under the Provisional Government it was customary, indeed it was a necessity, 
combining politics and enthusiasm at once, to preach to the generous workers who 
(as coidd be read on thousands of official placards) had ''placed three months of 
misery at the disposal of the republic,'' that the February Revolution had been 
waged in their own interests, and that the February Revolution was concerned 
above all with the interests of the ivorkers. But, after the opening of the National 
Assembly, everyone came down to earth. What was important now was to bring 
labor back to its old situation, as Minister Trelat said." Karl Marx, "Dem An- 
denken der Juni-Kampf er" [in Karl Marx als Denker, Mensch und Revolutiondr, 
ed. D. Rjazanov (Vienna and Berlin <1928>), p. 38; first published in the Neue 
rheinische Zeitung, ca. June 28, 184.8]. 23 [al7,2] 

Final sentence of the essay on the June combatants, coming directly after the 
description of the measures undertaken by the state to honor the memory of those 
victims who belonged to the bourgeoisie: "But the pleheians are tortured with 
hunger; reviled by the press; abandoned by doctors; abused by honest men as 
thieves, incendiaries, galley slaves; their women and children thrown into still- 
deeper misery; their best sons deported overseas; and it is the privilege, it is the 
right of the democratic press to entwine the laurels round their stern and threat- 
ening brows." Karl Marx, "Dem Andenken der Juni-Kampf er" [in Karl Marx als 
Denker, Mensch und Revolutiondr, ed. D. Rjazanov (Vienna and Berlin), p. 40; 
first published in the Neue rheinische Zeitung, ca. June 28, 1848]. 20 [al7,3] 



On Buret's De la Misere des classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en France and 
Engels' Lage der arbeitenden Klasse in England: "Charles Andler would like us to 
see in Engels' book only a 'recasting and sharpening' of the hook by Buret. In our 
view, however, there is grounds for comparison here only in the fact that both 
hooks. . . partly draw from the same source material. . . . The evaluative criteria 
of the French writer remain anchored in the concept of natural right . . . , while the 
German author . . . adduces the tendencies of economic and social development 
... in his explanations. Whereas Engels looks to communism as the sole salvation 
from the worsening situation of the present, Buret places his hopes in the complete 
mohilization of landed property, in a social politics and a constitutional system of 
industry." Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner 
Friihzeit (Berlin <1933>), p. 195. [al7a,l] 

Engels on the June Insurrection. "In a diary meant for publication on the literary 
page of the Neue rheinische Zeitung, he wrote: 'Between the old Paris ami the new 
lay the fifteenth of May and the twenty-fifth of June. . . . Cavaignac's homhshells 
had effectively burst the invincible Parisian gaiety. "La Marseillaise" and "Le 
Chant du depart" ceased to he heard, and only the hourgeois still hummed to 
themselves their "Mourir pout' la patrie," while the workers, unemployed and 
weaponless, gnashed their teeth in suppressed rage." Gustav Mayer, Friedrich 
Engels, vol. 1, Freidrich Engels in seiner Friihzeit (Berlin <1933>), p. 317. 21 

[al7a,2] 

Engels, during the June Insurrection, referred to "Paris East and West as symhols 
for the two great enemy camps into which here, for the first time, the whole society 
splits." Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engels in seiner 
Friihzeit (Berlin <1933>), p. 312. [al7a,3] 

Marx calls the revolution "our brave friend, Robin Goodf ellow, the old mole that 
can work in the earth so fast, that worthy pioneer — the Revolution." In the same 
speech, at the conclusion: "To avenge the misdeeds of the ruling class, there ex- 
isted in the Middle Ages in Germany a secret trihunal called the Vehmgericht. If a 
red cross was seen marked on a house, people knew that its owner was doomed by 
the Vehm. All the houses of Europe arc now marked with the mysterious red cross. 
History is the judge; its executioner, the proletarian." Karl Marx, "Die Revolu- 
tionen von 1848 und das Proletariat," speech delivered on the fourth anniversary 
of the foundation of The Peoples Paper. Puhlished in The Peoples Paper, April 
19, 1856 2 " [in Karl Marx als Denker, Mensch und Revolutioniir, ed. D. Rjazanov 
(Vienna and Berlin < 1928>), pp. 42, 43]. [al7a,4] 

Marx defends Cahet against Proudhon as "worthy of respect for his practical 
attitude toward the proletariat." Marx to <Johann> Schweitzer, London, January 
24., 1865, in Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Ausgeiviihlte Briefe, ed. V. Adorat- 
ski (Moscow and Leningrad, 1934), p. 143. 29 [al8,l] 



Marx on Proudhon: "The February Revolution certainly came at a very inconven- 
ient moment for Proudhon, who had irrefutably proved only a few weeks before 
that the 'era of revolutions' was ended forever. His speech to the National Assem- 
bly, however little insight it showed into existing conditions, was worthy of every 
praise. Coming after the June Insurrection, it was an act of great courage. In 
addition, it had the fortunate consequence that Thiers — by his reply (which was 
then issued as a special booklet), in which he opposed Proudhon's proposals — 
proved to the whole of Europe what an infantile catechism formed the pedestal for 
this intellectual pillar of the French bourgeoisie. Compared with Thiers, Proud- 
hon's stature indeed seemed that of an antediluvian colossus. . . . His attacks on 
religion, the church, and so on were of great merit locally at a time when the 
French socialists thought it desirable to show, by their religiosity, how superior 
they were to the bourgeois Voltaireanism of the eighteenth century and the Ger- 
man godlessness of the nineteenth. Just as Peter the Great defeated Russian har- 
barism by barbarity, Proudhon did his best to defeat French phrase-mongering by 
phrases." Marx to Schweitzer, London, January 24, 1865, in Karl Marx and Frie- 
drich Engels, Ausgewiihlte Briefe, ed. V. Adoratski (Moscow and Leningrad, 
1934), pp. 143-144. 30 [ a 18,2] 

"You'll he amused by the following: Journaldes economistes, August of this year, 
contains, in an article on . . . communism, the following: 'M. Marx is a cobbler, as 
another German communist, Weitling, is a tailor. . . . Neither does M. Marx pro- 
ceed beyond . . . abstract formulas, and he takes the greatest care to avoid hroach- 
ing any truly practical question. According to him [note the nonsense], the 
emancipation of the German people will he the signal for the emancipation of the 
human race; philosophy would be the head of this emancipation, the proletariat its 
heart. When all has been prepared, the Gallic cock will herald the Teutonic resur- 
rection. . . . Marx says that a universal proletariat must be created in Germany 
[!!] in order for the philosophical concept of comminiisni to he realized."' Engels 
to Marx, ca. September 16, 1846, in Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, <Briefivech~ 
sel,> vol. 1, 1844—1853, ed. Marx-Engels-Lenin Institute (Moscow, Leningrad, 
<and Ziirich,> 1935), pp. 45-46. :!l [al8,3] 

"It is a necessary result of every victorious reaction that the causes of the revolu- 
tion and especially of the counterrevolution should pass into utter ohlivion." 
Engels to Marx, Manchester, December 18, 1868, apropos of Eugene Tenot's 
books on the coup d'etat of 1851; in Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, A usgewdhlte 
Briefe, ed. V. Adoratski (Moscow and Leningrad, 1934), p. 209. 32 [al8,4] 

On national holidays, certain ohjects could he redeemed gratis from the pawn 
shops. [al8a,l] 



Laffitte calls himself "a citizen with possessions." Cited in Abel Bonnard, Les 
Moderes, in series entitled he Drame du present, vol. 1, (Paris < 1936>), p. 79. 

[al8a,2] 



"Poetry . . . has sanctioned the great error of separating the force of Lahor from 
Art. AJfred de Vigny's denunciation of the railroads is succeeded by Verhaeren's 
invective against the 'tentacled cities.' Poetry has taken flight from the forms of 
modern civilization. ... It has not understood that the elements of art can he 
found in any human activity whatsoever, and that its own powers are diminished 
by its refusal to entertain the possibility of inspiration in the things actually sur- 
rounding it." Pierre Hamp, "La Litterature, image de la societe," Encyclopedic 
francaise, vol. 16, Arts et litteratures dans la societe contemporaine, 1 < Paris, 
1935>,p. 64. [al8a,3] 

"From 1852 to 1865, France lent four and a half billion francs abroad. . . . The 
workers were even more directly affected than the bourgeois republicans by eco- 
nomic developments. The consequence of the trade treaty with England and the 
unemployment in the cotton industry caused hy the American Civil War inevitably 
made them realize their own dependence upon the international economic situ- 
ation." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach und das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 
1937), pp. 328, 330. 33 [al8a,4] 

Pierre Dupont's hymn to peace was still sung in the streets during the world 
exhibition of 1878. [al8a,5] 

In 1852, establishment of Credit Mobilier (Pereire) for financing the railroads. 
Establishment of Credit Foncier <land hanlo and of Au Bon Marche. [al8a,6] 

"In 1857, a year of crisis, a series of big financial trials started, under the influence 
of the opposition to the Saint-Simonian democratization of credit; they disclosed 
an enormous amount of corruption and shady practice, such as fraudulent bank- 
ruptcies, abuse of confidence, and artificial driving up of prices. An enormous 
sensation was caused by the trial of Mires, which started in 1861 and dragged on 
for years." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach und das Paris seiner Zeit (Amster- 
dam, 1937), p. 262. " [al8a,7] 

Louis Philippe to Guizot: "We shall never he able to effect anything in France, and 
a day will come when my children will have no hread." S. Kracauer, Jacques 
Offenbach und das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 1937), p. 139. 1:> [al8a,8] 

The manifesto of the Communist party was preceded hy many others. (1843: Con- 
siderant's "Manifeste de la Democratic paci/iqiie.") [al9,l] 

Fourier speaks of cohhlers as "men no less polite than others when they gather in 
association." Fourier, he Nouveau Monde industriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), 
p. 221. [al9,2] 



In 1822, France had only 16,000 passive electors and 110,000 active electors. 
According to the law of 1817, a man was a passive elector <eligible for election to 



the Chamber of Deputies) if he had reached the age of forty and paid 1,000 francs 
in direct taxation. He was an active elector < eligible to vote for deputies) if he had 
reached the age of thirty and paid 300 francs. 35 (Defaulting taxpayers had a man — 
a soldier? — quartered with them, whom they had to maintain until such time as 
they had settled their debt.) [al9,3] 

Proudhon on Hegel: "The antinomy is not resolved: here is the fundamental flaw 
of all Hegelian philosophy. The two terms of which the antinomy is composed 
balance out. ... A balance is by no means a synthesis." "Let us not forget," adds 
Cuvillier, "that Proudhon was for a long time a bookkeeper." Elsewhere, Proud- 
hon speaks of the ideas determining his own philosophy as "elementary ideas, 
common to bookkeeping and metaphysics alike." Armand Cuvillier, "Marx et 
Proudhon,"/! la Lumiere du marxisme, vol. 2 (Paris, 1937), pp. 180-181. 

[al9,4] 

The following premise of Proudhon's, claims Marx in Die heilige Familie < ? > , had 
been previously advanced by the English economist Sadler in 1830. Proudhon 
says: "'This immense power that results from the union and harmony of laborers, 
from the convergence and simultaneity of their efforts, has not been recompensed 
hy the capitalist.' Thus it is that 200 grenadiers succeeded, within several hours, 
in raising the obelisk of Luxor on the Place de la Concorde, whereas a single man 
working for 200 days would have obtained no result at all. 'Separate the laborers 
from one another, and the amount paid daily to each would perhaps exceed the 
value of each individual product, but this is not what is at issue here. A force of a 
thousand men working over a period of twenty days has been paid what a single 
man would earn in fifty-fi ve years; hut this force of a thousand has produced, in 
twenty days, what the power of a single man, multiplied across a million centuries, 
could not achieve. Is there equity in the marketplace?'" Cited in Armand Cuvil- 
lier, "Marx et Proudhon," A Im. Lumiere du marxisme, vol. 2 (Paris, 1937), p. 196. 

[al9,5] 

Unlike Saint-Simon and Fourier, Proudhon was not interested in history. "The 
history of property among ancient peoples is, for us, nothing more than a matter 
of erudition and curiosity" (cited in Cuvillier, "Marx et Proudhon," p. 201). 
Conservatism bound up with a lack of historical sense is just as petty bourgeois 
as conservatism bound up with historical sense is feudal. [al 9a, 1 ] 

Proudhon's apology for the coup d'etat: to he found in his letter to Louis Napoleon 
of April 21, 1858, where it is said of the dynastic principle "that this principle, 
which before '89 was simply the incarnation, in one chosen family, of divine right 
or religious thought, ... is or can he defined today as . . . the incarnation, in one 
chosen family, of human right or the rational thought of the revolution." Cited in 
Armand Cuvillier, "Marx et Proudhon," A la Lumiere du marxisme, vol. 2, part 1 
(Paris, 1937), p. 219. [al9a,2] 



Cuvillier presents Proudhon as a precursor of "national socialism" in the fascist 
sense. [al9a,3] 

"Proudhon believed that one could aholish surplus value, along with unearned 
income, without transforming the organization of production. . . . Proudhon con- 
ceived this preposterous dream of socializing exchange within a context of nonso- 
cialized production." A. Cuvillier, "Marx et Proudhon," A la Lumiere du 
marxisme, vol. 2, part 1 (Paris, 1937), p. 210. [al9a,4] 

"Value measured by labor . . . is . . . , in Proudhon's eyes, the very goal of pro- 
gress. For Marx, it is quite otherwise. The determination of value by labor is not 
an ideal; it is a fact. It exists in our current society." Armand Cuvillier, "Marx et 
Proudhon," A la Lumiere du marxisme, vol. 2, part 1 (Paris, 1937), p. 208. 

[al9a,5] 

Proudhon spoke out extremely maliciously against Fourier, and he spoke no less 
derogatorily of Cabet. This last provoked a reprimand from Marx, who saw in 
Cabet, by reason of his political role in the working class, a highly respectable 
man. [al9a,6] 

Blanqui's exclamation, on entering the salon of Mile, de Montgolfier on the evening 
of July 29, 1830: "The Romantics are done for!"'" [al9a,7] 

Beginning of the June Insurrection: "On June 19, the dissolution of the national 
workshops was announced as imminent; a crowd gathered around the Hotel de 
Ville. On June 21, he Moniteur announced that, the following day, workers aged 
seventeen to twenty-five would he enlisted in the army or conducted to Sologne and 
other regions. It was this last expedient that most exasperated the Paris workers. 
All these men who were used to doing detailed manual work in front of a work- 
bench and vise rejected the idea of going to till the earth and lay out roads in a 
marshland. One of the cries of the insurrection was: 'We won't go! We won't go! "' 
Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 193. [a20,l] 

Blanqui in he Liberateur, March 1834: "He demolishes, by a comparison, the 
notorious commonplace, 'The rich put the poor to work.' 'Approximately,' he 
says, 'as plantation owners put Negroes to work, with the difference that the 
worker is not capital to he hushanded like the slave.'" Gustave Geffroy, L'En- 
ferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 69. [a20,2] 

Garat's theme of April 2, 1848: "Establishment of a cordon sanitaire around the 
dwellings of the rich, who are destined to die of hunger." Gustave Geffroy, UEn- 
ferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 152. [a20,3] 



Refrain of 1848: "Hat in hand when facing the cap, / Kneel down hefore the 
worker!" [a20,4] 



Fifty thousand workers in the June Insurrection in Paris. 



[a20,5] 



Proudhon defines himself as "a new man, a man of polemics and not of the barri- 
cades; a man who would know how to reach his goal hy dining every day with the 
prefect of police and taking for his confidants all the De la Hoddes of the world." 
This in 1850. Cited in Gel'f roy, L 'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. l,pp. 180-181. 

[a20,6] 

"Under the Empire — to its very end, in fact — there was a renewal and develop- 
ment of the ideas of the eighteenth century. . . . People, in those days, readily 
called themselves atheists, materialists, positivists; and the vaguely religious or 
manifestly Catholic republican of 1848 became a . . . curiosity." Gustave Geff roy, 
L'Enferme (Paris, 1897), p. 247. [a20,7] 

Blanqui, in the proceedings taken against the Societe des Amis du Peuple, under 
questioning by the presiding judge: '"What is your profession?' Blanqui: 'Prole- 
tarian.' Judge: 'That is not a profession.' Blanqui: 'What! Not a profession? It is 
the profession of thirty million Frenchmen who live by their lahor and who are 
deprived of political rights.' Judge: 'Well, so he it. Let the clerk record that the 
accused is a proletarian. '" Defense du citoyen Louis Auguste Blanqui devant la 
cour d'assises, 1832 (Paris, 1832), p. 4. [a20,8] 

Baudelaire on Barhier's Rimes heroiqites: "Here, to speak frankly, all the folly of 
the century appears, resplendent in its unconscious nakedness. Under the pretext 
of writing sonnets in honor of great men, the poet has celehrated the lightning rod 
and the automated loom. The prodigious ahsurdities to which this confusion of 
ideas and functions could lead us is obvious." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique, ed. 
Hachette, vol. 3 (Paris), p. 336. "' [a20a,l] 

Blanqui, in his Defense du citoyen Louis Auguste Blanqui devant la cour d'as- 
sises, 1832 (Paris, 1832), p. 14.: "You have confiscated the rifles of July — yes. Bui 
the bullets have been fired. Every bullet of the workers of Paris is on its way round 
the world." [a20a,2] 

"The man of genius represents at once the greatest strength and the greatest weak- 
ness of humanity. . . . He tells the nations that the interests of the weak and the 
interests of genius coalesce, such that the one cannot be endangered without en- 
dangering the other, such that the ultimate limit of perfectibility will be reached 
only when the right of the weakest will have replaced, on the throne, the right of 
the strongest." Auguste Blanqui, Critique sociale (Paris, 1885), vol. 2, Fragments 
et notes, p. 46 ("Propriete intellectuelle," 1867 — conclusion!). [a20a,3] 



On the compliments paid hy Lamartine to Rothschild: "M. de Lamartine, this 
Captain Cook of oceangoing politics, this Sinbad the Sailor of the nineteenth cen- 
tury, . . . this voyager no less roving than Ulysses, though happier, who has taken 



the Sirens to he crew of his ship and aired upon the shores of all the parties the 
ever-varied music of his convictions, M. de Lamartine, in his never-ending odys- 
sey, has just gently beached his aeolian hark under the porticoes of the Stock 
Exchange." Auguste Blanqui, Critique sociale (Paris, 1885), vol. 2, p. 100 ("La- 
martine et Rothschild," April 1850). [a20a,4] 

Doctrine of Blanqui: "No! No one has access to the secret of the future. Scarcely 
possihle for even the most clairvoyant are certain presentiments, rapid glimpses, a 
vague and fugitive coup d'oeil. The Revolution alone, as it clears the terrain, will 
reveal the horizon, will gradually remove the veils and open up the roads, or 
rather the multiple paths, that lead to the new order. Those who pretend to have in 
their pocket a complete map of this unknown land — they truly are madmen." 
Auguste Blanqui, Critique sociale (Paris, 1885), vol. 2, pp. 115-116 ("Les Sectes 
et la Revolution," Octoher 1866). [a20a,5] 

Parliament of 1849: "In a speech delivered to the National Assemhly on April 14, 
M. Considerant, a disciple ... of Fourier, had this to say: 'The time of ohedience 
is past: men feel that they are equal, and they want to he free. They do not he- 
lieve any longer, and they wish to enjoy themselves. There you have the state 
of souls.' — 'You mean the state of hrutes!' interrupted M. de La Rochcjaque- 
lein." L. B. Bon jean, Socialisme et sens commun (Paris, May 1849), pp. 28-29. 

[a21,l] 

"M. Dumas (of the Institut) exclaims: ' The hlinding dust of foolish theories raised 
by the whirlwind of Fehruary has dissipated in the air, and, in the wake of this 
vanished cloud, the year 1844 reappears with its shining countenance and its 
sublime doctrine of material interests. '" Auguste Blanqui, Critique sociale (Paris, 
1885), vol. 2, p. 104 ("Discours de Lamartine," 1850). [a21,2] 

In 1850, Blanqui pens a polemic: "Rapport gigantesque de Thiers sur l'assistance 
publique." [a21,3] 

"Will matter . . . assume the form of a single point in the sky? Or he content with a 
thousand, ten thousand, a hundred thousand points that would barely enlarge its 
meager domain? No — its vocation, its law, is infinity. It will not in the least allow 
itself to be outflanked by the void. Space >vill not become its dungeon." A. Blanqui, 
L'Eternite par les astres: Hypothese astronomique (Paris, 1872), p. 54. [a21 ,4] 

At the end of a meeting in the early days of the Third Repuhlic: "Louise Michel 
announced that an effort would he made to contact the wives and children of 
imprisoned comrades. 'What we ask of y»n,' she said, 'is not an act of charity hut 
an act of solidarity; for those who hestow charity, when they do hestow it:, are 
proud and self-satisfied, but we — we are never satisfied.'" Daniel Halevy. Pays 
parisiens (Paris <1932>),p. 165. [a21,5] 



Moiwelle Nemesis, by Barthelemy (Paris, 1844), contains, in chapter 16 ("The 
Workers"), a "satire" which very emphatically takes up the demands of the 
working class. Barthelemy is already acquainted with the concept of proletarian. 

[a21,6] 

Barricades: "At nine o'clock in the evening, on a beautiful summer night, Paris 
without streetlights, without shops, without gas, without moving vehicles, pre- 
sented a unique tableau of desolation. At midnight, with its paving stones piled 
high, its barricades, its walls in ruins, its thousand carriages stranded in the mud, 
its boulevards devastated, its dark streets deserted, Paris was like nothing ever 
seen before. Thebes and Herculaneum are less sad. No noises, no shadows, no 
living beings — except the motionless worker who gnarded the barricade with his 
rifle and pistols. To frame it all: the hlood of the day preceding and the uncertainty 
of the morrow." Barthelemy and Mery, V Insurrection: Poeme (Paris, 1830), 
pp. 52-53 (note). 0 Parisian Antiquity 0 [a21a,l] 

"Who would believe it! It is said that, incensed at the hour, / Latter-day Joshuas, 
at the foot of every clocktower, / Were firing on clock faces to make the day stand 
still." At this point a note: "This is a unique feature in the history of the insurrec- 
tion: it is the only act of vandalism carried out hy the people against public monu- 
ments. And what vandalism! How well it expresses the situation of hearts and 
minds on the evening of the twenty-eighth! 19 With what rage one watched the 
shadows falling and the implacable advance of the needle toward night — just as on 
ordinary days! What was most singular ahout this episode was that it was ob- 
served, at the very same hour, in different parts of the city. This was the expres- 
sion not of an aberrant notion, an isolated whim, hut of a widespread, nearly 
general sentiment." Barthelemy and Mery, L'lnsurrection: Poeme dedie aux 
Parisiens (Paris, 1830), pp. 22, 52. [a21a,2] 

During the July Revolution, for a short time before the tricolor was raised, the 
flag of the insurgents was black. With it the female <body> was covered, presum- 
ably the same one carried by torchlight through Paris. 10 See Barthelemy and 
Mery, L'lnsurrection (Paris, 1830), p. 51. [a21a,3] 

Railroad poetry: 

To a station 'neath the rails everybody is bound. 
Wherever the train crisscrosses the land, 
There's no more distinction twixt humble and grand; 
All classes are equal six feet underground. 

Barthelemy, Nouvelle Nemesis, no. 12, "La Vapeur" (Paris, .1845) <p. 46>. 

[a22,l] 

Opening of the preface to Tissot's Dela Manie du suicide et de Vesprit de revoke: 
"It is impossible not to be struck hy two moral phenomena which are like the 



symptoms of a disease that today, in its own particular way, is ravaging the hody 
and limbs of society: we are speaking of suicide and revolt. Impatient with all law, 
discontented with all position, the individual rises up equally against human na- 
ture and against mankind, against himself and against society. . . . The man of our 
time, and the Frenchman perhaps more than any other, having violently broken 
with the past . . . and looked with fear toward a future whose horizon already 
seems to him so gloomy, kills himself if he is weak ... , if he lacks faith in . . . the 
betterment of men and, above all, lacks faith in a providence capable of deriving 
good from evil." J. Tissot, De la Manie du suicide et de Vesprit de revoke (Paris, 
1840) <p. v>. The author claims not to have known the books by Frcgier, Villerme, 
and Degeraude at the time he drafted his work. [a22,2] 

Concerning Flora Tristan's "Mephis": "This proletarian name, which now is so 
readily intelligible, . . . sounded extremely romantic and mysterious in those days. 
It marked the pariah, the galley slave, the carbonaro, the artist, the regenerator, 
the adversary of the Jesuits. From his encounter with a beautiful Spaniard was 
horn the inspired woman who must redeem the world." Jean Cassou, Quarante- 
huit (Paris <1939>), p. 12. [a22,3] 

With regard to the exotic enterprises of Considerant and Cabet, Blanqui speaks of 
experiments carried out "in a corner of the human species." Cited in Cassou, 
Quarante-huit, p. 41. [a22,4] 

The unemployment rate in England between 1850 and 1914 rose only once above 8 
percent. (In 1930, it reached 16 percent.) [a22,5] 

"The typographer Burgy, in his book Present et avenir des ouvriers, preaches . . . 
celibacy to his companions: the picture of the proletarian condition would not be 
complete if one left out: the shadows of resignation and defeatism." Jean Cassou, 
Quarante-huit (Paris <1939>), p. 77. [a22a,l] 

Guizot, in Du Mouvement et du resistance en politique: "Any man of above-aver- 
age intelligence who has neither property nor business — that is to say, who is 
unwilling or unable to pay a tribute to the state — should he considered dangerous 
from a political standpoint." Cited in Cassou, Quarante-huit, p. 152. [a22a,2] 

Guizot in 1837, to the Chamher: "Today — apart from force of law — you have hut 
one effective guarantee against this revolutionary disposition of the poorer classes: 
work, the constant necessity of work." Cited in Cassou, pp. 152-153. [a22a,3] 

Blanqui, in his letter to Maillard: "Thank heaven there are so many bourgeois in 
the camp of the proletariat. It is they who represent the chief strength of this 
camp, or at least its most lasting strength. They provide it with a contingent of 
luminaries such as the people themselves, unfortunately, cannot yet furnish. It 
was the bourgeois who first raised the flag of the proletariat, who formulated, 



propagated, and maintained the egalitarian doctrines, and who restored them 
after their downfall. Everywhere it is bourgeois who lead the people in their battles 
against the bourgeoisie." A passage immediately following deals with the bourgeoi- 
sie's exploitation of the proletariat as political shock troops. Maurice Dommanget, 
Blanqui a Belle-Ue (Paris, 1935 > , pp. 176-177. [a22a,4] 

"The terrible scourge of poverty, so relentless in its torments, requires a no less 
terrible remedy, and celibacy appears the most certain among those pointed out to 
us by social science." In connection with a reference to Malthus: "In our day the 
pitiless Marcus [evidently used for "Malthus"], unfolding the dismal consequences 
of a limitless increase in population . . . , has ventured to propose asphyxiating 
those babies born to indigent families that already have three children, and then 
compensating the mothers for suffering an act of such cruel necessity. . . . Here we 
have the last word of the economists of England!" [Jules Burgy,] Present et avenir 
des ouvriers (Paris, 1847), pp. 30, 32-33. 

[a22a,5] 

There exists on earth an infernal vat 

Named Paris; it is one large oven, 

A stony pit of wide circumference, 

Ringed hy three bends of a muddy yellow river. 

It is a seething volcano that never stops erupting; 

Its shock waves travel through human matter. 

Auguste Barhier, Iambes etpoemes (Paris, 1845), p. 65 ("La Cuve" <The Vat>). 

[a23,l] 

The Paris purebred is this pale guttersnipe, 

Sainted growth, yellowed like an old penny, 

This boy hooting, out at all hours 

Strolling indolent down unfamiliar lanes, 

Routing the skinny mutts, or, all along the high walls, 

Chalking a thousand unchaste figures, whisding the while, 

This child, believing nothing, who aims up his nose at mother; 

The admonition to pray is for him a bad joke. 

Auguste Barbier, Iambes et pohnes, p. 68 ("La Cuve"). Hugo had already re- 
touched these traits in the figure of Gavroche. [a23,2] 



b 



[Daumier] 



A paradoxical description of Daumier's art: "Caricature, for him, became a sort 
of philosophic operation which consisted in separating a man from that which 
society had made of him, in order to reveal what he was at bottom, what he 
could have been under different circumstances. He extracted, in a word, the 
latent self." Edouard Drumont, Les He'ros et les pitres (Paris <1900>),p. 299 ("Dau- 
mier"). [bl,l] 

On Daumier's bourgeois: "This ossified, inert, crystallized being who waits for the 
omnibus leans on an umbrella that expresses some unutterable idea of absolute 
petrifaction." Edouard Drnmont, Les Heros et les pitres (Paris), p. 304 ("Dau- 
mier"). [bl,2] 

"Many writers . . . acquired fame and fortune by mocking the faults and infirmi- 
ties of others. Monnier, on the other hand, did not have to go very far to find his 
model: he planted himself before the mirror, listened to himself thinking and 
talking, and, finding himself highly ridiculous, he conceived this cruel incarna- 
tion, this prodigious satire of the French bourgeois, whom he named Joseph Prud- 
homme." Alphonse Daudet, Trente ans de Paris, p. 91. [bl,3] 

"Not only does caricature greatly accentuate the techniques of drawing, . . . hut it 
has always been the means of introducing new subject matter into art. It was 
through Monnier, Gavarni, and Daumier that the bourgeois society of this century 
was opened up to art." Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der europdischen Volker, 
4th ed. (Munich <1921>), vol. 1, p. 16. [bl,4] 

"On August 7, 1830, Louis Philippe was . . . proclaimed . . . king. On November 4 
of that same year, the first issue of La Caricature appeared, the journal created by 
Philipon." Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der europdischen Volker (Munich), vol. 
l,p. 326. [bl,5] 

Michelet wanted to see one of his works illustrated by Daumier. [bl,6] 



"Philipon invented a new character type, . . . which was said to have brought him 
nearly as much . . . popularity as his pears: 'Robert Macaire,' the type of the 



unscrupulous speculator and promoter.'" Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der Si- 

europdischen Volker (Munich), vol. 1, p. 354. [bl,7] ^ 

SP 

"The last issue of La Caricature, dated August 27, 1835, was . . . devoted ... to O 

the promulgation of the . . . September Laws, . . . which . . . were represented in § 

the form of pears." Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der europdischen Volker, vol. 1, h 
p. 352. [bl,8] 



Travies, the creator of Mayeux; Gavarni, the creator of Thomas Vireloque; Dau- 
mier, the creator of Ratapoil — the Bonapartist lumpenproletarian. [bl,9] 

On January 1, 1856, Philipon rebaptizes he Journal pour rire as he Journal 
amusaut. [bl,10] 



"Whenever a priest . . . exhorted the girls of a village never to go to the dance, or 
the peasants never to frequent the tavern, Courier's epigrams would climb the bell 
tower and sound the alarm, proclaiming the advent of the Inquisition in France. 
His pamphlets, meanwhile, would make the whole country listen to the sermon." 
Alfred Nettement, Histoire de la litterature f ranqaise sous la Restauratiou (Paris, 
1858), vol. 1, p. 421. [bla.l] 



"Mayeux ... is actually an imitation. Under Louis XIV, ... a particular costume 
dance caused an uproar: children made up as old men, and sporting enormous 
hunchbacks, executed grotesque figures. It was known as the "Mayeux of Brit- 
tany" dance. The Mayeux who was made a member of the Garde Nationale in 1830 
was merely a very ill-bred descendant of these old Mayeux." Edouard Fournier, 
Enigmes des rues de Paris (Paris, 1860), p. 351. [bla,2] 

On Daumier: "By no one more than Daumier has the hourgeois heen known and 
loved (after the fashion of artists) — the bourgeois, this last vestige of the Middle 
Ages, this Gothic ruin that dies so hard, this type at once so commonplace and so 
eccentric." Charles Baudelaire, Les Dessius de Daumier (Paris < 1924>), p. 14. 2 

[bla,3] 



On Daumier: "His caricature has formidable hreadth, hut it is quite without bile 
or rancor. In all his work there is a foundation of decency and bonhomie. We 
should note that he has often refused to handle certain very fine and violent 
satirical themes, because, he said, they exceeded the limits of the comic and could 
wound the feelings of his fellow men." Charles Baudelaire, Les Dessius de Dau- 
mier (Paris <1924>), p. 1.6. ;> [bla,4] 



On Monnier: "But what a great source these merciless, impertnrhahle commenta- 
tors remain! Balzac took the name . . . 'Cihot' from Monnier, as well as the names 
'Desroches' and 'Descoings.' And Anatole France took from him the name 'Ma- 
dame Bergeret,' just as Flaubert had taken, with a very slight alteration, the name 




Honore Daumier, ca. 1857. Photo by Nadar. Collection Societe Franchise de 
PhotogTaphie. 



'Monsieur Pegnchet.'" Marie- Jeanne Durry, "De Monnier a Balzac," Vendredi, 
March 20, 1936, p. 5. [bla,5] 



When does Gavroche first appear? Who are his forebears? Is his first appearance 
in Les Muenbles? Abel Bonnard on the homme yn?/a#<adulteratedman> — "good 
only for provoking events he could not control." "This type of individual, origi- 
nating in the nobility, has undergone a descent — and lost all his gilding in the 
process — through the whole spectrum of society, to the point where what was 
born in the foam at the surface has come to rest in the slime at the bottom. What 
began in persiflage has ended in a sneer. Gavroche is, very simply, the marquis of 
the gutter " Abel Bonnard, Les Moderes, in series entitled Le Drame du present, vol. 
1 (Paris<l936>),p. 294. [bla,6] 

"Everyone knew Daumier's mythological caricatures, which, in the words of 
Baudelaire, made Achilles, Odysseus, and the rest look like a lot of played-out 
tragic actors, inclined to take pinches of snuff at moments when no one was look- 
ing." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach and das Paris seiner Zeit (Amsterdam, 
1937), p. 237. 1 [b2,l] 

Fourier. "Not content with extracting from his works the innumerable amusing 
inventions to he found there, the gazetteers add to them — for example, the busi- 
ness of the tail with an eye on its tip, supposedly an attribute of men of the future. 
He protests vehemently against this malicious fabrication." F. Armand and 
R. Mauhlanc, Fourier (Paris, 1937), vol. 1, p. 58. [b2,2] 

The Pagan School is opposed not only to the spirit of Christianity but also to the 
spirit of modernity. Baudelaire illustrates this, in his essay "L'Ecole paiieime," with 
the aid of Daumier: "Daumier did a remarkable series of lithographs, L'Histoire 
ancienne, which was, so to speak, the best paraphrase of the famous saying, 'Who 
will deliver us from the Greeks and Romans?' Daumier pounced brutally upon 
antiquity and mythology, and spit on them. The hotheaded Achilles, the prudent 
Ulysses, the wise Penelope, that great ninny Telemachus, the beautiful Helen 
who ruined Iroy, the ardent Sappho, patroness of hysterical women — all were 
portrayed with a farcical homeliness that recalled those old carcasses of classical 
actors who take a pinch of snuff in the wings." Charles Baudelaire, L'Art roman- 
tique, ed. Hachette (Paris), vol. 3, p. 305. 5 [b2,3] 



Types: Mayeux (Travies), Robert Macaire (Daumier), Prutlhonune (Monnier). 

[b2,4] 




[Literary History, Hugo] 



"Thiers argued that, since education was 'the beginning of ease, and since ease was 
not reserved for all,' then education should not he within reach of all. Moreover, 
he held lay instructors . . . responsible for the events of June . . . and declared 
himself 'ready to put the clergy in charge of all primary education. "' A . Malct and 



February 25, 1848: "During the afternoon, armed mobs demanded that the red 
flag replace the tricolor flag. . . . After a violent debate, Lamartine managed to 
turn them hack with an improvised address, whose concluding words have re- 
mained famous: T shall repudiate to the very death,' he cried, 'this flag of hlood, 
and you ought to spurn it more than I. For this red flag that y»u wave hef ore us has 
previously heen unfurled only on the Champ de Mars, soaked with the hlood of the 
people in '91 and '93, whereas the tricolor flag has been paraded the world over, 
with the name, the glory, and the liherty of the Fatherland." A. Malet and 



"In an admirahle article entitled 'Le Depart,' Balzac lamented the fall of the 
Bourhons, which for him meant the death knell of the arts and the triumph of the 
peddlers of political nostrums. Invoking the vessel on which the king was depart- 
ing, he exclaimed: ''There is law and logic; beyond this little hoat are the storms."' 
J. Lucas-Dubreton, Le Comte d'Artois, Charles X <Paris, 1927> , p. 233. [dl,3] 

"Who knows the titles of all the books that bear the name of M. Dumas? Does he 
know them himself? If he does not keep a two-column record with debits and 
credits, he will no doubt have forgotten . . . more than one of those children of 
whom he is the legitimate father, or the natural father, or the godfather. His output 
in recent months has amounted to not less than thirty volumes." Paulin Limayrac, 
"Du Roman actuel et de nos romanciers," Revue des deux mondes, 11, no. 3 



P. Grillet, XIX e Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 258. 



[dl.l] 



P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), p. 245. 



[dl,2] 



(Paris, 1845), pp. 953-954. 



[dl,4] 



Ironical: "What a happy thought on the part of M. de Balzac — to predict a peasant 
revolt and demand the reestablishment of feudalism! What is so surprising in that? 
It is his idea of socialism. Mme. Sand has another, and M. Sue likewise. To each 



novelist his own." Paulin Limayrac, "Du Roman actuel et de nos romanciers," 
Revuedesdeuxmond.es, 11, no. 3 (Paris, 1845), pp. 955-956. [dl,5] 



"Citizen Hugo made his debut at the tribune of the National Assembly. He was 
what we expected: a phrasemaker and a gesticulator, full of empty, high-flown 
oratory. Continuing along the perfidious and slanderous path of his recent broad- 
side, he spoke of the unemployed, of the indigent, of the idlers and do-nothings, 
the scoundrels who are the praetorians of the uprising, the condottieri. In a word, 
he ran the metaphor ragged to arrive at an attack on the national workshops." Les 
Boulets rouges: Feuille du club pacifique des droits de Vhomme, ed. Pelin, 1st 
year, June 22-25 [1848] ("Faits divers"). [dla.l] 

"Itis as though Lamartine had made it his mission to implement Plato's teaching 
on the necessity of banishing poets from the republic, and one cannot help smiling 
as one reads this author's account of the worker who was part of the large demon- 
stration in front of the Hotel de Ville, and who shouted at the speaker: 'You're 
nothing but a lyre! Go sing!"' Friedrich Szarvady, Paris, 1848-1852, vol. 1 (Ber- 
lin, 1852), p. 333. [dla,2] 

Chateauhriand: "He hrings into fashion that vague sadness, . . . 'le mal du siecle' 
<the infirmity of the century). A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), 
p. 145. [dla,3] 

'"If we could have ourwish . . .' This desire, this regret — Baudelaire was the first 
to interpret it, twice giving voice, in L'Art romantique, to unexpected praise for a 
poet of his day, the author of a "Chant des ouvriers," that Pierre Dupont who, he 
tells us, 'after 1848 . . . attained great glory.' The specification of this revolution- 
ary date is very important here. Without tliis indication, we might have trouhle 
understanding the defense of popular poetry, and of an art 'inseparable from 
utility,' 1 on the part of a writer who could pass for the chief architect of the 
rupture of poetry and art with the masses. . . . 1848: that is the hour when the 
street beneath Baudelaire's window begins in very truth to tremhle, when the 
theater of the interior must yield him up in all magnificence, to the theater of the 
exterior, as someone who incarnates, at the highest level, the concern for human 
emancipation in all its forms, as well as the consciousness, alas, of everything that 
is ridiculously ineffectual in this aspiration alone, wherehy the gift of the artist 
and of the man becomes total — Baudelaire's anonymous collaboration on Le Salut 
public of Fehruary 27 and 28 effectively proving the point. . . . This communion of 
the poet, of the authentic artist, with a vast class of people impelled hy their ardent 
hunger for freedom, even partial freedom, has every chance of emerging spontane- 
ously at times of great social ferment, when reservations can be laid aside. Rim- 
haud, in whom the claims of the human tend, nonetheless, ... to follow an infinite 
course, places, from the outset, all his confidence and elan vital in the Commune. 
Mayakovsky goes to great lengths to silence in himself — hottling it up to the point 
of explosion — everything horn of individual feeling that might not conduce to the 



exclusive glory of the triumphant Bolshevik Revolution." Andre Breton, "La 
Grande Actualite poetique," Minotaure, 2, no. 6 (Winter 1935), p. 61. [d2,l] 



"Progress is the very footstep of God." Victor Hugo, "Ajiniversaire de la revolu- 
tion de 1848," Fehruary 24, 1855 (on Jersey), p. 14. [d2,2] 

"Victor Hugo is the man of the nineteenth century, as Voltaire was the man of the 
eighteenth." "The nineteenth century thus comes to a close before its end. Its poet 
is dead." Obituary notices for Hugo in he National Republicain de VArdeche and 
he Phare des Charentes [Victor Hugo devant Vopinion (Paris, 1885), pp. 229, 
224]. [d2,3] 

Students of the schools of France, 

Cheerful volunteers for progress, 

Let us follow the people in its wisdom; 

Let us turn our backs on Malthus and his decrees! 

Let us light up the new roadways 

Which labor shall open; 

For socialism soars on two wings, 

The student and the worker. 

Pierre Dupont, he Chant des etudiants (Paris, 1849). [d2a,l] 

A. Michiels, Hutoire des idees litter aires en Frame au XIX siecle (Paris, 1863), 
vol. 2, provides, in his portrait of Sainte-Beuve, an outstanding description of the 
reactionary man of letters at midcentury. [d2a,2] 

1 caused a revolutionary wind to blow; 
I made the old lexicon don the insurgents' red cap. 
No more high-flown words! No more uncouth words! 
I raised a storm at the bottom of the inkwell. 

Victor Hugo, cited in Paul Bourget, obituary for Victor Hugo in he Journal des 
debuts [Victor Hugo devant Vopinion (Paris, 1885), p. 93]. [d2a,3] 

On Victor Hugo: "He was . . . the poet not of his own sufferings . . . but of the 
passions of those around him. The mournful voices of the victims of the Terror . . . 
made their way into the Odes. Then the trumpet blasts of the Napoleonic victories 
resounded in other odes. . . . Later on, he felt obliged to let the tragic cry of 
militant democracy pass through him. And what is La Legende des siecles ... if 
not the echo of the great turmoil of human history? ... It often seems as though he 
had collected the sighs of all families in his domestic verse, the hreath of all lovers 
in his love poems. ... It is for this reason that, . . . thanks to some mysterious 
quality in him that is always collective and general, Victor Hugo's poetry possesses 
an epic character." Paul Bourget, ohituary notice for Victor Hugo in he Journal 
des debuts [Victor Hugo devant ropinion (Paris, 1885), pp. 96-97]. [d2a,4] 






Victor Hugo, ca. 1860. Photo by Etienne Carjat. Courtesy, Museum of Fine Arts, 
Boston. Reproduced with permission. • 1999 Museum of Fine Arts, Boston. 
All rights reserved. 



It is worthy of note that the preface to Mademoiselle de Mnupiri 2 already seems to 
be pointing the way to Vxrt pour I' art. "A stage play is not a railroad train." 

[d2a,5] 

Gautier on the press: "Charles X alone has understood the question rightly. In 
ordering the suppression of the newspapers, he rendered a great service to the arts 
and to civilization. Newspapers are akin to courtiers and go-betweens, those who 
interpose themselves between artists and the puhlic, hetween the king and the 
people. . . . These perpetual yelpings . . . create such an atmosphere of mistrust 
that . . . royalty and poetry, the two greatest things in the world, hecome impossi- 
ble." Cited in A. Michiels, Histoire des idees litteraires en France au XIX' siecle 
(Paris, 1863), vol. 2, p. 445. This attitude earned Gautier the friendship of Balzac. 

[d3,l] 

"In the transports of his hatred [for the critics], M. Thcophile Gautier denies all 
progress, especially in the area of literature and art, as does his master, Victor 
Hugo." Alfred Michiels, Histoire des idees litteraires en France au XIX" siecle 
(Paris, 1863), vol. 2, p. 444. [d3,2] 



"Steam will conquer cannon. In two hundred years — well before, perhaps — great 
armies from England, France, and America . . . will descend upon old Asia under 
the leadership of their generals. Their weapons will consist of pickaxes, and their 
horses will he locomotives. Singing, they will fall upon these uncnltivated, unused 
lands. ... It is thus, perhaps, that war will be waged, in the future, against all 
unproductive nations, hy virtue of that axiom of mechanics which applies to all 
things: there mnst he no wasted energy!" Maxime Du Camp, Les Chants modernes 
(Paris, 1855), p. 20 ("Preface"). [d3,3] 

In the preface to La Comedie humaine, Balzac declares himself on the side of 
Bossuet and Bonald, and affirms: "I write by the faint light of two eternal verities: 
Religion and Monarchy." [d3,4] 

Balzac on the press, in the preface to the first edition of Un Grand Homme de 
province a Paris: "The public is unaware of how many evils heset literature in its 
commercial transformation. ... In the old days, newspapers . . . required a cer- 
tain numher of copies . . . This was over and ahove payment for articles attractive 
to . . . hooksellers — payment often made without any guarantee that these articles 
would appear in print. . . . Today, this douhle tax has been driven up by the 
exorbitant price of advertising, which costs as much as the actual production of 
the hook. . . . One can only conclude that newspapers are fatal for modern writ- 
ers." Cited in Georges Batault, he Pontife de la demagogie: Victor Hugo (Paris, 
1934), p. 229. [d3,5] 



In the dehate in the Chamher on Novemher 25, 1848 — June repression — Victor 
Hugo voted against Cavaignac. [d3,6] 



"The multiplication of readers is the multiplication of loaves. On the clay Christ 
discovered this symbol, he foreshadowed the printing press." Victor Hugo, Wil- 
liam Shakespeare, cited in Batault <Le Pontife de la demagogie (Paris, 1934)>, 
p. 142. [d3,7] 

Maxime Lishonne comments, in L'Ami dupeuple, on Victor Hugo's will. Beginning 
and conclusion of this statement: "Victor Hugo divides his fortune of 6 million 
francs as follows: 700,000 francs to the members of his family; 2 . 5 million francs to 
Jeanne and Georges, bis grandchildren. . . . And for the revolutionaries who, 
since 1830, sacrificed with him for the republic, and who are still in this world, a 
lifetime annuity: twenty sous per day!" Cited in Victor Hugo devant V opinion 
(Paris, 1885), pp. 167-168. [d3a,l] 

In the debate in the Chamber on November 25, 1848, Victor Hugo voted against 
Cavaignac's repression of thejune revolt. But on June 20 in the Chamber, during 
the discussion of the national workshops, he had coined the phrase: "Hie Mon- 
archy had its idlers; the Republic will have its do-nothings." [d3a,2] 

Seigneurial elements still obtain in nineteenth-century education. Saint-Simon's 
declaration is characteristic: "I used my money to acquire knowledge. Good 
food, fine wines, much alacrity vis-a-vis the professors, to whom my purse was 
opened — these things procured for me all the opportunities I could desire." Cited 
in Maxime Leroy, La Vie veritable du comte Henri de Saint-Simon (Paris, 1925), 
p. 210. [d3a,3] 

As regards the physiognomy of Romanticism, attention might focus, first of all, 
on the colored lithograph in the Cabinet des Estampes, Sf. 39, vol. 2, which 
undertakes its allegorical representation. [d3a,4] 

Engraving from the Restoration period, showing a crowd gathered before the shop 
of a publisher. A placard announces that the Album pour 18 16 has appeared. 
Caption: "Everything new is beautiful." Cabinet des Estampes. [d3a,5] 

Lithograph. A poor devil looks on dolefully as a young gentleman signs the picture 
which the former has painted. Title: L'Artiste et I'arnateur duXlX" siecle. Cap- 
tion: "It is by me, seeing that I sign it." Cabinet des Estampes. [d3a,6] 

Lithograph, representing a painter walking along and carrying under his arm two 
long narrow planks, on each of which he has painted various garnishes and ar- 
rangements of meats. Title: Les Arts et la misere < Poverty and the Arts> . "Dedi- 
cated to Messieurs the Pork Butchers." Caption: "The man of art in the toils of his 
trade." Cabinet des Estampes. [d3a,7] 



Jacquot de Mirecourt publishes Alexandre Dumas et Cie, fabrique de romans 
<Alexandre Dumas and Co., Manufactory of Novels) (Paris, 1845). [d3a,8] 




L'Artiste et I'mnateur du dix-neuvibne siecle (The Artist and the Amateur of the Nineteenth 
Century), Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale de France. See d3a,6. 

Dumas perc. "In September 1846, Minister Salvandy proposed to him that he 
travel to Algeria and write a book about the colony. . . . Dumas, . . . who was read 
by live million Frenchmen at the very least, would give some fifty or sixty thousand 
of them a taste for colonialism. . . . Salvandy offered 10,000 francs to cover the 
cost of the voyage; Alexandre demanded, in addition to this, ... a state vessel. . . . 
Why had the Veloce, which was charged with picking up freed prisoners in Melilla, 
gone to Cadiz . . . ? Members of Parliament seized on the incident. And M. de 



Castellane pointedly questioned the logic of entrusting a scientifi c mission ... to a 5j 
journalistic entrepreneur: the French flag had debased itself in granting 'that ^ 
fellow' its protection; 40,000 francs had been spent for no reason, and the ridicule 
was clearly audible on all sides." The affair ended in Dumas' favor after his ^ 
challenge to a duel was declined by Castellane. J. Lucas-Dubreton, La Vie d'Alex- 
andre Dumas pere (Paris <1928>), pp. 146, 148-149. [d4,i] ^ 

? 

Alexandre Dumas in 1848. "His proclamations . . . are . . . astonishing. In one of -3 
them, addressed to the working people of Paris, he enumerates his 'works for 
workers,' and proves, by citing figures, that in twenty years he has composed four °§ 
hundred novels and thirty-five plays, which have enabled him to provide a living 
for 8,160 persons, including typesetters, foremen, machinists, usherettes, and 




L'Homme de I'art dans I'embarras de so7i metier (The Man of Art in the 
Toils of His Trade) . Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale de France. 
See d3a,7 



llllll 





Alexandre Dumas pere, 1855. Photo by Nadar. Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale 
de France. 



professional applauders." J. Lucas-Dubreton, La Vie a" Alexandre Dumas pere 
(Paris), p. 167. [d4,2] 



"The bohemian of 1840 ... is dead and gone. — Did he really exist? I have heard it 
said that he did not. — Whatever the case may he, you could comb through all of 
Paris at the present moment, and not come upon a single example. . . . There are 
certain neighbor hoods, and a very great numher of them, where the bohemian has 
never pitched his tent. . . . The hohemian flourishes along the boulevards, from 
the Rue Montmartre to the Rue de la Paix. . . . Less frequently in the Latin Quar- 
ter, formerly his main ahode. . . . Where does the bohemian come from? Is he a 
product of the social or the natural order? . . . Who is to blame for the develop- 
ment of this species — nature or society? Without hesitation, I answer: nature! . . . 
As long as there are idlers and fops in the world, there will be hohemians." Gabriel 
Guillemot, Le Boheme, in the series entitled Physionomies parisiennes (Paris, 
1869), pp. 11, 18-19, 111-112. Something similar on the griscttes in this series. 

(d4,3] 

It would be useful to trace historically the "theses" of bohemia. The attitude of a 
Maxime Duchamps <Du Camp?>, who holds success to be a proof of the lack of 
artistic quality, stems directly from that which is expressed in the statement, 
"There is nothing beautiful but what is forgotten," which occurs in Lurine's 
Treizihne anondissement de Pans <Paris, 1850>, p. 190. [d4,4] 

The Raf alers' Club (Cercle des Rafales): "No famous names there. Should a mem- 
ber of the Rafalers' stoop so low as to make a name for himself — whether in 
politics, literature, or the arts — he would be mercilessly struck from the list." 
[Taxile Delord,] Paris-Boheme (Paris, 1854), pp. 12-13. [d4,5] 

Victor Hugo's drawings, in his house at 6 Place des Vosges, where he lived from 
1832 to 1848: Dolmen Where the Voice of Shadow Spoke to Me; Ogive; My Destiny (a 
giant wave); The Sail Recedes, the Rock Remains (gloomy rocky seashore; in the 
foreground a sailing ship); Ego Hugo; VH (allegorical monogram); Lacework and 
Specter. A sail with the inscription "Exile" and a tombstone with the inscription 
"France" (pendants, serving as homemade frontispieces, to two of his books); 
Tlxe Borough of Angels; Village in Moonlight; Fracta Sed Invicta (a wreck); a break- 
water; a fountain in an old village, around which all die storms on earth seem to 
have gathered. [d4a,l] 

"We have had novels about handits purified hy imprisonment — the tales of Vau- 
trin and of Jean Valjean; and it was not to stigmatize them . . . that the writers 
evoked these melancholy figures. . . . And it is in a city where 120,000 girls live 
secretly from vice and 100,000 individuals live off girls, it is in a city infested with 
hardened criminals, cutthroats, housebreakers, carriage thieves, shop breakers, 
shoplifters, rahhle rousers, con men, pickpockets, predators, shakedown artists, 
guardian angels, 1 swindlers, and loclcpickers — in a city, I say, where all the wreck- 



age of disorder and vice runs aground, and where the slightest spark can set fire to 
the suhlimated populace, it is here that this corrupting literature — . . . Les 
Mysteres cle Paris, Rocambole, and Les Miserables — is produced." Charles 
Louandre, Les Iclees subversives cle notre temps (Paris, 1872), pp. 35-37. [d4a,2] 

"The incomplete copy in the Bibliotheque Nationale is sufficient for us to judge of 
the holdness and novelty of the pro ject conceived hy Balzac. . . . he Feuilleton cles 
journaux politiqu.es aimed at nothing less than the elimination of booksellers. 
Directsale from publisher to purchaser was the plan ... by which everyone would 
benefit — the publisher and the author hy making a profit, the purchaser hy paying 
less for hooks. This arrangement . . . met with no success at all, douhtless because 
the booksellers were against it." Louis Lumet, introduction to Honore de Balzac, 
Critique litteraire (Paris, 1912), p. 10. [d4a,3] 

The three short-lived periodicals founded hy Balzac: he Feuilleton cles journaux 
politiques (1830), La Chronique cle Paris (1836-1837), La Revue pcirisienne 
(1840). [d4a,4] 

"Recollection has value only as prediction. Thus, history should he classed as a 
science: practical application constantly proves its utility." Honore de Balzac, 
Critique litteraire, introduction by Louis Lumet (Paris, 1912), p. 117 (review of 
Les Deux Fous, by P. L. Jacoh, hihliophile). [d4a,5] 

"It is not by telling the poor to cease imitating the luxury of the rich that one will 
make the lower class happier. It is not hy telling girls to stop permitting themselves 
to he seduced that one will suppress prostitution. We might as well tell them, 
'. . . When you have no hread, you will he so good as to cease being hungry.' But 
Christian charity, it will be said, is there to cure all these evils. To which we reply: 
Christian charity cures very little and prevents nothing at all." Honore de Balzac, 
Critique litteraire, introduction hy Louis Lumet (Paris, 1912), p. 131 (review of Le 
Pretre [Paris, 1830]). [d5,l] 

"In 1750, no hook — not even L'Esprit cles lois 1 — reached more than three or four 
thousand people. ... In our day, some thirty thousand copies of Lamartine's Pre- 
mieres meditations and some sixty thousand books hy Beranger have heen sold 
over the past ten years. Thirty thousand volumes of Voltaire, Montesquieu, and 
Moliere have enlightened men's minds." Balzac, Critique litteraire, introduction 
by Louis Lnmet (Paris, 1912), p. 29 ("De l'Etat actnel de la lihrairie" <On the 
Current State of the Bookstore>, sample from Le Feuilleton cles journaux poli- 
tiques, published in L'Universel, March 22-23, 1830). [d5,2] 

Victor Hugo hearkens to the inner voice of the crowd of his ancestors: "The crowd 
to which he listened admiringly in himself, and which he heard as the herald of his 
popularity, inclined him, in fact, toward the exterior crowd — toward the Iclola 
Fori,' toward the inorganic hody of the masses. . . . He searched in the tumult of 



the sea for the roar of applause." "He spent fifty years draping his love of confu- 
sion — of all confusion, provided it was rhythmic — in his love for the people." Leon 
Daudet, Les Oeuvres dans les homines (Paris, 1922), pp. 47-48, 11. [d5,3] 



A saying of Vacquerie's ahout Victor Hugo: "The towers of Notre Dame were the H 
of his name." Cited in Leon Daudet, Les Oeuvres dans les hoinmes (Paris, 1922), 



Victor Hugo in a letter to Baudelaire — with particular reference to "Les Sept 
Vieillards" and "Les Petites Vieilles" (both poems were dedicated to Hugo, and, as 
Baudelaire indicated to Poulet-Malassis, for the second of them Hugo's work 
served as the poet's model): "You have endowed the sky of art with an indescrib- 
able macabre gleam. You have created a new frisson." 6 Cited in Louis Barthou, 
Autour de Baudelaire (Paris, 1917), p. 42 ("Victor Hugo et Baudelaire"). [d5,6] 

Maxime Leroy, Les Premiers Amis frangcris de Wagner, suggests that a revolutionary 
impulse played a very large part in Baudelaire's enthusiasm for Wagner; indeed, 
Wagner's works inspired an anhfeudal Fronde. The fact that his operas dis- 
pensed with ballet infuriated habitues of the Opera. [d5,7] 

From Baudelaire's essay on Pierre Dupont: "We had been waiting so many years 
for some solid, real poetry ! Whatever the party to which one belongs, whatever the 
prejudices one has inherited, it is impossible not to be moved by the sight of that 
sickly throng breathing the dust of the workshops, swallowing lint, becoming satu- 
rated with white lead, mercury, and all the poisons necessary to the creation of 
masterpieces, sleeping among vermin in the heart of districts where the humblest 
and greatest virtues live side by side with the most hardened vices and with the 
dregs from prisons. That sighing and languishing throng to which the earth owes 
its marvels, which feels flowing in its veins an ardent red blood, which looks long 
and sadly at the sunshine and shade of the great parks and, for its only comfort 
and consolation, bawls at the top of its voice its song of salvation: Let us love one 
another . . ." — "There will come a time when the accents of this workingman's 
Marseillaise will circulate like a Masonic password, and when the exiled, the aban- 
doned, and the lost, whether under the devouring tropical sky or in the snowy 
wilderness, will be able to say, T have nothing more to fear — I am in France!' as he 
hears this virile melody perfume the air with its primordial fragrance: 'Nous dont 
la lampe le matin / Au clairon du coq se rallume, / Nous tous qu'un salaire incer- 
tain / Ramene avant l'aube a l'enchime . . ." — On the "Chant des ouvriers": 
"When I heard that wonderful cry of melancholy and sorrow, I was awed and 
moved." 7 Cited in Maxime Leroy, Les Premiers Amis francais de Wagner (Paris 



p. 8. 



[d5,4] 



Renouvier wrote a book on Victor Hugo's philosophy. 



[d5,5] 



<1925>),pp. 51-53, 51. 



[d5a,l] 



On Victor Hugo: "He placed the ballot box on turning tables." Edmond Jaloux, 



"Eugene Sue . . . was in certain respects . . . similar to Schiller — not only in his 
preference for tales of crime, for colportage, for black-and-white depictions, but 
also in his predilection for ethical and social issues. . . . Balzac and Hugo viewed 
him as a competitor." Egon Friedell, Kulturgeschichte der Neuzeit, vol. 3 (Mu- 
nich, 1931), p. 149. Foreigners, such as Rellstab, sought out the Rue aux Feves, 
where Les Mysteres de Paris was begun. [d5a,3] 

On Victor Hugo: "This Ancient, this unique genius, this unique pagan, this man of 
unparalleled genius was ravaged by, at the very least, a double politician: a politi- 
cal politician that made him a democrat, and a literary politician that made him a 
Romantic. This genius was corrupted by talent(s)." Charles Peguy, Oeuvres com- 
pletes, 1873-1914: Oeuvres de prose (Paris, 1916), p. 383 ("Victor-Marie, comte 



Apropos of Victor Hugo, Baudelaire "believed in the coexistence of genius and 
foolishness." Louis Barthou, Autour de Baudelaire (Paris, 1916), p. 44 ("Victor 
Hugo et Baudelaire"). Similarly, before the planned banquet for the tercentenary 
of Shakespeare's hirthday (April 23, 1864), he speaks of the "book by Victor Hugo 
on Shakespeare, a book which — full of beauties and stupidities like all his books — 
is almost certain to vex even the most ardent of his admirers" (cited in Barthou, 
p. 50). And: "Hugo, priestlike, with his head always bent — too bent to see any- 
thing except his navel" (cited in Barthou, p . 57) . K [d6,2] 

The publishers of Balzac's Feuilleton des journaux politiques offered certain 
books at lower-than-official prices by bypassing book retailers. Balzac himself 
takes pride in this initiative, which he defends against criticisms from without, and 
which he expects will create the immediate bond between publisher and public that 
was his aim. In a sample issue of the newspaper, Balzac sketches the history of the 
book trade and of publishing since the Revolution of 1789, to conclude with the 
demand: "We must finally see to it that a volume is produced exactly like a loaf of 
hread, and is sold like a loaf of bread, so that there would be no intermediary 
between an author and a purchaser other than the bookseller. Then this business 
will be the most secure of all. . . . When a bookseller is required to lay out some 
twelve thousand francs for every project, he will no longer engage in any that are 
risky or ill-conceived. They will realize, then, that instruction is a necessity of 
their profession. A clerk who has learned in what year Gutenberg printed the 
Bihle will no longer imagine that being a bookseller is only a matter of having one's 
name written over a shop." Honore de Balzac, Critique litteraire, introduction by 
Louis Lumet (Paris, 1912), pp. 34-35. [d6,3J 



L'Homme du XIX'' siecle," Le Temps, August 9, 1935. 



[d5a,2] 



Hugo"). 



[d6,l] 



Pelin publishes the letter of a publisher who declares himself ready to buy the 
manuscript of an author on the condition that he can publish it under the name of 



some other author of his choosing ("on the condition . . . that it he signed by 
someone whose name would be, according to my calculations, a spur to success"). 
Gabriel Pelin, Les Laicleurs clu beau Paris (Paris, 1861), pp. 98-99. [d6,4] 

Fees. Victor Hugo receives 300,000 francs from Lacroix for Les Muerables, in 
exchange for rights to the novel for twelve years. "It was the first time Victor 
Hugo had received such a sum. 'In twenty-eight years of furious labor,' Paul 
Souday has said, 'with an oeuvre of thirty-one volumes . . . , he had made a total 
of about 553,000 francs. ... He never earned as much as Lamartine, Scribe, or 
Dumas pere. . . .' Lamartine, in the years 1838 to 1851, made close to five million 
francs, of which 600,000 were for the His torn des Girondi?is. n Edmond Benoit- 
Levy "Les Muerables" de Victor Hugo (Paris, 1929), p. 108. Connection between 
income and political aspiration. [d6a,l] 

"When Eugene Sue, following upon . . . Les Mysteres de Londres <by Paul 
Fevab , . . . conceived the project of writing Les Mysteres de Paris, he did not at all 
propose to arouse the interest of the reader with a description of society's under- 
world. He began by characterizing his novel as an histoiref antastique. ... It was 
a newspaper article that decided his future. La Phalange praised the beginning of 
the novel and opened the author's eyes: 'M. Sue has just set out on the most 
penetrating critique of society. . . . Let us congratulate him for having recounted 
. . . the frightful sufferings of the working class and the cruel indifference of soci- 
ety.' The author of this article . . . received a visitfrom Sue; they talked — and that 
is how the novel already underway was pointed in a new direction. . . . Eugene Sue 
convinced himself: he took part in the electoral hattle and was elected . . . 
(1848). . . . The tendencies and the far-reaching effects of Sue's novels were such 
that M. Alfred Nettement could see in them one of the determining causes of the 
Revolution of 1848." Edmond Benoit-Levy, "Les Miserables" de Victor Hugo 
(Paris, 1929), pp. 18-19. [d6a,2] 

A Saint-Simonian poem dedicated to Sue as the author of Les Mysteres de Paris: 
Savinien Lapointe, "De Mon Echoppe" <My Workshop) ,* in line Voix d'en bas 
(Paris, 1844), pp. 283-296. [d6a,3] 

"After 1852, the defenders of the educator's art are much less numerous. The most 
important is Maxime Du Camp." C. L. de Liefde, Le Saint-Simonisme dans la 
poesief ranqaise <Haarlem, 1927 >, p. 115. [d6a,4] 

"Les Jesuites, by Michelet and Quinet, dates from 1843. (Le Juif errant <The 
Wandering Jew> appeared in 1844)." Charles Brim, Le Roman social en France 
m.u XIX* siecle (Paris, 1910), p. 102. [d6a,5] 



"Le Constitutionnel going from 3,600 subscribers to more than 20,000 . . . 128,074 
votes giving Eugene Sue an electoral mandate to become a deputy." Charles Brun, 
Le Roman social en France au XIX' siecle (Paris, 1910), p. 105. [d6a,6] 



The novels of George Sand led to an increase in the number of divorces, nearly 
all of which were initiated by the wife. The author carried on a large correspon- 
dence in which she functioned as an adviser to women. [d6a,7] 

Poor, but cleanly — is the philistine echo of a chapter title in Les Miserables: "La 
Boue, mais Fame" <Mire, but Soul>. 10 [d7,l] 

Balzac: "Mutual education produces 100-sous pieces made of human flesh. Indi- 
viduals disappear in a population leveled by instruction." Cited in Charles Brim, 
he Roman social en France au XIX" siecle (Paris, 1910), p. 120. [d7,2] 

Mirbeau and Natansou, he Foyer <The Hearth) (1, 4), Baron Courtin: "It is not 
desirable that education should be extended any further. . . . For education is the 
heginning of ease, and ease is not within everyone's reach." Cited in Charles Brim, 
he Roman social en France au XIX' siecle (Paris, 1910), p. 125. Mirheau merely 
repeats here, in satirical vein, a saying of Thiers <cited in dl,l > . [d7,3] 

"Balzac — unbridled romantic by virtue of the lyrical tirades, the hold simplifica- 
tion of characters, and the complication of plot — is at the same time a realist hy 
virtue of the evocation of place and social milieu, and a naturalist by virtue of his 
taste for vulgarity and his scientific pretensions." Charles Brun, he Roman social 
en France au XIX ! siecle (Paris, 1910), p . 129. [d7,4] 

Napoleon's influence on Balzac, the Napoleonic in him. "The spirit and mettle of 
the Grande Armee in the form of greed, amhition, and dehauchery: Grandet, 
Nucingen, Philippe Bridau, or Savarus." 11 Charles Brun, he Roman social en 
France au XIX' siecle (Paris, 1910), p. 151. [d7,5] 

"Balzac . . . quotes as authorities . . . Geoffroy Saint-Hilaire and Cuvier." Charles 
Bruu, he Roman social (Paris, 1910), p. 154. [d7,6] 

Lamartine and Napoleon. "In Les Destinies de la poesie, in 1834, he speaks of . . . 
his contempt for this age ... of calculation and power, of numhers and the 
sword. ... It was the age in which Esmenard sang the praises of navigation, Gudin 
of astronomy, Ricard of spheres, Aime Martin of physics and chemistry. . . . La- 
martine said it very well: 'Number alone is allowed, honored, protected, and 
recompensed. Since numher does not think, since it is an . . . instrument . . . that 
never asks . . . whether it is made to serve the oppression of humankind or its 
deliverance, . . . the military leader of this era wanted no other emissary.'" Jean 
Skerlitch, h'Opinion publique en France d'apres la poesie (Lausanne, 1901), 
p. 65. [d7,7] 



"Romanticism proclaims the liherty of art, the equality of genres, and the frater- 
nity of words (all under one entitlement as citizens of the French language)." 
Georges Renard, ha Methode scientifique de Vhistoire litteraire (Paris, 1900), 



pp. 219-220, cited in Jean Skerlitch, U Opinion publique en France d'apres la 
poesie (Lausanne, 1901), pp. 19-20. [d7,8] 



The magnificent seventh book of the fourth part of Les Miserables, "LArgot ," 
winds up its penetrating and audacious analyses with a gloomy reflection: "Since 
'89, the entire people has been expanding in the sublimated individual; there is 
no poor man who, having bis rights, has not bis ray; the starving man feels 
within himself the honor of France; the dignity of the citizen is an interior armor; 
he who is free is scrupulous; he who votes reigns." Victor Hugo, Oeiwres com- 
pletes, novels, vol. 8 (Paris, 1881), p. 306 {Les Miserables)} 2 [d7a,l] 

Nettement on the digressions in Les Miserables: "These hits of philosophy, of 
history, of social economy are like cold-water taps that douse the frozen and 
discouraged reader. It is hydrotherapy applied to literature." Alfred Nettement, 
he Roman contemporain (Paris, 1864), p. 364. . [d7a,2] 

"M. Sue, in Le Juif errant, hurls insults at religion ... in order to serve the 
antipathies of Le Constitutionnel. . . . M. Dumas, in La Dame de Monsoreau, 
heaps scorn on royalty ... to accommodate the passions of this same newspa- 
per, . . . while in La Reine Margot he conforms to the taste of the gilded youth at 
La Presse for . . . risque paintings, . . . and . . . in Le Comte de Monte-Cristo he 
deifies money and inveighs against the Restoration to please the world of civil 
servants who congregated around Le Journal des debuts.'''' Alfred Nettement, 
Etudes critiques sur lefeuilleton-roman, vol. 2 (Paris, 1846), p. 409. [d7a,3] 

Victor Hugo: owing to a law of his poetic nature, he has to stamp every thought 
with the form of an apotheosis. [d7a ,4] 

A wide-ranging remark by Drumont: "Almost all the leaders of the movement of 
the school of 1830 had the same sort of constitution: high-strung, prolific, enam- 
ored of the grandiose. Whether it was a matter of reviving the epic on canvas, as 
with Delacroix, of portraying a whole society, as with Balzac, or of putting four 
thousand years of the life of Humanity into a novel, like Dumas, all . . . were 
possessed of shoulders that did not shrink from the burden." Edouard Drumont, 
Les Hems et les pitres (Paris <1900>), pp. 107-108 ("Alexandre Dumas pere"). 

[d7a,5] 

'"For the past fifty years,' said Doctor Demarquay to Dumas fils one day, 'all our 
morihund patients have died with one of your father's novels under their pillow." 1 
Edouard Drumont, Les Heros et les pitres (Paris <1900>), p. 106 ("Alexandre 
Dumas pere"). [d7a,6] 

In the preface to Les Pay sans, Balzac speaks reproachfully of the year 1830, 
"which did not rememher that Napoleon had preferred to risk failure rather than 



arm the masses." Cited in Ch. Calippe, Balzac: Ses Idees sociales (Reims and 
Paris <1906>), p. 94. [d7a,7] 



"Bourget has remarked that Balzac's characters . . . appeared in real life even 
more frequently after the death of the novelist: 'Balzac,' he says, 'seems less to 
have ohserved the society of his age than to have contributed to the formation of 
an age. Certain of his characters were more true-to-life in 1860 than in 1835.' 
Nothing more just: Balzac deserves to he classed among anticipators of the lirst 
order. . . . Thirty years later, reality arrived on the terrain that his intuition had 
already crossed in a single hound." H. Clouzot and R.-H. Valensi, Le Paris de la 
Comedie humaine (Paris, 1926), p. 5 ("Balzac et ses fournisseurs"). [d8,l] 

Drumont, too, inclines to the view that Balzac's gift was a prophetic one. Occa- 
sionally, however, he reverses the terms of the equation: "The people of the Second 
Empire wanted to he characters from Balzac." Edouard Drumont, Figures de 
bronze ou statues de neige (Paris < 1900>), p. 48 ("Balzac"). [d8,2] 



Balzac, speaking through his country doctor: "The proletarians seem to me to he 
the minors of the nation, and should always remain in a state of tutelage." 11 Cited 
in Ahhe Charles Calippe, Balzac: Ses Idees sociales (Reims and Paris <1906>), 
p. 50. [d8,3] 

Balzac (like Le Play) was opposed to the parceling out of large estates: "My God, 
how could anyone fail to realize that the wonders of art are impossible in a 
country without great fortunes!" (cited in Charles Calippe, p. 36). Balzac likewise 
draws attention to the disadvantages that result when peasants and petty bour- 
geois hoard their money, and calculates how many billions are in this way with- 
drawn from circulation. On the other hand, the only remedy he can recommend 
is for the individual, by hard work and wise economy, to become a landed 
proprietor himself. He thus moves within contradictions. [d8,4] 

George Sand hecame acquainted with Agricol Perdiguier in 1840. She says: "I was 
struck hy the moral importance of the topic, and I wrote the novel Le Compagnon 
du tour de France out of sincerely progressive ideas." Cited in Charles Benoist, 
"L' Homme de 1848," part 2, Revue des deux mondes (February 1, 1914), pp. 
665-666. [d8,5] 

Dumas pere occupied almost simultaneously, with three of his novels, the fcuille- 
ton sections of La Presse, Le Constitutionnel, and Le Journal des debuts. [d8,6] 

Nettement on the style of Dumas pere: "It is usually natural and relatively rapid, 
hut it lacks force because the thought it expresses does not go very deep. It is to the 
style of great writers what lithography is to engraving." Alfred Netlement, Histoire 
de la litter ature franqaise sous le Gouvernement de Juillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 2, 
pp. 306-307. [d8,7] 



Sue, compared with George Sand: "Once again we have a protest against the state 
of society, but, this time, a collective protest . . . undertaken in the name of the 
passions and interests of the largest classes of society." Alfred Nettement, Histoire 
de la litter attire franqaise sous le Gouvemement de Juillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 2, 
p. 322. [d8a,l] 

Nettement points out that Sue's novels, which sought to undermine the July Mon- 
archy, were published in newspapers, (Le Journal des debuts and Le Constitution- 
nel) that were on its side. [d8a,2] 

Regular customers at the brasserie on the Rue des Martyrs: Delvau, Murger, 
Dupont, Malassis, Baudelaire, Guys. [d8a,3] 

Jules Bertaut sees Balzac's importance in terms of the action of significant figures 
in a milieu determined by the types of that day's society — which is to say, in terms 
of character study permeated by the study of manners. Apropos of the latter, he 
writes: "One need only peruse the innumerable physiologies ... to see how far this 
literary vogue has come. From the Schoolboy to the Stockbroker, and taking 
account of the Dry Nurse, the Sergeant, and the Seller of Countermarks in be- 
tween, it is an endless succession of petits portraits. . . . Balzac knows the genre 
well; he has cultivated it. Small wonder, then, that he seeks to give us, through 
these means, the picture of an entire society." Jules Bertaut, "Le Pere Goriot" de 
Balzac (Amiens, 1928), pp. 117-118. [d8a,4] 

'"Victor Hugo,' says Eugene Spuller, 'had gone along with the views of the reac- 
tionaries. . . . He had consistently voted on the right.' ... As for the question of 
the national workshops, on June 20, 1848, he declares them a double error — from 
a political as well as a financial standpoint. ... In the Legislative Assembly, on the 
other hand, he turns to the left, becoming one of its . . . most aggressive orators. Is 
this because of an evolution . . . , or is it due to wounded pride and personal 
bitterness against Louis Napoleon, under whom he supposedly wished — even ex- 
pected — to become minister of public instruction?" E . Meyer, Victor Hugo a la 
tribune (Chambery, 1927), pp. 2, 5, 7; cited in Eugene Spuller, Histoire parlemen- 
taire de la Seconde Republique, pp. Ill, 266. [d8a,5] 

"A discussion having opened between Le Bon-Sens and La Presse over the ques- 
tion of Girardin's forty-franc newspapers, Le National intervened. Because La 
Presse had taken this opportunity to mount a personal attack on M. Carrel, an 
encounter tookplace between the latter and the editor-in-chief of La Presse. " — "It 
was the political press that fell, in the person of Carrel, before the industrial 
press." Alfred Nettement, Histoire de la litterature franqaise sous le Gouveme- 
ment de Juillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 1 , p. 254. [d8a,6] 



"Communism, . . . that . . . logic of democracy, is already boldly attacking society 
in its moral assumptions, whence it is evident that the proletarian Samson, grown 



prudent, will henceforth sap the pillars of society in the cellar, instead of shaking 
them in the hanquet hall." Balzac, Les Paysans; 1 ' 1 (cited in Abbe Charles Calippe, 
Balzac: Ses Idees sociales (Reims and Paris <1906>), p. 108. [d9,l] 



Travel literature: "It is France that first . . . reinforced its armies with a brigade of 
geographers, naturalists, and archaeologists. The great achievements in Egypt . . . 
marked the advent of an order of works previously unknown. . . . The Expedition 
scientifique de la Moree and the Exploration scientifique de VAlgerie are worthy 
additions to this great line. . . . Whether scientific in spirit, serious or light, . . . 
accounts by travelers . . . have, in our time, found a considerable vogue. Along 
with novels, they form the staple fare in reading rooms, numbering, on average, 
some eighty works per year, or twelve hundred publications in fifteen years." 
This, on average, is not much more than in other fields of natural science. Charles 
Louandre, "Statistiquelitteraire: De la Production intellectuelle en France depuis 
quinze ans," Revue des deux mondes (November 1, 1847), pp. 425-426. [d9,2] 



From 1835 on, the average number of novels produced annually is 210 — approxi- 
mately the same as the number of vaudeville productions. [d9,3] 

Travel literature. It finds an unexpected application during the Chamber's debate 
on deportations (April 4, 1849). "Farconet, who was the first to oppose the proj- 
ect, brought up the question of the salubrity of the Marquesas Islands. . . . The 
member who had presented the report replied by reading some travel accounts 
which depicted the Marquesas as ... a veritable paradise. . . . This, in turn, drew 
. . . the angry response: 'To offer idylls and bucolics on a subject so grave is 
ridiculous."' E. Meyer, Victor Hugo * la tribune (Chambery, 1927), p. 60. [d9,4] 

The idea for La Comedie humaine came to Balzac in 1833 (the year in which Le 
Medecin de campagne was published). The influence of Geoffroy Saint-Hilaire's 
theory of types was decisive. To this was added, on the literary side, the influence 
of Scott's and Cooper's cycles of novels. [d9,5] 

In its second year of publication, in 1851, the "Almanack des reformateurs . . . , 
in which the government is presented as a necessary evil, brings together the 
expose of communist doctrine with verse translations of Martial and Horace, with 
sidelights on astronomy and medicine, and with all sorts of useful tips." Charles 
Benoist, "Le 'My the' de la classe ouvriere," Revue des deux mondes (March 1, 
1914), p. 91. [d9,6] 

Derivation of the feuilleton novel, whose appearance in newspapers immediately 
entailed dangerous competition for periodicals and a marked decline in the pro- 
duction of literary criticism. The periodicals, in turn, had to decide whether to 
publish novels in installments. The first to do so were La Revue de Paris (edited by 
V&ron?) and La Revue des deux mondes. "Under the old state of affairs, a journal 
with a subscription rate exceeding eighty francs was supported by those whose 



political convictions it expressed. . . . Under the new arrangements, a journal had 
to live by advertisements, . . . and in order to have lots of advertisements, the 
fourth page, which had become a publicity display, had to pass before the eyes of 
a great many subscribers. In order to have lots of subscribers, some bait had to be 
found that would speak to all opinions at the same time, and that would substi- 
tute, for political interest, an item of general interest. . . . This is how, by starting 
from the forty-franc newspaper and proceeding on to the advertisement, we 
arrive, almost inevitably, at the serial novel." Alfred Nettement, Histoire de la 
litterature francaise sous k Gouvemement de Quillet (Paris, 1859), vol. 1, pp. 301- 
302. [d9a,l] 

Sometimes, in publishing a novel in serial form, one would leave out part of the 
work in order to get the newspaper-reading public to buy the book. [d9a,2] 

In the editor's preface to Journet's Poesies et chants harmoniens, Uncle Tom's Cabin, 
by Harriet Beecher Stowe, is quite appropriately placed on an equal footing with 
Les Mysteres de Paris and Les Muerables. [d9a,3] 

"From time to time, one could read, in he Journal des debuts, articles by 
M. Michel Chevalier or M. Philarete Chasles, . . . articles of a socially progressive 
tendency. . . . The progressive articles in the Debuts were customarily published 
during the fortnight preceding subscription renewals, which occurred every four 
months. On the eve of large renewals, he Journal des debuts could be found 
flirting with radicalism. This helps to explain how he Journal des debuts could 
undertake the hold publication of Les Mysteres de Paris . . . — but this time, that 
imprudent newspaper had gone further than it realized. As a consequence, many 
wealthy bankers withdrew their support for the Debuts ... in order to found a 
new paper, . . . Le Globe. This worthy predecessor of L 'Epoque . . . was aimed at 
doing justice to the incendiary theories of M. Eugene Sue and of Lu Democrutie 
pucijique." A. Toussenel, Les Juifs, rois de Vepoque, ed. Gonet (Paris <1886>), 
vol. 2, pp. 23-24, [d9a,4] 

The boheme. "With Un Prince de la boheme (1840), Balzac wanted to portray a 
. . . characteristic of this nascent boheme. The amorous preoccupations ... of 
Rusticoli de la Palferine are only a Balzacian expansion upon the triumphs of 
Marcel and Rodolphe, l;> which would soon follow. . . . This novel contains a gran- 
diloquent delinition of hohemianism, . . . the first . . . : 'The boheme — what 
should he called the doctrine of the Boulevard des Italiens — consists of young 
people, ... all men of genius in their way, men as yet little known, but soon to 
become known. . . . Here one meets writers, administrators, soldiers, journalists, 
artists! If the emperor of Russia purchased this bohemia for twenty million 
francs, . . . and if it were subsequently deported to Odessa, then in a year Odessa 
would be Paris.' . . . During this same period, George Sand . . . and Alphonse 
Karr . . . initiated bohemian circles. . . . But these were imaginary bohemias; and 
that of Balzac was entirely fantastic. The hohemianism of Theophile Gautier, on 



the other hand, and that of Murger, have been talked about so much . . . that 
today we can get an idea of what they were. To tell the truth, Gautier and his 
friends . . . did not realize right away, in 1833, that they were bohemians; they 
were content with calling themselves Meune France' <Young France) .... Their 
poverty was merely relative. . . . This hohemianism . . . was the boheme galante; it 
could just as well be called gilded boheinianism, the boheme doree. . . . Ten or 
fifteen years later, around 1843, there was a new bohemia . . . , the true boheme. 
Theophile Gautier, Gerard de Nerval, Arsene Houssaye were then approaching 
forty; Murger and his friends were not yet twenty-five. This time, it was a genuine 
intellectual proletariat. Murger was the son of a concierge tailor; Champfleury's 
father was a secretary at the town hall in Laon; . . . Delvau's father was a tanner in 
the Faubourg Saint-Marcel; Courbet's family were quasi-peasants. . . . Champ- 
fleury and Chintreuil wrapped packages in a bookstore; Bonvin was a working- 
class typographer." Pierre Martino, he Roman realiste sous le Second Empire 
(Paris, 1913), pp. 6-9. [dlO.l] 

In the early 1840s, there was a copying process known as the Rageneau press, 
evidently based on lithography. [dl0,2] 

Firmin Maillard, La Cite des intellectuek (Paris <1905>), pp. 92-99, offers an 
abundance of information ahout author's fees. [dl0,3] 

"Balzac . . . compared his critique of Parisian journalism to Moliere's attacks on 
financiers, marquis, and doctors." Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), 
pp. 354-355. [dl0,4] 

On Balzac: 'What enahles us to say that he was perhaps not very truthful after 
1820 is the often expressed view that he wondrously painted in advance, and 
prophesied, the society of the Second Empire." Edmond Jaloux, "Les Romanciers 
etle temps," Le Temps, December 27, 1935. [dl0,5] 

From Lamartine's "Lettre en vers a M. Alphonse Karr": 

Every man can proudly sell the sweat of his brow; 
I sell my bunch of grapes as you do your flowers, 
Happy when its nectar, under the crush of my foot , 
Flows in amber streams through all my works, 
Producing for its master, drunk with its high price, 
Much gold with which to buy much freedom! 
Fate has reduced us to counting »ur wages; 
Day-wages you, night-wages me: two mercenaries. 
But bread well earned is bread well broken, too: 
0 the glory of freemen beholden to none for their salt! 

Veuillot, who cites this text, has this to say: "Until now, it was felt that the freedom 
that can he purchased with money is not the sort that men of conscience are in the 
habit of pursuing. . . . What! . . . You don't know that the way to be free is to heap 



scorn on gold? To secure this freedom acquired through gold, . . . you produce 
your hooks in the same mercenary fashion as you produce vegetables and wine. 
You will demand of your faculties a double or a triple harvest; you will start to 
market your early produce; the muse will no longer visit voluntarily, but will toil 
night and day like a drudge. . . . And in the morning, you will cast before the 
public a page scribbled over in the course of your nocturnal lucubrations; you will 
not even bother rereading the rubbish that covers it, though you will certainly 
have counted the number of lines it contains." Louis Veuillot, Pages choisies, ed. 
Antoine Albalat (Lyons and Paris, 1906), pp. 28, 31-32. (Kan - sold flowers grown 
on his estate near Nice.) [dl0a,l] 

"In vain Sainte-Beuve allows himself, out of a deep-rooted antipathy, to fly into a 
rage against the author of La Comedie humaine. But he is right to observe that 'the 
vogue for serial publication, which required, with each new chapter, that the 
reader be struck a hearty blow, had driven the stylistic effects of the novel to an 
extreme and desperate pitch. Cited in Fernand Baldensperger, "Le Raffermisse- 
ment des techniques <dans la Jitterature occidentale de> 1840," Revue de littera- 
ture comparee, 15, no. 1 (January-March 1935), p. 82. [dl0a,2] 

In reaction to the serial novel, there arose — around 1840 — novellas (Merimee) 
and regional novels (<Barbey> d'Aurevilly) . [dl0a,3] 

Eugene de Mirecourt, Les Vrais Miserables (Paris, 1862), recalls Lamartine's His- 
toire des Girondins and surmises that Hugo wanted to prepare his political career 
with his novel as Lamartine had done with his popular history. [dl0a,4] 

Apropos of Lamartine and Hugo: "Instead of fostering the notion . . . that people 
should follow devotedly in the steps of these sincere souls, we should investigate 
the underside of all sincerity. But bourgeois culture and democracy are too greatly 
in need of this value! The democrat is a man who wears his heart on his sleeve; his 
heart is an excuse, a testimonial, a subterfuge. He is professionally heartwarming, 
so he can dispense with being truthful." N. Guterman and H. Lcfebvre, La Con- 
science mystifiee (Paris <1936>), p. 151 ("Le Chantage etla sincerite" < Blackmail 
and Sincerity >). [d 1 1 , 1 ] 

On Lamartine: "The fatuity of the poet is indescrihable. Lamartine deems himself 
a statesman in the mold of Miraheau, and he boasts (another Turgot!) of having 
labored twenty years in the study of political economy. An eminent thinker, he's 
convinced that he draws up from the depths of his soul ideas that he actually 
catches on the wing and clothes in his own image." Emile Barrault, "Lamartine," 
extract from Le National of March 27, 1869 (Paris, 1869), p. 10. [dl 1 ,2] 



Alfred Delvau (1825-1867): "He was a child of the quartier Mouf'fetard. ... In 
1848, he hecame private secretary to Ledru-Rollin, who was then minister of the 



interior. Events having brusquely removed him from active politics, he devoted 
himself to letters, making his debut with several newspaper articles. . . . In Le 
Journal amusant, Le Figaro, and some other journals, he published articles deal- 
ing mainly with Parisian customs and practices. For some time, at Le Siecle, his 
special assignment was the Paris town council." During the second half of the 
1850s, he was in exile in Belgium, where he had fled to escape a prison sentence 
incurred while he was editor of Le Rabelais. Later, he would endure prosecutions 
for plagiarism. Information in Pierre Larousse, Grand Dictionnaire universel clu 
XIX s siecle, vol. 6 (Paris, 1870), p. 385 (article: "Delvau"). [dl 1 ,3] 

During the reign of Napoleon III, Benjamin Gastineau had already been twice 
deported to Algeria. "Under the Paris Commune, M. Gastineau was named inspec- 
tor of communal libraries. The twentieth council of war, charged with trying his 
case, could fi.nd no evidence of any breach of common law. He was nevertheless 
condemned to deportation in a fortified cell." Pierre Larousse, Grand Diction- 
naire universel du XIX" siecle, vol. 8 (Paris, 1872), p. 1062. — Gastineau had be- 
gun his career as a typesetter. [dl 1,4] 

Pierre Dupont: "The poet, as he says in one of his little poems, 'listens, by turns, 
to the forests and the crowd.' And in fact it is the great rustic symphonies, the 
voices through which nature in its entirety speaks, as well as the clamor, the 
griefs, the aspirations and lamentations of the crowd, that make for his double 
inspiration. The song such as our fathers knew it ... , the drinking song or even 
the simple ballad, is utterly foreign to him." Pierre Larousse, <Grand> Dictionnaire 
universel du XIX' siecle, vol. 6 (Paris, 1870), p. 1413 (article: "Dupont"). Hence, 
with Baudelaire, hatred for Beranger is an element of his love for Dupont. 

[dlla,l] 

Gustave Simon descrihes the scenes that took place in front of Paguerre's hook- 
shop when the second and third parts of Les Miserables were delivered: '"On May 
15, 1862,' he writes, 'a little before 6:00 in the morning, a dense crowd was gather- 
ing on the Rue de Seine before a shop that was still closed. The crowd kept growing 
larger and, impatient with waiting, hecame noisy, even riotous. . . . The pavement 
was obstructed by an impassable jumble of delivery carts, private carriages, cabs, 
carioles, and even wheelbarrows. People had empty baskets on their hacks. ... It 
was not yet 6:30 when the crowd, hecoming more unruly by the minute, started 
pushing against the shopfront, while those in the vanguard knocked with redou- 
bled force on the door. Suddenly, a window was opened on the second floor; a lady 
appeared and exhorted the assemhled citizens to be more patient. . . . The shop to 
which they were preparing to lay siege was quite inoffensive; only hooks were sold 
there. It was Paguerre's hookshop. The people hurling themselves at the building 
were bookstore clerks, agents, huyers, and hrokers. The lady who spoke from her 
second-floor window was Madame Paguerre. '" Alhert de Besancourt, Les Pam- 
phlets contre Victor Hugo (Paris), pp. 227-228; cited in Gustave Simon, "Les 



Origines des Miser ablest in ha Revue de Paris, and in letters about the hook 
which Simon published in La Revue). [dlla,2] 



Perrot de Chezelles, in his pamphlet "Examen dn livre des Miserables de M. Victor 
Hugo" (Paris, 1863), makes this more general contribution to the characterization 
of Victor Hugo: "In his dramas and novels he takes for his heroes a lackey like Kuy 
Bias, a courtesan like Marion Delorme, physically deformed beings like Trihoulet 
and Quasimodo, a prostitute like Fantine, a convict like Jean Valjean. ""' Cited in 
Albert de Besancourt, Les Pamphlets contre V.H. (Paris), p. 243. [dlla,3] 

Les Miserables depends, for its principal facts, on actual events. Underlying the 
condemnation of Jean Valjean is a case in which a man who had stolen a loaf of 
bread for his sister's children was condemned to five years' penal servitude. 
Hugo documented such things with great exactitude. [dl2,l] 

A detailed representation of Lamartine's behavior during the February Revolu- 
tion is provided hy Pokrowski in an article that hases itself, in part, on diplomatic 
reports hy Kisseliov, the Russian andjassador to Paris at that time. These reports 
are cited in the course of the article. '"Lamartine . . . admitted,' Kisseliov writes, 
'that, for the time heing, France found itself in a situation that always tends to 
arise when one government has just fallen and the other is not yet firmly in place. 
He added, however, that the population had given proof of so innch good sense, of 
such respect for family and property, that lawful order in Paris would be pre- 
served through the momentum of things in themselves and through the good will of 
the masses. ... In eight or ten days, continued Lamartine, a national guard of 
200,000 men would be organized, in addition to which there were 15,000 mounted 
police, whose spirits were excellent, and 20,000 front-line troops, who already had 
encircled Paris and were to march on the city. ' Here we must pause for a moment. 
It is well known that the pretext for recalling the troops, which since Fehruary had 
heen stationed at a distance from Paris, was the workers' demonstration of April 
16; the conversation between Lamartine and Kisseliov, however, took place on 
/Vpril 6. How hrilliantly, therefore, Marx divined (in Die Klassenkampfe in Frank- 
reich) that the demonstration was provoked solely in order to he able to call hack 
into the capital the most 'reliable' part of the 'forces of order.' . . . But let us go 
further. 'These masses, says Lamartine [that is, the hourgeois national guard, the 
mobile guard, and the line infantry — M.N. P.], will keep in check the cluh fanatics, 
who depend on a few thousand hooligans and criminal elements (!), and will nip 
every excess ... in the hud.'" M. N. Pokrowski, Historische Aufsdtze (Vienna and 
Berlin < 1928>), pp. 108-109 ("Lamartine, Cavaignac und Nikolaus I"). [dl2,2] 

On the sixth of April, a directive went out from Nesselrode in Petershurg to Kis- 
seliov: "Nicholas and his chancellor did not conceal from their agent the fact that 
they needed the alliance with France against Germany — against the new red Ger- 
many that was beginning, with its revolutionary colors, to outshine the France 



which had already come rather far on the road to reason." M. N. Pokrowski, 
Historische Aufsitze (Vienna and Berlin), p. 112. [dl2,3] 



Michelet on Lamar tine: "He glides on his great wing, rapid and oblivious." Cited 
in Jacques Boulenger, "Le Magie de Michelet," Le Temps, May 15, 1936. [dl2a,l] 

"A shrewd observer remarked, one day, that fascist Italy was being run like a large 
newspaper and, moreover, by a great journalist: one idea per day, with sidelights 
and sensations, and with an adroit and insistent orientation of the reader toward 
certain inordinately enlarged aspects of social life — a systematic deformation of 
the understanding of the reader for certain practical ends. The long and the short 
of it is that fascist regimes are publicity regimes." Jean de Lignieres, "Le Cen- 
tenaire de La Presse," Vendredi, June 1936. [dl2a,2] 

"Balzac was one of the collaborators on La Presse . . . , and Girardin was for him 
one of the best guides to the society in which the great man lived." Jean de Lig- 
nieres, "Le Centenaire de La Presse,'''' Vendredi, June 1936. [dl2a,3] 

"In general, the various currents of Realism between 1850 and 1860, that of 
Champfleury like that of Flaubert, are considered 'the school of Balzac.'" Ernst 
Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 1923), p. 487. [dl2a,4] 

"Modern mass production destroys the sense of art, and the sense of work, in 
labor: 'We have products; we no longer have works. '" Ernst Robert Curtins, 
Balzac (Bonn, 1923), p. 260; citation from Beatrix <Balzac edition in La Collec- 
tion Michel-Levy (Paris, 1891-1899)> , p. 3. [dl2a,5] 

"The organization of intelligence is Balzac's goal. In this he sometimes, like the 
Saint-Simonians, entertains notions of corporation such as marked the Middle 
Ages. At these times, he returns to the idea ... of an incorporation of intellectual 
labor into the modern system of credit. The idea of the state's remunerating intel- 
lectual production also surfaces here and there." Ernst Rohert Curtius, Balzac 
(Bonn, 1923), p. 256. [dl2a,6] 

"Intelligential workers" — a coinage of Balzac's. See E. R. Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 
1923), p. 263. [dl2a,7] 

<J.-A. > Chaptal, De I'Industrie francaise, vol. 2 (Paris, 1819), p. 198, estimates 
that the number of books published annually is 3,090. [dl2a,8] 

From the highly unfavorable "M. de Balzac," by Chaudes-Aigues: "Dungeons, 
brothels, and prisons would he asylums of virtue . . . compared to the civilized 
cities of M. de Balzac. . . . The banker is a man who has enriched himself through 
embezzlement and usury; the politician . . . owes his stature ... to cumulative acts 
of treachery; the manufacturer is a prudent and skillful swindler; . . . the man of 



letters ... is always hawking his opinions and his conscience. . . . The world as 
painted by M. de Balzac is ... a cesspool." ,I<acques> Chaudes-Aigues, Les Ecri- 
vains modemes de la France (Paris, 1841), p. 227. [dl3,l] 



"Nowadays, so many attested and authenticated facts have emerged from the 
occult sciences that the time will come when these sciences will be taught at univer- 
sities just as chemistry and astronomy are. Just now, when so many professorial 
chairs are being set up in Paris — chairs in Slavonic, in Manchurian studies, and in 
literatures so unprofessable as those of far northern lands; chairs which, instead 
of offering instruction, stand in need of it themselves . . . — is it not a matter of 
surprise that, under the name of anthropology, the teaching of occult philosophy, 
one of the glories of the old-time university, has not been restored? In this respect, 
Germany ... is a step ahead of France." Honore de Balzac, Le Cousin Pons, 1 " 1 in 
Oeuvres completes, vol. 18, La Comedie humaine: Scenes de la vie parisienne, 6 
(Paris, 1914), p. 131. □ Physiologies D [dl3,2] 

On Lamartine: "He is the most feminine of men in a century which has seen a great 
many such men, several of whom seem to announce themselves by the very article 
preceding their names: Lafayette, Lamennais, Lacordaire, Lamartine. . . . There 
are very good reasons for thinking that he had prepared for the red flag the same 
speech he delivered for the tricolor flag." AbelBonnard, Les Moderes, in the series 
entitled Le Drame du present, vol. 1 (Paris < 1936>), pp. 232-233. [dl3,3] 

"The novel ... is no longer only a way of telling a story but has become an 
investigation, a continual discovery. . . . Balzac stands at the limit of the literature 
of imagination and of the literature of exactitude. He has books in which the spirit 
of inquiry is rigorous, like Eugenie Grandet or Cesar Birotteau; others in which 
the unreal is blended with the real, like La Femme de trente cms; and still others, 
like Le Chef-d'oeuvre inconnu, composed of elements drawn from a variety of jeux 
d'esprit." Pierre Hamp, "La Litterature, image de la societe," Encyclopedie 
franqaise, vol. 16, Arts et litteratures dans la societe content poraine, 1, p. 64. 

[dl3,4] 

"By 1862, the year in which Victor Hugo publishes Les Miserables, the number of 
illiterates has considerably diminished in France. ... In proportion as an edu- 
cated populace begins to patronize hookshops, authors begin choosing their he- 
roes from the crowd, and the one in whom this phenomenon of socialization can 
best be studied is Hugo himself, the first great poet who gave to his literary works 
commonplace titles: Les Miserables, Les Travailleurs de la mer." Pierre Hamp, 
"La Litterature, image de la societe," Encyclopedie franqaise, vol. 16, Arts et 
litteratures dans la societe content por aine , 1, p. 64). [dl3a,l] 

These remarks on Scott might be applied to Victor Hugo: "He regarded rhetoric, 
the art of the orator, as the immediate weapon of the oppressed. . . . And it is odd 
to reflect that he was, as an author, giving free speech to fictitious rebels while he 



S was, as a stupid politician, denying it to real ones." G. K. Chesterton, Dickens, 
trans. Laurent and Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1 927) , p. 175. 18 [dl3a,2] 

monument of what happens when a great literary genius has a literary taste akin 
2 to that of the community. For this kinship was deep and spiritual. Dickens was 
S3 not like our ordinary demagogues and journalists. Dickens did not write what 
a the people wanted. Dickens wanted what the people wanted. . . . He died in 
^ 1870; and the whole nation mourned him as no public man has ever been 

ig mourned; for prime ministers and princes were private persons compared with 
Dickens. He had been a great popular king, like a king of some more primal age 
whom his people could come and see, giving judgment under an oak tree." G. K. 
Chesterton, Dickens, trans. Laurent and Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), pp. 72, 
168. 1!l [dl3a,3] 



he Nain jaune is founded by Aurelien Scholl; La Vie Parisienne, by Marcelin, a 
friend of Worth's. L 'Evenement founded in 1865 by Villemessant, with the partici- 
pation of Rochef ort, Zola, and others in the opposition. [dl3a,4] 



"Mires and the Pereire brothers, following the example of the Rothschilds, would 
from time to time cause an unexpected shower, not of gold hut of securities, to 
descend on well-known poets, journalists, and playwrights, without involving any 
direct ohligation in return." S. Kracauer, Jacques Offenbach unddas Paris seiner 
Zeit (Amsterdam, 1937), p. 252. 21 ' [dl4,l] 



"A single one of the new sciences — that of analogy — ought to yield authors a profi t 
of five million to six million francs for a sixteen-page installment." Charles 
Fourier, he Nouveau Monde inclustriel et societaire (Paris, 1829), p. 35. [dl4,2] 



Numher of Paris newspaper subscribers: in 1824, ca. 47,000; in 1836, ca. 70,000; 
in 1846, ca. 200,000. (Details for 1824: 15,000f or the government papers Journal 
de Paris, Etoile, Gazette, Moniteur, Drapeau blanc, Pilote; 32,000 for the opposi- 
tion papers Journal cles debuts, Constitutionnel, Quoticlienne, Courrier de Paris, 
Journal.du Commerce, Aristarque.) [dl4,3] 

With the increase in public advertising, newspapers turned against the annonces 
de guise es <advertisements in disguise>, which no doubt had brought in more for 
journalists than for the administration. [dl4,4] 



Around he Globe gathered, as editors, the most important of the later Orleanists; 
this editorial staff included Cousin, Villemain, Guizot. In 1829, Blanqui entered 
the office as stenographer, particularly as parliamentary stenographer. [dl4,5] 



The journalistic strain in the novels of Dumas: the first chapter of Les Molncans de 
Pans already provides information about what impost must be paid, in the event 



one is arrested, for the privilege of an individual cell; where the Paris executioner 
lives; and what the best-known apache pubs of Paris are. [dl4,6] 



A young man from St. Petersburg called Les Mysteres de Paris "the foremost hook 
after the Bihle." J. Eckardt, Die baltischen Provinzen Russlands (Leipzig, 1869), 
p. 406. [dl4,7] 

Valery, in his introduction to Les Fleurs du mal (Paris, 1928), p . xv, on Hugo: "For 
more than sixty years, this extraordinary man was at his desk every day from five 
o'clock in the morning until noon! He unremittingly called up new combinations of 
language, willed them, waited for them, and had the satisfaction of hearing them 
respond to his call. He wrote one or two hundred thousand lines of poetry and 
acquired, hy that uninterrupted exercise, a curious manner of thinking which 
superficial critics have judged as best they could." 21 [dl4,8] 

For nearly all the Romantics, the archetype of the hero is the bohemian; for 
Hugo, it is the beggar. In this regard, one should not lose sight of the fact that 
Hugo as writer made a fortune. [dl4a,l] 

Hugo in Post-scriptum de ma vie: L'Esprit; Tas de pierre, p. 1 (cited in Maria 
Ley-Deutsch, he Gueux chez Victor Hugo, series entitled Bibliotheque de la Fon- 
dation Victor Hugo, vol. 4 [Paris, 1936], p. 435): "Do you want a measure of the 
civilizing power of art . . . ? Look in the prisons for a man who knows of Mozart, 
Virgil, and Raphael, who can quote Horace from memory, who is moved by #r- 
phee and Der Freischiitz. . . . Look for such a man . . . , and you will not find 
him." [dl4a,2] 

Regis Messac speaks of an "epic period" which the feuilleton under Louis Philippe 
enjoys, hefore it hecomes a mass item in the Second Empire. The novels of Gabriel 
Ferry belong to the beginning of the latter era, as do those of Paul Feval. [dl4a,3] 

One can speak, in certain respects, of a contribution made by the physiologies to 
detective fiction. Only, it must be borne in mind that the combinative procedure 
of the detective stands opposed here to an empirical approach that is modeled on 
the methods of Vidocq, and that betrays its relation to the physiologies precisely 
through the Jackal in Les Mohicans de Paris (cited in Messac <Le "Detective Novel" 
et I'influence de la pense'e scientifique [Paris, 1929]>, p. 434), of whom it is said: 
"One look at the ripped-open shutter, at the broken pane, at the knife slash was 
enough: 'Oh ho!' he said, 'I recognize this! It is the modus operandi of one of 
them"' [dl4a,4] 

Veron pays 100,000 francs for he Juif errant before a line has been penned. 

[dl4a,5] 



"Every time a serial novel threatened to carry off the prize, Balzac redouhled his 
efforts with Vautrin. It was in 1837-1838 that Les Memoires du diable seemed to be 



dominating the serial format, and it was just at that point that the series entitled 
Splendeurs et miseres des courtisanes began. In 1842-1843, Les Mysteres de Paris 
appeared, and Balzac responded with A Combien V Amour revient aux vieillards. 
In 1844 Monte-Cristo, and in 1846 La Closerie des Genets; the latter year saw the 
publication of Balzac's Oil menent les mauvais chemins; the year after that, La 
Derniere incarnation de Vautrin. 22 If this dialogue . . . did not continue any fur- 
ther, it is because Balzac . . . died shortly afterward." Regis Messac, Le "Detective 
Novel" et Vinfluence de la pensee scientifique (Paris, 1929), pp. 403-4.04. 

[dl4a,6] 

Under the Second Republic, an amendment to the law of July 16-19, 1850, 
designed "to strike out against an industry that dishonors the press and that is 
detrimental to the business of the bookstores." So declaims de Riancey, the 
author of the amendment. The law imposes on each feuilleton a tax of one 
centime per copy. The provision was annulled by the new and more severe press 
laws of February 1852, through which the feuilleton gained in importance. 

[dl5,l] 

Nettement draws attention to the particular significance which the period for 
subscription renewal had for the newspapers. There was a tendency, at such 
times, to begin publishing a new novel in the feuilletons even before the old one 
had Snished its run. In tliis same period of development, the reaction of readers 
to the novels started to make itself felt more immediately. Publishers took note of 
this tendency and gauged their speculations beforehand according to the title of 
the new novel. [dl5,2] 

The novel published in installments can be seen as a precursor of the newspaper 
feuilleton. In 1836, a periodical of Karr's for the first time undertook to publish 
such installments — which later could be gathered under one cover — as a supple- 
ment for its readers. [dl5,3] 

Political attitude of Romanticism, according to Baudelaire's conception in "Petrus 
Borel": "If the Restoration had turned into a period of glory, Romanticism would 
not have parted company with royalty." "Later on, ... a misanthropic republi- 
canism joined the new school, and Petrus Borel was the . . . most paradoxical 
expression of the spirit of the Bousingots. . . . This spirit, . . . contrary to the 
democratic and bourgeois passion which later so cruelly oppressed us, was excited 
both by an aristocratic hatred . . . for kings and the bourgeoisie, and by a general 
sympathy . . . for all that . . . was . . . pessimistic and Byronic." Charles Baude- 
laire, L'Art romantique, ed. Hachette, vol. 3 (Paris), pp. 354, 353-354. 23 [dl5,4] 

"We in Paris have . . . seen the evolution of Romanticism favored by the monar- 
chy, while liberals and republicans alike remained obstinately wedded to the rou- 
tines of that literature called classical." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique (Paris), 
p. 220 ("Richard Wagner et Tannhduser").™ [dl55] 



Three forms of bohemianism: "That of Theophile Gautier, Arsene Houssaye, 
Gerard de Nerval, Nestor Koqueplan, Camille Rogier, Lassailly, Edouard Our- 
liac — a voluntary boheme . . . where one played at poverty . . . , a bastard scion of 
the old Romanticism . . . ; that of 1848, of Murger, Champlleury, Barbara, Nadar, 
Jean Wallon, Schanne — truly needy, this boheme, hut as quickly relieved, thanks 
to an intellectual camaraderie . . . ; and that finally of 1852, our boheme, not 
voluntary at all . . . hut cruelly grounded in privation." Jules Levallois, Milieu de 
siecle: Memoires d'un critique (Paris <1895>),pp. 90-91. [dl5a,lj 

Balzac sees human beings magnified through the mists of the future behind 
which they move. On the other hand, the Paris he describes is that of bis own 
time; measured against the stature of its inhabitants, it is a provincial Paris. 

[dl5a,2] 

'What I have in mind here will become sufficiently clear if I say that I fi nd in 
Balzac no interior life of any kind, but rather a devouring and wholly external 
curiosity, which takes the form of movement without passing through thought." 
Alain, Avec Balzac (Paris <1937>), p. 120. [dl5a,3] 

Laf orgue on La Fin de Satan: "I remember a phrase hy M. Mallarine: Each morn- 
ing, on rising from his bed, Hugo would go to the organ — like the great Bach, who 
piled up score upon score without concern for other consequences." Earlier, on 
the same page: "The organ continues as long as the score of the visible world lies 
open before his eager eyes, and as long as there is wind for the pipes." Jules 
Laforgue, Melanges posthumes (Paris, 1903), pp. 130-131. [dl5a,4] 

"It has often heen asked whether Victor Hugo had an easy time composing. It is 
clear that he was not endowed, or afflicted, with that strange facility in improvisa- 
tion thanks to which Lamartine never crossed out a word. The iron pen of the 
latter sped rapidly along, barely touching the satiny paper it covered with light 
marks. . . . Victor Hugo makes the paper cry out under his pen, which itself cries 
out. He reflects on each word; he weighs every expression; he comes to rest on 
periods, as one might sit upon a milestone — to contemplate the linished sentence, 
along with the open space in which the next sentence will begin." Louis Ulbach, Les 
Contemporains (Paris, 1883); cited in Raymond Escholier, Victor Hugo raconte 
par ceux qui Vontvu (Paris, 1931), p. 353. [dl5a.5] 

"Some of the letters which reached him were addressed simply: Victor Hugo, 
Ocean." Raymond Escholier, Victor Hugo raconte par ceux qui I'ont vn (Paris, 
1931), p. 273 ("Automne"). [dl5a,6] 

An early, highly characteristic specimen of the feuilleton style in the lettre 
parisienne of January 12, 1839, from the pen of the vicomte de Launais (Madame 
de Girardin): "There is a great deal of excitement over M. Daguerre's invention, 
and nothing is more amusing than the explanations of this marvel that are offered 



in all seriousness by our salon savants. M. Daguerre can rest easy, however, for 
no one is going to steal his secret. . . . Truly, it is an admirable discovery, but we 
understand nothing at all about it: there has been too much explanation." Mme. 
de Girardin, Oeuvres completes, vol. 4, pp. 289-290; cited in Gisele Freund, La 
Photographie en France au XIX siecle (Paris, 1936), p. 36. [dl 6,1] 

Baudelaire mentions "an immortal feuilleton" by Nestor Roqueplan, "Ou vont les 
chiens?" < Where Do Dogs Go?>, in Le Spleen de Paris, ed. R. Simon (Paris), p. 83 
("Les Bons Chiens"). 25 [dl 6,2] 

On Lamartine, Hugo, Michelet: "There is lacking to these men so rich in talent — 
as to their predecessors in the eighteenth century — that secret part of study 
whereby one forgets one's contemporaries in the search for truths, for that which 
afterward one can lay before them." Aiel Bonnard, Les Moderes, in the series 
entitled Le Drame du present, vol. 1 (Paris <1936>), p. 235. [dl6,3] 

Dickens: "There was a great deal of the actual and unbroken tradition of the 
Revolution itself in his early radical indictments; in his denunciations of the Fleet 
Prison there was a great deal of the capture of the Bastille. There was, above all, a 
certain reasonable impatience which was the essence of the old Republican, and 
which is quite unknown to the Revolutionist in modern Europe. The old Radical 
did not feel exactly that he was 'in revolt'; he felt if anything that a number of 
idiotic institutions had revolted against reason and against him." G. K. Chester- 
ton, Dickens, trans. Laurent and Martin-Dupont (Paris, 1927), pp. 164—165. 26 

[dl6,4] 

Gustave Geffroy (UEnferme <Paris, 1926>, vol. 1, pp. 155-156) points out that 
Balzac never described the unrest of the Parisian population in his days, the club 
life, the streetcorner prophets, and so on — with the possible exception of Z. Mar- 
cas, that slave of Louis Philippe's regime. [dl6,5] 

During the July Revolution, Charles X had handwritten appeals distributed 
among the insurgents by his troops. See Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme, vol. 1, p. 50. 

[dl6,6] 

"It is . . . important to conceive of the possibility of reorienting aesthetics . . . 
toward influences operating on man thanks to representations engendered by the 
morphology of society itself. ... It is still more important to demonstrate that 
phenomena of this kind occur with the advent of universal literacy [that is to say, 
with the institution of compulsory primary school education, which was estab- 
lished at precisely the same time that the myth of Paris was formed ( — /Vote)]." 
Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," ISouveUe Revue franquise, 25, no. 284 
(May 1, 1937), p. 699. [dl6a,l] 



Gautier, in his "Victor Hugo," on the red waistcoats at the premiere of Hernani: 
"To avoid the infamous red of '93, we had added a slight amount of purple to our 



tint. We did not wish to have any political motive attributed to us." Cited in 
Raymond Escholier, Victor Hugo raconte par ceux qui I'ont vu (Paris, 1931), 
p. 162. [dl6a,2] 



1852: "The reputation of the author of Hernani had passed, by the peculiar con- 
duits of bohemerie and utopianism, from the Latin Quarter to the faubourgs of 
Paris. Then, suddenly, the great metaphorist had had the revelation of the dogma 
of the sovereign people. . . . This revelation encompassed, at the same time, the 
projects of Michelet and Quinet and many another writer of lesser ability, such as 
Considerant." Leon Daudet, ha Tragique Existence de Victor Hugo (Paris 
<1937>), p. 98. — Around this time, Hugo made a speech to the troops. [dl6a,3] 

Hugo: "It was during one of those desolate excursions that the sight of a ship run 
aground on a nameless rock, its keel in the air, gave Hugo the idea for a new 
Robinson Crusoe, which he would call Les Travailleurs de la mer <The Toilers of 
the Sea> , lahor and the sea comprising the two poles of his exile. . . . Whereas in 
. . . Les Contemplations he had lulled his agonizing regret for the loss of his eldest 
daughter to the sea, he went on, in the prose of Les Travailleurs, to soothe the 
sadness he felt for the daughter who had sailed away. This marine element, then, 
was decidedly linked, by chains of black, to his destiny." Leon Daudet, La 
Tragique Existence de Victor Hugo (Paris), pp. 202-203. [dl6a,4] 

Juliette Drouet: "It is likely . . . that, beyond the question of former lovers and of 
debts, this propensity for ancillary amours, which attended the poet . . . from his 
thirtieth year until the end of his life, made him want to reduce his pretty actress 
to a subordinate position, to the position of beggar woman, . . . and the famous 
expiation might well have been only a metamorphosis of desire." Leon Daudet, La 
Tragique Existence de Victor Hugo (Paris), pp. 61-62. [dl7,l] 

Leon Daudet maintains that the failure of Le Roi s 'amuse in 1832 turned Hugo 
against the monarchy. [dl7,2] 

Hugo's panegyrics to Louis Napoleon were puhlished in L'Evenement. [dl7,3] 

From the record of the spiritualist sessions on Jersey (cited in Albert Beguin, 
L'Ame romantique et le reve [Marseilles, 1937], vol. 2), to which Beguin appends the 
just remark (p. 397): "Hugo transports all that he takes up — and which could 
appear pure foolishness were reason alone to judge — into his mythology, a little 
like the primitive savage initiated into the beauties of free and compulsory public 
education. But his vengeance (and his destiny as well) will be to become, himself, 
the myth of an age devoid of all mythic meaning." Hence, Hugo transported 
spiritualism into his world. "Evety great spirit carries on in his lif e two works : the 
work of the living person and the work of the phantom. . . . Whereas the living 
man performs the first work, the pensive phantom — at night, amid the universal 
silence — awakes widiin the man. O terror! 'What,' says the human being, 'that is 
not all?' — 'No,' replies the specter. 'Get up! Up! There is a great wind abroad, the 



hounds and the foxes are yelping, darkness is everywhere, and nature shudders 
and trembles under the whipcord of God.' . . . The writer-specter sees the phan- 
tom ideas. Words take fright, sentences shiver, . . . the windowpane grows dim, 
the lamp is afraid. . . . Take care, living man, O man of a century, O proscript of 
a terrestrial idea! For this is madness, this is the tomb, this is the infinite — this is a 
phantom idea" (p. 390). The "great spirit," in the same context: "He encounters 
certitude sometimes as an obstacle on his path, and clarity sometimes as a fear" 
(p. 391). — From Post-Scriptum de ma vie: "There exists a hilarity of shadows. 
Nocturnal laughter floats in the air. There are merry specters" (p. 396). [dl7,4] 

Hugo famously intoxicates himself — and not only in William Shakespeare — with 
long lists of the names of great geniuses. In this regard, one should recall the 
poet's passion for imagining his own name writ large; we know he read an H in 
the towers of Notre Dame. Another aspect of the matter is disclosed by his 
spiritualistic experiences. The great geniuses whose names he tirelessly rehearses, 
always in a different order, are his "avatars," incarnations of his own ego, and the 
more present for being ranged so before it. [dl7a,l] 

Just as, during the writing of Notre-Dame de Paris, Hugo every evening would 
visit one of the towers of the cathedral, so on Guernsey (Jersey?) he sought out 
the roc her des proscrits <exiles' rock>, from which every afternoon he would con- 
template the ocean. [dl7a,2] 

This decisive passage, which explodes the status of consciousness within the 
century, from "Ce que dit la Bouche d'ombre" : 

Weep for the unclean spider, for the worm, 

For the slug whose back is wet as winter, 

For the vile louse that hangs upon the leaf, 

For the liideous crab, and die appalling centipede, 

For the dreadful toad, poor monster with gentle eyes, 

Who is always gazing at the mysterious sky. 

The last line should be compared with that of Baudelaire's "Les Aveugles." 27 

[dl7a,3] 

Sainte-Beuve on Lamartine's role in 1848: "What he did not foresee is that he 
would he the Orpheus who later, for a time, would direct and govern, with his 
golden lyre, this invasion of barbarians." C. A. Sainte-Beuve, Les Consolations: 
Pensees d'aout, poems, part 2 (Paris, 1863), p. 1 18. [dl7a,4] 

"One remembers that the china and the tallies began to dance, while the rest of the 
world seemed to lie standing still — in order to encourage the others." Karl Marx, 
Das Kapital <vol. 1 > , eel. Korsch (Berlin < 1932>) <p. 83 > . 2!1 [dl7a,5] 



In a note in Das Kapital (ed. Korsch, p. 541), Marx speaks of "Balzac, who so 
thoroughly studied every shade of avarice." 2 " [dl7a,6] 



he Bo heme — was, at first, the organ of the proletarianized intellectuals of Del- 
vau's generation. [d!8,l] 



Bourget on Balzac: "Certain of his characters were more true-to-life in 1860 than 
in 1835." A. Cerfherr and J. Christophe, Repertoire de la Comedie humaine 
(Paris, 1887), p. v (introduction hy PaulBourget). <See d8,l.> [dl8,2] 

Taking a cue from Hofmannsthal (Versach iiber Victor Hugo <Munich, 1925>, 
pp. 23-25), one could provide an account of the birth of the newspaper from the 
spirit of rhetoric, 30 and emphasize how the spirit of representative political dis- 
course has conformed to that of empty chatter and civic gossip. [dl8,3] 

On the feuilleton: "Avid for gain, the editors of the hig newspapers have not 
wanted to demand that their feuilletonists write criticism founded on conviction 
and on truth. Their convictions have too often changed." This the judgment of the 
Fourierist press. H. J. Hunt, he Socialisme et fe romantisme en France: Etude de 
la presse socialiste de 1830 a 184S (Oxford, 1935) <p. 142 >. [dl8,4] 

Lamartine's politico-poetic program, model for fascist programs of today: "The 
ignorance and timidity of governments . . . has the effect, within all the parties, of 
disgusting one hy one those men endowed with breadth of vision and generosity of 
heart. Each, in his turn, disenchanted with the mendacious symbols that no longer 
represent them, these men are going to congregate around ideas alone. ... It is to 
help hring forth conviction, to add one voice more to this political gronp, that I 
temporarily renounce my solitude." Lamartine, "Des Destinees de la poesie" [sec- 
ond preface to Les Meditations], in Les Grand Ecrivains de la France: La- 
martine, vol. 2 (Paris, 1915), pp. 422-423. [dl8,5] 

On the serial novel in Sue's day: "The need to which these fantasies respond is that 
of discovering some relation among events that appear to he utterly random. Oh- 
scurely, the imagination persuades itself that all these inequalities of social exist- 
ence, these downfalls and ascents, constitute one and the same great action — in 
other words, that they proceed from a single cause and are connected one to 
another. The development of the serial novel parallels the creation of the social 
sciences." Cassou, Quarante-huit (Paris <1939>), p. 15. [dl8,6] 

Casson on the "democratic lyricism of Lamartine": "We discover in this a secret 
thought: our possessions, along with all their train of spiritual delights, accom- 
pany us to the very threshold of immortality. Hardly broached in Milly, •« Im terre 
natale, this theme hursts forth in La Vigne et la maison, expressing Lamartine's 
supreme desire — that of living on in a realm of physical immortality where every 
object preserves its perfect and savory reality. This eschatology, no doubt, differs 
a little from the pure spiritualism of La Mort de Socrate, with its Platonic inspira- 
tion. . . . But it reveals the profound nature of this aristocratic landowner." Jean 
Cassou, Quarante-huit (Paris), p. 173. [dl8a,l] 



The gargoyles of Notre Dame must be just about contemporary with Victor 
Hugo's novel. "Here Viollet-le-Duc, . . . whose work was so sharply criticized, 
has accomplished something remarkable. These devils and monsters are actually 
descendants of the grotesques created in the Middle Ages by the possessed imagi- 
nation, everywhere seeing demons, really seeing them." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin 
<1929>), p. 72. We meet with the analogous phenomenon, it seems, in Hugo. At 
stake here, perhaps, is a question, one that coincides with the question: Why is 
the nineteenth century the century of spiritualism? [dl8a,2] 

An important relation between information and feuilleton is indicated by Laver- 
dant (this, at any rate, is how the signet "Lm" is read by Hunt, Le Socialume et le 
romantisme en France [Oxford, 1935]): "The distressing disputes . . . between Ger- 
many and France, the war in Africa — do not such facts deserve as much attention 
as skillfully told stories of former times or of individual misfortunes? This being 
the case, if the public . . . reads these great national novels chapter by chapter, 
why do you wish to impose on it, all at one time, your tale or your doctrine? . . . 
Division of labor and short sittings: such are the requirements of the reader." Lm, 
"Revue critique du feuilleton," La Phalange ,]\Ay 18, 1841; in La Phalange, 3rd 
series, vol. 3 (Paris, 1841), p. 540. [dl8a,3] 

"Victor Hugo, . . . according to a description hy Theophilc Gautier, would mix 
together on the same plate a cutlet, beans in oil, a ham omelette, and Brie cheese, 
and would drink cafe au lait seasoned with a dash of vinegar and a spot of mus- 
tard." R. B[runet], "La Cuisine regionale," Le Temps, April 4, 1940. [dl9] 



[The Stock Exchange, Economic History] 



"Napoleon represented the last onslaught of revolutionary terror against the 
bourgeois society which had been proclaimed by this same Revolution, and against 
its policy. Napoleon, of course, already discerned the essence of the modern state; 
he understood that it is based on the unhampered development of bourgeois soci- 
ety, on the free movement of private interest, and so forth. . . . Yet, at the same 
time, he still regarded the state as an end in itself and civil life only as a purse- 
bearer. . . . He perfected the Terror by substituting permanent war for permanent 
revolution. . . . If he despotically suppressed the liberalism of bourgeois society — 
the political idealism of its daily practice — he showed no more consideration for its 
essential material interests, trade and industry, whenever they conflicted with his 
political interests. His scorn for industrial homines d'affaires was the complement 
to his scorn for ideologues. . . . Just as the liberal bourgeoisie was opposed once 
more by revolutionary terror in the person of Napoleon, so it was opposed once 
more by counterrevolution during the Restoration, in the person of the Bourhons. 
Finally, in 1830, the bourgeoisie put into effect its wishes of the year 1789, the only 
difference being that its political enlightenment was now complete, that it no 
longer considered the constitutional representative state as a means for achieving 
the ideal of the state, the welfare of the world, and universal human aims hut, on 
the contrary, had acknowledged it as the official expression of its own exclusive 
power and the political recognition of its own special interests." Karl Marx and 
Friedrich Engels, Die heilige Familie; cited in Die neue Zeit, 3 (Stuttgart, 1885), 
pp. 388-389. 1 [gl,l] 

A schema from Edgar Quinet's De la Revolution et clela philosophie: "The devel- 
opment of German philosophy ... a sort of theory of the French political revolu- 
tion. Kant is the Constituent Assembly, Fichte the Convention, Schelling the 
Empire (in light of his veneration of physical force), and Hegel appears as the 
Restoration and the Holy Alliance." <Eduard> Schmidt-Weissenfels, Portraits 
aits Frankreich (Berlin, 1881), p. 120 ("Edgar Quinet und dei- franzbsische Na- 
tionalhaJJ" < Edgar Quinet and French National Hatred)). [gl^] 

Guizot ministry. "Corrupting the electoral colleges was a simple matter. These 
colleges generally comprised few electors; many contained less than 200, among 



which were government bureaucrats. The latter obeyed the orders they were 
given; as to ordinary electors, one could buy them by giving their dependents and 
favorites things like tobacco shops or scholarships, or by giving the elector himself 
some important administrative post. In the Chamber, as in the electoral colleges, 
government bureaucrats were quite numerous: more than a third of the deputies 
(184 out of 459, in 1846) were prefects, magistrates, officials. The minister con- 
trolled them by fueling their hopes for advancement. . . . To reach a majority, 
thirty or forty deputies were needed. Guizot won them with concessions for large 
state projects (this was in the early days of railroad construction) or hy giving 
them a share of the contract for supplies to the state. Corruption was thus built up 
into a system of government, and the numerous scandals at the end of the reign 
make glaringly clear that the underlings worked the system just as well as the 
prime minister." A. Malet and P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), pp. 95, 97. 
Lamartine spoke, at this time, of the danger of an "electoral aristocracy" (1847). 

[gla,l] 

"On July 28, 1831, a Parisian man displays his portrait together with that of Louis 
Philippe, providing them with the following caption: 'There is no distance separat- 
ing Philippe from me. He is the citizen-king; I am the king-citizen."' Gisela 
Freund, "La Photographie au point de vue sociologique" (manuscript, p. 31), 
citing Jean Jaures, Histoire socialiste: he Regne de Louis-Philippe, p. 49. [gla,2] 

"'Paris is as sad as possible,' wrote the author of Colombo, at the height of the 
exhibition. 'Everyone is afraid without knowing why. It is a sensation akin to that 
produced by the music of Mozart when the Commendatore is about to enter. 2 . . . 
The least little incident is awaited like a catastrophe."' Adolphe Demy, Essai 
historique sur les expositions universelles de Paris (Paris, 1907), pp. 173-174. 

[gla,3] 

Some light on Napoleon's relation to the hourgeoisie around 1814. "The emperor 
had evinced the greatest reluctance at the prospect of arming the Paris population. 
Fearing the revolutionary spirit, he had refused the services of 50,000 workers, 
most of them former soldiers; he had wanted to organize companies . . . made up 
solely of citizens of the haute hourgeoisie — that is to say, those who were inclined 
to regard the allies as liberators. . . . People cursed Napoleon's name. Witness a 
letter to Colonel Greiner, second in command at the Ecole . . . : 'April 11, 1814. 3 
Cowardly slave of an equally cowardly master! Give me hack my son! Bloodthirst- 
ier even than the tyrant, you have outdone him in cruelty by delivering up to 
enemy fire the children we entrusted to your care — we who helieve in the law that 
guaranteed their education. Where are they? You will answer for this with your 
head! All the mothers are marching against you, and I myself, I promise you, will 
wring your neck with my own two hands if my son does not reappear soon.'" 
G. Pinet, Histoire de VEcole polytechnique (Paris, 1887), pp. 73-74, 80-81. The 
letter is from the father of Enfantin. [g2,l] 



"Protestantism . . . did away with the saints in heaven so as to be able to abolish 
their feast days on earth. The Revolution of 1789 understood still better what it 
was about. The reformed religion had held on to Sunday; but for the revolution- 
ary bourgeois, that one day of rest coming every seven days was too much, and 
they therefore substituted for the seven-day week the ten-day week <la decade >, 
so that the day of rest recurred but every ten days. And in order to bury all 
memory of the ecclesiastical holy days . . . , they replaced the names of saints, in 
the republican calendar, with the names of metals, plants, and animals." Paul 
Lafargue, "Die christliche Liebestatigkeit" [Die neue Zeit, 23, no. 1 (Stuttgart), 
pp. 145-146]. [g2,2] 

"In the first days of the Revolution, the question of the poor assumed ... a very 
distinct and urgent character. Bailly, who initially had been elected mayor of Paris 
for the express purpose of alleviating the misery of the . . . workers, packed them 
into masses and cooped them up — some 18,000 people — like wild animals, on the 
hill of Montmartre. Those who stormed the Bastille had workers with cannons 
emplaced there, lighted match in hand. . . . Had the war not drawn the unem- 
ployed and destitute laborers from town and countryside . . . into the army, and 
shuttled them off to the borders, ... a popular uprising would have spread across 
the whole of France." Paul Lafargue, "Die christliche Liebestatigkeit" [Die neue 
Zeit, 23, no. 1 (Stuttgart), p. 147]. [g2,3] 

"Our century, in which the sovereign is everywhere except on the throne." Balzac, 
Preface to Un Grand Homme de province a Paris; cited in Georges Batault, Le 
Pontife de la demagogie: Victor Hugo <Paris, 1934>, pp. 230-231. [g2a,l] 

On the writings of Napoleon III: "A set of commonplaces developed with sustained 
solemnity . . . , a perpetual clashing of antitheses, and then suddenly a striking 
formulation that captivates by its air of grandeur or seduces by its generosity . . . , 
along with ideas which are so confused that one can no longer distinguish them in 
the depths where they're apparently buried, but which, at the very moment one 
despairs of ever finding them, burst forth with the sound of trumpets." Pierre de 
la Gorce, Napoleon III et sa politique (Paris), pp. 4, 5; cited in Batault, Le Pontife 
de la demagogie, pp. 33-34. [g2a,2] 

Transition from the Napoleonic military regime to the peacetime regime of the 
Restoration. Engravings titled The Soldier-Laborer, The Soldier-Reapers, Gener- 
osity of a French Soldier, The Tomb of the Brave. Cabinet des Estampes. [g2a,3] 

"When, around 1829, M. de Saint-Cricq, director of Customs, announced the 
commercial shutdown, ... we were incredulous. It was so serious that it caused 
the July Revolution. On the eve of February 1848, during the harsh winter that 
preceded it, the shutdown returned, and with it unemployment. Twenty years 
later, in 1869, here it is again. No one has any desire for enterprise. The current 
government, with its Credit Mobilier and other companies, all so advantageous to 



the Stock Exchange, diverted for ten years the agricultural and industrial capital 
that earns comparatively little interest. Its free-trade treaty, opening France to 
English industry in 1860, . . . hrought litter ruin from the outset. Normandy says 
it cannot recover. Much less the ironworks of the North." J, Michelet, Nos jils 
(Paris, 1879), pp. 300-301. [g2a,4] 

A copper engraving of 1818: Xenomania Impugned, or It's No Disgrace To Be 
French. On the right, a column inscribed with the names of famous battles as well 
as famous works of art and literature. Under it, a young man with the honor roll of 
industry; his foot rests on a sheet hearing the inscription, "Products of Foreign 
Manufacture." Facing him, another Frenchman, who proudly points toward the 
column. In the hackground, an English civilian debates with a French soldier. All 
four persons provided with captions. Floating above in the sky and blowing into a 
trumpet, the figure — sharply reduced in scalt — of an angel. From his horn hangs 
a tablet with the words: "To Immortality." Cahinet des Estampes. [g2a,5] 

"If you pass in front of the Stock Exchange at noon, you will see a long line. . . . 
This line is composed of men from all walks of life — bourgeois, pensioners, shop- 
keepers, porters, errand boys, postmen, artists and actors — who come there to get 
a place in the first row, around the circular enclosure. . . . Positioned close to the 
floor, next to the puhlic crier, they purchase shares of stock which they sell off 
during the same session. That old white-haired fellow who offers a pinch of snuff 
to the guard passing by is the dean of these speculators .... From the general look 
of the trading on the floor and off, and from the faces of the stockbrokers, he is 
able to divine, with a marvelous instinct, the rise or the fall of stocks!." [Taxilc 
Delord,] Paris Boursier (Paris, 1854 ), pp. 44-46 ("Les Petits Paris"). [g3,l] 

On the Stock Exchange: "The Bourse dates only from the time of M. de ViUele. 
There was more initiative and more Saint-Simonianism in the mind of this minister 
from Toulouse than is generally helieved. . . . Under his administration, the posi- 
tion of stockbroker was sold for up to one million francs. The first words of 
speculation, though, were harely a lisp; the meager four billion in French deht, the 
several million in Spanish and . . . Neapolitan deht, were t he alphahet hy which it 
learned to read. . . . One put one's faith in the farm, in the house. ... Of a rich 
man it was said: he has land in the sun and a house in town! ... It was not until 
18:52, after the . . . sermons of Samt-Simonianism, . . . that the country found 
itself . . . suddenly ripe for its great financial destiny. In 1837, an irresistihle force 
could he observed attracting attention to the Bourse; the creation of the railroad 
added new momentum to this force. . . . The petite-coulisse in the colonnade <see 
Convolute O, note 9> does the husiness of the petty bourgeoisie; just heyond, the 
contre-pelite-coulisse handles the capital of the proletariat. The one operates for 
the porters, cooks, coachmen, grill-room proprietors, haberdashers, and waiters; 
the other descends a notch in the social hierarchy. One day we said t o ourselves: 
'The cobbler, the match seller, the hoiler cleaner, and the fried-potato vendor 
know how to put their capital to use; let's make the great market of the Bourse 




-'»<" ' is" t'l-ji,>m^ :l n't; a p,f J'&'pvtoi.* 

LEtrangomanie blamee, ou D 'Etre Francois il n'y a pas d 'affront 
(Xenomania Impugned, or It's No Disgrace to Be French). 
Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale de France. See g2a,5. 



available to them. . . . Thus, we opened up the contre- petite-coulisse, trading be- 
yond the external market. We sold shares at a fixed rate of 3 francs, 50 centimes, 
and made a profit of one centime. Business was booming in this market when the 
debacle of last month occurred." 1 [Taxile Delord,] Paris-Boursier (Paris, 1854), 
pp. 6-8, 56-57 ("Les Petits Paris"). [g3,2] 

Commercial crisis of 1857 as cause of the Italian campaign. [g3,3] 

"Enf antin exhorts his political comrades ... to establish, in addition to the 'indus- 
trial credit' already in existence, an 'intellectual credit. , " This was in 1863! C. L. 
de Licfdc, he Saint-Simonisme dans la poesie francaise, 1825-1865 < Haarlem, 
1927 >, p. 113. [g3a,l] 



Balzac's portrait of the speculator Diard in Les Marana: "He demanded thus- 
and-such percent on the purchase of fifteen legislative votes, which passed, in the 
space of one night, from the benches of the Left to those of the Right. That sort of 
thing is no longer rohbery, or any sort of crime; it is simply carrying on the 
government, becoming a silent partner in the national industry." Cited in Ahbe 
Charles Calippe, Balzac: Ses idees sociales (Reims and Paris < 1906>), p. 100. 3 

[g3a,2] 

"It was in . . . 1838 that the government, in the person of M. Martin from Nord, 
had the good idea of bringing before the Chambers the project of a great network 
of national railways — a gigantic undertaking which the state alone would carry 
out. . . . Against this untoward governmental project he Journal des debats 
launched a devastating attack, from which the project did not recover. Two years 
later, the concession for the two principal lines of the West and the South was 
granted hy the state to two large companies. . . . Five years later, . . . Pere Enfan- 
tin was secretary of the administrative council of the Lyons railroad, . . . and the 
pact between Saint-Simon and Judea . . . was sealed forever. . . . All this was the 
work of the Father <see U14a,l>. . . . Too many Jewish names appear on the 
membership rolls of the Saint-Simonian church for us to be surprised at the fact 
that the system of financial feudalism was established by the disciples of Saint- 
Simon." A. Toussenel, Les Juifs, rois de I'epoque (Paris <1886>), ed. Gonet, 
pp. 130-133. [ g 3a,3] 

"It was not the French bourgeoisie as such that ruled under the bourgeois king, 
hut merely . . . the financial aristocracy. The entire industrial corps, on the other 
hand, was in the opposition." Eduard Fuchs, Die Karikatur der europiiischen 
Vblker (Munich <1921>), vol. 1, p. 365. [g3a,4] 

"Before 1830, large-scale agriculture held sway over public policy; after 1830, the 
manufacturers took its place, hut their reign had already developed under the 
regime which had been overthrown hy the barricades. . . . Whereas 15 factories 
had heen equipped with machines in 1814, there were 65 in 1820 and 625 in 1830." 
Paul Louis, Histoire de la classe ouvriere en France, de la Revolution a nos jours 
(Paris, 1927), pp. 48-49. [g3a,5] 

"The enslavement of governments is on the increase, and the influence of specula- 
tors has grown to such an extent that the gambling den of the Bourse has hecome 
the compass of puhlic opinion." Cited in F. Armand and R. Maublanc, Fourier 
(Paris, 1937), vol. 2 , p. 32. [g4 J] 

Fourier's Bourse: "There is much more animation and intrigue at the Stock Ex- 
change of a Phalanx than there is at the stock exchanges of London and Amster- 
dam. For every individual must go to the Exchange to arrange his work and 
pleasure sessions for the following days. . . . Assuming that 1,200 individuals are 
present, and that each one has twenty sessions to arrange, this means that, in the 



meeting as a whole, there are 24,000 transactions to be concluded. Each of these 
transactions can involve twenty, forty, or a hundred individuals, who must be 
consulted and intrigued with or against. . . . Negotiations are carried on quietly, 
by means of signals. Each negotiator holds up the escutcheons of the groups or 
phalanxes which he represents, and by certain prearranged signs he indicates the 
approximate number of members he has recruited." Publication des manuscrits 



The term Bourse de travail < Labor Exchange) was coined by Fourier, or a Fouri- 



In 1816 there were seven listings on the Stock Exchange; in 1847, more than two 



de Fourier (Paris, 1851-1858), 4 vols., Year 1851, pp. 191-192. 



[g4,2] 



erist. 



[g4,3] 



hundred. 



[g4,4] 



In 1825, according to Marx,' the first crisis of modern industry — that is, the lirst 
crisis of capitalism. [g4,5] 



[Reproduction Technology, Lithography] 



"The social philosophy of the art of lithography at its heginnings . . . After the 
image makers of the Napoleonic legend, after the literary artists of Romanticism, 
came the chroniclers of the daily life of the French. The first group unwittingly 
paved the way for political upheavals, the second hastened the evolution of litera- 
ture, and the third contributed to the profound demarcation between the aristoc- 
racy and the people." Henri Bonehot, La Lithographie (Paris <1895>), pp. 112, 
114. [il,l] 

Pigal portrays the people; Monnier, the petty bourgeoisie; Lami, the aristocracy. 

[il,2] 

The important contribution of amateurs can be observed in the early days of 
lithography, exactly as it can later in photography. [il,3] 

"The contest between lithography and stipple-engraving accelerates from day to 
day, hut, since the end of 1817, the victory has belonged to lithography, thanks to 
the existence of caricature." Henri Bonehot, La Lithographie (Paris <1895>), 
p. 50. [il,4] 

Bouchot looks on lithographs produced before 1817 as the incunabula of lithog- 
raphy. From 1818 to 1825, lithographic production in France steadily expands. 
Political circumstances made this upsurge much more visible there than in other 
countries. Its decline, too, is in part conditioned by politics: it coincides with the 
rise of Napoleon III. "Tire fact is . . . that, of the illustrious number present under 
the reign of Louis Philippe, there remained, in the early years of Napoleon III, 
barely four or five exhausted, disoriented survivors." Henri Bouchot, La Lit/wg- 
raphie (Paris), p. 182. [il,5] 

Lithography toward the end of the Second Empire: "So many things worked 
against it! The newly revived etching, the nascent heliographic processes, and to 
some extent the burin. Materially, it foundered under the difficulties associated 
with printing — the encumbrance of those very heavy stones, which the editors 
refused to warehouse as before." Henri Bonehot, La Lithographie (Paris), p. 193. 

[il,6] 



Raffet undertook lithographic reportage in the Crimea. [il,7] 

1835-1845: "It should . . . not be forgotten that the large-scale commercial opera- 
tion which, at that time, was underway in wood engraving very quickly . . . led to 
mass-production techniques. A woodcutter would make only the heads or figures 
in a work, while another less skilled, or an apprentice, would make the accesso- 
ries, the backgrounds, and so on. Out of such a division of labor nothing unified 
could . . . emerge." Eduard Fuchs, Honore Daumier: Holzschnitte, 1833-1870 
(Munich <1918>), p. 16. [il,8] 

The first attempt at introducing lithography into France, undertaken by Sene- 
felder's associate Andre d'Offenbach, was a complete failure. "He had . . . moved 
to France solely with the intention of selling musical scores printed by means of 
lithography. The patent had been taken out in his name in 1802, and he had 
opened a shop, . . . little suspecting . . . what was in store for the discovery. ... As 
a matter of fact, it was not an auspicious moment for the minor arts of transcrip- 
tion. The master David expressed only the haughtiest disdain for engraving; at 
most, he had a few kind words for the copper-plate technique. Andre's enterprise 
was very soon in jeopardy." Henri Bouchot, ha Lithographie (Paris <1895>), 
pp. 28-29. [ila,l] 

On Dore's contributions to he Journal illustre andLe Journal pour tous: "These 
publications that sold for two sous — he Journal pour tous, he Journal illustre, he 
Tour du monde — where Dore gave of himself with stupefying prodigality and 
verve, served him, above all, as a laboratory for his researches. Indeed, in the 
grandes editions sold in bookshops, produced at high cost (for those days) hy 
Hachette or Gamier, the imagination, the fantasy, the energy of Gustave Dore 
were . . . , to a certain extent, disciplined and contained hy the requirements of a 
deluxe edition." Roger Devigne, "Gustave Dore, illustrateur dc journaux a deux 
sous et reporter du crayon," Arts et Metiers graphiques, 50 (December 15, 1935), 
p. 35. [ila,2] 

"The Paris worker in revolt appears, in hooks and in illustrations, as a veteran of 
the street wars, a seasoned revolutionary, going about half naked with a cartridge 
helt and saber crisscrossed over his shirt, with a headdress like an African chief- 
tain — a gold-hraided kepi or a plumed hat — penniless, worn out, magnanimous, 
blackened with powder and sweating from the sun, ostentatiously calling for water 
when he is offered a glass of wine, installing Viimself comfortably on the uphol- 
stered throne in the manner of the sans culottes of '93, eyeing his companions at 
the exit to the royal apartments, shooting any thieves. Take a look at drawings by 
Charlet and by Raffet; read the accounts, in the form of glorifications that were 
sold, a few days after a hattle, for the benefit of widows, orphans, and the 
wounded." Gustave Geffroy, h'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 51. [ila,3] 



Certain pamphlets hy Marx were lithographed. (According to Casson, Quarante- 
huit <Paris, 1939 >, p. 148.) [i2] 



[The Commune] 



"The history of the Paris Commune has hecome a touchstone of great importance 
for the question: How should the revolutionary working class organize its tactics 
and strategy in order to achieve ultimate victory? With the fall of the Commune, 
the last traditions of the old revolutionary legend have likewise fallen forever; no 
favorahle turn of circumstances, no heroic spirit, no martyrdom can take the 
place of the proletariat's clear insight into . . . the indispensable conditions of its 
emancipation. What holds for the revolutions that were carried out hy minorities, 
and in the interests of minorities, no longer holds for the proletarian revolu- 
tion. ... In the history of the Commune, the germs of this revolution were effec- 
tively stifled by the creeping plants that, growing out of the bourgeois revolution of 
the eighteenth century, overran the revolutionary workers' movement of the nine- 
teenth century. Missing in the Commune were the firm organization of the prole- 
tariat as a class and the fundamental clarity as to its world-historical mission; on 
these grounds alone it had to succumb." [F. Mehring,] "Zum Gedachtnis der Par- 
iser Kommune," Die neue Zeit, 14, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1896), pp. 739-740. [kl,l] 

"We will say hut two words about the lecture-presentations that have multiplied in 
recent years. . . . M. Ballande, who first thought of devoting Sunday afternoons to 
the inexpensive performance of masterpieces or the exhibition of certain monu- 
ments of art, preceded hy a historical and literary explication of the work, had hit 
upon a happy and rewarding idea. . . . But success breeds imitation, and it is rare 
that the imitations do not bring out the trouhlesome aspects of the things they 
copy. This is indeed what happened. Daily presentations were organized at the 
Chatclet and the Ambigu. In these performances, questions of artistry were rele- 
gated to a position of secondary importance; politics predominated. Someone 
fetched up Agnes de Meranie; another exhumed Calas and Charles IX, ou L 'EcoJe 
des rois. [ . . . From here, things could only go downhill; the most benign of works, 
by a strange inflection of the political madness, provided material . . . for the most 
heterogeneous declamations on the affairs of the day. Moliere and Louis XIV 
would certainly have heen surprised, at times, by the attacks . . . for which they 



served as pretexts. This type of 'theatrical' presentation completely deliecl all 
control." — "When revolutions break out, one often hears admissions that can be 
highly instructive. Here is what was said in Le Mot d'ordre of May 17, 1871, on the 
subject of the citizenship cards: 2 'The overly assiduous reading of Le Chevalier de 
Maison-Rouge and other novels hy Alexandre Dumas certainly inspired the mem- 
bers of the Commune to come up with this decree. We regret having to inform them 
that history is not made hy reading novels.'" Victor Hallays-Dahot, La Censure 
drmmatique et le thei.tr e, 1850-1870 <Paris, 1871>, pp. 68-69, 55. [Le Mot 
d'ordre is presumably an organ of Rochefort. ] [kl ,2] 

The Commune felt itself to be, in all respects, the heir of 1793. [kl ,3] 

The passage in Hallays-Dabot, p. 55 <cited in kl,2>, is very important for the 
connection between colportage and revolution. [kl ,4] 

"At several intersections, our path opened out unexpectedly into vast arched 
domes. . . . Surely, each of these clandestine colosseums would provide a useful 
stronghold for the concentration of forces in certain eventualities, just as the 
infinity of subterranean networks, with its thousand galleries running under every 
corner of the capital, provides a ready-made sap from which to attack the city 
from helow. . . . The lightning bolt that annihilated the Empire did not leave it 
time to act on this conception. It is harder to figure out why the leaders of the 
Commune, ... so resolute in everything, did not make use of this formidable 
means of destruction when faced with the appearance of troops." Nadar, Quand 
j'etais photographe (Paris <1900>), p. 121 ("Paris souterrain") . Refers to the 
"Letter from N — (Paris) to Louis Blanc (Versailles), May 1871," which voices just 
such an expectation. [kla,l] 

"If Rimbaud is in fact admirable, it is not for having fallen silent but for having 
spoken. If he fell silent, it was douhtless for lack of a true audience. It was hecause 
the society in which he lived could not offer him this audience. One ought to keep 
in mind the very simple fact that Arthur Rimhaud came to Paris in 1871, quite 
naturally, to join the army of the Commune. ... In the barracks of the Chateau- 
d'Eau, the young Rimhaud did not yet question the utility of writing and singing 
about the hands of the Wench, of the Jeanne-Marie of the fauhourgs, who is not 
the plaster Marianne of the town halls: 

They are the hands not of a cousin 
But of working women witli large foreheads 
Burned, in woods stinking of a factory, 
By a sun drunk on tar. 

They have paled, marvelous, 
Under the great sun full of love, 
O n t li e hro nze of m ac lii lie gu ns , 
Throughout insurgent Paris!' 1 



Then, in the Assemblies of the Commune . . . , side by side with the workers of 
Paris . . . , with the warriors of socialism, one could see the poet of the Interna- 
tional, Potier ; the author of L 'Insurge, Jules Valles; the painter of L ' Enterrement 
a Ornans, Courbet; and the brilliant researcher into the physiology of the cerebel- 
lum, the great Flourens." <Louis> Aragon, "D'Alfred de Vigny a Avdeenko," 
Commune, 2 (April 20, 1935), pp. 810, 815. [kla,2] 

"The Commune, which accorded seats only to those elected from the workers' 
districts, was formed of a coalition of revolutionaries without a common program. 
Of the seventy-eight members, only a score were intent on projects of social re- 
form; the majority were Jacobin democrats in the tradition of 1793 (Delescluze)." 
A. Malet, P. Grillet, XIX" Siecle (Paris, 1919), pp. 481-482. [kla,3] 

Within the Commune emerged the project of a Monument to the Accursed, which 
was supposed to be raised in the corner of a public square whose center would be 
occupied by a war memorial. All the official personalities of the Second Empire 
(according to the draft of the project) were to be listed on it. Even Haussmann's 
name is there. In this way, an "infernal history" of the regime was to be launched, 
although the intention was to go back to Napoleon I, "the villain of Brumaire — the 
chief of this accursed race of crowned bohemians vomited forth to us by Corsica, 
this fatal line of bastards so degenerated they would be lost in their own native 
land." The project, in the form of a printed placard, is dated April 15, 1871. 
(Exhibition entitled "La Commune de Paris," Municipal Offices of Saint-Denis.) 

[k2,l] 

"There are your fruits, bloodthirsty Commune; / Yes, . . . you wanted to annihi- 
late Paris." The last line is the refrain of a poem, "Les Ruines de Paris," printed as 
a pamphlet (Exhibition by the Municipality of Saint-Denis). [k-2,2] 

A lithograph by Marcier, Le Depart de la Commune, published by Deforet et 
Cesar Editeurs, shows a woman (?) riding an animal that is half-nag and half- 
hyena, wrapped in a giant shroud, and brandishing the tattered, dirty red llag, 
while leaving behind her a murky alley filled with the smoke and llames of burning 
houses. (Exhibition, Municipality of Saint-Denis.) [k2,3] 

After the taking of Paris, L'lllustration published a drawing entitled Chasse a 
Vhomme dans les catacombes < Manhunt in the Catacombs). In fact, the cata- 
combs were searched one day for fugitives. Those found were shot. The troops 
entered at the Place Denfert-Rochereau, while the outlets of the catacombs toward 
the plain of Montsouris were guarded. (Exhibition.) [k2,4] 

A Communard pamphlet publishes a drawing captioned Les Cadavres decouverts 
dans les souterrains de VEglise Saint-Laurent <The Cadavers Discovered in the 
Vaults of the Church of Saint-Laurent). It was claimed that female corpses had 



been discovered at this underground site — bodies which could not have been there 
longer than a couple of years, and whose thighs were forced open and hands 
bound. (Exhibition.) [k.2,5] 



Leaflet; lithograph, She. The republic as a beautiful woman wrapped around by a 
snake, whose features are those of Thiers. The woman has a mirror high over her 
head. Beneath, a verse: "Many the ways you can take her — / She is for rent, but 
not for sale." [k2,6] 

The illusions that still underlay the Commune are given striking expression in 
Proudhon's formula, his appeal to the bourgeoisie: "Save the people and save 
yourselves — as your fathers did — by the Revolution." Max Raphael, Proudhon, 
Marx, Picasso (Paris <1933>), p. 1 18. [k2a,l] 

Remember the words of Chevalier: "Glory to us! We have entered into the 
treasury of kings, escorted by poverty and hunger; we have walked amid the 
purple, gold, and diamonds; when we came out, our companions were hunger 
and poverty." "Religion Saint-Simonienne: La Marseillaise" (Excerpt from L'Or- 
ganisateur of September 11, 1830) [author Michel Chevalier, according to the 
Catalogue de la Bibliotheque Nationale], p. 2. [k2a,2] 

One of the Commune's last centers of resistance: the Place de la Bastille. [k2a,3] 

Charles Louandre, Les Ide'es subversives de notre temps (Paris, 1872), is a charac- 
teristic example of the reactionary pamphlets that followed in the wake of the 
Commune. [k2a,4] 

A caricature of Courbet: the painter standing on a broken column. Beneath, the 
caption: "Actuality." Cabinet des Estampes, kc 164 a 1. 1 [k2a,5] 

"Louise Michel, recounting, in her memoirs, a conversation she had with Gustave 
Courbet, shows us the great Communard painter enraptured on the topic of the 
future, losing himself in visions which, though they are redolent of their own 
nineteenth century, are despite this — or perhaps because of it — marked by a won- 
drous and touching grandeur. 'Since everyone will be able to give himself over, 
unfettered, to his own special genins,' prophesied Courbet, 'Paris will double in 
importance. And Europe's international city will be able to offer to the arts, to 
industry, to commerce, to transactions of all kinds, and to visitors from all lands 
an imperishable order: the citizen-created order, which cannot be disrupted by 
the pretexts of monstrous pretenders. ' It is a dream ingenuous as the world exhibi- 
tions, but one which nonetheless implies profound realities — above all, the certi- 
tude that a unanimous order will be founded, 'the citizen-created order.'" Jean 
Cassou, "La Semaine sanglante," Vendredi, May 22, 1936. [k2a,6] 



ACTUAL1TE 




;:;>^::^: : ::L[',y.^; 



Adualite (Actuality), a caricature of the painter Gustave Courbet. 
Courtesy of the Bibliotheque Nationale de France. See k2a,5. 

In France's First Empire, and especially its Second, Engels sees states that could 
appear as a court of mediation hetween an equally strong bourgeoisie and prole- 
tariat. See G. Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 2 (Berlin <1933>), p. 441. [k2a,7] 

The desperate struggle of the Commune: "Delescluze then issued his famous proc- 
lamation: 'Enough of this militarism! No more of these officers dripping gold hraid 
and emhroidery! Make way for the people, for hare-armed lighters! The hour of 
revolution has struck. . . . ' An impatient enthusiasm awakes in all hearts, and one 
will go off to get oneself killed, as the Polish strategists intend/' Each man will 
return to his neighborhood, his native turf, to the streetcorner where it is good to 
live and bravely die — the traditional barricade! This proclamation is the last cry 
of Blanquism, the supreme leap of the nineteenth century. One still wants to be- 
lieve. To believe in the mystery, the miracle, the f euilleton, the magic power of the 



epic. One has not yet understood that the other class has organized itself scien- 
tifically, has entrusted itself to implacable armies. Its leaders have long since ac- 
quired a clear vision of the situation. Not for nothing had Haussmann built broad, 
perfectly straight avenues to break up the swarming, tortuous neighborhoods, the 
breeding grounds for mystery and for the f euilleton, the secret gardens of popular 
conspiracy." Jean Cassou, "La Semaine sanglante," Venclrecli, May 22, 1936. 

[k3,l] 

Engels and the Commune: "As long as the central committee of the Garde Nation- 
ale was directing the military operations, he remained hopeful. 1 1 was doubtless he 
who gave the advice which Marx transmitted to Paris: 'to fortify the northern 
slopes of Montmartre, the Prussian side.' He feared that, otherwise, the uprising 
'would land in a mousetrap.' But the Commune failed to heed tliis warning and, as 
Engels regretfully confirmed, let the right moment for the offensive slip past. . . . 
Initially, Engels believed that the struggle would drag on. ... In the General 
Council, he emphasized . . . that the Parisian workers were better organized mili- 
tarily than in any earlier rebellion; that the street widening undertaken during the 
administration of Napoleon 01 would necessarily work to their advantage, should 
the assault on the city succeed; that for the first time, the harricades would be 
defended by cannons and regularly organized troops." Gustav Mayer, Friedrich 
Engels, vol. 2, Engels unci der Aufstieg cler Arbeiterbewegung in Euro pa (Berlin 
<1933>), p. 227." [k3,2] 

In 1884, Engels "admitted to Bernstein that Marx 'had upgraded the unconscious 
tendencies of the Commune into more or less conscious projects,' and he added 
that this improvement had been 'justified, even necessary, in the circumstances.' 
. . . The majority of the participants in the uprising had heen Blanquists — that is 
to say, nationalistic revolutionaries who placed their hopes on immediate political 
action and the authoritarian dictatorship of a few resolute individuals. Only a 
minority had belonged to the <First> International, which at that time was still 
dominated by the spirit of Proudhon, and they could therefore not he descrihcd as 
social revolutionaries, let alone Marxists. That did not prevent the governments 
and the bourgeoisie throughout Europe from regarding this insurrection ... as a 
conspiracy hatched by the General Council of the International." Gustav Mayer, 
Friedrich Engels, vol. 2, Engels und der Aufstieg der Arbeiterbewegung in 
Euro pa (Berlin), p . 228. 7 [k3a,l] 

The first communio: the city. "The German emperors — Frederick I and Frederick 
II, for instance — issued edicts against these communiones [communities], conspi- 
rations, . . . quite in the spirit of the German Federal Diet. ... It is quite amusing 
that the word communio was used as a term of ahuse, just as 'communism' is 
today. The parson Guibert of Nogent writes, for instance: 'Communio is a new and 
extremely had word.' There is frequently something rather dramatic about the 
way in which thephilistines of the twelfth century invite the peasants to flee to the 
cities, to the communio jurata < sworn communes)." Marx to Engels, July 27, 



A barricade of the Paris Commune, Rue Basfroi (ll e arrondissement), March 18, 1871. Photogra- 
pher unknown. See k.4,5. 



1854, from London [Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Ausgewiihlte Briefe, ed. 
V. Adoratski (Moscow and Leningrad, 1934), pp. 60-61]." [k3a,2] 

Ibsen saw further than many of the leaders of the Commune in France. On 
December 20, 1870, he writes to Brandes: "Up till now, we have been living on 
nothing but crumbs from the revolutionary table of last century, and I think we 
have been chewing on that stuff long enough. . . . Liberty, equality, and fraternity 
are no longer what they were in the days of the late-lamented guillotine. This is 
what the politicians will not understand; and that is why I hate them." Henrik 
Ibsen, Samtliche Werke, vol. 10 <Berlin, 1905>, p. 156. 9 [k3a,3] 

It was the Proudhonist Beslay who, as delegate of the Commune, allowed himself 
to be persuaded on March 30, by de Ploeuc, deputy governor of the Banque de 
France, to leave untouched, in the interests of France, the two billion francs — 
"the true hostages." With the support of the Proudhonists on the council, his view 
prevailed. [k4,l] 

Blanqui, in La Patrie en danger, the newspaper he published during the siege :'" 
"It is Berlin that supposedly will be the holy city of the future, the radiance that 
enlightens the world. Paris is the usurping and corrupted Bahylon, the great pros- 
titute which God's emissary, the exterminating angel, with Bible in hand, will wipe 
from the face of the earth. You mean you don't know that the Lord has marked the 



German race with the seal of predestination? . . . Let us defend ourselves. It is the 
ferocity of Odin, magnified by the ferocity of Moloch, that advances against our 
cities; it is the barbarity of the Vandal and the barharity of the Semite." Cited in 
Gustave Geffroy, L 'Enferme (Paris, 1897), p. 304. [k4,2] 

Georges Laronze in his Histoire de la Commune de 1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 143, on 
the shooting of the hostages: "hy the time the hostages fell, the Commune had lost 
power. But it remained accountable." 11 [k4,3] 

The Parisian administration during the Commune: "It preserved intact the entire 
organism, animated, as it was, by a keen desire to set its slightest cogwheels rolling 
again and to augment further — in good hourgeois fashion — the number of middle- 
class functionaries." Georges Laronze, Histoire de la Commune de 1871 (Paris, 
1928), p. 450. [k4,4] 

Military formations in the Commune: "A company little inclined to go beyond the 
city's ramparts, preferring, to combat in open country, the hattle atmosphere of 
its own quartiei; the fever of public meetings, the clubs, the police operations, 
and, if necessary, death behind the heaped-up paving stones of a Paris street." 
Georges Laronze, Histoire de la Commune de 1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 532. [k4,5] 

Courbet took sides with several other Commnnards against Protot, to protect 
Thiers 's collections from destruction. 12 [k4,6] 

The members of the International got themselves elected, on the advice of Varlin, 
to the Central Committee of the Garde Nationale. [k4,7] 



"This orgy of power, wine, women, and blood known as the Commune." Charles 
Louandrc, Les Idees subversives de notre temps (Paris, 1872), p. 92. [k4,8] 



I 



[The Seine, the Oldest Paris] 



Around 1830: "The quartier was full of those gardens which Hugo has described in 
<his poem of 1839> 'Ce qui se passait aux Feuillantines.' The Luxembourg, rather 
more grand than it is today, was bordered directly by houses; the proprietors each 
had a key to the garden and could walk up and down there all night long." Duhech 
and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 367. [H>1] 

"Ramhuteau had two rows of trees planted" — on the Boulevards Saint-Denis and 
Bonne-Nouvelle — "to replace those old and beautiful trees which had gone into 
the barricades of 1830." Dubech and d'Espezel, Hist oire de Paris, p. 382. [11 ,2] 

"Housewives go to draw their water from the Seine; the more distant neighbor- 
hoods are supplied by water carriers." Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, 
pp. 388-389 (section on the July Monarchy). [11,3] 

Before Haussmann: "Prior to his day, the old aqueducts were capable of bringing 
water only as high as the second story." Duhech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris, 
p. 418. [11,4] 

"Anglomania . . . has had an influence on ideas since the Revolution, on fashions 
since Waterloo. Just as the Constituents copied England's political institutions, 
the architects copied the parks and squares of London." Duhech and d'Espezel, 
p. 404, [11,5] 

"The route of the Seine, as attested in Strabo, began to be used and appreciated. 
Lutetia became the center of an association of navigators or mariners, who, during 
the reign of Tiberius , raised to the emperor and to Jupiter the famous altar that 
was discovered under Notre Dame in 1711." Dubech and d'Espezel, p. 18. [11,6] 



"The winter here is not severe. You can see vineyards and even fig trees, since care 
is taken to cover them with straw." Julian in the Misopogon; cited in Duhech and 
d'Espezel, p. 25. [11,7] 



"The Seine seems to exhale the air of Paris all the way to its mouth." Friedrich 
Engels, "Von Paris nach Bern," Die neue Zeit, 17, no. 1 (Stuttgart, 1899), p. II. 

[11,8] 

"If reading in the public gardens is now permitted, smoking there is not — liberty 
(as people are beginning to say) not heing the same as license." Nadar, Quand 
j'etais photographe (Paris <1900>), p. 284 ("1830 et environs"). [11,9] 

"Not long ago we witnessed the erection of the obelisk brought hack from Luxor hy 
the prince de Joinville. 1 We were made a bit nervous by noises that must not have 
heen reassuring to the engineer Lebas, supervisor of the operation: the English, 
always so jealous, . . . were supposed to have paid a traitor to cut the insides of the 
cables. Oh, those English!" Nadar, Quand j'etais photographe (Paris), p. 291 
("1830 et environs"). [11,10] 

Liberty trees — poplars [peupliers] — were planted in Paris in 1848. Thiers: ''''Peo- 
ple, you will grow tall." They were cut down in 1850 by order of the prefect of 
police, Carlier. [U>11] 

After the July Revolution: "The endless number of felled trees on the road to 
Neuilly, on the Champs-Elysees, on the boulevards. Not a single tree has been left 
standing on the Boulevard des Italiens." Friedrich von Raumer, Briefe aus Paris 
wild Frankreich im Jahre 1830 (Leipzig, 1831), vol. 2, pp. 146—147. [11,12] 

"One sees gardens measuring only a few square feet, which offer nonetheless a bit 
of greenery in which to read a book; here and there, even a bird is chirping. — But 
the Place Saint-Georges is an altogether charming spot. Rustic and urban tastes 
are blended here. It is surrounded by buildings that look toward the city on one 
side and toward the country on the other." Add to this fountains, terraces, green- 
houses, flower heds. L. Rellstah, Paris im Friihjahr 1843: Briefe, Berichte and 
Schilderu.ngen (Leipzig, 1844), vol. 1, pp. 55-56. [lla,l] 

"Paris is between two layers, a layer of water and a layer of air. The layer of water, 
lying at a considerable depth underground, ... is furnished by the hed of green 
sandstone lying hetween the chalk and the Jurassic limestone. This bed can be 
represented hy a disk with a radius of seventy miles. A multitude of rivers and 
hrooks filter into it: we drink the Seine, the Marne, the Yonne, the Oise, the Aisne, 
the Cher, the Vienne, and the Loire in a single glass of water from the well of 
Crenelle. The layer of water is salubrious; it comes first from heaven, then from 
the earth. The layer of air is unwholesome, it comes from the sewers." Victor 
Hugo, Oeuvres completes, novels, vol. 9 (Paris, 1881), p. 182 (Les Miserables). 2 

[lla,2] 



At the heginning of the nineteenth century, there were still trains de bois (timher 
rafts'.'') going down the Seine; and Ch. F. Viel finds fault, in his work De I'Impuis- 



sance des mathematiques pour assurer la solidite des batiments, with the piers of 
the Pont clu Louvre, on which such rafts are clashed to pieces. [Ha, 3] 



On the "nets of Saint-Cloud" we have the testimony of Mercier {Tableau de Paris 
[Amsterdam, 1782], vol. 3, p. 197), among others: "The hodies of those unfortu- 
nates who have drowned are pulled up (except when the river is iced over) hy the 
nets of Saint-Cloud." There are many, such as Dulaure, who speak of these nets; 
others, like Gozlan and Touchard-Lafosse, deny they ever existed. The archives of 
the Seine make no mention of them. Tradition maintains that they stopped being 
used in 1810. This according to Firmin Maillard, Recherches historiques et cri- 
tiques sur la Morgue (Paris, 1860). The last chapter of this hook (p. 137): "Les 
Filets de Saint-Cloud." [lla,4] 

On "an underground river in Paris," which was, in large part, covered over at the 
beginning of the seventeenth century: "The stream thus . . . descended gradually 
along the slope, all the way to the house which, as early as the fifteenth century, 
had two salmon on its signhoard, and which would he replaced hy the Passage du 
Saumon. There, having swelled with the added flow of water coming from Les 
Halles, it plunged underground at the site where the Rue Mandar begins today, 
and where the entrance of the great sewer, which had long stood open, gave way 
. . . , after Thermidor . . . , to busts of Marat and Saint-Fargeau. . . . The stream 
disappeared ... in the currents of the Seine, well helow the city. ... It was quite 
enough that this filthy stream created a stench in the districts it crossed, which 
happened to he among the most populous in Paris. . . . When the Plagne broke out 
here, its first manifestations were in those streets which the stream, hy its in- 
fectious contiguity, had already made a center of disease." Edouard Fournier, 
Enigmes des rues de Paris (Paris, 1860), pp. 18-19, 21-22 ("Une Riviere souter- 



"We recall the divine lamp with the silver hurner, shining 'white like an electric 
light,' as it passes, in Les Chants de Maldoror, slowly down the Seine through 
Paris. Later, at the other extreme of the Cycle, in Fantimas, the Seine will also 
come to know, near the Quai de Javel, "inexplicable flashes of light in its depths." 
Roger Caillois, "Paris, mythe moderne," Nouvelle Revue francaise, 25, no. 284 



"The quays of the Seine likewise owe their realization toHaussmann. It was only 
in his day that the walkways were constructed up above and the trees planted 
down helow, along the banks; and these are what serve to articulate the form of 
that great thoroughfare, with its avenues and boulevards, that is the river." Fritz 



rain dans Paris"). 



[12,1] 



(May 1,1937), p. 687. 



[12,2] 



Stahl, Paris (Berlin <1929>), p. 177. 



[12,3] 



"If Lutetia was not yet in direct communication with the great cities of northern 
lands, it was nevertheless on the commercial route that ran overland beside the 
river. ... It was the great Roman way along the Right Bank which became the Rue 



Saint-Martin. At the crossroads of Chateau-Landon, a second route branched off, 
that of Senlis. A third, the Melun road, a pathway cut through a thick marsh near 
the Bastille, came into existence perhaps, at the height of the empire . . . ; this 
would become the Rue Saint-Antoine." Dubech and d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris 



"Turning off from the boulevards, let us go down the Rue de Rougemont. You will 
notice that the Comptoir d'Escompte < Discount Banlo occupies the bottom of a 
marked depression: you are in the earliest bed of the Seine." Dubech and 



"The bourgeois center, Paris Ville, sharply distinguished from Paris Cite, grew up 
on the Right Bank and on the bridges which, at that time, were erected every- 
where. The most influential segment of the population consisted of the merchants; 
here again, the hanse <merchants' guild) did its part to steer business to the water. 
The most important marketplace arose on a spot near the Church of Saint- 
Eustache, where the street by which ocean fish arrived crossed the street on which 
the marsh farmers of the region brought their vegetables to town. It Ls the same 
spot on which, today, the central market halls stand." Fritz Stahl, Paris (Berlin 



(Paris, 1926), p. 19. 



[12,4] 



d'Espezel, Histoire de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 14. 



[I2a,l] 



<1929>), p. 67. 



[I2a,2] 



[Idleness] 



Noteworthy conjunction: in ancient Greece, practical labor is branded and pro- 
scribed. Although essentially left in the hands of slaves, it is condemned not least 
because it betrays a base aspiration for earthly goods (riches). This view after- 
ward plays a part in the denigration of the tradesman as the servant of Mammon: 
"Plato, in the Laws (VIII, 846), decrees that no citizen shall engage in a mechani- 
cal trade; the word banausos, signifying 'artisan,' becomes synonymous with 'con- 
temptible' . . . ; everything relating to tradespeople or to handwork carries a 
stigma, and deforms the soul together with the body. In general, those who 
practice these professions ... are busy satisfying . . . this 'passion for wealth . . . 
which leaves none of us an hour's leisure." Aristotle, for his part, opposes the 
excess of the chrematistic to . . . the prudence of domestic economy. ... In this 
way, the scorn felt for the artisan is extended to the merchant: in comparison to 
the liberal life, as absorbed in studious leisure (schole, otium), the affairs of trade 
(neg-otium, ascholia), 'business affairs,' have mostly a negative value." Pierre- 
Maxime Schuhl, Machinume et philosophic (Paris, 1938), pp. 11-12. [ml,l] 

Whoever enjoys leisure escapes Fortuna; whoever embraces idleness falls under 
her power. The Fortuna awaiting a person in idleness, however, is a lesser god- 
dess than the one that the person of leisure has fled. This Fortuna is no longer at 
home in the vita activa; her headquarters is the world at large. 2 "The artists of the 
Middle Ages depict those men who pursue an active life as bound to the wheel of 
fortune, ascending or descending according to the direction in which it turns, 
while the contemplative man remains inunobile at the center." P.-M. Schuhl, 
Machinisme et philosophic (Paris, 1938), p. 30. [ml ,2] 

Re the characterization of leisure. Sainte-Beuve, in his essay on Joubert: "'To 
converse and to seek to know — it was in this above all that, according to Plato, the 
happiness of private life consisted.' This class of connoisseurs and amateurs . . . 
has practically disappeared in France, now that everyone here has a trade." Cor- 
respondance de Joubert (Paris, 1924), p. xcix. [ml, 3] 

In bourgeois society, indolence — to take up Marx's word — has ceased to be 
"heroic." (Marx speaks of the "victory ... of industry over a heroic indolence." 



Bilani derpreussuchen Revolution, in Gesammelte Schriften von Karl Marx und Fried- 
rich Engeh, vol. 3 [Stuttgart, 1902], p. 2 ll.) 3 [mla,l] 



In the figure of the dandy, Baudelaire seeks to find some use for idleness, just as 
leisure once had a use. The vita contemplativa is replaced by something that could 
be called the vita contemptiva. (Compare part 3 of my manuscript <"Das Paris des 
Second Empire bei Baudelaire">.) [mla,2] 

Experience is the outcome of work; immediate experience is the phantasmagoria 
of the idler.' 1 [mla,3] 

In place of the force field that is lost to humanity with the devaluation of experi- 
ence, a new field of force opens up in the form of planning. The mass of un- 
known uniformities is mobilized against the confirmed multiplicity of the 
traditional. To "plan" is henceforth possible only on a large scale. No longer on 
an individual scale — and this means neither for the individual nor by the individ- 
ual. Valery therefore says, with reason: "The long-hatched enterprises, the pro- 
found designs of a Machiavelli or a Richelieu, would today have the reliability 
and value of a good tip on the Stock Exchange." Paul Valery, Oeuvres completes, 
J <(Paris, 1938), p. 30>. [mla,4] 

The intentional correlate of "immediate experience" has not always remained the 
same. In the nineteenth century, it was "adventure." In our day, it appears as 
"fate," Schicksal. In fate is concealed the concept of the "total experience" that is 
fatal from the outset. War is its unsurpassed prefiguration. ("I am born German; 
it is for this I die" — the trauma of birth already contains the shock that is mortal. 
This coincidence <Koinzidenz> defines "fate.") [mla,5] 

Would it be empathy with exchange value that first qualifies the human being for 
a "total experience"? [mla,6] 

With the trace <Spur>, a new dimension accrues to "immediate experience." It is 
no longer tied to the expectation of "adventure"; the one who undergoes an 
experience can follow the trace that leads there. Whoever follows traces must not 
only pay attention; above all, he must have given heed already to a great many 
things. (The hunter must know about the hoof of the animal whose trail he is on; 
he must know the hour when that animal goes to drink; he must know the course 
of the river to which it turns, and the location of the ford by which he himself can 
get across.) In this way there comes into play the peculiar configuration by dint of 
which long experience appears translated into the language of immediate experi- 
ence. 3 Experiences can, in fact, prove invaluable to one who follows a trace — but 
experiences of a particular sort. The hunt is the one type of work in which they 
function intrinsically. And the hunt is, as work, very primitive. The experiences 
<Erfahrungen> of one who attends to a trace result only very remotely from any 
work activity, or are cut off from such a procedure altogether. (Not for nothing do 
we speak of "fortune hunting.") They have no sequence and no system. They are 



a product of chance, and have about them the essential interminability that 
distinguishes the preferred obligations of the idler. The fundamentally unBirish- 
able collection of things worth knowing, whose utility depends on chance, has its 
prototype in study. [m2,l] 

Idleness has little about it that is representative, though it is far more widely 
exhibited than leisure. The man of the middle class has begun to be ashamed of 
labor. He to whom leisure no longer means anything in itself is happy to put his 
idleness on display. [m2,2] 

The intimate association between the concept of idleness and the concept of 
study was embodied in the notion of studio. Especially for the bachelor, the studio 
became a sort of pendant to the boudoir. [m2,3] 

Student and hunter. The text is a forest in which the reader is hunter. Rustling in 
the underbrush — the idea, skittish prey, the citation — another piece "in the bag." 
(Not every reader encounters the idea.) [m2a,l] 

There are two social institutions of which idleness forms an integral part: the 
news service and nightlife. They require a specific form of work-preparedness. 
This specific form is idleness. [m2a,2] 

News service and idleness. Feuilletonist, reporter, photographer constitute a gra- 
dation in which waiting around, the "Get ready" succeeded by the "Shoot," 
becomes ever more important vis-a-vis other activities. [m2a,3] 

What distinguishes long experience from immediate experience is that the for- 
mer is inseparable from the representation of a continuity, a sequence. The 
accent that falls on immediate experience will be the more weighty in proportion 
as its substrate is remote from the work of the one having the experience — from 
the work distinguished by the fact that it draws on long experience precisely 
where, for an outsider, it is at most an immediate experience that arises. [m2a,4] 

In feudal society, leisure — freedom from labor — was a recognized privilege. In 
bourgeois society, it is no longer so. What distinguishes leisure, as feudalism 
understands it, is that it communicates with two socially important types of 
behavior. Religious contemplation and court life represented, as it were, the 
matrices through which the leisure of the grand seigneur, of the prelate, of the 
warrior could be molded. These attitudes — that of piety no less than that of 
representation — were advantageous to the poet. His work in turn benefited 
them, at least indirectly, insofar as it maintained contact with both the religion 
and the life at court. (Vbltaire was the first of the great literati to break with the 
church; so much the less did he disdain to secure a place at the court of Frederick 
the Great.) In feudal society, the leisure of the poet is a recognized privilege. It is 
only in bourgeois society that the poet becomes an idler. [m2a,5] 



Idleness seeks to avoid any sort of tie to the idler's line of work, and ultimately to 
the labor process in general. That distinguishes it from leisure. [m3,l] 



"All religious, metaphysical, historical ideas are, in the last analysis, merely 
preparations derived from the great experiences of the past — representations of 
the experience." Wilhelm Dilthey, Das Erlebnis unci die Dichtung (Leipzig and 
Berlin, 1929), p. 198. [m3,2] 

Closely connected with the shattering of long experience is the shattering of 
juridical certitudes. "In the liberalist period, economic predominance was gener- 
ally associated with legal ownership of the means of production. . . . But after the 
development of technology in the last century had led to a rapidly increasing 
concentration ... of capital, the legal owners were largely excluded from . . . 
management. . . . Once the legal owners are cut off from the real productive 
process . . . , their horizon narrows; . . . and finally the share which they still have 
in industry due to ownership . . . comes to seem socially useless. . . . The idea of 
a right with a fixed content, and independent of society at large, loses its impor- 
tance." We finally arrive at "the loss of all rights with a determined content, a loss 
. . . given its fullest form in the authoritarian state." Max Horkheimer, "Tradi- 
tionelle mid Kritische Theorie," ^eitsckrift jur Sozialforschung, no. 2 (1937), 
pp. 285-287. Compare Horkheimer, "Bemerkungen zur philosophischen An- 
thropologic," £eitschrift fur Sozialforschung, no. 1 (1935), p. 12. 6 [m3,3] 

"The authentic field of operations for the vivid chronicle of what is happening is 
the documentary account of immediate experience, reportage. It is directly aimed 
at the event, and it holds fast to the experience. This presupposes that the event 
also becomes an immediate experience for the journalist reporting on it. . . . The 
capacity for having an experience is therefore a precondition ... of good . . . 
professional work." <Emil> Dovifat, "Formen und Wirkungsgesetze des Stils in 
der Zeitung," Deutsche Presse, July 22, 1939 (Berlin), p. 285. [m3,4] 

Apropos of the idler: the archaic image of ships in Baudelaire. [m3,5] 

The stringent work ethic and moral doctrine of Calvinism, it may be said, is most 
intimately related to the development of the vita contemplative.. It sought to build 
a dam to stem the melting of time into idleness, once such time was frozen in 
contemplation. [m3a,l] 

On the feuilleton. It was a matter of injecting experience — as it were, intrave- 
nously — with the poison of sensation; that is to say, highlighting within ordinary 
experience the character of immediate experience. 7 To this end, the experience of 
the big-city dweller presented itself. The feuilletonist turns this to account. He 
renders the city strange to its inhabitants, hie is thus one of the first technicians 
called up by the heightened need for immediate experiences. (The same need is 



evinced in the theory of "modern beauty" expounded by Poe, Baudelaire, and 
Berlioz. In this type of beauty, surprise is a ruling element.) [m3a,2] 



The process of the atrophy of experience is already underway within manufac- 
turing. In other words, it coincides, in its beginnings, with the beginnings of 
commodity production. (Compare Marx, Z)«u Kapitcd <vol. 1>, ed. Korsch <Ber- 
lin, 1932>, p. 336.) 8 ' [m3a,3] 



Phantasmagoria is the intentional correlate of immediate experience. [m3a,4] 

Just as the industrial labor process separates off from handicraft, so the form of 
communication corresponding to this labor process — information — separates off 
from the form of communication corresponding to the artisanal process of labor, 
which is storytelling. (See < Walter Benjamin,) "Der Erzahler," <Orient und Occi- 
dent, new series, no. 3 (October 1936)> p. 21, par. 3 through p. 22, par. 1, line 3; 
p. 22, par. 3, line 1 through the end of the Valery citation.) 3 This connection must 
be kept in mind if one is to form an idea of the explosive force contained within 
information. This force is liberated in sensation. With the sensation, whatever 
still resembles wisdom, oral tradition, or the epic side of truth is razed to the 
ground. [m3a,5] 

For the relations which the idler loves to enter into with the demimonde, "study" 
is an alibi. It may be asserted of the bohhne, in particular, that throughout its 
existence it studies its own milieu. [m3a,6] 



Idleness can be considered an early form of distraction or amusement. It consists 
in the readiness to savor, on one's own, an arbitrary succession of sensations. But 
as soon as the production process began to draw large masses of people into the 
field, those who "had the rime" came to feel a need to distinguish themselves en 
masse from laborers. It was to this need that the entertainment industry an- 
swered; and it immediately encountered specific problems of its own. Before very 
long, Saint-Marc Girardin was forced to conclude that "man is amusable only a 
small part of the time." (The idler does not tire as quickly as the man who amuses 
himself.) [m4,l] 



The tiue "salaried flaneur" (Henri Beraud's term) is the sandwich man. [m4,2] 



The idler's imitatio dei: as flaneur, he is omnipresent; as gambler, he is omnipo- 
tent; and as student, he is omniscient. This type of idler was first incarnated 
among the jeunesse doree. w [m4,3] 

"Empathy" comes into being through a declic, a kind of gearing action. With it, 
the inner life derives a pendant to the element of shock in sense perception. 
(Empathy is a synchronization, 11 in the intimate sense.) [m4,4] 



Habits are the armature of connected experiences. This armature is assailed by 
individual experiences. [m4,5] 



God has the Creation behind him; he rests from it. It is this God of the seventh 
day that the bourgeois has taken as the model for his idleness. In flanerie, he has 
the omnipresence of God; in gambling, the omnipotence; and in study, it is God's 
omniscience that is his. — This trinity is at the origin of the satanism in Baude- 
laire. — The idler's resemblance to God indicates that the old Protestant saying, 
"Work is the burgher's ornament," has begun to lose its validity. [m4,6] 

The world exhibitions were training schools in which the masses, barred from 
consuming, learned empathy with exchange value. "Look at everything; touch 
nothing." [m4,7] 

The classic description of idleness in Rousseau. This passage indicates, at one 
and the same time, that the existence of the idler has something godlike about it, 
and that solitude is a condition essential to the idler. In the last book of Les 
Confessions, we read that "the age for romantic plans was past. I had found the 
incense of vainglory stupefying rather than flattering. So the last hope I had left 
was to live . . . eternally at leisure. Such is the life of the blessed in the other 
world, and henceforth I thought of it as my supreme felicity in this. / Those who 
reproach me for my many inconsistencies will not fail to reproach me for this 
one, too. I have said that the idleness of society made it unbearable to me; and 
here I am, seeking for solitude solely in order to give myself up to idleness. . . . 
The idleness of society is deadly because it is obligatory; the idleness of solitude 
is delightful because it is free and voluntary," Jean Jacques Rousseau, Les Confes- 
sions, ed. Hilsum (Paris <1931>), vol. 4, p. 173. 12 [m4 a ,l] 

Among the conditions of idleness, particular importance attaches to solitude. It is 
solitude, in fact, that first emancipates — virtually — individual experience from 
every event, however trivial or impoverished: it offers to the individual experi- 
ence, on the high road of empathy, any passerby whatsoever as its substrate. 
Empathy is possible only to the solitary; solitude, therefore, is a precondition of 
authentic idleness. [m4a,2] 

When all lines are broken and no sail appears on the blank horizon, when no 
wave of immediate experience surges and crests, then there remains to the iso- 
lated subject in the grip of taediwn vitae one last thing — and that is empathy. 

[m4a,3] 

We may leave the question undecided as to whether, and in what sense, leisure is 
also determined by the order of production which makes it possible. We should, 
however, try to show how deeply idleness is marked by features of the capitalist 
economic order in which it flourishes. — On the other side, idleness, in the bour- 
geois society that knows no leisure, is a precondition of artistic production. And, 



often, idleness is the very thing which stamps that production with the traits that 
make its relation to the economic production process so drastic. [m4a,4] 

The student "never stops learning"; the gambler "never has enough"; for the 
flaneur, "there is always something more to see." Idleness has in view an unlim- 
ited duration, which fundamentally distinguishes it from simple sensuous pleas- 
ure, of whatever variety. (Is it correct to say that the "bad infinity" that prevails in 
idleness appears in Hegel as the signature of bourgeois society?) [m5,l] 

The spontaneity common to the student, to the gambler, to the flaneur is perhaps 
that of the hunter — which is to say, that of the oldest type of work, which may be 
intertwined closest of all with idleness. [m5,2] 

Plaubert's "Few will suspect how depressed one had to be to undertake the 
revival of Carthage" makes the connection between study and melencolia <sic> 
transparent. (The latter no doubt threatens not only this form of leisure but all 
forms of idleness.) Compare "My soul is sad and I have read all the books" 
(Mallarme); "Spleen II" and "La Voix" (Baudelaire); "Here stand I, alas, Philoso- 
phy / behind me" (Goethe) . 13 [m5,3] 

Again and again in Baudelaire, the specifically modern is there to be recognized 
as complement of the specifically archaic. In the person of the flaneur, whose 
idleness carries him through an imaginary city of arcades, the poet is confronted 
by the dandy (who weaves his way through the crowd without taking notice of 
the jolts to which he is exposed). 'Vet also in the flaneur a long-extinct creature 
opens a dreamy eye, casts a look that goes to the heart of the poet. It is the "son 
of the wilderness" — the man who, once upon a time, was betrothed, by a gener- 
ous nature, to leisure. Dandyism is the last glimmer of the heroic in times of 
decadence. Baudelaire is delighted to find in Chateaubriand a reference to Ameri- 
can Indian dandies — testimony to the former golden age of these tribes. [m5,4] 

On the hunter type in the flanenr: "The mass of tenants and lodgers begins to stray 
from shelter to shelter in this sea of houses, like the hunters and shepherds of 
prehistory. The intellectual education of the nomad is now complete." Oswald 
Spengler, he Declin de V Occident < trans. M. Tazerout>, vol. 2, part 1 (Paris, 
1933), p. 140. H [m5,5] 



"Man as civilized heing, as intellectual nomad, is again wholly microcosmic, 
wholly homeless, as free intellectually as hunter and herdsman were free sensu- 
ally." Spengler, vol. 2, p. 125. 15 [m5,6] 



»— — — — 

[Anthropological Materialism, History of Sects] 



Gustav: "Your bottom is . . . divine!" 
Berdoa: "And immortal as well, I hope." 
Gustav: "What?" 
Berdoa: "Nothing." 

— Grabbe, Herwg "flieodor von Gothland 1 



The grandiose and lachrymose Memoires de Chodruc-Duclos, edited by J. Arago 
and Edouard Gouin (Paris, 1843), in two volumes, are occasionally interesting as 
the rudiments of a physiology of the beggar. The long preface is unsigned and 
says nothing about the manuscript. The memoirs could be apocryphal. We read 
at one point: "Let there be no mistake about it: it is not the refusal that humiliates 
so much as the almsgiving. ... I never stretched out my hand in supplication. I 
would walk more quickly than the man who was going to accede to my request; 
passing him, I would open my right hand, and he would slip something into it" 
(vol. 2, pp. 11-12). At another point: "Water is sustaining! ... I gorged myself 
with water, since I had no bread" (vol. 2, p. 19). [pl,l] 

Scene in the dormitory of a prison at the beginning of the 1830s. The passage is 
cited in Benoist without indication of author: "In the evening, with the dormitory 
in an uproar, 'the republican workers, before going to bed, performed La Revolu- 
tion de 1830, a theatrical charade they had composed. It reproduced all the scenes 
of the glorious week, from the decision of Charles X and his ministers to sign the 
July Ordinances, to the triumph of the people. The battle on the barricades was 
represented hy a hattle with holsters carried on behind a lofty pile of beds and 
mattresses. At the end, victors and vanquished joined forces to sing "La Mar- 
seillaise. "'" Charles Benoist, "L'Homme de 1848," part 1, Revue des deux mondes 
(July 1, 1913), p. 147. The passage cited presumably comes from Chateaubriand. 

[pl.2] 

Ganneau. "The Mapah . . . appears to us under the aspect of the perfect dandy, 
who loves horses, adores women, and has a taste for the high life but is entirely 
impecunious. This lack of funds he makes up for through gamhling; he is a hahitue 
of all the gambling dens of the Palais-Royal. . . . He helieves himself destined to be 



the redeemer of man's better half, and . . . takes the title of Mapah, a named 
formed from the first syllables of the two words 'mama' and 'papa.' He goes on to 
say that all proper names should be modifi ed in this manner: you should no longer 
hear the name of your father, but rather should use the first syllable of your 
mother's maiden name combined with the first syllable of your father's name. And 
to mark the more clearly that he forever renounces his own former name . . . , he 
signs himself: 'He who was Ganneau.'" He distributes his pamphlets at the exits of 
theaters or sends them through the mail; he even tried to persuade Victor Hugo to 
patronize his doctrine. Jules Bertaut, "Le 'Mapah,'" Le Temps, September 21, 
1935. [pi, 3] 

Charles Louandre on the physiologies, which he charges with corruption of mor- 
als: "This dreary genre . . . has very quickly run its course. The physiology, as 
produced in 32mo format suitable to be sold ... to those out walking or driving, is 
represented in 1836, in the Bibliographie de la France, by two volumes; in 1838 
there are eight volumes listed; in 1841 there are seventy-six; in 1842, forty-four; 
fifteen the year following; and hardly more than three or four in the two years 
since then. From the physiology of individuals, one moved to the physiology of 
cities. There was Paris la nuit; Paris m, table; Paris dans I'eau; Paris « cheval; 
Paris pittoresque; Paris bohemien; Paris litteraire; Paris marie. Then came the 
physiology of peoples: Les Francais; Les Anglais peints par eux-memes. These 
were followed by the physiology of animals: Les Animaux peints par eux-memes et 
dessines par d'autres. Having finally run out of subjects, . . . the authors . . . 
turned in the end to portraying themselves, and gave us the La Physiologie des 
physiologistes." Charles Louandre, "Statistique litteraire: De la Production intel- 
lcctuelle en France depuis quinze ans," Revue des deux mondes (November 15, 
1847), pp. 686-687. [pla,l] 

Theses of Toussenel: "That the happiness of individuals is in direct proportion to 
female authority"; "that the rank of the species is in direct proportion to female 
authority." A. Toussenel, Le Monde des oiseaux, vol. 1 (Paris, 1853), p. 485. The 
first is the "formula of the gyrfalcon" (p. 39). [pla,2] 

Toussenel on his Monde des oiseaux: "The world of birds is only its incidental 
subject, whereas the world of men is its principal subject." Vol. 1, p. 2 (preface by 
the author). [pla,3] 

Toussenel in his preface to Le Monde des oiseaux: "He [the author] has sought to 
underline the importance of the culinary side of his subject by according the item 
"roast meat" a more prominent place than it usually occupies in scientific works. " 
Vol. 1, p. 2. [pla,4] 



"We admire the hird . . . because with the bird, as in all well-organized politics, 
. . . it is gallantry that determines rank. . . . We feel instinctively that the woman, 
who came from the Creator's hand after the man, was made to command the latter, 



just as he was horn to command the beasts who came before him" <Le Monde des 
oiseaux, vol. 1, p. 38>. [pla,5] 



According to Toussenel, the races that most look up to the woman stand highest: at 
times the Germans, but above all the French and the Greeks. "As the Athenian 
and the Frenchman are denoted by the falcon, so are the Roman and the English- 
man by the eagle." (The eagle, however, "does not rally to the service of human- 
ity.") A. Toussenel, he Monde des oiseaux, vol. 1 (Paris, 1853), p. 125. [pla,6] 

Comic physiologies: Musee pour rire; Musee Philipon; Musee or Magasin com- 
ique; Musee Parisien; Les Metamorphoses du jour. [p2,l] 

Series of drawings. Les Vesuviennes, by Beaumont: twenty prints. Daumier's se- 
ries Les Divorceuses <Divorced Women) . A series (by whom?) titled Les Bas-bleus 
<The Bluestockings > . 2 [p2,2] 

Rise of the physiologies: "The burning political struggle of the years 1830-1835 
had formed an army of draftsmen, . . . and this army . . . was completely knocked 
out, politically speaking, by the September Laws. At a time, that is, when they had 
fathomed all the secrets of their art, they were suddenly restricted to a single 
theater of operations: the description of bourgeois life. . . . This is the circum- 
stance that explains the colossal revue of bourgeois life inaugurated around the 
middle of the 1830s in France. . . . Everything came into the picture: . . . happy 
days and sad days, work and recreation, marriage customs and bachelor habits, 
family, house, child, school, society, theater, types, professions." Eduard Fuchs, 
Die Karikatur der europiiischen Volker, 4th ed. (Munich <1921>), vol. 1, p. 362. 

[p2,3] 

What sordidness once again, at the end of the century, in the representation of 
physiological affairs! Characteristic of this is a description of impotence in Mail- 
lard's book on the history of women's emancipation, which in its overall han- 
dling of the matter lays bare, in drastic fashion, the reaction of the established 
bourgeoisie to anthropological materialism. In connection with the presentation 
of Claire Demar's doctrine, one finds that "she . . . speaks of the deceptions that 
can result from that strange and enormous sacrifice, at the risk of which, under a 
torrid Italian sky, more than one young man tries his luck at becoming a famous 
c/ianteur." Firmin Maillard, La Ugende de la femme anaticipee (Paris), p. 98. 

[p2,4] 

A key passage from the manifesto of Claire Demar: "The union of the sexes in the 
future will have to be the result of . . . deeply meditated sympathies . . . ; this will 
he the case even where the existence of an intimate, secret, and mysterious rapport 
between two souls has been recognized. . . . All such relations could very well come 
to nothing in the face of one last, indispensable, and decisive test: the TEST of 
MATTER by MATTER, the ASSAY of FLESH by flesh!!! . . . Often enough, on the very 



threshold of the hedroom, a devouring flame has come to he extinguished; often 
enough, for more than one grand passion, the perfumed hedsheets have become a 
death shroud. More than one person . . . who will read these lines has entered, at 
night, into the bed of Hymen, palpitating ivith desires and emotions, only to 
awaken in the morning cold and icy.' 17 Claire Demar, Ma Loi d'avenir (Paris, 



Re anthropological materialism. Conclusion of Claire Demar's Ma Loi d'avenir 
<My Law of the Future): "No more motherhood, no more law of blood. I say: no 
more motherhood. And, in fact, the woman emancipated . . . from the man, who 
then no longer pays her the price of her body, . . . will owe her existence ... to her 
works alone. For this it is necessary that the woman pursue some work, fulfill a 
function. And how can she do this if she is always condemned to give up a more or 
less large part of her life to the care and education of one or more children? . . . 
You want to emancipate the woman? Well, then, take the newborn child from the 
breast of the blood-mother and give it into the arms of the social mother, a nurse 
employed by the state, and the child will be better raised. . . . Then, and then only, 
will man, woman, and child be freed from the law of blood, from the exploitation 
of humanity by humanity." Claire Demar, Ma Loi d'avenir: Ouvrage posthume 
pnblie par Suzanne (Paris, 1834), pp. 58-59. [p2a,l] 

"What! Because a woman would rather not take the public into her confidence 
concerning her feelings as a woman; hecause, from among all the men who would 
lavish their attentions upon her, . . . only she could say which one she prefers — 
... is she then ... to become . . . the slave of one man? . . . What! In such cases a 
woman is exploited. . . . For if she were not afraid of seeing them tear themselves to 
pieces, . . . she could give satisfaction to several men at once in their love. ... I 
believe, with M. James de Laurence, in the need . . . for a freedom without . . . 
limits , . . . a freedom founded on mystery, which for me is the basis of the new 
morality." Claire Demar, Ma Loi d'avenir (Paris, 1834), pp. 31-32. [p2a,2] 

The demand for "mystery" — as opposed to "publicity" — in sexual relations is 
closely connected, in Demar, with the demand for more or less extended trial 
periods. Of course, the traditional fonn of marriage would in general be sup- 
planted by this more flexible fonn. It is logical, furthermore, that these concep- 
tions should give rise to the demand for matriarchy. [p2a,3] 

From the arguments directed against patriarchy: "Ah, it is with a huge pile of 
parricidal daggers at my side that, amid widespread groans of lamentation at the 
very mention of the words 'father' and 'mother,' I venture to raise my voice . . . 
against the law of hlood, the law of generation!" Claire Demar, Ma Loi d'avenir 



1834), pp. 36-37. 



[ P 2,5] 



(Paris, 1834), pp. 54-55. 



[p2a,4] 



Caricature plays a considerable role in the development of the caption. It is 
characteristic that Henri Bouchot, La Lithsg-tphie (Paris <1895>) <p. 114>, re- 
proaches Daumier with the length and indispensability of his captions. [p2a,5] 



Henri Bonchot, La Lithographie (Paris), p. 138, compares the productivity of 
Deveria with that of Balzac and Dumas. [p2a,6] 



Several passages from Claire Demar's work Ma Loi d'avenir may be cited by way 
of characterizing her relation to James de Laurence. The fir st comes from the 
foreword written by Suzanne and has its point of departure in Claire Demar's 
refusal to contribute to La Tribune des femmes: "Up until the seventeenth issue, 
she had consistently refused, saying that the tone of this periodical was too 
moderate. . . . When this issue appeared, there was a passage in an article by me 
which, by its form and its moderation, exasperated Claire. — She wrote to me that 
she was going to respond to it. — But . . . her response became a pamphlet, which 
she then decided to publish on its own, outside the framework of the peri- 
odical. . . . Here, then, is the fragment of the article of which Claire has cited only 
a few lines. 'There is still in the world a man who interprets . . . Christianity ... in 
a manner . . . favorable to our sex: I mean M. James de Laurence, the author of a 
pamphlet entitled Les Enfants de dieu, ou La Religion de Jesus. . . . The author is 
no Saint-Sinionian; ... he postulates ... an inheritance through the mother. 
Certainly this system ... is highly advantageous to us; I am convinced that some 
part of it will have a place ... in the religion of the future, and that the principle 
of motherhood will become one of the fundamental laws of the state'" (Claire 
Demar, Ma loi d'avenir: Ouvr age posthume publie par Suzanne [Paris, 1834], pp. 14- 
16). In the text of her manifesto, Claire Demar makes common cause with 
Laurence against the reproaches leveled at him by La Tribune des femmes, which 
had claimed that he was advocating a form of "moral liberty . . . without rules or 
boundaries," something "which . . . would surely land us in a coarse and disgust- 
ing disorder." The blame for this is said to reside in the fact that in these things 
Laurence propounds mystery as a principle; on the strength of such mystery, we 
would have to render account in these things to a mystical God alone. La Tribune 
des Femmes, on the contrary, believes that "the Society of the Future will be 
founded not on mystery but on trust; for mystery merely prolongs the exploita- 
tion of our sex." Claire Demar replies: "Certainly, Mesdames, if, like you, I 
confused trust with publicity, and considered mystery as prolonging the exploita- 
tion of our sex, I would be bound to give my blessings to the times in which we 
live." She goes on to describe the brutality of the customs of these times: "Before 
the mayor and before the priest, ... a man and a woman have assembled a long 
train of witnesses. . . . Voila! . . . The union is called legitimate, and the woman 
may now without blushing affirm: 'On such and such a day, at such and such an 
hour, I shall receive a man into my woman's bed!!!' . . . Contracted in the presence 
of the crowd, the marriage drags along, across an orgy of wines and dances, 
toward the nuptial bed, which has become the bed of debauchery and prostitu- 
tion, inviting the delirious imagination of the guests to follow ... all the details 
... of the lubricious drama enacted in the name of the Wedding Day! If the 
practice which thus converts a young bride . . . into the object of impudent 
glances . . . , and which prostitutes her to unrestrained desires, . . . does not 
appear to you a horrible exploitation, . . . then I know not what to say" (Ma Loi 
d'avenir, pp. 29-30). [p3 5 l] 



Publication date of the first issue of Le Charivari: December 1, 1832. [p3,2] 



Lesbian confession of a Saint-Simonienne: "I hegan to love my fellow woman as 
much as my fellow man. ... I left to the man his physical strength and his brand of 
intelligence in order to exalt at his side, and with equal right, the physical beauty 
of the woman and her distinctively spiritual gifts." Cited without indication of 
source or author in Firmin Maillard, La Legende de lafemme emancipee (Paris), 
p. 65. [p3a,l] 



Empress Eugenie as successor to the Mother: 

Should you wish, O blessed one, 
The whole of humankind with joy 
Will hail its EUGENIE — 
Archangel guiding us to port!! ! 

Jean Journet, L'Ere de lafemme, on he Regne de Vharmonie universelle (January 
1857), p. 8. <See U14a,4 and U17a,2.> [ p 3a,2] 



Maxims from James de Laurence, Les Enfant s de dieu, ou La Religion de Jesus 
reconciliee avec la philosophie (Paris, June 1831): "It is more reasonahle to claim 
that all children are made hy God than to say that all married couples are joined 
together hy God" (p. 14). The fact that Jesus does not condemn the woman taken 
in adultery leads Laurence to conclude that he did not approve of marriage: "He 
pardoned her hecause he considered adultery the natural consequence of mar- 
riage, and he would have accepted it were it to he found among his disciples. . . . 
As long as marriage exists, an adulterous woman will be found criminal because 
she hurdens her hushand with the children of others. Jesus could not tolerate such 
an injustice; his system is logical: he wanted children to belong to the mother. 
Whence those remarkable words: 'Call no man your father on earth, for you have 
one Father, who is in heaven'"' (p. 13). "The children of God, as descended from 
one woman, form a single family. . . . The religion of the Jews was that of pater- 
nity, under which the patriarchs exercised their domestic authority. The religion 
of Jesus is that of maternity, whose symhol is a mother holding a child in her arms; 
and this mot her is called the Virgin hecause, while fulfilling the duties of a mother, 
she had not renounced the independence of a virgin" (pp. 13-14 ). [p3a,3] 

"Some sects . . . , during the first centuries of the church, seem to have divined the 
intentions of Jesus; the Simonians, the Nicolaitans, the Carpocratians, the 
Basilidians, the Marcionites, and others . . . not only had abolished marriage but 
had established the community of women." James de Laurence, Les Enfants de 
dieu, ou La Religion de Jesus reconciliee avec la philosophie (Paris, June 1831), 
p. 8. [ P 3a,4] 

The interpretation of the miracle at Cana' 1 which James de Laurence offers, in an 
effort to prove his thesis that Jesus stood opposed to marriage, is wholly in the 
style of the early Middle Ages: "Seeing the wedded pair make a sacrifice of their 




The Fourierist missionary Jean Joumet, ca. 1858. Photo by Natlar. Courtesy of the Bib- 
liotheque Nationale de France. See p3a,2. 



liberty, he changed the water into wine so as to demonstrate that marriage was a 
foolhardy venture undertaken only by people whose brains are addled by wine." 
James de Laurence, Les Enfants de diea, ou La Religion de Jesus reconciliee avec la 
philosophie (Parisjune 1831), p. 8. [p4,l] 

"The Holy Spirit, or the soul of nature, descended upon the Virgin in the form of a 
dove; and since the clove is the symbol of love, this signifies that the mother of 



Jesus had yielded to the natural inclination for love." James de Laurence, Les 
Enfmnts de dieu (Paris, June 1831), p. 5. [p4,2] 



Some of Laurence's theoretical motifs are already evident in his four-volume 
novel, he Panorama des boudoirs, ou L'Empire des Nairs (Paris, 1817), which 
was published earlier in Germany and of which a fragment had appeared in 1793 
in Wieland's Deutsche Merkur. Laurence (Lawrence) was English. [p4,3] 

"Balzac has described the physiognomy of the Parisian in unforgettable fashion: 
the faces drawn taut, tormented, livid, 'the almost infernal complexion of Parisian 
physiognomies'; 3 not faces but masks." Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac (Bonn, 
1923), p. 243. (Citation from La Fille auxyeux d'or.) [p4,4] 

"Balzac's interest in longevity is one of the things he has in common with the 
eighteenth century. The naturalists, the philosophers, the charlatans of that age 
are agreed on this point. . . . Condorcet expected from the future era, which he 
painted in glowing colors, an infinite prolongation of the life span. Count Saint- 
Germain dispensed a 'tea of life,' Cagliostro an 'elixir of life'; others promoted 
'sidereal salts,' 'tincture of gold,' 'magnetic beds. '" Ernst Robert Curtius, Balzac 
(Bonn, 1923), p. 101. [p4,5] 

In Fourier {Nouveau Monde <Paris, 1829— 1830>, p. 275) there are outcries against 
wedding rites that recall the pronouncements of Claire Demar. [p4,6] 

Note of Blanqui's from the spring of 184.6, when he was imprisoned in the Hospital 
of Tours: "On Communion days, the sisters of the hospice of Tours are unap- 
proachable, ferocious. They have eaten God. They are churning with the pride of 
this divine digestion. These vessels of holiness become flasks of vitriol." < Cited in> 
Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 133. [p4,7] 

Apropos of the wedding at Cana. 1848: "A banquet for the poor was planned; it 
was to offer, for twenty-live centimes, bread, cheese, and wine, which would be 
eaten and drunk on the plain of Saint-Denis. It did not take place (initially sched- 
uled for June 1, it was postponed to June 18, then to July 14); but the preparatory 
meetings that were held, the subscriptions that were collected, and the enroll- 
ments — which had mounted, by June 8, to 165,532 — served to stir up public opin- 
ion." Gustave Geffroy, L 'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. 1, p. 192. [p4a,l] 

"In 1848, in the room of Jenny the worker, there were portraits of Beranger, 
Napoleon, and the Madonna pinned to the wall. People felt certain that the relig- 
ion of Humanity was about to emerge. Jesus is a great man of '48. Among the 
masses, there were indications of a faith in omens. . . . The Almanack pro phetique 
of 1849 announced the return of the comet of 1264 — the warrior comet, produced 
by the influence of Mars." Gustave Geffroy, L'Enferme (Paris, 1926), vol. I, 
p. 156. [p4a,2] 



Bahick, deputy of the tenth arrondissement, Pole, worker, then tailor, then per- 
fumer. "He was ... a member of the International and of the Central Committee, 
and at the same time an apostle of the f usionist cult — a religion of recent inspira- 
tion, intended for the use of brains like his. Formed hy a certain M. de Toureil, it 
combined . . . several cults, to which Babick had conjoined spiritualism. As a 
perfumer, he had created for it a language which, for lack of other merits, was 
redolent of drugs and ointments. He would write at the top of his letters 'Paris- 
Jerusalem,' date them with a year of the fusionist era, and sign them 'Babick, 
child of the Kingdom of God, and perfumer. 1 " Georges Laronze, Histoire de la 
Commune de 1871 (Paris, 1928), pp. 168-169. [p4a,3] 

"The whimsical idea conceived by the colonel of the twelfth legion was no more 
felicitous. It entailed forming a company of female citizen volunteers who were 
charged, for the greater shame of lawbreakers, with securing their arrest." 
Georges Laronze, Histoire de la Commune de 1871 (Paris, 1928), p. 5#1. [p4a,4] 

Fusionisme begins its reckoning of time with December 30, 1845. [p4a,5] 

Maxime Du Camp, in his Souvenirs litteraires, makes a play on words with 
"Evadians" and "evaders." <See al5,2-4.> [p4a,6] 

From the constitution of the Vesuviennes: "Female citizens ought to do their part 
to serve the armies of land and sea. . . . The enlisted will form an army to be 
designated as reserve. It will he divided into three contingents: the corps of women 
workers, the corps of vivandieres, and the corps of charity. . . . Since marriage is 
an association, each of the two spouses must share in all the work. Any husband 
refusing to perform his portion of domestic duties will be condemned ... to as- 
sume responsibility for the service of his wife in the Garde Civique, in place of his 
own service in the Garde Nationale." Firmin Maillard, La Legende de lafemme 
emancipee (Paris), pp. 179, 181. [p5 , 1 ] 

"The feelings Hegel stirred up among the members of Young Germany, and which 
fluctuated hetween strong attraction and even stronger repulsion, are reflected 
most vividly in Gustav Kiihne's Quarantine im Irrenhause < Quarantine in the 
Insane Asylum) .... Because the memhers of Young Germany placed the accent 
more on subjective volition than on objective freedom, the Young Hegelians 
heaped scorn upon the 'unprincipled meandering' of their 'helletristic ego- 
ism' .... Although the fear arose, within the ranks of Young Germany, that the 
inescapahle dialectic of Hegelian doctrine might deprive Youth of the strength . . . 
to act, this concern proved unjustified." Quite the contrary: once these young 
Germans "were forced to recognize, after the han on their writings was imposed, 
that they themselves had hurned the hands by whose diligent labors they had 
hoped to live like good bourgeois, their enthusiasm quickly vanished." Gustav 
Mayer, Friedrich Engels, vol. 1, Friedrich Engets in seiner Friihzeit (Berlin 
<1933>), pp. 37-39/' [p5,2] 



Around the time that "physiologies" first appeared, historians like Thierry, 
Mignet, Guizot were laying emphasis on the analysis of "bourgeois life." [p5,3] 



Engels on the Wuppertal region: "Excellent soil for our principles is being pre- 
pared here; and once we are able to set in motion our wild, hot-tempered dyers 
and bleachers, you won't recognize Wuppertal. Even as it is, the workers during 
the past few years have reached the final stage of the old civilization; the rapid 
increase in crimes, robberies, and murders is their protest against the old social 
organization. At night the streets are unsafe, the bourgeois are beaten up, knifed, 
and rohbed. If the local proletarians develop according to the same laws as the 
English proletarians, they will soon realize that it is useless to protest against the 
social system in this manner . . . and will protest in their general capacity, as 
human beings, by means of communism." Engels to Marx, October 1844., from 
Barmen [Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Briefwechsel, ed. Marx-Engels-Lenin 
Institut, vol. 1 (<Zurich> 1935), pp. 4-5]. 7 [p5,4] 

The heroic ideal in Baudelaire is androgynous. This does not prevent him from 
writing: "Wfe have known the philanthropist woman author, the systematic priest- 
ess of love, the republican poetess, the poetess of the future, Fourierist or Saint- 
Simonian; and our eyes . . . have never succeeded in becoming accustomed to all 
this studied ugliness." Baudelaire, L'Art romantique, ed. Hachette, vol. 3 (Paris), 
p. 340 ("Marceline Desbordes-Valmore"). 8 [p5a,l] 

One of the later sectarian developments of the nineteenth century is the fusionist 
religion. It was propagated by L.J. B. Toureil (born in Year VIII, died 1863 [or 
1868?]). The Fouiierist influence can be felt in his periodization of history; from 
Saint-Simon comes the idea of the Trinity as a unity of Mother-Father to which 
Sister-Brother or Androgyne is joined. The universal substance is determined in 
its working by three processes, in the definition of which the inferior basis of this 
doctrine comes to light. These processes are: "Emanation, . . . the property which 
the universal substance possesses of expanding infinitely beyond itself; . . . Ab- 
sorption, . . . the property which the universal substance possesses of turning 
back infinitely upon itself; . . . Assimilation, . . . the property which the universal 
substance possesses of being intimately permeated with itself" (p. i). — A charac- 
teristic passage from the aphorism "Pauvres, riches" <Rich Men, Poor Men>, 
which addresses itself to the rich and speaks of the poor: "Moreover, if you refuse 
to elevate them to your level and scorn to involve yourselves with them, why 
then do you breathe the same air, inhabit the same atmosphere? In order not to 
breathe in and assimilate their emanation . . . , it will be necessary for you to 
leave this world, to breathe a different air and live in a different atmosphere" 
(p. 267).— The dead are "multiform" and exist in many places on the earth at the 
same time. For this reason, people must very seriously concern themselves, dur- 
ing their lifetime, with the betterment of the earth (p. 307). LJltimately, all unites 
in a series of suns, which in the end, after they have passed through the station of 
one light (unilumiere) , realize the "universal light" in the "universalizing region." 



Religion fusionienne, ou Doctrine de I'universalisation re'alisant le vrai catholicisme 
(Paris, 1902). [ P 5a,2] 



"Me: Is there some particular facet of your religious cult that you could comment 
on? M. de Tonreil: We pray often, and our prayers ordinarily hegin with the 
words: '0 Map supreme and eternal.' Me: What is the meaning of this sound 
'Map'? M. de Toureil: It is a sacred sound which combines the m signifying mere 
(mother), the p signifying pere (father), and the a signifying amour (love). . . . 
These three letters designate the great eternal God." Alexandre Erdan [A. A. 
Jacob], La France mistique, 2 vols. (Paris, 1855), vol. 2, p. 632 [continuous pagi- 
nation], [p6,l] 

Fusionisme aims not at a syncretism but at the fusion of human beings with one 
another and with God. [p6,2] 

"There will he no happiness for humanity until the day the republic sends the son 
of God back to the carpenter's shop of Monsieur his father." This sentence is put 
into the mouth of Courbet, in a pamphlet that presents the heroes of the February 
Revolution to the public. [p6,3] 



[Ecole Polytechnique] 



On commerce: "I ( competition between merchants, ... or any other matter, pre- 
vents them from selling their wares in timely fashion, then the individual merchant 
is forced ... to suspend business and cast the problem back onto the pro- 
ducers. . . . Tliis is why we cannot distinguish between commercial and industrial 
crises, so dependent is industry on intermediaries. ... A fearsome audit is con- 
ducted on all assets in circulation, and an enormous quantity of them are declared 
worthless. . . . The times when commercial assets are subjected to audit arc called 
crises." Eugene Buret, De la Misere des classes laborieuses en Angleterre et en 



"In 1860, having long slumbered in the arms of protectionism, France abruptly 
awakened 'on the pillow of free trade.' Exercising the right conferred on him by 
the constitution of 1852, Napoleon III had bypassed parliament and negotiated to 
open our borders to products from other nations, at the same time opening several 
foreign markets to our entrepreneurs. . . . Long years of prosperity had made it 
possible for our industrial forces ... to wage a global struggle." Henry Fougere, 
Les Delegations ouvrieres aux expositions universelles sous le Second Empire 



Founding of the Ecole Polytechnique: 1 "The Terror within, invaders at the bor- 
ders . . . ; the country in ruins, disorganized, able neither to acquire the saltpeter 
needed for gunpowder nor to run the factories needed for manufacturing arms 
(since nearly all these factories were in the hands of insurgents) — such were the 
circumstances in which deliberations were held to found the new institution. . . . 
'Everything that genius, lahor, and concerted action were capable of,' as Biot had 
put it, 'was now called up, so that France alone could sustain itself against all of 
Europe . . . for the duration of the war, however long and terrible it might prove to 
be'. . . . Characteristic of the Ecole Polytechnique . . . was the coexistence of 
purely theoretic st udies with a series o{vocationalcourses geared to civil engineer- 
ing, architecture, fortifications, mining, and even naval constructions. . . . Napo- 
leon . . . made residence in the barracks obligatory for students. . . . Then came 
the events of . . . 1815, after which . . . one no longer concealed the hope of seeing 
the Ecole recruit more students from aristoeratic families. . . . The institution thus 



France (Paris, 1840), vol. 2, pp. 211, 213. 



[rU] 



(Montlueon, 1905), p. 28. 



[rl,2] 



ceased to have the character of a preparatory school for public service. . . . Pure 
science was to gain nothing by this; for . . . the graduating classes ... of 1817 to 
1830 contributed hy far the lowest proportion of memhers to the Institut de 
France. ... In 1848, the Ecole was in danger of heing closed." A. de Lapparent, he 
Centenaue del 'Ecole polytechnique (Paris, 1894), pp. 6-7, 12-15. [rl,3] 

Vote of March 18, 1871, at the Ecole Polytechnique, on the position to he adopted 
vis-a-vis the Commune: "Some . . . wonder what this committee is that claims to 
have been elected hy the federation of 300,000 citizens. . . . Others . . . propose 
taking up the tradition of the past and putting themselves at the forefront of the 
movement. After a very lively hut peaceful discussion, a vote is held: the partisans 
of the Central Committee are fourteen in nuinher!" G. Pinet, Ilistoire de VEcole 
polytechnique (Paris, 1887), p. 293. [i"la,l] 

In 1871, the Ecole Polytechnique encountered justified mistrust. Voices were 
heard to say: "The Ecole is no longer what it was in 1830!" (Pinet, p. 297). 

[rla,2] 

Two characteristic passages from Edouard Foucaud, Pans inventeur: Physiologie de 
I'industrie frangaise (Paris, 1844), on the conception of industry and of the worker 
before 1848: "Industrial intelligence is the daughter of heaven. It loves and 
surrenders itself only to those whom society . . . calls manual laborers, those 
whom intelligent persons know as brothers or zfor/een" (p. 181). "Today, in the 
nineteenth century, the chattel of the Romans, . . . the serf of Charlemagne, the 
peasant of Francis I — this miserable trinity which slavery has brutalized but which 
the genius of emancipation has made radiant — is called the people" (pp. 220-221). 

[rla,3] 

"Without the advantages of wealth, ... or a narrow mind, . . . the worker finds 
retirement on an annuity to be oppressive. The sky above may well be cloudless, 
and his home may well be verdant, perfumed with flowers, and enlivened by the 
song of birds; yet his inactive mind remains insensible to the charms of solitude. 
If, by chance, his ear should catch some sharp noise coming from a distant 
manufacturing plant, or even the monotonous churning of a factory mill, then his 
countenance immediately brightens; he no longer notices the birdsongs or the 
perfumes. The thick smoke escaping from the factory's high chimney, the ringing 
of the anvil, make him tremble with joy. These things remind him of the good old 
days of manual labor motivated by a mind inspired." Edouard Foucaud, Paris 
inventeur: Pfysiologie de I'industrie frangaise (Paris, 1844), pp. 222-223. [rla,4] 

"'Amid the reigning disorder,' writes Vaulahelle, 'their well-known uniform, be- 
loved of all, gave them a sort of official character, which turned them into . . . the 
most active and most useful agents of the up and coming power'. . . . 'Whenever 
we had to give an order that required the backing of some kind of force,' says 
Mauguin, 'we would generally entrust its execution to a student of the Ecole 



Polytechnique. The student would descend the flight of stairs leading out from the 
Hotel de Ville. Before reaching the hottom step, he would address the crowd, 
which had hecome attentive; he would simply pronounce the words, "Two hun- 
dred men, ahle and wilJing!" Then he would complete his descent and turn alone 
into the street. At that very instant, one could see stepping forth from the walls 
and marching heliind him — some with rifles, others just with swords — one man, 
two men, twenty men, and then one hundred, four hundred, five hundred men; 
more than twice the number needed.'" G. Pinet, Histoire de I'Ecole polytechnique 
(Paris, 1887), pp. 156-157. [The two passages cited are from <Achille> Vaulahelle, 
Histoire des deux restaurations, vol. 8, p. 291, and a letter of M. Mauguin to La 
Presse, Saumur, March 8, 1853.] [r2,l] 

The students of the Ecole Polytechnique organize a relief fund to make it easier f or 
La Tribune to pay a fine. (Pinet, p. 220.) [r2,2] 

Lamartine in Destinies de la poesie, as cited in Michiels: "M. Lamartine, who has 
seen with his own eyes the intellectual servitude of the Empire, describes it. . . . 'It 
was a universal confederacy of the mathematical forms of study, in opposition to 
thinking and poetry. Number alone was permitted, was honored, protected, and 
paid. Since number does not think for itself, the military chief of that era had need 
of no other . . . henchman. '" Alfred Michiels, Histoire des idees litteraires en 
France au XIX s siecle (Paris, 1863), vol. 2, p . 94. [r2,3] 

Pinet < Histoire de I'Ecole polytechnique (Paris, 1887)> (p. viii) refers to the Ency- 
clopedistes as "the true founders" of the Ecole Polytechnique. [r2,4] 

"One tried hy every means possible, but always without success, to win the Ecole 
over to the cause of the Bourbons." Pinet, Histoire de I'Ecole polytechnique, 



Customs and precepts of the student body at the Ecole Polytechnique, as assem- 
bled in the "Code X." "It rested entirely on this one principle, which had been 
upheld ever since the school was founded: 'Any resolution voted through is obliga- 



Michelet on the Ecole Polytechnique and the Ecole Normale: "After those great 
trials, there seemed to be a moment of silence for all human passions; one might 
have thought that there was no longer any pride, self-interest, or envy. The leading 
men in the state and in science accepted the most humhle positions of public 
instruction. Lagrange and Laplace taught arithmetic. Fifteen hundred students — 
grown men who were in some cases already famous — came ... to take their seats 
at the Ecole Normale and to learn to teach. They came as best they could, in the 
depth of winter, at that time of poverty and famine. ... A great citizen, Carnot, 
. . . was the real founder of the Ecole Polytechnique. They learned with the zeal of 
soldiers. . . . Watching the uninterrupted inventions of their teachers, the students 



p. 86. 



[r2,5] 



tory, no matter what the consequences might be.'" Pinet, pp. 109-110. 



[r2,6] 



went on to invent as well. Imagine the spectacle of a Lagrange who suddenly 
stopped short in the middle of his lecture and was lost in thought. The room waited 
in silence. Finally he awoke and told them of his glowing new discovery, barely 
formed in his mind. . . . What a decline after those days! . . . After the reports 
made to the Convention, read those of Fourcroy and Fontanes; you sink . . . from 
manhood to old age." .1. Michelet, Le Peuple (Paris, 1846), pp. 336-338. 2 [r2a,l] 

"Parnassus of the triangle and the hypotenuse" — this is what Paul-Ernest de 
Rattier, in Paris n'existe pas (Paris, 1857), calls the Ecole Polytechnique (p. 19). 

[r2a,2] 

Ch. F. Viel, as an adversary of engineering construction, no less than as a royal- 
ist, was necessarily also an adversary of the Ecole Polytechnique. He laments the 
decline of architecture as art — a decline "that began with that terrible period when 
the throne of our king was toppled." Charles-Francois Viel, De la Cfmte imminente 
de la science de la construction des bitimens en France, vol. 1 (Paris, 1818), p. 53. The 
study of architecture as art is, according to him, more difficult than the mathe- 
matical theory of construction; as proof, he cites the many prizes won in tliis field 
by students of the Ecole Polytechnique. The author speaks contemptuously of 
the new educational arrangements — "these new institutions professing everything 
with everything else" — and he writes on the same page: "Let us pay homage here 
to the govermnent that has judged so well of the difference between mathematics 
and arclritecture, and which has preserved the special school in Paris for the 
teaching of this art, and recreated the private boarding school of Rome." Charles- 
Francois Viel, De I'bnpuusance des mathematiques pour assurer la solidite des bdti- 
mens (Paris, 1805), p. 63. Viel emphasizes (ibid., pp. 31-32) the irrational element 
in the genuine study of architecture: "The forms preexist the construction and 
constitute essentially the theory of the art of building," In 1819 {De la Chute . . . , 
vol. 2, p. 120), he is still denouncing "the attitude of the century toward the fine 
arts in general, which it puts in a class with the industrial arts." [r2a,3] 

From the time of Napoleon I, the Ecole Polytechnique was subject to continual 
reproach for providing practical training with an overly broad theoretical founda- 
tion. These criticisms led, in 1855, to proposals for reform, against which Arago 
took a most determined stand. At the same time, he dismissed the charge that the 
school had become a breeding ground of revolutionary animus: "I have been 
told of a reproach directed against polytechnical instruction, and according to 
which the mathematical disciplines — the study of differential calculus and of 
integral calculus, for example — would have the effect of transforming their stu- 
dents into socialists of the worst stamp. . . . How has it escaped the author of such 
a reproach that its immediate consequence is nothing less than to range the likes 
of a Huygens, a Newton, a Leibniz, a Euler, a Lagrange, a Laplace among the 
most hot-headed of demagogues? It is truly shameful that someone was led to 
make comparisons of this kind." <Francois> Arago, Sur I'ancienne Ecole polytech- 
nique (Paris, 1853), p. 42. [ r 3,l] 



In he Cure cle village, which Balzac wrote in the years 1837 to 1845, there are very 
violent attacks on the Ecole Polytechnique (coming in the letter of Gregoire 
Gerard to his patron, the banker Grossetete). Balzac fears that the forced study of 
the exact sciences would have devastating effects on the spiritual constitution and 
life span of the students. Still more characteristic are the following reflections: "I 
do not believe that any engineer who ever left the Ecole could build one of the 
miracles of architecture which Leonardo da Vinci erected — Leonardo who was at 
once engineer, architect, and painter, one of the inventors of hydraulic science, the 
indefatigable constructor of canals. They are so accustomed while not yet in their 
teens to the bald simplicity of geometry, that by the time they leave the Ecole they 
have quite lost all feeling for grace or ornament. A column, to their eyes, is a 
useless waste of material. They return to the point where art begins — on utility 
they take their stand, and stay there." H. de Balzac, he Cure cle village, ed. Siccle 
(Paris), p. 184. 3 [r3,2] 

Arago's speech on the question of fortifications 4 is directed against the report by 
Thiers and against Lamartine. The speech is dated January 29, 1841. One of its 
most important sections is headed: "The detached forts examined from the point 
of view of their political significance. Is it true that governments have never re- 
garded citadels as a means of subduing and suppressing populations?" From this 
section: "M. Thiers does not like to admit that any government, in order to control 
the population, would ever resort to bombarding the towns . . . This illusion cer- 
tainly does honor to his humanity and to his taste for fine arts; but . . . few others 
would share it. . . . And so . . . one may subscribe to the protestations of 1833 
against the detached forts and the smaller fortresses without incurring the epithet 
of 'philistine,' or 'madman,' or other such compliments." Arago, Sur les Forti- 
fications de Paris (Paris, 1841), pp. 87, 92-94. [r3,3] 

Arago fights for the "continuous enceinte'''' as opposed to the "detached forts": 
"The goal we should strive for, in fortifying Paris, is clearly to give this gigantic 
city the means of defending itself solely with the aid of its Garde Nationale, its 
workers, the population of surrounding areas, and some detachments of regular 
army troops. . . . This point granted, the best ramparts for Paris will be those the 
population finds to be best — the ramparts most intimately suited to the tastes, 
customs, ideas, and needs of an armed bourgeoisie. To pose the question in this 
manner is to reject out of hand the system of detached forts. Behind a continuous 
surrounding wall, the Garde Nationale would have news of their families at all 
times. The wounded would have access to care. In such a situation, the apprehen- 
sive guardsman would be as good as the seasoned veteran. On the other hand, we 
would he strangely deluded if we imagined that citizens under daily obligations as 
heads of families and as heads of businesses would go, without great reluctance, to 
shut themselves up within the four walls of a fort — that they would be prepared to 
sequester themselves at the very moment when circumstances of t he most pressing 
kind would demand their presence at the domestic hearth or at the counter, store, 
or workshop. I can already hear the response to such imperious demands: the 



forts will be occupied hy regular army troops! You admit then that, with a system 
of forts, the population could not defend itself alone. This is ... an immense, a 
terrible admission." Arago, Sur les Fortifications de Paris (Paris, 1841), pp. 80- 
81. [r3a,l] 



Marx on the June Insurrection: "In order to dispel the people's last illusion, in 
order to enable a complete break with the past, it was necessary for the customary 
poetic accompaniment of a French uprising, the enthusiastic youth of the bour- 
geoisie, the students of the Ecole Polytechnique, the three-cornered hats — all to 
take the side of the oppressors." Karl Marx, "Dem Andenken der Juni-Kampfer" 
[Karl Marx als Denker, Mensch und Revolution*.!; eel. D. Rjazanov (Vienna and 
Berlin < 1928 > , p. 36]. 5 [r3a,2] 



Again, in 1871, in his strategy for the defense of Paris, Blanqui comes back to the 
uselessness of the forts which Louis Philippe erected against Paris. [r3a,3] 

The postrevolutionary tendencies of architecture, which gain currency with Le- 
doux, are characterized by distinct block-like structures to which staircases and 
pedestals are often appended in "standardized" fashion. One might discern in 
this style a reflection of Napoleonic militaiy strategy. With this goes the effort to 
generate certain effects by means of structural massing. According to Kaufmann, 
"Revolutionary architecture aimed to produce an impression through giant 
masses, the sheer weight of the forms (hence the preference for Egyptian forms, 
which predates the Napoleonic campaign), and also through the handling of 
materials. The Cyclopean embossment of the saltworks, the powerful ordon- 
nance of the Palais de Justice at Aix, and the extreme severity of the prison 
designed for this city . . . speak clearly of that aim." Emil Kaufmann, Von Ledoux 
bu Le Corbusier (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933), p. 29. [r4,l] 

Ledoux's planned toll-helt for Paris: "From the beginning, he set his sights as high 
as possible. His tollgates were intended to proclaim from afar the glory of the 
capital. Of the more than forty guardhouses, not one resemhled any of the others, 
and among his papers after his death were found a number of unfinished plans for 
expanding the system." Emil Kaufmann, Von Ledoux bis Le Corbusier: Ur sprung 
und Entivicklung der autonomen Architektur (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933) , p. 27. 

[r4,2] 

"Shortly after 1800, things were already so far along that the ideas which appear 
in Ledoux and Boullee — elemental outbursts of passionate natures — were heing 
propounded as official doctrine. . . . Only three decades separate the late work of 
Blondel, which still . . . embodies the teachings of French classicism, from the 
Precis des leqons d' architecture of Durand, whose thinking had a decisive 
influence during the Empire and in the period following. They are the three dec- 
ades of Ledoux's career. Durand, who announced the norm from his chair at the 
Ecole Royale Polytechnique in Paris, . . . diverges from Blondel on all essential 



points. His primer hegins . . . with violent attacks on two famous works of classic 
Baroque art. St. Peter's in Rome, along with its square, and the Paris Pantheon 
are invoked as counterexamples. . . . Whereas Blondel warns of 'monotonous 
planimetry' and would not he unmindful of the function of perspective, Durand 
sees in the elementary schemata of the plan the only correct solutions." Emil 
Kaufmann, Von Ledoux bis he Corbusier (Vienna and Leipzig, 1933), pp. 50-51. 

N,3] 

The institution of the Ponts et Chaussees <Civil Department of Bridges and High- 
ways) had the unique privilege of coining through the great Revolution nnc«n- 
tested. [r4a,l] 

The students of the Ecoli; Poly technique, according to Barthelemy: 

Glory to you, youths of banquets and darts! 
How we applauded in our poets' hearts 
When on the dusty street you took your stand, 
Elegantly dressed, with rifle in hand! 



Barthelemy and Mery, L 'Insurrection (Paris, 1830), p. 20. 



[r4a,2] 



FIRST SKETCHES 



First Sketches 

Paris Arcades <I> 



These early sketches for Tlie Arcades Project (Gesammelte Scltriflen, vol. 5 [Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 
1982], pp. 991-1038) were written by Benjamin in a bound notebook that contains various other 
notes and draf ts dating from mid-1927 to early 1930. Many of the sketches are crossed out in 
Benjamin's manuscript, presumably because in most cases they were revised and transf erred to the 
manuscript of the convolutes; these canceled sketches are printed here in a smaller typeske, with 
cross-references to the corresponding entries in the convolutes and early drafts. (Some of the uncan- 
celed sketches, in the larger typesize, were also transferred to the convolutes, and are accordingly 
cross-referenced.) Cross-references should not be considered exhaustive. The numbering here, as in 
"The Arcades of Paris," is that of the German editor and bears no relation to the numbering of the 
convolutes. The sign <x> indicates an illegible word. 



The asphalt roadway in the middle: teams of harnessed humans, human car- 
riages. Procession of human carriages. < A ° , 1 > 

The street that runs through houses. Track of a ghost through the walls of houses. <See 
L2,7> <A°,2> 

People who inhabit these arcades: the signboards with the names have nothing in com- 
mon with those thathangbeside respectable entryways. Rather, they recall the plaques on 
the railings of cages at the zoo, put there to indicate not so much the dwelling place as the 
name and origin of the captive animals. <See b°,2.> <A°,3> 

World of particular secret affinities: palm tree and feather duster, hairdryer and Venus de 
Milo, champagne bottles, prostheses, and letter-writing manuals, <broken off> <See a°,3 
andR2,3.> <A°,4> 

When, as children, we were made a present of those great encyclopedic works — 
World and Mankind or The Earth or the latest volume of the New Universe — 
wasn't it into the multicolored "Carboniferous Landscape" or "European Animal 
Kingdom of the Ice Age" that we plunged fir st of all, and weren't we, as though at 
first sight, drawn by an indeterminate affinity between the ichthyosaurs and 
bisons, the mammoths and the woodlands? Yet this same strange rapport and 
primordial relatedness is revealed in the landscape of an arcade. Organic world 
and inorganic world, abject poverty and insolent luxury enter into the most 
contradictory communication; the commodity intermingles and interbreeds as 
promiscuously as images in the most tangled of dreams. Primordial landscape of 
consumption. <See a°,3.> <A°,5> 



Trade and traffic are the two components of the street. Now, in the arcade the first of these 
<error, corrected in A3a,7> has all but died out: the traffic there is rudimentary. The 
arcade is a street of lascivious commerce only; it is wholly adapted to arousing desires. 
Thus, there is no mystery in the f act that whores feel spontaneously drawn there. Because 
in this street all the juices slow to a standstill, the commodity proliferates along the house 
fronts and enters into new and fantastic combinations, like the tissue in tumors. <A°,6> 

The will turns down the wide street into the teeth of pleasure and, as lust, drags 
with it into its gloomy bed whatever it finds in the way of fetish, talisman, and 
gage of fate across its path, drags with it the rotting debris of letters, kisses, and 
names. Love presses forward with the inquisitive fingers of desire down the 
winding street. Its way leads through the interior of the lover, which opens up to 
him in the image of the beloved who passes lightly before him. This image opens 
up his interior to him for the first time. For, as the voice of the truly beloved 
awakens in his heart an answering voice which he has never before heard in 
himself, the words which she speaks awaken in him thoughts of tliis new, much 
more hidden ego that reveals to him her image, while the touch of her hand 
awakens <broken off> <A°,7] 

Game in which children have to form a brief sentence out of given words. This 
game is seemingly played by the goods on display: binoculars and flower seeds, 
screws and musical scores, makeup and stuffed vipers, fur coats and revolvers. 

<A°,8> 

Maurice Renard, in his book Le Peril bleu, 1 has told how inhabitants of a distant planet 
come to study the Bora and fauna indigenous to the lower depths of the atmosphere — in 
other words, to the surface of the earth. These interplanetary travelers see in human 
beings the equivalent of tiny <?> deep-sea fish — that is to say, beings who live at the 
bottom of a sea. We no more f eel the pressure of the atmosphere than fish feel that of the 
water; this in no way alters the fact that both sets of creatures reside on an ocean floor. 
With the study of the arcades, a closely related reorientation in space is opened up. The 
street itself is thereby manifest as <x> well-worn interior: as living space of the collective, 
for true collectives as such inhabit the street. The collective is an eternally awake, eter- 
nally agitated being that — in the space between the building fronts — lives, experiences, 
understands, invents as much as individuals do within the privacy of their own four walls. 
For it, for this collective, enameled shop signs are a wall decoration as good as, if not 
better than, the inexpensive oleograph above the hearth. Walls with their "Post No Bills" 
are its writing desk, newspaper stands its libraries, display windows its glazed inaccessible 
armoires, mailboxes its bronzes, benches its bedroom furniture, and the cafe terrace is the 
balcony from which it looks down on its household. As with a railing where pavers hang 
their coats before going to work, the vestibule is the hidden gateway which gives onto a 
row of courtyards — is, for it, the corridor that daunts the stTangers and serves as the key 
to its dwelling. <See d°,l and M3a,4.> <A°,9> 

A factory of 5,000 workers for weddings and banquets. Attire for bride and groom. 
Birdseed in the fixative pans of a photographer's darkroom. — Mine, de Consolis, Ballet 
Mistress. Lessons, Classes, Routines. — Mme. de Zalma, Fortuneteller. Possession by spir- 
its, llusions, Secret Embraces. <See "Arcades" and a°,3.> <A*,10> 



Everywhere stockings play a starring role. They are found in the photographer's studio, 
then in a doll hospital, and, one day, on the side table of a tavern, watched over by a girl. 
<See "Arcades" and b°,l.> <A°,11> 

The arcade may be conceived as mineral spa <£runnen/i*lle>. Arcade myth, with legen- 
dary source. <See L2,6.> < A°,12> 

It is high rime the beauties of the nineteenth century were discovered. < A°,13> 

Arcade and railroad station: yes / Arcade and church: yes / Church and railroad station: 
Marseilles/ <A°,14> 

Poster and arcade: yes / Poster and building: no / Poster and <x>: open / <A°,15> 

Conclusion: erotic magic / Tune / Perspective / Dialetical reversal (commodity — type). 

<A°,16> 



There is, to speak once more of restaurants, a nearly infallible criterion for determining 
their rank. This is not, as one might readily assume, their price range. We find this 
unexpected criterion in the color of the sound that greets us when <brokenoff> <B°,1> 

The solemn, reflective, tranquil character of the Parisian mealtime is measured 
less by the particular dishes served than by the stillness that surrounds you in the 
restaurant, whether it be before uncovered tables and plain white walls or in a 
carpeted and richly furnished dining room. Nowhere does one find the hubbub 
of a Berlin restaurant, where patrons like to give themselves airs and where food 
is only a pretext or necessity. I know a shabby, dark room in the very middle of 
which, a few minutes past noon, milliners from nearby shops gather around long 
marble tables. They are the only customers, keeping quite to themselves, and 
they have little to say to one another during their short lunch break. And yet — it 
is merely a whispering, from which the clinking of knives and forks (refined, 
dainty, as though punctuated) continuously rises. In a "Chauffeurs' Rendez- 
vous," as the small bistros like to call themselves, a poet and tliinker can have his 
breakfast and, in an international company of Russian, Italian, and French taxi 
drivers, advance his thoughts a good distance. If he wants, however, to enjoy the 
undivided sociable silence of a public repast, he will not turn his steps toward any 
of die venerable old Paris restaurants, and still less toward one of the newer chic 
establishments; rather, he goes to seek out, in a remote quartier, the new Parisian 
mosque. There he finds, along with the indoor garden and its fountains, along 
with the obligatory bazaar full of carpets, fabrics, and copperware, three or four 
medium-sized rooms furnished with stools and divans and lit by hanging lamps. 
He must of course bid adieu not only to French cooking, which he exchanges for 
a choice Middle Eastern cuisine, but above all to French wines. Nevertheless, 
within months of its opening, the best Parisian society had already discovered the 
"secrets of the mosque" and now takes its coffee in the little garden, or a late 
supper in one of the adjoining rooms. <B°,2> 



If one wanted to characterize the inexhaustible charm of Paris in a few words, one could 
say that there is in this atmosphere a wisely apportioned mixture, such that <broken off > 

<B°,3> 

Cams on Paris, the atmosphere and its colors 2 / Paris as the city of painters / 
Ghirico: the palette of gray <see Dla,7 and Dla,8> <B°,4> 

Dreams vary according to where you are, what area and what street, but above 
all according to the time of year and the weather. Rainy weather in the city, in its 
thoroughly treacherous sweetness and its power to draw one back to the days of 
early childhood, can be appreciated only by someone who has grown up in the 
big city. It naturally evens out the day, and with rainy weather one can do the 
same thing day in, day out — play cards, read, or engage in argument — whereas 
sunshine, by contrast, shades the hours and is furthermore less friendly to the 
dreamer. In that case, one must get around the day from morning on; above all, 
one must get up early so as to have a good conscience for idleness. Ferdinand 
Hardekopf, the only honest decadent which German literature has produced, 
and whom I hold to be, of all the German poets now in Paris, the most unproduc- 
tive and the most able, has in his "Ode vom seligen Morgen" <Ode to Blessed 
Mormng>," : ' which he dedicated to Emmy Hennings, laid out for the dreamer the 
best precautions to be taken for sunny days. In the history of the pobtes maudits, 
the chapter describing their battle against the sun is yet to be written; the fogs of 
Paris, which is really what we are talking about here, were dear to Baudelaire 
<SeeDla,9.>. <B°,5> 



Every year, one hears it said that the last BastiJle Day did not measure up to 
previous ones. Unfortunately, and by way of exception, it was true this time. The 
reasons: First, the cool weather. Second, the city this year had refused to grant the 
usual funds to the holiday committee. Third, the franc has to some degree 
stabilized. 1 And everyone knows what a splendid basis for popular festivals a 
weakened currency is. Last year, when in July the franc was in the midst of a 
terrifi c slump, the currency communicated its impetuosity to the desperate pub- 
lic. People danced as they had seldom done before. At the streetcomers you 
could find the old image: long festoons of electric bulbs, platforms with musi- 
cians, crowds of the curious. But the dynamism of the tempos was undoubtedly 
weaker, and the drree-day-long festivities did not extend so late into the night as 
in years past. On the other hand, its aftereffect was longer. A small assemblage of 
booths, strolling confectioners, target-shooting <stands> <broken off> <C°,1> 

Death, the dialectical central station; fashion, measure o f time. <C°,2> 

In the first half of the previous century, theaters too, by preference, found a place 
in the arcades. In the Passage des Panoramas, the Theatre des Varietes stands 
next to the Children's Theater of M. Comte; 5 another theater, the Gymnase des 
Enf'ants, was located in the Passage de 1'Opera, where later on, around 1896, the 



commentating <?> naturalist theater of Chirac housed the Theatre de Verite, in 
which one-act plays were performed by a nude couple. Today, one still finds in 
the Passage Choiseul the Bouffes Parisiennes, and if the other theaters have had 
to close their doors, the small bare booths of the ticket agents open <something> 
like a secret passage to all theaters. But this gives no idea of how strict the 
correlation between arcade and theater originally was. Under — , it was the 
custom to name fancy-goods shops after the most snccessful vaudevilles of 
the season. And since such shops, by and large, made up the most elegant part 
of the arcades, the gallery was, in places, like the mockup of a theater. These 
magasins de nouveautes played a particular role here. <C°,3> 

Claretie speaks of the "stifled perspective" of certain pictures and compares it to 
the airlessness of the arcades. <See El,5.> But the perspective of the arcades can 
itself be compared to this "suffocated" perspective, which is precisely that of the 
stereoscope. The nineteenth century <broken off> <C°,4> 

Energies of repose (of tradition) which carry over from the nineteenth century. 
Transposed historical forces of tradition. What would the nineteenth century be 
to us if we were bound to it by tradition? How would it look as religion or 
mythology? We have no tactile <taktisc!t> relation to it. That is, we are trained to 
view things, in the historical sphere, from a romantic distance. To account for the 
directly transmitted inheritance is important. But it is still too early, for example, 
to form a collection. Concrete, materialistic deliberation on what is nearest is 
now required. "Mythology," as Aragon says, drives things back into the distance. 
Only the presentation of what relates to us, what conditions us, is important. The 
nineteenth century — to borrow the Surrealists' terms — is the set of noises that 
invades our dream, and which we interpret on awaking. <C°,5> 

A walk through Paris will begin with an aperitif — that is, between five and six 
o'clock. I would not tie you down to this. You can take one of the great railroad 
stations as your point of departure: the Gare du Nord, with trains leaving for 
Berlin; the Gare de l'Est, with departures for Frankfurt; the Gare Saint-Lazare, 
where you can take off for London; and the Gare de Lyon, with its <xxxx> into 
the P.L.M. If you want my advice, I'd recommend the Gare Saint-Lazare. There 
you have half of France and half of Europe around you; names like Le Havre, 
Provence, Rome, Amsterdam, Constantinople are spread through the street like 
sweet filling through a torte. It is the so-called Quartier Europe, in which the 
greatest cities of Europe have all commissioned a street as emblem of their 
prestige. A rather precise and rigorous etiquette prevails in this diplomatic corps 
of European streets. Each one is clearly set off against the others, and if they have 
some business to transact with one another — at the comers — they come together 
very courteously, without the slightest ostentation. A foreigner who was unaware 
of the fact would perhaps never notice that he was in a royal household here. 
Atop this particular throne, however, is the Gare Saint-Lazare itself, a robust and 
dirty sovereign lady, a clanging puffing princess of iron and smoke. <See Ll,4.> 
But we are by no means obliged to limit ourselves to railroad stations. Railroad 



stations make good starting points, but they also serve very well as destinations. 
Tfiink now of the city's squares. Here, certain distinctions are called for: some 
are without history and without name. Thus, there is the Place de la Bastille and 
the Place de la Republique, the Place de la Concorde and the Place Blanche, but 
there are also others whose designers are unknown, and whose names are often 
not to be found on any wall. These squares are lucky accidents, as it were, in the 
urban landscape; they do not enjoy the patronage of history like the Place 
Vendome or the Place de Greve, are not the result of long planning, but instead 
resemble architectural improvisations — those crowds of houses where the shabby 
buildings collide in a jumble. In these squares, the trees hold sway; here the 
smallest trees afford thick shade. At night, however, their leaves stand out against 
the gas-burning street lamps like transparent <x> fruits. These tiny hidden squares 
are the future <?> Gardens of the Hesperides. <See Pl,2.> Let us suppose, then, 
that at five o'clock we sit down to an aperitif on the Place Sainte Julie. Of one 
thing we may be sure: we will be the only foreigners and will have, perhaps, not 
even one Parisian near us. And should a neighbor present himself, he will most 
likely give the impression of being a provincial who has stopped in here at the 
end of the day to have a beer. Now, here we have a little secret password of 
freemasonry by which fanatical Paris-aficionados, French as well as foreign, rec- 
ognize one another. This word is "province." With a shrug of the shoulders, the 
true Parisian, though he may never travel out of the city for years at a stretch, 
refuses to live in <Paris>. Fie lives in the treiuhne or the deuxieme or the dix- 
huitieme; not in Paris but in bis arrandissement — in the third, seventh, or twentieth. 
And this is the provinces. Here, perhaps, is die secret of the gentle hegemony 
which the city maintains over France: in the heart of its neighborhoods, and <that 
is to say, its> provinces, it has welcomed the other into itself, and so possesses 
more provinces than the whole of France. For it would be foolish to depend on 
the bureaucratic division into arrandissement s here: Paris has more than twenty of 
them and comprises a multitude of towns and villages. A young Parisian author, 
Jacques de Lacretelle, has recently taken as the theme of his dreamy <?> flanerie 
this quest for the secret Parisian districts, provinces, arrondissements, and has 
offered a description of a reveur parisien <Parisian dreamer> that teaches us a great 
deal in twenty pages. 6 Paris has its South, with its Riviera and sandy beach where 
new construction plays; it has its foggy, rainy Breton coast on the banks of the 
Seine <?>, its Burgundian market corner not far from the Hotel de Ville, and its 
harbor alleys of ill fame out of Toulon and Marseilles — naturally not on the knoll 
of Montmartre but just behind the respectable Place Saint-Michel, There are 
other spots that look as though, on the photo of a <broken off> <C°,6> 

And to have missed the onset of evening, with the question confided from the 
heart of the hour, is proof of a successful, abundant Parisian afternoon, which is 
much too beautiful to be merely a vestibule of the Moulin Rouge. On another 
occasion in nocturnal Paris, we will make sure to take our <x> only after dinner. 

<C°,7> 



Surrealism — "wave of dreams" — new art of flaneiie. New nineteenth-century 
past — Paris its classic locale. Here, fashion has opened the place of dialectical 
exchange between woman and ware. The clerk, death, tall and loutish, measures 
the century by the yard, serves as mannequin himself to save costs, and manages 
single-handedly the "liquidation" that in French is called "revolution." <See f °,1 
and Bl,4.> And all this we know only since yesterday. We look on the empty 
offices, and where <?> yesterday there was <?>... a room. <D°,1> 

Fashion was never any tiling other than: provocation of death through the woman. Here, 
with the victory of death, this provocation has ended. Deadi has erected the armature of 
the whores as a pallid battle memorial on the banks of the new Lethe, which as river of 
asphalt nins through the arcades. <See f°,l and Bl,4.> <D°,2> 

And nothing at all of what we are saying here actually existed. None of it has ever 
lived — as surely as a skeleton has never lived, but only a man. As surely, how- 
ever, <broken off> <D*,3 > 

Being past, being no more, is passionately at work in things. To this the historian 
trusts for his subject matter. He depends on this force, and knows things as they 
are at the moment of their ceasing to be. Arcades are such monuments of being- 
no-more. And the energy that works in them is dialectics. The dialectic takes its 
way through the arcades, ransacking them, revolutionizing them, turns them 
upside down and inside out, converting them, since they no longer remain what 
they are, from abodes of luxury to <x>. And nothing of them lasts except tire 
name: passages. And: Passage du Panorama <sic>. In the inmost recesses of these 
names the upheaval is working, and therefore we hold a world in the names of 
old streets, and to read the name of a street at night is like undergoing a transfor- 
mation <?>. <D',4> 



Fashion as parody of the 
(motley) cadaver 



Fashion a dialogue with the 
body, even with putrefaction. 



Mold in which modernity is 

cast 



Surrealism 

Primal landscape of consumption / Colors 

Inhabitants 

Inner spaces 

Dialectical reversal / Paris dolls 

Interieur I Salon 

Mirror / Perspective 

Theaters / Dioramas 

M*,g*si?is de nouveautes I Guides to Paris 

Fashion / Time 

Lethe (modern) 



Street as interior / the sitting room / the dialectical reversal 
Last refuge of the commodity 



<D°,5> 



All this is the arcade in our eyes. And it was nothing of all this earlier. <See a°,2 
and C2a,9.> So long as the gas lamps, even the oil lamps were burning in them, 
the arcades were fairy palaces. But if we want to diink of them at the height of 
their magic, we must call to mind the Passage des Panoramas around 1870 <?>: on 
one side, there was gaslight; on the other, oil lamps still flickered. The decline sets 
in with electric lighting. Fundamentally, however, it was no decline but, properly 
speaking, a reversal. As mutineers, after plotting for days on end, take possession 
of a fortified site, so the commodity by a lightning stroke seized power over the 
arcades. Only then came the epoch of commercial firms and figures. The inner 
radiance of the arcades faded with the blaze of electric lights and withdrew into 
their names. But their name was now like a filter which let through only the most 
intimate, the bitter essence of what had been. (This strange capacity for distilling 
the present, as inmost essence of what has been, is, for true travelers, what gives 
to the name its exciting and mysterious potency.) <*°,6> 

Architecture as the most important testimony to latent "mythology." And the 
most important architecture of the nineteenth century is the arcade. — The effort 
to awaken from a dream as the best example of dialectical reversal. Difficulty of 
this dialectical technique. <D°,7> 



Lorgnette dealer. <E°,1> 

In 1893 the arcades were closed to cocottes. <See Hl,4.> <E°,2> 

Music in the arcades. "Lanterne magiqite! Piece airieiise?' With this cry, a peddler would 
travel through the streets and, at a wave of the hand, step up into dwellings where he 
operated his lantern. The affiche for the first exhibition of posters characteristically dis- 
plays a magic lantern. <See Q2,3.> <E°,3> 

Rage for tortoises in 1839. Tempo of flanerie in the arcades. <See D2a,l.> <E°,4> 

Names of magasins de nouveautes (most derived from successful vaudevilles): La Fille 
d'Honneur, La Vestale, Le Page Inconstant, Le Masque de Fer, Le Coin de la Rue, La 
Lampe Merveilleuse, Le Petit Chaperon Rouge <Little Red Riding Hood>, Petite Nanette, 
Chaumiere Allemande <German Cottage>, Mamelouk. <See Al,2.> <E°,5> 

Sign above a confectioner's shop: "Aux Armes de Werther." A glover's: "Au Ci-Devant 
Jeune Homme" <The Ci-Devant Young Man>. <See Al,2.> <E*,6> 

Olympia — continuation of the street. 7 Kinship with the arcade. <E°,7> 

Musee Grevin: Cabinet des Mirages. Representation of a connection between 
temple, railroad station, arcades, and market halls where tainted (phosphores- 
cent) meat is sold. Opera in the arcade. Catacombs in the arcade. <E*,8> 



In 1857 the first electric streetlights in Paris (near the Louvre). <See Tl,4.> <E°,9> 



Impasse Maubert, formerly d'Amboise. Around 1756, at Nos. 4-6, a poisoner resided 
with her two assistants. All three were found dead one morning — killed through inhala- 
tion of toxic Rimes. <See Ala,8.> <E°,10> 



In the Passage de la Reunion there was once a courtyard; in the sixteenth cen- 
tury, it was a meeting place for thieves. At the beginning of the nineteenth or end 
of the eighteenth century, a dealer in muslins (wholesale) sets up shop in the 
arcade. <E°,11> 

Two pleasure districts in 1799: the Goblentz 8 (for returning emigres) and the 
Temple. <E°,12> 

Le Charivari of 1836 has an illustration showing a poster diat covers half a housefront. 
The windows are left uncovered, except for one, it seems, out of which a man is leaning 
while cutting away the obstructing piece of paper. <See G3,6.> <E°, 1 3 > 

Originally gas was delivered to fashionable establishments in containers for daily con- 
sumption. <SeeT 1,5. > <E°,14> 

Thurn <?> as georama in the Galerie Colbert <E°,15> 

Felicien David, Le Desert (performed before <by?> Arabs), Christoplw Colomb (panorama 
music). <See Hl,5.> <E°,16> 

Passage du Pont-Neuf: described in Zola's Therese Raquin, right at the beginning 
(identical with the earlier Passage Henri IV <?>*). <E°,17> 

Elie Nachmeron <?> / Arcades: Bois-de-Boulogne (today: ),'" Caire, Commerce, 
Grosse-Tete, Reunion. < E ° , 1 8 > 

"Winter, with the famed warmth of lamps ..." Paul de Kock, La Grande Ville, 
vol.4. <E*,19> 

Paul de Kock: "numerals of fire" on the fronts of gambling houses. <E°,20> 

Passage Vivieiine — sculptures at the entrance representing allegories of com- 
merce. In an inner courtyard, on a pedestal, a copy of a Greco-Roman Mercury. 

<E°,21> 

"tears of industrial growth under Louis XVIII. <See Ala,9.> <E°,22> 

Louis Philippe drives out prostitution from the Palais-Royal, closes the gambling 
houses. <E°,23> 

Setup of the panoramas: view from a raised platform, surrounded by a balustrade, of 
surfaces lying round about and beneath. The painting nms along a cylindrical wall 
approximately a hundred meters long and twenty meters high. The principal panoramas 
of Prevost (the great painter of panoramas) : Paris, Toulon, Rome, Naples, Amsterdam, 



Tilsit, Wagram, Calais, Antwerp, London, Florence, Jerusalem, Athens. Among his pu- 
pils, Daguerre. <See Qla,l.> <E°,24> 

Site of the Passage du Caire in the notorious "Cour des Miracles" (see Hugo, Notre-Dame 
de Paris) . It was called the "court of miracles" because the beggars who made this place 
their guild hall shed their feigned infirmities there. <See A3a,6.> <E°,25> 

February 12, 1790: execution of the Marquis de Favras (accused of counterrevolutionary 
conspiracy). The Place de Greve and the scaffold decked with Chinese lanterns. <See 
Tla,9.> <E°,26> 

A Strasbourg piano manufacturer, Schmidt, made the first guillotine. <E°,27> 

Georama in the fourteenth arrondissement. Small nature-replica of France. <See Q2,4.> 

<E°,28> 

Passage Vivienne the "solid" arcade, in contrast to the Passage des Panoramas. No luxury 
shops in the former. Businesses in the Passage des Panoramas: Restaurant Veron, Mar- 
quis Chocolates, lending library, music shop, caricaturist, Theatre des Varietes (tailors, 
bootmakers, haberdashers, wine merchants, hosiers). <See A2,l.> <E°,29> 

The perspective of the opera in the Musee Grevin (on the Passage de l'Opera, compare Le 
Fantdme de l'Opera). 11 <E°,30> 

The (caricaturist?) Aubert in the Passage Vero-Dodat. Marble pavement! 

<E°,31> 

Roi-Macon <Mason King> — nickname of Louis Philippe. <See Ela,l.> <E°,32> 

In 1863 Jacques Fabien publishes Paris en songe <Paris in a Dream. > He explains there how 
electricity causes multiple blindings through excess of light, and induces madness because 
of the tempo of news services. <See B2,l.> <E°,33> 

Names of jewelers written in false gemstones above their shops. <See Al,2.> <E°,34> 

Transition from boutique to magasin. The shopkeeper buys provisions for a week and 
withdraws to the entresol. <See Al,3.> <E°,35> 

In great vogue around 1820: cashmere. <E°,36> 

Origin of the magic lantern. Inventor, Athanasius Kircher. <E°,37> 

In 1757, there were only three cafes in Paris. <See D3a,L> <E°,38> 

Identify the frontispiece to volume 1 of L'Hermite de la Chausse'e d'Antin (Paris, 
1813)." <E°,39> 



"Praise God and all my shops" — saying attributed to Louis Philippe. <E°,40> 



Rachel resided in the Passage Vero-Dodat. <See Ala,4.> <E°,41 > 

84 Rue Franciade, "Passage du Desir," which in the old days led to a lieu galant. 
<See A6a,4.> <E°,42> 

The panoramas in the Passage des Panoramas were closed in 183 1 . <E°,43> 

Gutzkow reports that the exhibition salons were full of oriental scenes calculated to arouse 
enthusiasm for Algiers. <See I2,2.> <E°,44> 

Query for the arcades project. 

Does plush first appear under Louis Philippe? <E°,45> 

What is a "drawer play"? (Gutzkow, Briefe aus Paris, vol. 1, p. 84) — {piece k 
tiroirs?)" <E°,46> 

At what tempo did changes in fashion take place in earlier times? <E°,47> 

Find out the meaning of bee de gaz u in argot and where it comes from. <E°,48> 

Read up on the manufacture of mirrors. <E D ,49> 

When did it become customary to give streets names that had no intrinsic rela- 
tion to them but were meant to commemorate a famous man, and so forth? 

<E°,5I> 

Difference between passage and cite? <E Q ,5 1 > 

Early writings on iron construction, technology of factory construction, and so 
on? <E°,52> 

What is an astral lamp? Invented in 1809 by Bordin-Marrell <?>. 15 <E°,53> 

What are the atmospherical railroads of Vallance? 10 <E°,54> 

Where does the citation of Apollinaire in Crevel come from? 17 <E°,55> 

Where is Picabia's proposal taken from — that of letting two mirrors face and look 
into each other? Likewise cited in Crevel. As epigraph to the section on mirrors. 

<E°,56> 

Information about the construction of the Carcel lamp, in which a clockwork mechanism 
drives the oil from below up into the wick, whereas in the Argand lamp (quinquef) the oil 
drips out of a reservoir into the wick from above, producing a shadow. <See Tla,7.> 

<E°,57> 

Where did Charles Nodier write against gas lighting? 18 <E° ,58> 



What is line psyche? 



<E°,59>. 



The city made of markets. Thus Riga, when viewed from the other side of the 
river in the evening light, looks like a warehouse. When multicolored clouds 
gather over the ocean, Chinese legend says the gods are coming together to hold 
a market. They name this phenomenon hai-thi, or the sea-market. <F°, 1 > 

Comparison of the arcades to the indoor arenas in which one learned to ride a bicycle. In 
these halls the figure of the woman assumed its most seductive aspect: as cyclist. That is 
how she appears on contemporary posters. Cheret as painter of this feminine pulchritude. 
<SeeBl,2.> ' ' * <F°,2> 

Music in arcades. It seems to have settled into these spaces only with the decline of die 
arcades — that is to say, only with the advent of mechanical music. (Gramophone. The 
"theatrophone" in certain respects its forerunner.) Nevertheless, there was music drat 
conf ormed to the spirit of the arcades — a panoramic music, such as can be heard today 
only in old-fashioned genteel concerts like those of the casino orchestra in Monte Carlo: 
the panoramic compositions of David (Le Desert, Herculanum). <See Hl,5.> <F°,3> 

The nine <sic> muses of Surrealism: Luna, Geo de Merode, Kate Greenaway, Mors, 
Friederike Kempner, Baby Cadum, Hedda Gabler, Libido, Angelika Kauff maim, Count- 
ess Geschwitz. 20 <F°,4> 



Amid the smoke of batde, on the printed picture sheets, is smoke in which spirits rise 
(from the Thousand and One Niglits) . <See D2a,8.> <F°,5> 

There is a wholly unique experience <Eifakitng> of dialectic. The compelling — the dras- 
tic — experience, which refutes everything "gradual" about becoming and shows all seem- 
ing "development" to be dialectical reversal, eminendy and thoroughly composed, is the 
awakening from dream. For the dialectical schematism at die core of this magic process, 
the Chinese have found, in their fairy tales and novellas, the most radical expression. 
Accordingly, we present die new, the dialectical method of doing history: with the inten- 
sity of a dream, to pass through what has been, in order to experience the present as die 
waking world to which the dream refers! (And every dream refers to the waking world. 
Everything previous is to be penetrated historically.) <See h°,4 and Kl ,3.> <F°,6> 

Awakening as a graduated process that goes on in the life of the individual as in that of the 
generation. Sleep its initial stage. A generation's experience of youth has much in com- 
mon with the experience <Erfahrung> of dreams. Its historical configuration is a dream- 
configuration. Every epoch has such a side turned toward dreams, the child's side. For the 
previous century, it is the arcades. But whereas the education of earlier generations 
explained these dreams for them in terms of tradition, of religious doctrine, present-day 
education simply amounts to the "distraction" of children. What follows here is an 
experiment in the technique of awakening. The dialectical — the Copemican — turn of 
remembrance <Wendungdes Eingedenhe?is> (Bloch). <See h°,4 and KI,1.> <F°,7> 

Boredom and dust. Dream a garment one cannot turn. On the outside, the gray boredom 
(of sleep). Sleep state, hypnotic, of the dusty figures in the Musee Grevin. A sleeper is not 



a good subject for wax. Boredom <Langeweile> is always the external surface of uncon- 
scious events. Therefore, it could appear to the great dandies as a mark of distinction. For 
it is precisely <?> the dandy who despises new clothing: whatever he wears must appear 
slightly frayed. As opposed to a theory of dreams that would reveal to us "psyches," the 
world that comes to seem pointless. What about it? <See e°,2 and D2a,2.> <F°,8> 

Arcades: houses, passages, having no outside. Like the dream. <See Lla,l.> <F D ,9> 

Catalogxie of muses: Luna, Countess Geschwitz, Kate Greenaway, Mors, Cleo de 
Merode, Dulcinea <variant: Hedda Gabler>, Libido, Baby Cadum, and Friederike 
Kempner. <See Cl,3.> <F°,10> 

And boredom is the grating before which the courtesan teases death. <See B1,L> 

<F°,11> 

There are, at bottom, two sorts of philosophy and two ways of noting down 
thoughts. One is to sow them in the snow — or, if you prefer, in the Ere clay — of 
pages; Saturn is the reader to contemplate their increase, and indeed to harvest 
their flower (the meaning) or their fruit (the verbal expression) . The other way is 
to bury them with dignity and erect as sepulcher above their grave the image, the 
metaphor — cold and barren marble. 21 <F°,12> 

Most bidden aspect of the big cities: this historical object, the new metropolis, with its 
uniform streets and endless rows of houses, has given material existence to those architec- 
tures of which the ancients dreamed — the labyrinths. Man of the crowd. Impulse that 
turns the big cities into a labyrinth. Fulfilled through die covered passageways of the 
arcades. <See M6a,4.> <F°,13> 

Perspective: plush for silk <?>. Plush the material of the age of Louis Philippe. <See El,7> 

<F°,14> 

Self -photography and the unrolling of the lived life before the dying. Two kinds of 
memory (Proust). <See H5,l and K8a,l.> Relationship of this kind of memory with the 
dream. <F°,15> 

Hegel: in itself — for itself — in and for itself. In the PhMnomenologie, these stages of 
the dialectic become consciousness — self-consciousness — reason. < F° , 1 6 > 

Gamut i n the word passage. <F° , 1 7 > 

"Rainshowers have given birth to many adventures." 22 Diminishing magical power of the 
rain. Mackintosh. <SeeDl,7> <F°,18> 

What the big city of modern times has made of the ancient conception of the 
labyrinth. It has raised it, through the names of streets, into the sphere of lan- 
guage, raised it from out of the network of streets in which the city <x> designated 
<x> within language <x>. <F° , 1 9 > 



What was otherwise reserved for only a very few words — a privileged caste of words, the 
names — the city has made possible for all words, or at least a great many: to be elevated 
to the noble status of name. And this supreme revolution in language was carried out by 
what is most general: the street. And a vast order appears in the fact that all names in the 
cities run into one another without exercising any influence <?> on one another. Even 
those much-overused names of great men, already half -congealed into concepts, here once 
more pass through a filter and regain the absolute; through its street names, the city is 
image of a linguistic cosmos. <See P3,5.> <F°,20> 

Only the meeting of two different street names makes for the magic of the 
"corner." <F°,21> 

Names of streets written vertically (when? <x> book? a t any rate German) . On 
the invasion of the letters. <F°,22> 

The structure of books like La Grande Ville, Le Diable a Paris, Les Frangau peinls par 
eux-memes is a literary phenomenon that corresponds to the stereoscopes, panoramas, and 
so fordi. <See Q2,6.> <F°,23> 

The true has no windows. Nowhere does the true look out to the universe. And the 
interest of the panorama is in seeing the true city. "The city in the bottle" — the city 
indoors. What is found within the windowless house is the true. One such windowless 
house is the theater; hence the eternal pleasure it affords. Hence, also, the pleasure taken 
in those windowless rotundas, the panoramas. In the theater, after the beginning of the 
performance, the doors remain closed. Those passing through arcades are, in a certain 
sense, inhabitants of a panorama. The windows of this house open out on them. They can 
be seen out these windows but cannot themselves look in. <See Q2a,7> <F°,24> 

Paintings of foliage in the Bibliotheque Nationale. This work was done in . . . <F°,25> 

With the dramatic signboards of the magadns de noitveaittes, "art enters the service of the 
businessman." <SeeAla,9.> <F°,26> 

Persian fashion makes its appearance in the mania for magasins. <F°,27> 
Fate of street names in die vaults of the Metro. <See P2,3.> <F°,28> 

On the peculiarly voluptuous pleasure in naming streets. <See PI ,8.> Jean Brunet, 
Le Messianisme, organisation generale Paris: Sa constitution generale, part 1 (Paris, 
1858). "Rue du Senegal," "Place d'Afrique." <See Pla,3.> In this connection, 
something on the Place du Maroc. <See Pla,2.> Monuments are sketched out in 
this book, too. <F°,29> 

Red lights marking the entrance to the underworld of names. Link between 
name and labyrinth in the Metro. <See Gla,2.> <F°,30> 



Cashier as Danae. <See Cl,4.> 



<F°,31> 



The true expressive character of street names can be recognized as soon as they are set 
beside reformist proposals for their normalization. <See P2,4.> <F°,32> 



Proust's remarks on the Rue de Parme and the Rue du Bac. 23 <F°,33> 

At the conclusion of Matiere et me moire, Bergson develops the idea that perception is a 
function of time. If, let us say, we were to live more calmly, according to a different 
rhythm, there would be nothing "subsistent" for us, but instead everything would happen 
right before our eyes; everytliing would strike us. But this is precisely what occurs in 
dreams. In order to understand die arcades from the ground up, we sink them into the 
deepest stratum of the dream; we speak of them as though they had struck us. A collector 
looks at things in much the same way. Things come to strike the great collector. How he 
himself pursues and encounters them, what changes in the ensemble of items are effected 
by a newly supervening item — all this shows him his affairs dissolved in constant flux, like 
realities in the dream. <See Hla,5.> <F°,34> 

Until ca. 1870 the carriage ruled. FlSneiie, on foot, took place principally in the arcades. 
<SeeAla,l.> <F°,35> 

Rhythm of perception in the dream: story of the three trolls. <F°, 36> 



"He explains that the Rue Grange-Bateliere is particularly dusty, that one gets terribly 
grubby in the Rue Reaumur." Aragon, Paysan de Paris (Paris, 1926), p. 88. 24 <See Dla,2.> 

<G°,1> 

"The coarsest hangings plastering the walls of cheap hotels will deepen into 
splendid dioramas." Baudelaire, Paradis artificiels, p. 72. 25 <G°,2> 

Baudelaire on allegory (very important!), Paradis artificiels, p. 73. 2!i <G°,3> 

"It has often happened to me to note certain trivial events passing before my eyes 
as showing a quite original aspect, in which I fondly hoped to discern the spirit of 
the period. 'This,' I would tell myself, 'was bound to happen today and could not 
have been other than it is. It is a sign of the times.' Well, nine times out of ten, I 
have come across the very same event with analogous circumstances in old 
memoirs or old history books." A. France, Le Jardin d'Epicure, p. 113. 27 <See 
Sl,2.> <G°,4> 

The figure of the flaneur. He resembles the hashish eater, takes space up into 
himself like the latter. In hashish intoxication, the space starts winking at us: 
"What do you think may have gone on here?" And with the very same question, 
space accosts the flaneur. <See Mla,3.> In no other city can he answer it as 
precisely as he can here. For of no other city has more been written, and more is 
known here about certain stretches of the city's streets than elsewhere about the 
history of entire countries. <G°,5> 



Death and fashion. Rilke, thepassage from the Duineser Elegien. 29 <G°,6> 

Characteristic ofjugendstil are posters with full-length figures. So long asjugend- 
stil lasted, man refused to grant a place to things on the giant silver surface of the 
mirror, and claimed it for himself alone. <G°,7> 

Definition of the "modem" as the new in the context of what has always already been 
there. <See Sl,4.> <G°,8> 

"The clever Parisians . . . , in order to disseminate their fashions more easily, made use of 
an especially conspicuous reproduction of their new creations — namely tailors' dum- 
mies. . . . These dolls, which still enjoyed considerable importance in the seventeenth and 
eighteenth centuries, were given to little girls as playthings when their career as fashion 
figurines had ended." Karl Grober, Kinder spieheug cms alter ^eit (Berlin, 1927), pp. 31-32. 
<SeeZl,l.> * <G°,9> 

Perspective in the course of centuries. Baroque galleries. Scenography in the 
eighteenth century. <G°,10> 

Play on words with "-rama" (on the model of "diorama") in Balzac at the beginning of 
Rre Goriot. <See Ql ,6.> <G°,11> 

Riickert: virgin forests in miniature. <G°,12> 

To cultivate fields where, until now, only madness has reigned. Forge ahead with the 
whetted axe of reason, looking neither right nor left so as not to succumb to the horror 
that beckons from deep in the primeval forest. But every ground must at some point have 
been turned over by reason, must have been cleared of the undergrowth of delusion and 
myth. This is to be accomplished here for the terrain of the nineteenth century. <See 
Nl,4.> <G°,13> 

Microcosmic journey which the dreamer makes through the regions of his own body. For 
he has this in common with the madman: the noises emanating from within the body, 
which for the salubrious individual converge in a steady surge of health and bring on 
sound sleep if they are not overlooked, dissociate for the one who dreams. Blood pres- 
sure, intestinal chum, heartbeat, muscle sensations become individually perceptible for 
him and demand the explanation which delusion or dream image holds ready. This 
sharpened receptivity is a feature of the dreaming collective, which settles into the arcades 
as into the insides of its own body. We must follow in its wake in order to expound the 
nineteenth century as its dream vision. 29 <See Kl,4.> <G°,14> 

Rustling in the painted foliage under the vaulted ceilings of the Bibliothe^ue Nationale — 
produced by the many pages continually leafed through in the books here. <See S3,3.> 

<G°,15> 

Heathscape, all remains ever new, ever the same (Kafka, Der Prozeft). <See Sl,4.> 

<G°,16> 



Modernity, the time of hell. The punislnnents of hell are always the newest thing going in 
this domain. What is at issue is not that "the same thing happens over and over" (much 



less is it a question here of eternal return), but rather that the face of the world, the 
colossal head, precisely in what is newest never alters — that this "newest" remains, in 
every respect, the same. This constitutes die eternity of hell and the sadist's delight in 
iimovation. To detennine the totality of traits which define this "modernity" is to repre- 
sent hell. <See Sl,5.> <G°,17> 

Rejugendstil: Peladan. <SeeJ18,6.> <G°,18> 

Careful investigation into the relation between the optics of the myriorama and 
the time of the modern, of the newest. They are related, certainly, as the funda- 
mental coordinates of this world. It is a world of strict discontinuity; what is 
always again new is not something old that remains, or something past that 
recurs, but one and the same crossed by countless intermittences. (Thus, the 
gambler lives in intermittence.) Intermittence means that every look in space 
meets with a new constellation. Intermittence the measure of time in film. And 
what follows from this : time of hell, and the chapter on origin in die book on 
Baroque. 30 <G°,19> 

All true insight forms an eddy. To swim in time against the direction of the 
swirling stream. Just as in art, the decisive thing is: to brush nature against the 
gram. <G°,20> 

Perspectival character of the crinoline, with its manifold flounces. In earlier times, at least 
six petticoats were worn underneath. <See El,2.> <G°,21> 

Wilde's Salome— Jugendstil — for the first time, the cigarette. Lethe flows in the 
ornaments ofjugendstil. <G°,22> 

"The Gum-Resin Boll." Rilke's piece on dolls. 31 <G°,23> 

Glass over oil paintings — only in the nineteenth century? <G°,24> 

Physiology of beckoning. The nod of the gods (see introduction to Heinle's 
papers). 32 Waving from die mail coach, to the organic rhythm of the trotting 
horses. The senseless, desperate, cutting wave from the departing train. Waving 
has gone astray in the railroad station. On the other hand, the wave to strangers 
passing by on a moving train. This above all with children, who are waving to 
angels when they wave to the noiseless, unknown, never-returning people. (Of 
course, they are also saluting the passing train.) <G°,25> 

Orpheus, Eurydice, Hermes at the train station. Orpheus the one who stays 
behind. Eurydice in the midst <?> of kisses. Hermes the statiomnaster with his 
signal disk. <See Ll,4.> This a neoclassical motif. With the neoclassicism of 
Cocteau, Stravinsky, Picasso, Chirico, and others, it has this in common: the 
transitional space of awakening in which we now are living is, wherever possible, 
traversed by gods. This traversal of space by gods is to be understood as light- 
ning-like. And only certain of the gods may be thought of here. Above all, 



Hermes, the masculine god. It is characteristic that, in neoclassicism, the muses 
who are so important for classical humanism mean nothing whatsoever. More- 
over, there is much in Proust that belongs in the contexts of neoclassicism : names 
of gods. Also, the significance of homosexuality in Proust can be grasped from 
this perspective alone. More generally, the progressive leveling of the difference 
between masculine and feminine elements in love belongs in this space. But what 
is important above all in Proust is the stake which the entire work has in the 
supremely dialectical dividing point of life: waking up. Proust begins with a 
presentation of the space of someone awakening. — Where neoclassicism is basi- 
cally lacking is in the fact that it builds an architecture for the gods passing by 
which denies the fundamental relations of their coming-to-appearance. (A bad, 
reactionary architecture.) <G°,26> 

It is one of the tacit suppositions of psychoanalysis that a clear-cut distinction between 
sleeping and waking has no value for the human being or for the empirical impressions of 
consciousness in general, but yields before an unending variety of conscious states deter- 
mined, in each case, by the level of wakefulness of all psychic and corporeal centers. This 
thoroughly fluctuating situation of a consciousness each time manifoldly divided between 
waking and sleeping has to be transferred from the individual to the collective. Once this 
is done, it becomes clear that, for the nineteenth century, houses are the dream configura- 
tions of its deepest level of sleep. <See K.l,5.> <G°,27> 



All collective architecture of the nineteenth century constitutes the house of the 
dreaming collective. < H ° , 1 > 

Railroad-station dreamworld of departure (sentimentality). <H°,2> 

Continuous assimilation of the various architectural capsules to forms of the 
dream house. <H°,3> 

Terrestrial atmosphere as undersea. <H°,4> 

Line of men around the woman to whom they are paying court. Train of suitors. 

<H°,5> 

Esprit de masque — when did this expression come into use? <H°,6> 

Collapse of the iron market-hall of Paris in 1842. <H°,7> 

Dennery, Kaspar Hauser, Marechal Ney, Le Naufrage de La Perouse (1859). Le Tremblement 
de terre de la Martinique (1843), BoMmiens de Paris (1843). <See Yla,6.> 

<IP,8> 

Louis-Francois Clairville, Les Sept Chateaux du diable (1844), Les Pommes de terre malades 
(1845), Rothomago (1862), Cendrillon (1866). <See Yla,6.> <H°,9> 



Duveyrier. <See Yla,6> 



<H U ,10> 



Dartois. <See Yla,6.> 



<H°,11> 



Specialty as a criterion for the fundamental <?> differentiation of items displayed accord- 
ing to the interests of buyers and collectors. Here is the historical-materialist key to genre 



Wiertz the painter of the arcades: The Premature Burial, The Suicide, The Burnt 
Child, Woman Reading a Novel, Hunger Madness and Crime, Thoughts and Visions of 
a Severed Head, The lighthouse of Golgotha, One Second lifter Death, The Might 
of Man Knows Mo Bounds, The Last Cannon (in this picture: airships and steam- 
powered dirigibles as the harbingers of achieved peace!). With Wiertz, "optical 
illusions." Under The Triumph of Light: "lb be reproduced on an innnense scale." 
A contemporary regrets that Wiertz was not given, say, "railway stations" to 
decorate. <H°,13> 

To render the image of those salons where the gaze was enveloped i n billowing drapery, 
where church doors opened within full-length mirrors and settees were gondolas in the 
eyes of those who sat there, on whom the gaslight from a vitreous globe shone down like 
the moon. <See 11,8. > <H°,14> 

Important is the twofold character of the gates in Paris: border gates and triumphal 
arches. <See C2a,3.> <H°,15> 

On the rhythm of today, which determines this work. Very characteristic is the 
opposition, in film, between the downright jerky rhythm of the image sequence, 
which satisfies the deep-seated need of this generation to see the "flow" of "devel- 
opment" disavowed, and the continuous musical accompaniment, lb root out 
every trace of "development" from the image of history and to represent becom- 
ing — through the dialectical rupture between sensation and tradition — as a con- 
stellation in being: that is no less the tendency of this project. <H°,16> 

Delimitation of the tendency of this project with respect to Aragon: whereas Aragon 
persists within the realm of dream, here the concern is to find the constellation of awaken- 
ing. While in Aragon there remains an impressionistic element, namely, the "mythology" 
(and this impressionism must be held responsible for the many vacuous pbilosophemes in 
his book) , here it is a question of the dissolution of "mythology" into the space of history. 
That, of course, can happen only through the awakening of a not-yet-conscious knowl- 
edge of what has been. <See Nl,9.> <H°,17> 

Interiors of our childhood days as laboratories for the demonstration of ghostly 
phenomena. Experimental relations. The forbidden book. Tempo of reading: 
two anxieties, on different levels, vie with one another. The bookcase with the 
oval panes from which it was taken. Vaccination with apparitions. The other 
prophylaxis: "optical illusions." <H°,18> 



painting. <See A2,6 



and I2a,7> 



<H°,12> 



The writings of the Surrealists treat words like trade names and form texts that in reality 
act as prospectus for enterprises not yet off the ground. Nesting in the trade names are 
qualities that in earlier ages were looked for in the oldest words. <See Gla,2.> <H°,19> 

Daumier <?>, Grandville— Wiertz— <H°,20> 



F. Ih. Vischer, Mode und Zymsmus (Stuttgart, 1879). <I°,1> 

Uprising of the anecdotes. The epochs, currents, cultures, movements always concern the 
bodily life in one and the same, identical fashion. There has never been an epoch that did 
not feel itself to be "modern" in the sense of most eccentric, and suppose itself to be 
standing directly before an abyss. A desperately clear consciousness of gathering crisis is 
something chronic in humanity. Every age unavoidably seems to itself a new age. But the 
"modernity" that concerns men with respect to the bodily is as varied in its meaning as 
the different aspects of one and the same kaleidoscope. — The constructions of history are 
comparable to instructions that commandeer the tine life and confine it to barracks. On 
the other hand: the street insurgence of the anecdote. The anecdote brings things near to 
us spatially, lets them enter our life. It represents the strict antithesis to the sort of history 
which demands "empathy," which makes everything abstract. "Empathy": tins is what 
newspaper reading terminates in. The true method of making things present is: to represent 
them in our space (not to represent ourselves in their space). Only anecdotes can do this 
for us. Thus represented, the tilings allow no mediating construction from out of "large 
contexts." — It is, in essence, the same with the aspect of great things from the past — the 
cathedral of Chartres, the temple of Paestum: to receive them into our space (not to feel 
empathy with their builders or their priests) . We don't displace our being into theirs: they 
step into our life. — The same technique of nearness may be observed, calendrically, with 
regard to epochs. Let us imagine that a man dies on the very day he turns fifty, which is 
the day on which his son is born, to whom the same thing happens, and so on. The result 
would be: since the birth of Christ, not forty men have lived. Purpose of this fiction: to 
apply a standard to historical times that would be adequate and comprehensible to human 
life. This pathos of nearness, the hatred of the abstract configuration of human life in 
epochs, has animated the great skeptics. A good example is Anatole France. On the 
opposition between empathy and actualization: jubilees, Leopardi 13. 33 <See Sla,4; Sla,3; 
H2,3.> <I°,2> 

Benda reports on a German visitor's amazement when, sitting at a table d'hite in Paris 
fourteen days after the stonxjing of the Bastille, he heard no one speak of politics. Anatole 
France's anecdote about Pontius Pilate, who, in Rome, while wasliing his feet, no longer 
quite recalls the name of the crucified Jew. 34 <See Sl,3.> <I°,3 > 

Masks for orgies. Pompeian tiles. Gateway arches. Greaves. Gloves. <I°,4> 

Very important: bull's-eye windows in cabinet doors. But was there such a thing in France 
as well? <See I2a,4.> <I°,5> 



To make a truly palpable presentation of human beings — doesn't that mean 
bringing to light our memory of them? <I°,6> 



The flower as emblem of sin and its via crucu through the stations of the arcades, 
of fashion, of Redon's painting — which Marius and Axy Leblond have described 
by saying, "It is a cosmogony of flowers." <I°,7> 

More on fashion: what the child (and, through faint reminiscence, the man) 
discovers in the pleats of the old material to which it fastens while trailing at its 
mother's skirts. <See K2,2.> <I°,8> 

The arcades as milieu of Lautreamont. <I°, 9> 



Various notes drawn from Brieger 35 and Vischer: 

Around 1880, out-and-out conflict between the tendency to elongate the female 
figure and the rococo disposition to accentuate the lower body through multiply- 
ing underskirts. < .V^ > 

In 1876, the derriere disappears; but it comes back again. < J°. 2> 

floral forms in the drawings of cyclothymes, which for their part recall drawings 
made by mediums. < J°. 3> 

Story of the child with its mother in a panorama. The panorama is presenting the Battle of 
Sedan. The child regrets that the sky is overcast. "That's what the weather is like in war," 
answers the mother. <See Dl,l.> < J°,4> 

At the end of the 1860s, Alphonse Karr writes that no one knows how to make mirrors 
anymore. <See Rl,7> <J°,5> 

The rationalist theory of fashion appears very characteristically in Karr. It bears a resem- 
blance to the religious theories of the Enlightenment. Karr thinks, for example, that long 
skirts come into fashion because certain women have an interest in concealing an unlovely 
foot. Or he denounces, as the origin of certain types of hats and certain hairstyles, the 
wish to compensate for thin hair, <See Bl,7> < .J°)6 > 



Addendum to the remarks on Metro stations : it is owing to these stations that the 
names of places where Napoleon I gained a victory are transformed into gods of 
the underworld. < K ° , 1 > 

The radical alterations to Paris under Louis Napoleon (Napoleon III), mainly along the 
axis nmning through the Place de la Concorde and the Hotel de "Ville, in <Adolf> Stahr, 
Nach Jiitif Jahren <vol. 1 (Oldenburg, 1857)>, pp. 12-13. — Stahr, moreover, lived at that 
time on Leipziger Platz. <See El,6.> <K°,2> 



The broad Boulevard de Strasbourg, which connects the Strasbourg railway station with 
the Boulevard Saint-Denis. <K°,3> 



Around the same rime, the macadamization of the streets — which makes it possible, 
despite the heavy traffic, to cany on a conversation in front of a cafe without shouting in 
the other person's ear. <See M2,6.> <K°,4> 



For the architectural image of Paris the war of 1870 was perhaps a blessing, seeing that 
Napoleon III had intended to alter whole sections of the city. Stahr thus writes, in 1857, 
that one had to make haste now to see the old Paris, "for the new ruler, it seems, has a 
mind to leave but little of it standing." <See El,6.> <K°,5> 

Ornament and boredom. <See D2a,2.> <K°,6> 
Opposition of perspective and concrete, tactile nearness. <K°,7> 

In the theory of collecting, the isolation, the segregation of every single object is very 
important. A totality — whose integral character always stands as far removed as possible 
from utility and, in preeminent cases, resides in a strictly defined, phenomenologically 
quite remarkable type of "completeness" (which is diametrically opposed to utility). <See 
Hla,2.> <K°,8> 

Historical and dialectical relation between diorama and photography. <K°,9> 

Important in regard to collecting: the fact that the object is detached from all original 
functions of its utility makes it the more decided in its meaning. It functions now as a true 
encyclopedia of all knowledge of the epoch, the landscape, the industry, and the owner 
from which it comes. <See Hla,2.> <K°,10> 

There was pleorama (travels on water; pled, "I go by ship"), navalorama, cosmorama, 
diaphanorama, picturesque views, pictorial voyages in a room, pictorial room-voyage, 
diaphanorama. <See Ql,l.> <K°,11> 

Among the images : the sea o f ice on the Grindelwald glacier in Switzerland, view 
of the harbor of Genoa from rooms of the Palazzo Dona, interior view of the 
cathedral of Brou in France, gallery of the Colosseum in Rome, Gothic cathedral 
inmorninglight. <K°,12> 

The play on words with "-rama" (see Balzac, Pere Goriot) in Germany as well. "Is 
<?> it <?> still in use?" <See Ql,6.> <K°,13> 

father and boredom. The mere soporific, narcotizing effect which cosmic forces have 
on the ordinary man is attested in the relation of such a man to one of the lughest 
manifestations of these forces: the weather. Comparison with the way Goethe (in his 
studies on meteorology) 36 managed to illuminate the weather. — On the weather which a 
fountain creates in its particular location. (Vestibule of Daguerre's diorama in Berlin.) 
Weather in the casinos. <See Dl,3.> <K°.14> 

A ballet whose principal scene takes place in the casino at Monte Carlo. Noise of 
rolling balls, of croupiers' rakes, of chips determining the character of the music. 

<K°,15> 



Other names : optical belvedere. 



<K°,16> 



In the year in which Daguerre invented photography (1839) his diorama burned down. 
<SeeQ2,5.> <K°,17> 

It remains to be discovered what is meant when, in the dioramas, the variations in lighting 
which a day brings to a landscape take place in fifteen or thirty minutes. <See Qla,4.> 

<K°,18> 

The Berlin diorama is closed on May 31, 1850; the pictures are sent, in part, to 
St. Petersburg. <K°,19> 

First London exhibition of 1851 brings together industries from around the world. Fol- 
lowing this, the South Kensington museum is founded. Second world exhibition 1862 (in 
London!). With the Munich exhibition of 1875, the Gennan Renaissance style came into 
fashion. <See G2a,3.> <K°,20> 

In 1903, in Paris, Emile Tardieu brought out a book entitled L'Ennui, in which all human 
activity is shown to be a vain attempt to escape from boredom, but in which, at the same 
time, what is, what was, and what will be appear as the inexhaustible nourishment of that 
feeling. In view of such a portrait, one might suppose the work to be some mighty classical 
monument of literature — a monument ae re perennius erected by a Roman to the taedium 
vitae? 7 But it is only the self-satisfied, shabby scholarship of a new Homais, who aims to 
turn the most serious matters — asceticism and martyrdom included — into documents of 
his thoughtless, spiritually barren, petty-bourgeois discontent. <See Dl,5.> <K°,21> 

lb be mentioned in connection with the fashion in shawls: the characteristic and, properly 
speaking, sole decoration of the Biedenneier room "was afforded by the curtains, 
which — extremely refined and compounded preferably from several fabrics of different 
colors — were furnished by the upholsterer. For nearly a whole century afterward, interior 
decoration amounts, in theory, to providing instructions to upholsterers for the tasteful 
arrangement of draperies." Max von Boehn, Die Mode im XIX Jahrhandert , vol. 2 (Mu- 
nich, 1907), p. 130. <See El,l.> <K°,22> 

Mantlepiece clocks with genre scenes in bronze. Time looks out from the base. 
Double meaning of the term temps <x>. 3a <See D2a,3.> <K°,23> 

Rue des Immeubles Industriels — how old is it? <See Pla,5.> <K°,24> 

"For our type of man, train stations are truly factories of dreams." Jacques de Lacretelle, 
"Le Reveur parisien," Noiwelle Revue francaise, 1927. <See Ll,4.> <K°,25> 

Within the frames of the pictures that hung on dining room walls, the advent of whiskey 
advertisements, of Van Houten Cocoa, of . . . is gradually heralded. Naturally, one can 
say that the bourgeois comfort of the dining room has survived longest in small cafes and 
other such places; but perhaps one can also say that the space of the cafe, within which 
every square meter and every hour is paid for much more precisely than in apartment 
houses, evolved out of the latter. Apartments laid out like cafes — in Frankfurt am Main, 



something very characteristic of that town. Attempt to formulate what there was inside. 
<SeeGl,2.> <K°,26> 



Empty, brightly lit streets as we enter cities at night. They surround us in fan-shaped 
formation, travel out and away from us like rays of a mandorla. And the glance into a 
room will always find a family at a meal or else occupied with some obscure niggling thing 
at a table under a hanging lamp, its white glass globe set into a metal frame. Such eidola 
are the germ cells of Kafka's work. And this experience remains an inalienable possession 
of his generation, his only — and therefore ours, because only for it do the horror-furnish- 
ings of incipient high capitalism fill the scenes of its most luminous childhood experi- 
ences. — Unexpectedly, the street emerges here such as we never otherwise experience it, 
as way, as built-up thoroughfare. <See I3,3.> <K° ,27> 

What, then, do we know of streetcomers, of curbstones, of the architecture of the pave- 
ment — we who have never felt the street, heat, filth, and the edges of the stones beneath 
our naked soles, and have never scrutinized the uneven placement of the wide paving 
stones with an eye toward bedding down on them. 39 <See Pl,10.> <K°,28> 



Mode und Zynismuj 10 — from the copy in the <Prussian> National Library, one 
can see how often it was read in the past. <L°,1> 

Redon was on very friendly terms with the botanist Armand Clavaud. <L°,2> 

"I am not inspired by the supernatural. I do nothing but contemplate the external 
world; my works are true — whatever one may say." Odilon Redon. <L°,3> 

"A cheval de renfort <spare horse> which, at Notre Dame de Lorette, would make possible 
the hard climb up the Rue des Martyrs." <See Ml,l.> <L°,4> 

Andre Mellerio, Odilon Redon (Paris, 1923). Refer to the plates on pp. 57 and 117. 

<L°,5> 

Say something about the method of composition itself; how everything one is dunking at 
a specific moment in time must at all costs be incorporated into the project then at hand. 
Assume that the intensity of die project is thereby attested, or that one's thoughts, from 
the very beginning, bear this project within them as their telos. So it is with the present 
portion of the work, which aims to characterize and to preserve the intervals of reflection, 
the distances lying between the most essential parts of this work, which are turned most 
intensively to the outside. <See Nl,3.> <L°,6> 

The Human Comedy comprises a series of works which are not novels, in the ordinary 
sense of the tenn, but something like epic transcription of the tradition from the first 
decades of the Restoration. Entirely in the spirit of oral tradition is the interminability of 
this cycle, the antithesis to Flaubert's rigorous conception of form. No doubt about it — the 
nearer a work stands to the collective forms of expression of the epic, the more it tends, in 
varying and episodic development, to summon up the same recurrent circle of figures, 
according to the eternal paradigm of Greek legend. Balzac had secured this mythic 
constitution of his world through precise topographic contours. Paris is the breeding 
ground of his mydiology, Paris with its two or three great bankers (like Nucingen), with 



its continually reappearing doctor, with its enterprising merchant (Cesar Birotteau) , with 
its four or five great courtesans, with its usurer (Gobseck), with its sundry soldiers and 
bankers. But above all — and we see this again and again — it is from the same streets and 
comers, the same little rooms and recesses, that the figures of this world step into the light. 
What else can this mean but that topography is the ground plan of every mythic space of 
tradition, < Traditiojisrau?n>, and that it can become indeed its key — just as it became the 
key for Pausanias in Greece, and just as the history, layout, distribution of the Paris 
arcades are to become the key for the underworld of this century, into which Paris has 
sunk. <See Cl,7> <L°,7> 

Stahr reports that the premier cancan dancer at the Bal Mabille, a certain Chicard, dances 
under the surveillance of two police sergeants, whose sole responsibility is to keep an eye 
on the dancing of this one man. <See 04,2.> <L°,8> 

Portraits of famous cancan dancers on display in the arcades (Rigolette and Frichette). 
<See Gla,L> <L°,9> 

On Redon: "Unconcerned with every quick and transitory effect, however se- 
ductive, he ultimately and above all wishes to give his flowers the very essence of 
life and, so to speak, a profound soul." Andre Mellerio, Odilon Redon (Paris, 
1923), p. 163. ' <L°,10> 

Redon's plan to illustrate Pascal. <L°,11> 

Redon's nickname, after 1870, in the salon of Mme. de Rayssac: the prince of 
dream. <L°,12> 

Redon's flowers and the problem of ornamentation, especially in hashish. Plower 
world. <L°,13> 

"Rococo," at the time of the Restoration, has the meaning "antiquated." <L°,14> 

Chevet, at the Palais-Royal, "bestowed" dessert in exchange for a certain sum of 
money spent on the fruits and dainties consumed at dinner. <L°,15> 

Eugene Sue— a castle in Blogue <Bordes?>, a harem in which there were women of color. 
After bis death, a legend that the Jesuits had poisoned him. <See 12, L> <L°,16> 

The tin racks with artificial flowers which can be found at refreshment bars in railroad 
stations, and elsewhere, are vestiges of the floral arrangements that formerly encircled the 
<cashier>. <See Tl,9.> <L°,17> 

The Palais-Royal is in its heyday under Louis XVIII and Charles X. <L°,18> 



Marquis de Sevry: director of the Salon des Etrangers. His Sunday dinners in 
Romainville. <L°,19> 



How Bliicher gambled in Paris. (See Gronow, Aus der grossen Welt [Stuttgart, 1908], p. 56.) 
Blikher borrows 100,000 francs from the Bank of France. <See 01,3.> <L°,20> 



A bell sounds: departure for ajoumey <?> in the Kaiserpanorama. <See C3,5.> <L°,21> 

Concerning the mythological topography of Paris: the character given it by its gateways. 
Mystery of the boundary stone which, although located in the heart of the city, once 
marked the point at which it ended. Dialectic of the gate: from triumphal arch to traffic 
island. <See C2a,3.> <L°,22> 

When did industry take possession of the streetcorner? Architectural emblems of com- 
merce: cigar shops have the comer, apothecaries the stairs . . . <See C2,4.> <L°,23> 

Panes of glass in which not the chandeliers but only the candles are reflected. 

<L°,24> 

Excursus on the Place du Maroc. Not only city and interior but city and open air can 
become entwined, and thu intertwining can occur much more concretely. There is the 
Place du Maroc in Belleville: that desolate heap of stones with its rows of tenements 
became for me, when I happened on it one Sunday afternoon, not only a Moroccan desert 
but also, and at the same time, a monument of colonial imperialism; and topographic 
vision was entwined with allegorical meaning in this square, yet not for an instant did it 
lose its place in the heart of Belleville. But to awaken such a view is something ordinarily 
reserved for intoxicants. And in such cases, in fact, street names are like intoxicating 
substances that make our perception more stratified and richer in spaces than it is in 
everyday existence. The state into which these street names transport <us>, their vertu 
evocatrice (but this is saying too little, for what is decisive here is not the association but the 
interpenetration of images) ought also to be considered in connection with certain cycloid 
states. The patient who wanders the city at night for hours on end and forgets the way 



home is perhaps under the sway of this power. <See Pla,2.> <L°,25> 

Did the books of antiquity have prefaces? <L C \26> 

Bonhomie of revolutions in the book on Baudelaire, E2. n <L°,27> 

Arcades as temples of commodity capital. <See A2,2.> <L°,28> 

Passage des Panoramas, formerly Passage Mires. <See Ala,2.> <L°,29> 

In the fields with which we are concerned here, knowledge comes only in lightning 

flashes. The text is the long roll of thunder that follows. <See Nl,l.> <L°,30> 



The deepest enchantment of the collector: to put things under a spell, as though at a 
touch of the magic wand, so that all at once, while a last shudder runs over them, they are 
transfixed. All architecture becomes pedestal, socle, frame, antique memory room. It must 
not be assumed that the collector, the flaneur, would fmd anything strange in the topos 
hjpermiranios — that place beyond the heavens where Plato locates the immutable arche- 
types of things. He loses himself, assuredly. But in return, he has the strength to raise 
liimself up again to his full height — thanks to a project <?>. From out of the mists that 



envelop his sun, images arise like tables of the gods, islands in the Mediterranean. <See 
Hla,2.> <L°,31> 



The need for sensation a s king-size vice. To fasten o n two o f the seven deadly sins. Which 
ones? The prophecy that men would be blinded by the effects of too much electric light, 



and maddened by the rapidity of news reporting. <See B2,L> <L°,32> 

As introduction to the section on weather: Proust, the story of the little weather 
maniukin. ' 2 My joy whenever the morning sky is overcast. <L°,33> 

Demoiselles: incendiaries disguised as women around 1830. <See 02,4.> <L D ,34> 

Around 1830 there was a newspaper in Paris with the name Le Sylphe. Find a ballet about 
newspapers. <See A2,9.> <L°,35> 

<xx> fasces, Phrygian caps, tripods. <L°,36> 

<xx> the "playing-card kings of stone" in Hacklander. <L°,37> 

<Carl> von Etzel — railroad constructions. <L°,38>. 



\arious of the Berlin arcades should be mentioned: the colonnade in the vicinity 
of the Spittelmarkt (Leipziger Strasse), the colonnade in a quiet street of the 
clothiers' district, the arcade, the colonnade at the Halle Gate, the railing at the 
entry to private ways. Also to be kept in mind is the blue postcard of the Halle 
Gate, which showed all the windows lit up beneath the moon, illuminated by 
exactly the same light as came from the moon itself. Think further of the un- 
touchable Sunday afternoon landscape that opens out somewhere at the end of a 
forlorn secluded street of "faded gentility"; in its nearness, the houses of this 
dubious neighborhood seem suddenly changed to palaces. <M°,1> 

Magic of cast iron: "Hahblle was able then to convince himself that the ring around this 
planet was nothing other than a circular balcony on which the inhabitants of Saturn 
strolled in the evening to get a breath of fresh air." Grandville, Un autre monde <Paris, 
1844>, p. 139. (Perhaps belongs also under the rubric "Hashish.") <See "The Ring of 
Saturn" and F1,Z> <M°,2> 

Comparison of Hegel's PMnomenologie and the works of Grandville. Derivation of Grand- 
vine's work in terms of the philosophy of history. Important is the hypertrophy of the 
caption in this work. Also, the consideration of Lautreamont may be linked to Grandville. 
Grandville's works are a veritable cosmogony of fashion. Equally important, perhaps, a 
comparison between Hogarth and Grandville. A part of Grandville's work might be 
entitled "Fashion's Revenge on the Flowers." Grandville's works are the sibylline books of 
publicite. Everything that, with him, has its preliminary form as joke, or satire, attains its 
true unfolding as advertisement. <See B4,5 and Gl,3.> <M°,3> 



Superposition according to the rhythm of time. In relation to the cinema and to 
the "sensational" transmission of news. "Becoming" has for us — in regard to 
rhythm, according to our perception of time — no more claim as evidence. We 
decompose it dialectically into sensation and tradition. — Important to express 
these things analogously with respect to the biographical. <M°,4> 

Parallelism between this work and the Trauerspiel book. Common to both, the 
theme: theology of hell. Allegory<,> advertisement, types: martyr, tyrant — 
whore, speculator. <M°,5> 

Hashish in the afternoon: shadows are a bridge over the river of light that is the 
street. <M°,6> 

Acquisition as decisive fact in collecting. <M°,7> 

Art of priming in reading and writing. Whoever can design at the most super- 
ficial level is the best author. <M°,8> 

Underground sightseeing in the sewers. Preferred route, Chatelet-Madeleine. <See 
C2a,7.> <M°,9> 

Passage du Caire erected in 1799 on the site of the garden of the Convent of the Daugh- 
ters of God. <See A3a,6.> <M°,li> 

The best way, while dreaming, to catch the afternoon in the net of evening is to make 
plans. <See M3a,2.> <M°,11> 

Comparison of the human being with an instrument panel on which are thou- 
sands of electric bulbs. Some of them go out at one moment, some at another, 
<and> come back on again. <M°,12> 

The pathos of this work: there are no periods of decline. Attempt to see the nineteenth 
century just as positively as I tried to see the seventeenth, in the work on Trauerspiel. No 
belief in periods of decline. By the same token, every city is beautiful to me (from outside 
its borders), just as all talk of particular languages' having greater or lesser value is to me 
unacceptable. <See N 1 ,6 .> <M Q ,13> 

The dreaming collective knows no history. Events pass before it as always identical and 
always new. The sensation of the newest and most modern is, in fact, as much a dream 
formation of events as the "eternal return of the same." The perception of space that 
corresponds to this perception of time is superposition. Now, as these formations dissolve 
within the enlightened consciousness, political-theological categories arise to take their 
place. And it is only within the purview of these categories, which bring the flow of events 
to a standstill, that history forms, at the interior of this flow, as crystalline constellation. — 
The economic conditions under which a society exists not only determine that society in 
its material existence and ideological superstructure; they also come to expression. In the 
case of one who sleeps, an overfull stomach does not find its ideological superstructure in 
the contents of the dream — and it is exactly the same with the economic conditions of life 



for the collective. It interprets these conditions; it explains them. In the dream, they find 
their expression; in the awakening, their interpretation, <See S2,l and K2,5.> <M°,14> 



The man who waits — a type opposed to the flaneur. The flaneur's apperception 
of historical time, set off against the time of one who waits. Not looking at his 
watch. Case of superposition while waiting: the image of the expected woman 
superimposes itself on that of some unknown woman. We are a dam holding 
back the time which, when the awaited woman appears, breaks upon us in a 
mighty torrent. "Tous les objets sont des maitres" (Edouard Karyade). <M°,15> 

The fact that we were children during this time belongs together with its objective image. 
It had to be this way in order to produce this generation. That is to say: we seek a 
teleological moment in the context of dreams. Which is the moment of waiting. The 
dream waits secretly for the awakening; the sleeper surrenders himself to death only 
provisionally, waits for the second when he will cunningly wrest himself from its clutches. 
So, too, the dreaming collective, whose children provide the happy occasion for its own 
awakening. <See Kla,2.> <M°,16> 

Look into the connection between colportage and pornography. Pornographic 
picture of Schiller — a litho: with one hand he gestures, picturesquely posed, into 
an ideal distance; with the other he masturbates. Pornographic parodies of 
Schiller. The ghostly and lascivious monk; the long train of specters and de- 
bauchery; in the Memoires des Satumin, by Mme. de Pompadour, the lewd proces- 
sion of monks, with the abbot and his cousin at the head. <M°,17> 

We are bored when we don't know what we are waiting for. And that we do know, or 
think we know, is nearly always the expression of our superficiality or inattention. Bore- 
dom is the threshold to great deeds. <See D2,7> <M°,18> 

Clouded atmosphere, cloud-changeableness of things in the space of vision <Visionsraum>. 

<M°,19> 

Task of childhood: to bring the new world into symbolic space <Symbolraum>. The child, 
in fact, can do what the grownup absolutely cannot: remember the new once again. For 
us, locomotives already have symbolic character because we met with them in childhood. 
Our children, however, will find this in automobiles, of which we ourselves see only the 
new, elegant, modern, cheeky side. <See Kla,3.> <M°,20> 

<The> glassed-in spot facing my seat at the Staatsbibliothek. Charmed circle inviolate, 
virgin terrain for the soles of figures I dreamed. <See Nl,7> <M°,21> 

"She was everybody's contemporary." <Marcel Jouhandeau,) Prudence Hautechaume 
<Paris, 1927>,p. 129. <See B2,5.> <M°,22> 

<xxxxx> world — and fashion.' 13 <M°,23> 



At the entrance to the skating rink, to the provincial pub, to the tennis court: penates. The 
hen that lays the golden praline-eggs, the machine that stamps our names on nameplates, 



slot machines, the mechanical fortuneteller — these guard the threshold. Oddly, such 
machines don't flourish in the city but rather are a component of excursion sites, of 
beer gardens in the suburbs. And when, in search of a little greenery, one heads for 
these places on a Sunday afternoon, one is turning as well to the mysterious thresholds. 
P.S.: Automatic scales — the modem gnothi seauton! u Delphi. <See C3,4 and Ila,4.> 

<M°,24> 

The gallery that leads to the Mothers is made of wood. Likewise, in the large-scale 
renovations of the urban scene, wood plays a constant though ever-shifting role: amid the 
modern traffic, it fashions, in the wooden palings and in the wooden planking over open 
substructions, the image of its rustic prehistory. <See C2a,4.> <M°,25> 

Threshold and boundary must be very carefully distinguished. The Schwelle <t?ireshold> 
is a zone. And indeed a zone of transition. Transformation, passage, flight <?> are in the 
word schwellen <swell>, and etymology ought not to overlook these senses. On the other 
hand, it is necessary to keep in mind the immediate tectonic framework that has brought 
the word to its current meaning. We have grown very poor in threshold experiences. 
"Falling asleep" is perhaps the only such experience that remains to us. But also the ebb 
and flow of conversation and the sexual permutations of love, like the world of figures in 
the dream, rise up over the threshold. — Out of the field of experience proper to the 
threshold evolved the gateway that transforms whoever passes under its arch. The Ro- 
man victory arch makes the returning general a conquering hero. Absurdity of the relief 
on the inner wall of the arch — a classicist misunderstanding. <See 02a,l and C2a,3.> 

<M°,26> 



J. W. Samson, Die Frauenmode der Gegenwart (Berlin, 1927) (Ml — marks and images<?>). 

<N°,1> 

Flower market: "There — without recurring to the efforts / Of the splendid archi- 
tecture / To conceal from us its riches — / Flora in her temple de verdure." <N°,2> 

Description <?> from Ferragus. 45 <N°,3> 

Heinrich Mann, Kaiserin Eugenie!^ <N°,4> 

The Trojan horse — as snow <?>, as the imminent awakening steals into the dream. <See 
K2,4.> <N°,5> 

Dusk: the hour when great works are inspired (inspiration litte'raire). According to 
Daudet, however, the hour when mistakes are made in reading <?>. <N °,6>. 



The indestructibility of the highest life in all things. Against the prognosticators of de- 
cline. One can make a film of Goethe's Faust. And yes, isn't it an outrage, and isn't there 
a world of difference between the poem Faust and the film Faust? Certainly, there is. But 



again, isn't there a whole world of difference between a bad film of Faust and a good one? 
What matter in culture are not the great contrasts but the nuances. <It is from them that> 
the world <is> always <born anew>. <See Nla,4.> <0°,1> 



Pedagogic side of this undertaking: "To educate the image-making medium within us, 
raising it to a stereoscopic and dimensional seeing into the depths of historical shadows." 
The words are <Rudolf> Borchardt's in Epilegomena zu Dante, vol. 1 (Berlin, 1923), 
pp. 56-57. <See Nl,8.> <0°,2> 

From the start, to keep this thought in view and to weigh its constructive value: the refuse- 
and decay-phenomena as precursors, in some degree mirages, of the great syntheses that 
follow. These new synthetic realities are to be looked for everywhere: advertising, film 
reality, and so on. <See Yl,4.> <O c ,3> 

Of vital interest to recognize, at a particular point of development, currents of thought at 
the crossroads — namely, the new view on the historical world at the point where a 
decision is forthcoming as to its reactionary or revolutionary application. In this sense, 
one and the same phenomenon is at work in the Surrealists and in Heidegger. <See Sl,6.> 

<0°,4> 



It is said that the dialectical method consists in doing justice, at each moment, to the 
concrete historical situation of its object. But that is not enough. For it is just as much a 
matter of doingjustice to the concrete historical situation of the interest taken in the object. 
And thu situation is always so constituted as to be itself preformed in that object; above 
all, however, the object is felt to be concretized in this situation itself and upraised from its 
former being into the higher concretion of now-being <Jetztsein>. In what way thu now- 
being (which is something other than the now-being of the present time <Jetitieit>) already 
signifies, in itself, a higher concretion — this question, of course, can be entertained by the 
dialectical method only within the purview of a philosophy of history that at all points has 
overcome the ideology of progress. In regard to such a philosophy, one could speak of an 
increasing concentration (integration) of reality, such that everything past (in its time) can 
acquire a higher grade of actuality than it had in the moment of its existing. How it adapts 
to this, its own higher actuality, is something determined and brought to pass by the image 
as which and in which it is comprehended. — To treat the past (better: what has been) in 
accordance with a method that is no longer historical but political. To make political 
categories into theoretical categories, insofar as one dared to apply them only in the sense 
of praxis, because only to the present — that is the task. The dialectical penetration and 
actualization of former contexts puts the truth of all present action to the test. This means, 
however: the explosive materials latent in fashion (which always refers back to something 
past) have to be ignited. <See K2,3.> <0°,5> 

On the figure of the collector. One may start from the fact that the true collector detaches 
the object from its functional relations. But that is hardly an exhaustive description of this 
remarkable mode of behavior. For isn't this the foundation (to speak with Kant and 
Schopenhauer) of that "disinterested" contemplation by virtue of which the collector 
attains to an unequaled view of the object — a view which takes in more, and other, than 
that of the profane owner and which we would do best to compare to the gaze of the great 
physiognomist? But how his eye comes to rest on the object is a matter elucidated much 
more sharply through <another> consideration. <See H2,7; H2a,l.> <0°,6> 



It must be kept in mind that, for the collector, the world is present, and indeed ordered, in 
each of liis objects. Ordered, however, according to a surprising and, for the profane 
understanding, incomprehensible connection. This connection stands to the customary 
ordering and schematization of things something as their arrangement in the dictionary 
stands to a natural arrangement. We need only recall what importance a particular collec- 
tor attaches not only to his object but also to its entire past, whether this concerns the 
origin and objective characteristics of the thing or the details of its ostensibly external 
liistory: previous owners, price of purchase, current value, and so on. All of these — the 
"objective" data together with the other — come together, for the true collector, in every 
single one of his possessions, to form a whole magic encyclopedia, a world order, whose 
outline is the ftite of his object. Here, therefore, within this circumscribed field, we can 
understand how great physiognomists (and collectors are physiognomists of the world of 
tilings) become interpreters of fate. It suffices to observe just one collector as he handles 
the items in his showcase. No sooner does he hold them in his hands than he appears 
inspired by them and seems to look through them into their distance, like an augur. (It 
would be interesting to situate the bibliophile as the only type of collector who has not 
unconditionally withdrawn his treasures from a functional context.) <See H2,7; H2a,l.> 

<0°,7> 

Attempt to develop Giedion's thesis. "In the nineteenth century," he writes, "construction 
plays the role of the subconscious." 47 Wouldn't it be better to say "the role of bodily 
processes" — around which "artistic" architectures gather, like dreams around the frame- 
work of physiological processes? <See Kla,7> <0°,8> 

Bear in mind that commentary on a reality (such as we are writing here) calls for a method 
completely different from that required by commentary on a text. In the one case, the 
scientific mainstay is theology; in the other case, philology. <See N2,l.> <0°,9> 

Interpenetration as principle in film, in new architecture, in colportage. <O°,10> 

Fashion inheres in the darkness of the lived moment, but in the collective darkness. — 
Fashion and architecture (in the nineteenth century) belong to the dream consciousness of 
the collective. We must look into how it awakes. For example, in advertising. Would 
awakening be the synthesis derived from the thesis of dream consciousness and the 
antithesis of waking consciousness? <See K2a,4.> <0°, 1 1 > 

The problem of space (hashish, myriorama) treated under the rubric "Flanerie." 
The problem of time (intermittences) treated under the rubric "Roulette." 

<0°,12> 

Interlacing o f the history o f the arcades with the whole presentation. < O 0 , 1 3 > 

Reasons for the decline of the arcades: widened sidewalks, electric light, ban on prostitu- 
tion, culture of the open air. <See C2a,12.> <0°,14> 

To be developed: motif of boredom amid half-finished material. <0°,15> 



The "ultimate aims" of socialism hardly ever so clear as in the case of Wiertz. 
The basis here in vulgar materialism. <0°,16> 



The grandiose mechanical-materialistic divinations of Wiertz have to be seen in 
the context of the subjects of his painting — and, to be sure, not only the ideal 
Utopian subjects but those allied to colportage and the ghastly. <O c ,17> 

Advertisement by Wiertz: "Monsieur Wiertz requires a servant skilled in the 
painting of medieval accessories to do all his research work, etcetera, etcetera, 
such as <x>, etcetera." A.J. Wiertz, Oeuvres littercdres (Paris, 1870), p. 235. 

<0°,18> 

Of particular importance, the great "legend" with which Wiertz has accompanied his 
Rnsees et visions d'une tete coupee (Thoughts and Visions of a Severed Head). The first 
thing that strikes one about this magnetopathic experience is the grandiose sleight of hand 
which the consciousness executes in death. "What a singular thing! The head is here 
under the scaffold, and it believes that it still exists above, forming part of the body, and 
continuing to wait for the blow that will separate it from the trunk." A.J. Wiertz, Oeuvres 
littercdres (Paris, 1870), p. 492. (At work here in Wiertz is the same inspiration that ani- 
mates the unforgettable short story by Ambrose Bierce.' 18 The rebel who is hanged from a 
bridge over the river.) <See K2a,2.> <0°,19> 

Does fashion die because it can no longer keep up the tempo — at least in certain fields? 
While, on the other hand, there are fields in which it can follow the tempo and even 
dictate it? <See B4,4.> <O°,20> 

Title of a painting by Wiertz: Les Choses du present devant les hommes de I'avenir 
<The Things of the Present on Display before the Men of the Future>. Note- 
worthy is the tendency of this painter toward allegory. For example, in the 
catalogue description of the picture Une Second apres la mort, we read: "Consider 
die idea of a book that has fallen from one's hands, and on its cover these words: 
Lofty Achievements of Humanity." Oeuvres littemires, p. 496. Figure of "civilization" 
and many other allegories in Le Dernier Canon. <0°,21> 

Painting by Wiertz: Le Soujflet d'une dame beige. "This painting was executed 
with the intention of proving the necessity of having women trained in the use of 
firearms. It was Monsieur Wiertz, as we know, who had the idea of setting up a 
special rifle range for ladies and offering, as prize in the competition, a portrait of 
the victorious heroine." Oeuvres litteraires, p. 501 (catalogue of works, edited by 



the painter himself). <0°,22> 

Passage on the museum in Proust. 41 ' <0°,23> 

Boredom of the ceremonial scenes depicted in historical paintings, and boredom in gen- 
eral. Boredom and museum. Boredom and battle scenes. <See D2a,8.> <0°,24> 

Excursus on the battle scene! <0°,25> 



To the complex of boredom and waiting (a metaphysics of waiting is indispensable) one 
could no doubt assimilate, in a particular context, the metaphysics of doubt. In an allegory 



of Schiller's we read of "the hesitant wing of the butterfly." 50 This points to that associa- 
tion of wingedness with the feeling of indecision which is so characteristic of hashish 
intoxication. <See M4a,l.> <0°,26> 

HofmannsthaPs plan for The Novice and for The Fortuneteller? 1 <0°,27> 

Polemic against iron rails, in the 1830s. A. Gordon, A Treatise in Elementary Locomotion, 
wanted to have the "steam carriage" run on lanes of granite. <See F3,4.> <0°,28> 

Great collectors. Pachinger, Wolfskehl's friend, who has put together a collection that, in 
its array of proscribed and damaged objects, rivals the Figdor collection in Vienna. On the 
Stachus, he suddenly stoops to pick up something he has been seeking for weeks: a 
misprinted streetcar ticket that was in circulation for only one hour. Gratz in Wiihlgarten. 
The family in which everyone collects something, for example matchboxes. Pachinger 
hardly knows any more how things stand in the world; explains to his visitors — alongside 
the most antique implements — the use of pocket handkerchief s, distorting mirrors, and 
the like. "Beautiful foundation for a collection." Hoerschelmann. A German in Paris who 
collects bad (only bad!) art. <See H2a,2.> <0°,29> 

Waxworks: mixture of the ephemeral and the fashionable. Woman fastening her garter. 
Madja <Paris, 1928>, p. <200>. 52 <See B3,4 and E2a,2.> <O°,30> 

Aporias of town planning (beauty of old districts), of museums, of street names, of 
interiors. <See I2a,6.) <0°,3 1 > 

One can characterize the problem of the form of the new art straight on: When and how 
will the worlds of form wliich, without our having expected it, have arisen, for example, 
in mechanics, or in machine construction, and subjugated us — when will they make 
whatever nature they contain into primal history? When will we reach a state of society in 
<which these forms, or> those arising from them, <reveal> themselves to us as natural 
forms? <See K3a,2.) <0°,32> 

On Veuillot's "Paris is musty and close." Fashions and the complete antithesis to the 
open-air world of today. The "glaucous gleam" under the petticoats, of which Aragon 
speaks. The corset as the torso's arcade. What today is de rigueur among the lowest class 
of prostitutes — not to undress — may once have been the height of refinement. Hallmark of 
yesterday's fashions: to intimate a body that tiever knows full nakedness. <See E2,2; Ola, 3; 
B3,l.> <0°,33> 

On the renferme, much also in Proust. Above all, the retreat in the Bois. 53 

<0°,34> 

Rue Laferriere formerly an arcade. See <Paul> Leautaud, Le Petit ami. <O c ,35> 



Method of this project: literary montage. I needn't say anything. Merely show. I shall 
appropriate no ingenious formulations, purloin no valuables. But the rags, the refuse — 
these I will not describe but put on display. <See Nla,8.> <0°,36> 



Notes on montage in my journal. Perhaps, in this same context, there should be 
some indication of the intimate connection that <exists> between the intention 
making for nearest nearness and the intensive utilization of refuse — a connection 
in fact exhibited in montage. < O ° , 3 7 > 

Fetish character of the commodity to be conveyed through the example of prosti- 
tution. <0°,38> 

On the interlacing of street and domestic interior: house numbers for the latter 
become cherished family photos . < O ° , 3 9 > 

Utter ambiguity of the arcades: street and house. <O°,40> 

When and, above all, how did the name "Winter Garden" come to designate a 
variety theater? (Compare Cirque d'hiver) <0°,41> 

Traffic at the stage of myth. Industry at the stage of myth. (Railroad stations and 
early f actories.) < O ° , 4 2 > 

Tedium of the railway journey. Stories of conductors. Here, Unold on Proust, 
Frankfurter geitung, 1926 or 1927. <0°,43> 

Relation of myth and topography. Aragon and Pausanias. (Bring in Balzac here 
as well.) <See Cl,7.> <0°,44> 

Boredom and: the commodity's wait to be sold. <0°,45> 

Motif of dream time: atmosphere of aquariums. Water slackening resistance. 

<0°,46> 

Reasons for the decline of the arcades: widened sidewalks, electric light, ban on prostitu- 
tion, cult of the open air. <See C2a,12.> <0°,47> 

On the doll motif: <c You have no idea how repulsive these automatons and dolls can 
become, and how one breathes at last on encountering a full-blooded being in this soci- 
ety." Paul Lindau, Der Abend (Berlin, 1896), p. 17. <See Zl,5.> <0°,48> 

Tire modish green and red of recreation spots today, which corresponds ob- 
scurely — as a fashion phenomenon — to the knowledge we are trying to unfold 
here, has a capital interpretation in a passage by Bloch, where he speaks of "the 
green-papered chamber of memory with curtains red as sunset." Geist der Utopie 
(Munich and Leipzig, 1918), p. 351. <0°,49> 

The theory of not-yet-conscious knowing may be linked with the theory of forgetting 
(notes on Der Blonde Eckbert ) M and applied to the collective in its various epochs. What 
Proust, as an individual, directly experienced <erlebte> in the phenomenon of remem- 



brance, we have to experience <erfahreri> indirectly (with regard to the nineteenth century) 
as "current," "fashion," "tendency" — in punishment, if you will, for the sluggislmess 
which keeps us from taking it up ourselves. <See K2a,3.> <O°,50> 

These gateways are also thresholds. No stone step serves to mark them. But this marking 
is accomplished by the expectant posture of the handful of people. Tightly measured 
paces reflect the fact, altogether unknowingly, that a <decision lies> ahead. Citation <from 
Aragon> on people waiting in front of arcades. 55 <See C3,6.> <0°,51 > 

This truly remarkable theory in Dacque: 56 that man is a germ. (There are germinal forms 
in nature that present themselves as fully grown embryos, but without being trans- 
formed.) It is, accordingly, in the early stages of development that the human being — and 
the human-like animal species, anthropoid apes — would have their most proper, most 
genuinely "human" form: in the fully developed embryo of the human and the chimpan- 
zee (that is, in the fully developed human and chimpanzee), the properly animal re- 
emerges. But <broken off> <0°,52> 

Study of the theoreticians ofjugendstil is imperative. Following indication in A. G. Meyer, 
Eisenbauten (Esslingen, 1907): "Those endowed with an especially fine artistic conscience 
have hurled down, from the altar of art, curse after curse on the building engineers. It 
suffices to mention Ruskin" (p. 3). In the context of Jugenstil: Peladan. <See F5,l.> 

<0°,53> 

"It is becoming more and more difficult to be revolutionary on both the spiritual 
plane and the social plane at once." Emmanuel Berl, "Premier pamphlet," Europe, 
75 (1929), p. 40. <0°,54> 

floral art and genre painting. <0°,55> 

We can speak of two directions in this work: one which goes from the past into 
the present and shows the arcades, and all the rest, as precursors, and one which 
goes from the present into the past so as to have the revolutionary potential of 
these "precursors" explode in the present. Arid this direction comprehends as 
well the spellbound elegiac consideration of the recent past, in the form of its 
revolutionary explosion. <0°,56> 

Shadow of myth which this agitated age casts onto the past, as myth-bearing 
Hellas (mythotokos) once did. <O c ,57> 

Leon Daudet narrates his life topographically. Paris ve'cu. <0°,58> 

Passage and proces. Mires. <0°,59> 

Movement of the life of fashion: change a little. <O°,60> 



Injazz, noise is emancipated. Jazz appears at a moment when, increasingly, noise 
is eliminated from the process of production, of traffic, and of commerce. Like- 
wise in radio. <0°,61> 



From Der Bazar, illustrated ladies' magazine published in Berlin (1857-): pearl 
embroidery for boxes of Communion wafers or gambling chips, men's shoes, 
glove box, small bolster, penwipers, needlecase, pincushion, slippers. Chnst77ias 
items: lamp stands, game bags, bell pulls, firescreens, folder for musical scores, 
basket for knives, canister for wax tapers, pudding cloths, gambling chips. 

<0°,62> 

Tire type of tire flaneur gains in distinctness when one thinks, for a moment, of 
the good conscience that must have belonged to the type of Saint-Simon's "indus- 
trial," who bore this title only as possessor of capital. <0°,63> 

Notable difference between Saint-Simon and Marx, lire former conceives the class of 
exploited (the producers) as broadly as possible, reckoning among them even the entre- 
preneur because he pays interest to his creditors. Marx, on the other hand, includes all 
those who in any way exploit another — even though they themselves may be victims of 
exploitation — among the bourgeoisie. <See U4,2.> <0°,64> 

Exacerbation of class divisions: the social order as a ladder along which the 
distance from rung to rung grows greater by the year. Infinite number of grada- 
tions between wealth and poverty in the France of the previous century. 

<0°,65> 

Byzantine mysticism at the Ecole Polytechnique. See Pinet, "L'Ecole polytechnique et les 
Saint-Simoniens," Revue de Paris (1894). <0°,66> 

Didn't Marx teach that the bourgeoisie, as class, can never arrive at a perfectly clear 
awareness of itself? And if this is the case, isn't one justified in annexing to Marx's thesis 
the idea of the dream collective (that is, the bourgeois collective)? <See S2,L> <0°,67> 

Wouldn't it be possible, furthermore, to show how the whole set of issues with which this 
project is concerned is illuminated in the process of the proletariat's becoming conscious 
of itself? <0°,68> 

The first tremors of awakening serve to deepen sleep — (tremors of awakening). <See 
Kla,9.> <0°,69> 

The Comptes fantastiques d'Haussmann <by Jules Ferry (1868) > first appeared as a 
series of articles m.Les 'Imps. <0*,7I> 

Good formulation by Bloch apropos of The Arcades Prtject: history displays its Scotland 
Yard badge. That was in the context of a conversation in wliich I was describing how this 
work — comparable to the method of atomic fission, which liberates the enormous ener- 
gies bound up within the atom — is supposed to liberate the enormous energies of history 
that are slumbering in the "once upon a time" of classic historical narrative. The history 
that was bent on showing things "as they really and truly were" was the strongest narcotic 
of the nineteenth century. <See N3,4.> <0°,71> 



Concretion extinguishes thought; abstraction kindles it. Every antithesis is ab- 
stract; every synthesis, concrete. (Synthesis extinguishes thought.) <0°,72> 



Formula: construction out of facts. Construction with the complete elimination 
of theory. What only Goethe in his morphological writings has attempted. 

<0°,73> 

On gambling. There is a certain stiucture of fate that can be recognized only in money, 
and a certain structure of money that can be recognized only in fate. <See 03,6.> 

<0°,74> 

The arcade as temple of Aesculapius. Medicinal spring. The course of a cure. 
Arcades (as resort spas) in ravines. At Schuls-Tarasp, at Ragaz. The gorge as 
landscape ideal in our parents' day. <See L3,L> As with the impact of very distant 
memories, the sense of smell is awakened. To me, as I stood before a shop 
window in Saint-Moritz and looked on mother-of-pearl pocketknives as "memo- 
ries," it was as though at that moment I could smell them. <0°,75> 

The things sold in the arcades are souvenirs <Andenken>. The "souvenir" is the 
form of the commodity in the arcades. One always buys only mementos of the 
commodity and of the arcade. Rise of the souvenir industry. As the manufacturer 
knows it. The custom-house officer of industry. <SeeJ53,l.> <0°,76> 

How visual memories emerge transformed after long years. The pocketknife that 
came to me as I chanced upon one in a shop window in Saint-Moritz (with the 
name of the place inscribed between sprigs of mother-of-pearl edelweiss) had a 
taste and odor. <0°,77> 

Rather than pass the rime, one must invite it in. To pass the time (to kill time, expel it): to 
be drained. Type: gambler, time spills from his every pore. — To store time like a battery: 
the type, flaneur. Finally, the synthetic type (takes in the energy "time" and passes it on in 
altered form): he who waits. <See D3,4.> <0°,78> 

"Primal history of the nineteenth century" — this would be of no interest if it were under- 
stood to mean that forms of primal history are to be recovered among the inventory of the 
nineteenth century. Only where the nineteenth century would be presented as originary 
form of primal history — as a form, that is to say, in which the whole of primal history so 
renews itself that certain of its older traits would be recognized only as precursors of these 
recent ones — only there does this concept of a primal history of the nineteenth century 
have meaning. <See N3a,2.> <0°,79> 

All categories of the philosophy of history must here be driven to the point of 
indifference. No historical category without its natural substance, no natural 
category without its historical filtration. <O°,80> 

Historical knowledge of the truth is possible only as overcoming the illusory 
appearance <Aufhebung des Scheins>. Yet this overcoming should not signify subli- 



mation, actualization of the object but rather assume, for its part, the configura- 
tion of a rapid image. The small quick figure in contrast to scientifi c complacency. 
This configuration of a rapid image goes together with the recognition of the 
"now" in things. 57 But not the future. Surrealist mien of things in the now; 
philistine mien in the future. The illusion overcome here is that an earlier time is 
in the now. In truth: the now <is> the imnost image of what has been. <0°,81> 



For the flower section. Fashion journals of the period contained instructions for preserving 
bouquets. <See I4,2.> <P°,1> 

The mania for chamber and box. Everything came in cases, was covered and 
enclosed. Cases for watches, for slippers, for thermometers — all with embroidery 
on fine canvas. <See I4,4.> <P°,2> 

Analysis of dwelling. The difficulty here is that on die one hand, in dwelling, the age- 
old — perhaps eternal — has to be recognized: image of that abode of die human being in 
the maternal womb. And then, on the other hand, this motif of primal history notwith- 
standing, we must understand dwelling in its most extreme fonn as a condition of nine- 
teenth-century existence, one with which we have begun to break. The original fonn of all 
dwelling is existence not in the house but in the shell. The difference between the two: 
<the latter> bears quite visibly the impression of its occupant. In the most extreme in- 
stance, the dwelling becomes a shell. The nineteenth century, like no other century, was 
addicted to dwelling. It conceived the residence as the receptacle for the person, and it 
encased him, with all his appurtenances, so deeply in the dwelling's interior that one 
might be reminded of the inside of a compass case, where the instrument with all its 
accessories lies embedded in deep, usually violet folds of velvet. It is scarcely possible 
nowadays to think of all the things for which the nineteenth century invented etuis: 
pocket watches, slippers, egg cups, thennometers, playing cards. What didn't it provide 
with jackets, carpets, wrappers! The twentieth century, with its porosity and transparency, 
its tendency toward the well-lit and airy, has nullified dwelling in the old sense. Jumping- 
off point of things <?>, like the "homes for human beings" in Ibsen's Master Builder. Not 
by chance a drama rooted in Jugendstil, which itself unsettled the world of the shell in a 
radical way. Today this world is highly precarious. Dwelling is diminished: for the living, 
through hotel rooms; for the dead, through the crematorium. <See I4,4.> <P°,3> 

Dialectics at a standstill — this is the quintessence of the method. <P°,4> 

"Tb dwell" as a transitive verb. For example, "indwelt spaces" — this gives a sense of the 
hidden frenetic topicality of dwelling. This topicality consists in fashioning a shell. <See 
I4,5.> <P°,5> 

Kitsch. Its economic analysis. In what way is manifest here: the overproduction 
of commodities ; the bad conscience of producers. < P 0 , 6 > 



Fashion. A sort of race for first place in the social creation. The running begins 
anew at every instant. Contrast between fashion and uniform. <P°,7> 



Thomasius, Yom Recht des Schlafs undder Traume (Halle, 1723). 
Simmel, Philoso phische Kultur <Leipzig, 1911> (fashion). 



<P°,8> 
<P°, 9> 



Am I the one who is called W.B.? Or am I simply called W.B.? Tliis, in fact, is the 
question which leads into the mystery of a person's name, and it is very aptly 
fomiulated in a posthumous fragment by Hermann Ungar: "Does the name 
attach to us, or are we attached to a name?" H. Ungar, "Fragment," in Das 
Stichiuort, Newspaper of the Theater on Schiffbauer Damm (December 1929), 



p. 4. <q:,i> 

Waxworks in Lisbon, in Joachim Nettelbeck's autobiography. <Q?,2> 

Anatole France, the series of novels with M. Bergeret. <QJ\3> 

Das Kapital, vol. 1, original edition, p. 40; vol. 3, pp. 1-200, especially 150ff. 5a 
Tendency of the profi t rate and the average profit rate to fall. <QJ,4) 

Kafka, "Der Landarzt" <A Country Doctor> (a dream). <QT,5> 

In The Arcades Project, contemplation must be put on trial. But it should defend 
itself brilliantly and jus tif y itself. < QJ , 6 > 



Happiness of the collector, happiness of the solitary, tete-a-tete with things. Is not 
this the felicity that suffuses our memories — that in them we are alone with 
particular things, which range about us in their silence, and that even the people 
who haunt our thoughts then partake in diis steadfast, confederate silence of 
tilings. The collector "stills" his fate. And that means he disappears in die world 
of memory. <QJ,7> 

E. T. A. HofFmaim, "Die Automate" < Automata) {Serapionsbriider <The Serapion Breth- 
ren, 1819-1821>, vol. 2). ' <QJ,8) 

Hoffmann as type of the flaneur. "Des Vetters Eckfenster" <My Cousin's Comer Win- 
dow) the testament of the flaneur. Thus Hoffmann's great success in France. In the 
biographical notes to the five-volume collection of his later writings, we read: "Hoffmann 
was never really a friend of the great outdoors . What mattered to him more than anything 
else was the human being — communication with, observations about, the simple sight of, 
human beings. Whenever he went for a walk in summer, which in good weather hap- 
pened every day toward evening, he always made for those public places where he would 
run into people. On the way, there was scarcely a tavern or pastry shop where he would 
not look in to see whedier anyone — and if so, who — might be there." <See M4a,2.) 

<a°,9> 



Armature of physiognomic studies: the flaneur, the collector, the forger, the gambler. 

<QJ,10) 



Hans Kistemaecker, "Die Kleidung der Frau: Ein erotisches Problem" <Women's Cloth- 
ing, A Problem in Erotics >, ^jirc/ier Di.skumonen, vol, 8 (1898). The author probably 
Panizza. <QJ\H> 



Louis Schneider, Ofenbach (Paris, 1923). 3!) <d°,12> 

Le Guide historique et anecdotique de Paris (Paris, Editions Argo). 60 <QJ',13> 

We can be sure that the art of an earlier period — in its sociological sphere of 
influence, in the hierarchies that were founded on it, in the maimer of its forma- 
tion — was much more closely related to what today is f ashion than to what today 
is known as art. Fashion: aristocratic-esoteric origin of the most widely distrib- 
uted articles of use. < QJ , 1 4 > 

Misunderstanding as constitutive element in the development of fashion. No 
sooner is the new fashion at a slight remove from its origin and point of departure 
than it is turned about and misunderstood. <QJ',15> 

Metternich, Denkwiirdigkeiten (Munich, 1921). 61 <QJ,16> 

Flans von Veltheini, Heliogabale, ou Biographie du XIX siecle de la France 
(Braunschweig, 1 843) . < QJ , 1 7 > 

Grasse andjannicke, Kunstgeiuerbliclie Altertilmer und Kuriositaten (Berlin, 1909). 

<Qy8> 

On La Muette de Portici. 62 First performance 1828. An undulating musical extravaganza, 
an opera made of draperies, which rise and subside over the words. "Very evident the 
success which this musical must have had at a time when la drapene was beginning its 
triumphal procession (at first, infasliion, as Turkish shawls). The novarum rerum cupidur® 
of the revolutionary is understood by this public to mean interest in fancy goods. With 
good reason it was shown a revolt whose premier task is to protect the king from its own 
effect. Revolution as drapery covering a slight reshuffle in the ruling circles, precisely what 
occurred in 1830. <See B4,3.> <CL°,19> 

Hemi See, R-araodsclw WirtschaJhgescMchte^ <OJ,20> 

On the dialectical image. In it lies time. Already with Hegel, time enters into 
dialectic. But the Flegelian dialectic knows time solely as the properly historical, if 
not psychological, time of thinking. The time differential <£eitdifferential> in 
which alone the dialectical image is real is still unknown to him. Attempt to show 
this with regard to fashion. Real time enters the dialectical image not in natural 
magnitude — let alone psychologically — but in its smallest gestalt. <See Nl,2.> — 
All in all, the temporal momentum <das ^eit??w?7ient> in the dialectical image can 
be determined only through confrontation with another concept. This concept is 
the "now of recognizability" <Jeht der Erkennbarkeit>. <QJ,21> 



Fashion is intention that ignites; knowledge, intention that extinguishes. 

<Q.°.22> 



What is "always the same thing" is not the event but the newness of the event, 
the shock with which it eventuates. <Q,°,23 > 

Am I the one who is called W!B., or am I simply called W!B.? These are two sides 
of a medallion, but the second side is worn and effaced, while the first is freshly 
minted. This initial take on the question makes it evident that the name is object 
of a mimesis. Of course, it is in the nature of the latter to show itself not in what 
is about to happen, but always only in what has been — that is, in what has been 
lived. The habitus of a lived life: this is what the name preserves, but also marks 
out in advance. With the concept of mimesis, it is further asserted that the realm 
of the name is the realm of the similar. And since similarity is the organon of 
experience <Erfahrung>, it may be said that the name can be recognized only in 
the contexts of experience. Only in them is its essence — that is, linguistic es- 
sence — recognizable. <Q,°,24> 

Point of departure for the foregoing considerations: a conversation with Wiesen- 
grund on the operas Electm and Carmen. To what extent their names already 
contain within themselves their distinctive character, and thus make it possible 
for the child to have a presentiment of these works long bef ore he comes to know 
them. (Carmen appears to him in the shawl which his mother has around her on 
evenings when she kisses him good night before going to the opera.) The knowl- 
edge contained in the name is developed most of all in the child, for the mimetic 
capability decreases with age in most people. <Q,°,25> 



■ 

: ,,, r . : .... ... ^ 

EARLY DRAFTS 



Arcades 



This brief essay, dating from the summer or fall of 1927 (Gesammelte Schriften, vol. 5, [Frankfurt: 
Suhrkamp, 1982], pp. 1041-1043), is the only completed text we have from the earliest period of 
work on The Arcades Project, when Benjamin was planning to write a newspaper article on the Paris 
arcades in collaboration with Franz Hessel. The article may have been written by Benjamin and 
Hessel together. (See "Materials for 'Arcades.'") 

On the Avenue Champs-Elysees, between modern hotels with Anglo-Saxon 
names, arcades were opened recently and the newest Parisian passage made its 
appearance. For its inaugural ceremony, a monster orchestra in uniform per- 
formed in front of flower beds and flowing fountains. The crowd broke, groan- 
ing, over sandstone thresholds and moved along before panes of plate glass, saw 
artificial rain fall on the copper entrails of late-model autos as a demonstration of 
the quality of the materials, saw wheels turning around in oil, read on small black 
plaques, in paste-jewel figures, the prices of leather goods and gramophone re- 
cords and embroidered kimonos. In the diffuse light from above, one skimmed 
over flagstones. While here a new thoroughfare was being prepared for the most 
fashionable Paris, one of the oldest arcades in the city has disappeared — the 
Passage de l'Opera, swallowed up by the opening of the Boulevard Haussmann. 
Just as that remarkable covered walkway had done for an earlier generation, so 
today a few arcades still preserve, in dazzling light and shadowy corners, a past 
become space. Antiquated trades survive within these inner spaces, and the 
merchandise on display is unintelligible, or else has several meanings. Already 
the inscriptions and signs on the entranceways (one could just as well say "exits," 
since, with these peculiar hybrid forms of house and street, every gate is simulta- 
neously entrance and exit), already the inscriptions which multiply along the 
walls within, where here and there between overloaded coatstands a spiral stair- 
case rises into darkness — already they have about them something enigmatic. 
"Albert at No. 83" will in all likelihood be a hairdresser, and "Theatrical Tights" 
will be silk tights; but these insistent letterings want to say more. And who would 
have the courage to take the dilapidated stairs up one flight to the beauty salon of 
Professor Alfred Bitter lin? Mosaic thresholds, in the style of the old restaurants 
of the Palais-Royal, lead to a diner de Paris; they make a broad ascent to a glass 
door — but can there really be a restaurant behind it? And the glass door next to 
it, which announces a casino and permits a glimpse of something like a ticket 



booth with prices of seats posted — would it not, if one opened it, lead one into 
darkness rather than a theater, into a cellar or down to the street? And on the 
ticket booth hang stockings once again, stockings as in the doll hospital across 
the way and, somewhat earlier, on the side table of the tavern. — In the crowded 
arcades of the boulevards, as in the semi-deserted arcades of the old Rue Saint- 
•enis, umbrellas and canes are displayed in serried ranks: a phalanx of colorful 
crooks. Many are the institutes of hygiene, where gladiators are wearingorthope- 
dic belts and bandages wind round the white bellies of mannequins. In the 
windows of the hairdressers, one sees the last women with long hair; they sport 
richly undulating masses, petrified coiffures. How brittle appears the stonework 
of the walls beside them and above: crumbling papier-mache! "Souvenirs" and 
bibelots take on a hideous aspect; the odalisque lies in wait next to the inkwell; 
priestesses in knitted jackets raise aloft ashtrays like vessels of holy water. A 
bookshop makes a place for manuals of lovemaking beside devotional prints in 
color; next to the memoirs of a chambermaid, it has Napoleon riding through 
Marengo and, between cookbook and dreambook, old-English burghers tread- 
ing the broad and the narrow way of the Gospel. In the arcades, one comes upon 
types of collar studs for which we no longer know the corresponding collars and 
shirts. If a shoemaker's shop should be neighbor to a confectioner's, then his 
festoons of bootlaces will resemble rolls of licorice. Over stamps and letterboxes 
roll balls of string and of silk. Naked puppet bodies with bald heads wait for 
hairpieces and attire. Combs swim about, frog-green and coral-red, as in an 
aquarium; trumpets turn to conches, ocarinas to umbrella handles; and lying in 
the fixative pans from a photographer's darkroom is birdseed. The concierge of 
the gallery has, in his loge, three plush-covered chairs with crocheted antimacas- 
sars, but next door is a vacant shop from whose inventory only a printed bill 
remains: "Will purchase sets of teeth in gold, in wax, and broken." Mere, in the 
quietest part of the side-alley, individuals of both sexes can interview for a staff 
position within the confines of a sitting room set up behind glass. On the pale-col- 
ored wallpaper full of figures and bronze busts falls the light of a gas lamp. An old 
woman sits beside it, reading. For years, it would seem, she has been alone. And 
now the passage is becoming more empty. A small red tin parasol coyly points 
the way up a stair to an umbrella ferrule factory; a dusty bridal veil promises a 
repository of cockades for weddings and banquets. But no one believes it any 
longer. Fire escape, gutter: I am in the open. Opposite is something like an arcade 
again — an archway and, through it, a blind alley leading to a one-windowed 
Hotel de Boulogne or Bourgogne. But I am no longer heading in that direction; I 
am going up the street to the triumphal gate that, gray and glorious, was built in 
honor of Louis the Great. Carved in relief on the pyramids that decorate its 
columns are lions at rest, weapons hanging, and dusky trophies. 



<The Arcades of Paris> 

< Paris Arcades II> 



These originally untitled texts (Gesanmielte Schriften, vol. 5, [Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1982], pp. 1044- 
1059), written on loose sheets of expensive handmade paper folded in half, date from 1928 or, at the 
latest, 1929, when Benjamin was planning to write an essay entitled "Pariser Passagen: Eine dialek- 
tische Feerie" (Paris Arcades: A Dialectical Fairyland). In the manuscript they are followed by 
citations which were largely transferred to the con volutes and which therefore are not reproduced in 
the German edition at this point. The ordering of the entries here is that of the German editor, who 
also gives their original order in the manuscript: 

Ms. 1154 recto: a°,l; a°,3; b°,l; b°,2. 
Ms. 1154 verso: c°,3; e°,l. 
Ms. 1155 recto: c°,l; c°,4; d°,l; d°,2; c°,2. 
Ms. 1155 verso: h°,5. 

Ms. 1160 verso: h°,l; a°,2; f°,l; h°,2; h°,3; h°,4; a°,5. 
Ms. 1161 verso: f D ,2; e°,2; P,3; a°,4; g°,l. 

These texts were among those from which Benjamin read to Adomo and Horkheimer at Konigstein 
and Frankfurt in 1929. Prominent correspondences to entries in the convolutes and to the essay 
"Arcades" are indicated in cross-references. 

"In speaking of the inner boulevards," says the Illustrated Guide to Paris, a com- 
plete picture of the city on the Seine and its environs from the year 1852, "we 
have made mention again and again of the arcades which open onto them. Hiese 
arcades, a recent invention of industrial luxury, are glass-roofed, marble-paneled 
corridors extending through whole blocks of buildings, whose owners have 
joined together for such enterprises. Lining both sides of these corridors, which 
get their light from above, are the most elegant shops, so that the arcade is a city, 
a world in miniature, in which customers will find everything they need. During 
sudden rainshowers, the arcades are a place of refuge for the unprepared, to 
whom they offer a secure, if restricted, promenade — one from which the mer- 
chants also benefit." The customers are gone, along with those taken by surprise. 
Rain brings in only the poorer clientele without waterproof or mackintosh. 
These were spaces for a generation of people who knew little of the weather and 
who, on Sundays, when it snowed, would rather warm themselves in the winter 
gardens than go out skiing. Glass before its time, premature iron: it was one 
single line of descent — arcades, winter gardens with their lordly palms, and 
railroad stations, which cultivated the false orchid "adieu" with its fluttering 
petals. They have long since given way to the hangar. And today, it is the same 



with the human material on the inside of the arcades as with the materials of their 
construction. Pimps are the iron uprights of this street, and its glass breakables 
are the whores. Here was the last refuge of those infant prodigies that saw the 
light of day at the time of the world exhibitions: the briefcase with interior 
lighting, the meter-long pocket knife, or the patented umbrella handle with built- 
in watch and revolver. And near the degenerate giant creatures, aborted and 
broken-down matter. We followed the narrow dark corridor to where — between 
a discount bookstore, in which colorful tied-up bundles tell of all sorts of failure, 
and a shop selling only buttons (mother-of-pearl and the kind that in Paris are 
called de fantaisie) — there stood a sort of salon. On a pale-colored wallpaper full 
of figures and busts shone a gas lamp. By its light, an old woman sat reading. 
They say she has been there alone for years, and collects sets of teeth "in gold, in 
wax, and broken." Since that day, moreover, we know where Doctor Miracle got 
the wax out of which he fashioned Olympia. 1 They are the true fairies of these 
arcades (more salable and more worn than the life-sized ones): the formerly 
world-famous Parisian dolls, which revolved on their musical socle and bore in 
their arms a doll-sized basket out of which, at the salutation of the minor chord, a 
lambkin poked its curious muzzle. <See A 1,1; F3,2; H1,1;Z1,2.> <a°,l> 

All this is the arcade in our eyes. And it was nothing of all this. They <the 
arcades> radiated through the Paris of the Empire like grottoes. For someone 
entering the Passage des Panoramas in 1817, the sirens of gaslight would be 
singing to him on one side, while oil-lamp odalisques offered enticements from 
the other. With the kindling of electric lights, the irreproachable glow was extin- 
guished in these galleries, which suddenly became more difficult to find — which 
wrought a black magic at entranceways, and peered from blind windows into 
their own interior. It was not decline but transformation. All at once, they were 
the hollow mold from which the image of "modernity" was cast. Here, the 
century mirrored with satisfaction its most recent past. Here was the retirement 
home for infant prodigies . . . <See C2a,9; Tla,8; Sla,6> <a*,2> 

When, as children, we were given those great encyclopedic works World and 
Mankind, New Universe, Tlie Earth, wouldn't our gaze always fall, first of all, on 
the color illustration of a "Carboniferous Landscape" or on "Lakes and Glaciers 
of the First Ice Age"? Such an ideal panorama of a barely elapsed primeval age 
opens up when we look through the arcades that are found in all cities. Here 
resides the last dinosaur of Europe, the consumer. On the walls of these caverns, 
their immemorial flora, the commodity, luxuriates and enters, like cancerous 
tissue, into the most irregular combinations. A world of secret affinities : palm tree 
and feather duster, hair dryer and Venus de Milo, prosthesis and letter-writing 
manual come together here as after a long separation. The odalisque lies in wait 
next to the inkwell, priestesses raise aloft ashtrays like patens. These items on 
display are a rebus; and <how> one ought to read here the birdseed kept in the 
fixative-pan from a darkroom, the flower seeds beside the binoculars, the broken 
screws atop the musical score, and the revolver above the goldfish bowl — is right 



on the tip of one's tongue. After all, nothing of the lot appears to be new. The 
goldfish come perhaps from a pond that dried up long ago, the revolver will have 
been a corpus delicti, and these scores could hardly have preserved their pre- 
vious owner from starvation when her last pupils stayed away. <See R2,3.> 

<a°,3> 

Never trust what writers say about their own writings. When Zola undertook to 
defend his Therese Raquin against hostile critics, he explained that his book was a 
scientific study of the temperaments. His task had been to show, in an example, 
exactly how the sanguine and the nervous temperaments act on one another — to 
the detriment of each. But this explanation could satisfy no one. Nor does it 
explain the unprecedented admixture of colportage, the bloodthirstiness, the 
cinematic goriness of the action. Which — by no accident — takes place in an 
arcade. If this book really expounds something scientifically, then it's the death of 
the Paris arcades, the decay of a type of architecture. The book's atmosphere is 
saturated with the poisons of this process, and its people are destroyed by them. 
<See Hl,3.> <a',4> 

One knew of places in ancient Greece where the way led down into the under- 
world. Our waking existence likewise is a land which, at certain hidden points, 
leads down into the underworld — a land full of inconspicuous places from which 
dreams arise. All day long, suspecting nothing, we pass them by, but no sooner 
has sleep come than we are eagerly groping our way back to lose ourselves in the 
dark corridors. By day, the labyrinth of urban dwellings resembles conscious- 
ness; the arcades (which are galleries leading into the city's past) issue unre- 
marked onto the streets. At night, however, under the tenebrous mass of the 
houses, their denser darkness bursts forth like a threat, and the nocturnal pedes- 
trian hurries past — unless, that is, we have emboldened him to turn into the 
narrow lane. <See Cla,2.) <a°,5> 

Falser colors are possible in the arcades; that combs are red and green surprises 
no one. Snow White's stepmother had such things, and when the comb did not 
do its work, the beautiful apple was there to help out — half red, half poison- 
green, like cheap combs. Everywhere stockings play a starring role. Now they are 
lying under phonographs, across the way in a stamp shop; another time on the 
side table of a tavern, where they are watched over by a girl. And again in front of 
the stamp shop opposite, where, between the envelopes with various stamps in 
refined assortments, manuals of an antiquated art of life are lovelessly dis- 
pensed — Secret Ei?ibraces and Maddening Illusions, introductions to outmoded 
vices and discarded passions. The shop windows are covered with vividly col- 
ored Epinal-style posters, on which Harlequin betroths his daughter, Napoleon 
rides through Marengo, and, amid all types of standard artillery pieces, delicate 
English burghers travel the high road to hell and the forsaken path of the Gospel. 
No customer ought to enter this shop with preconceived ideas; on leaving, he 
will be the more content to take home a volume: Malebranche's Recherche de la 



verite, or Miss Daisy: Tlie Journal of an English Equestrienne. <See Gla,l and 
"Arcades.") <b°,l> 



To the inhabitants of these arcades we are pointed now and then by the signs and 
inscriptions which multiply along the walls within, where here and there, be- 
tween the shops, a spiral staircase rises into darkness. The signs have little in 
common with the nameplates that hang beside respectable entryways but are 
reminiscent of plaques on the cages at zoos, put there to indicate not so much the 
dwelling place as the origin and species of the captive animals. Deposited in the 
letters of the metal or enameled signboards is a precipitate of all the forms of 
writing that have ever been in use in the West. "Albert at No. 83" will be a 
hairdresser, and "Theatrical Tights" will probably be silk tights, pink and light 
blue, for young chanteuses and ballerinas; but these insistent letterings want to 
say something more, something different. Collectors of curiosities in the field of 
cultural history have in their secret drawer broadsheets of a highly paid literature 
which seem, at first sight, to be commercial prospectuses or theatrical bills, and 
which squander dozens of different alphabets in disguising an open invitation. 
These dark enameled signs bring to mind the baroque lettering on the cover of 
obscene books. — Recall the origin of the modern poster. In 1861, the first litho- 
graphic poster suddenly appeared on walls here and there around London. It 
showed the back of a woman in white who was thickly wrapped in a shawl and 
who, in all haste, had just reached the top of a flight of stairs, where, her head half 
turned and a finger upon her lips, she is ever so slightly opening a heavy door to 
reveal die starry sky. In this way Wilkie Collins advertised his latest book, one of 
the greatest detective novels ever written, The Woman in White. Still color<less>, 
the first drops of a shower of letters ran down the walls of houses (today it pours 
unremittingly, day and night, on the big cities) and was greeted like the plagues of 
Egypt. — Hence the anxiety we feel when, crowded out by those who actually 
make purchases, wedged between overloaded coatstands, we read at the bottom 
of the spiral staircase: "Insbtut de Beaute du Professeur Alfred Bitterlin." And the 
"Fabrique de Cravates au Deuxieme" — Are there really neckties there or not? 
("The Speckled Band" from Sherlock Holmes?) Of course, the needlework will 
have been quite inoffensive, and all the imagined horrors will be classified objec- 
tively in the statistics on tuberculosis. As a consolation, these places are seldom 
lacking institutes of hygiene. There gladiators wear orthopedic belts, and ban- 
dages are wrapped round the white bellies of mannequins. Something induces 
the owner of the shop to circulate among them on a frequent basis. — Many are 
the aristocrats who know nothing of the Almanach de Gotha: "Mme. de Con- 
solis, Ballet Mistress — Lessons, Classes, Numbers." "Mine, de Zalina, Fortune- 
teller." And if, sometime in the mid-Nineties, <we had> asked for a prediction, 
surely it would have been: the decline of a culture. <See Gl,6 and "Arcades."> 

<b°,2> 

Often these inner spaces harbor antiquated trades, and even those that are thor- 
oughly up to date will acquire in diem something obsolete. They are the site of 



information bureaus and detective agencies, which there, in the gloomy light of 
the upper galleries, follow the trail of the past. In hairdressers' windows, you can 
see the last women with long hair. They have richly undulating masses of hair, 
which are "permanent waves," petrified coiffures. They ought to dedicate small 
votive plaques to those who made a special world of these buildings — to Baude- 
laire and Odilon Redon, whose very name sounds like an all too well-turned 
ringlet. Instead, they have been betrayed and sold, and the head of Salome itself 
made into an ornament — if that which sorrows there in the console is not the 
embalmed head of Anna Czyllak. And while these things are petrified, the ma- 
sonry of the walls above has become brittle. Brittle, too, are the mosaic thresh- 
olds that lead you, in the style of the old restaurants of the Palais-Royal, to a 
"Parisian Dinner" for five francs; they mount boldly to a glass door, but you can 
hardly believe that behind this door is really a restaurant. The glass door adja- 
cent promises a "Petit Casino" and allows a glimpse of a ticket booth and the 
prices of seats; but were you to open it — would it open into anything? Instead of 
entering the space of a theater, wouldn't you be stepping down to the street? 
Where doors and walls are made of mirrors, there is no telling outside from in, 
with all the equivocal illumination. Paris is a city of mirrors. The asphalt of its 
roadways smooth as glass, and at the entrance to all bistros glass partitions. A 
profusion of windowpanes and mirrors in cafes, so as to make the inside brighter 
and to give all the tiny nooks and crannies, into which Parisian taverns separate, 
a pleasing amplitude. Women here look at themselves more than elsewhere, and 
from this comes the distinctive beauty of the Parisienne. Before any man catches 
sight of her, she has already seen herself ten times reflected. But the man, too, 
sees his own physiognomy flash by. He gains his image more quickly here than 
elsewhere and also sees himself more quickly merged with this, his image. Even 
the eyes of passersby are veiled mirrors. And over that wide bed of the Seine, 
over Paris, the sky is spread out like the crystal mirror hanging over the drab 
beds in brothels. <See Hla,l; Rl,3; "Arcades."> <c°,l> 

Let two niirrors reflect each other; then Satan plays his favorite trick and opens 
here in his way (as his partner does in lovers' gazes) the perspective on infinity. Be 
it now divine, now Satanic: Paris has a passion for mirror-like perspectives. The 
Arc de Triomphe, the Sacre Coeur, and even the Pantheon appear, from a dis- 
tance, like images hovering above the ground and opening, architecturally, a fata 
morgana. Baron von Haussmann, when he undertook to transform Paris during 
the period of the Third <correction: Second> Empire, was intoxicated with these 
perspectives and wanted to multiply them wherever possible. In the arcades, the 
perspective is lastingly preserved as in the nave of a church. And the windows in 
the upper story are choir lofts in which the angels that men call "swallows" are 
nesting. — "Hirondelles < — women) who work the window." <See Rl,6 and 
Ola,2.> <c°,2> 

Ambiguity of the arcades as an ambiguity of space. Readiest access to this phe- 
nomenon would be afforded by the multiple deployment of figures in the wax 



museum. On the other hand, the resolute focus on the ambiguity of space, a 
focus obtained in the arcades, has to benefi t the theory of Parisian streets. The 
outermost, merely quite peripheral aspect of the ambiguity of the arcades is 
provided by their abundance of mirrors, which fabulously amplifies the spaces 
and makes oiientation more difficult. Perhaps that isn't saying much. Neverthe- 
less: though it may have many aspects, indeed infinitely many, it remains — in the 
sense of mirror world — ambiguous, double-edged. It blinks, is always just this 
one — and never nothing — out of which another immediately arises. The space 
that transforms itself does so in the bosom of nothingness. In its tarnished, dirded 
mirrors, things exchange a Kaspar-Hauser-look with the nothing: it is an utterly 
equivocal wink coming from nirvana. And here, again, we are brushed with icy 
breath by the dandyish name of Odilon Redon, who caught, like no one else, this 
look of things in the mirror of nothingness, and who understood, like no one 
else, how to join with things in their collusion with non being. The whispering of 
gazes fills the arcades. There is no thing here that does not, where one least 
expects it, open a fugitive eye, blinking it shut again; and should you look more 
closely, it is gone. To the whispering of these gazes, the space lends its echo: 
"Now, what," it blinks, "can possibly have come over me?" We stop short in 
some surprise. "What, indeed, can possibly have come over you?" Thus we 
gendy bounce the question back to it. Here, the coronation of Charlemagne 
could have taken place, as well as the assassination of Henri IV, the death of 
<Edward's> sons in the Tower, and the . . . That is why the wax museums are 
here. This optical gallery of princes is their acknowledged capital. For Louis XI, 
it is the throne room; for Ttbrk, die Tower of London; for Abdel Krim, the desert; 
and for Nero, Rome. <See R2a,3 and Q2,2.> <c°,3> 

The innermost glowing cells of the ville lumiere, the old dioramas, nested in these 
arcades, one of which today still bears the name Passage des Panoramas. It was, 
in die very first moment, as though you had entered an aquarium. Along the wall 
of the great darkened hall, broken at intervals by narrow joints, it stretched like a 
land of illuminated water behind glass. The play of colors among deep-sea fauna 
cannot be more fiery. But what came to light here were open-air, atmospheric 
wonders. Seraglios are mirrored on moolit waters; bright nights in deserted parks 
loom large. In the moonlight you can recognize the chateau of Saint-Leu, where a 
hundred years ago the last Conde was found hanged in a window. A light is still 
burning in a window of the chateau. A couple of times the sun splashes wide in 
between. In the clear light of a summer morning, one sees die rooms of the 
Vatican as they would have appeared to the Nazarenes; not far beyond rises 
Baden-Baden in its entirety, and were we not writing of 1860, one could perhaps 
make out among its figurines, on a scale of 1 :10,000, Dostoevsky on the casino 
terrace. But candlelight, too, is honored. Wax tapers encircle the murdered due 
de Berry in the dusky cathedral that serves as mortuary chapel, and hanging 
lamps in the skies beside 2 practically put round Luna to shame. It was an unpar- 
alleled experiment on the moonstrack magic night of Romanticism, and its noble 
substance emerged victorious from this ingenious trial. For anyone who was 



inclined to linger before the transparent image of the old thermal baths of 
Contrexeville, it was as though he had already wandered, in some previous life, 
along this sunny way between poplars, had brushed against the stone wall close 
by — modest, magical effects for domestic use, such as otherwise would be expe- 
rienced only in rare cases, as before Chinese groups in soapstone or Russian 
lacquer-painting. <See Q3,2.> <c°,4> 

Streets are the dwelling place of the collective. The collective is an eternally 
wakeful, eternally agitated being that — in the space between the building 
fronts — lives, experiences, understands, and invents as much as individuals do 
within the privacy of their own four walls. For this collective, glossy enameled 
shop signs are a wall decoration as good as, if not better than, an oil painting in 
the drawing room of a bourgeois; walls with their "Post No Bills" are its writing 
desk, newspaper stands its libraries, mailboxes its bronze busts, benches its bed- 
room furniture, and the cafe terrace is the balcony from which it looks down on 
its household. The section of railing where road workers hang their jackets is the 
vestibule, and the gateway which leads from the row of courtyards out into the 
open is the long corridor that daunts the bourgeois, being for the courtyards the 
entry to the chambers of the city. Among these latter, the arcade was the drawing 
room. More than anywhere else, the street reveals itself in the arcade as the 
furnished and familiar interior of the masses. <See M3a,4.> <d°, 1> 

The bourgeois who came into ascendancy with Louis Philippe sets store by the 
transformation of near and far into the interior. He knows but a single scene: the 
drawing room. In 1839, a ball is held at the British embassy. Two hundred rose 
bushes are ordered. "The garden," so runs an eyewitness account, "was covered 
by an awning and had the feel of a drawing room. But what a drawing room! The 
fragrant, well-stocked flower beds had turned into enormous jardinieres, the grav- 
eled walks had disappeared under sumptuous carpets, and in place of the cast- 
iron benches we found sofas covered in damask and silk; a round table held 
books and albums. From a distance, the strains of an orchestra drifted into this 
colossal boudoir, and, along the triple gallery of flowers on the periphery, exuber- 
ant young people were passing to and fro. It was altogether delightful!" The 
dusty fata morgana of the winter garden, the dreary perspective of the train 
station, with the small altar of happiness at the intersection of the tracks — it all 
molders, even today, under spurious constructions, glass before its time, prema- 
ture iron. <Toward the> middle of the previous century, no one as yet understood 
how to build with glass and iron. The problem, however, has long since been 
solved by the hangar. <Now> it is the same with the human material on the inside 
of the arcades as with the materials of their construction. Pimps are the iron 
uprights of this street, and its glass breakables are the whores. <See 14,1 ; F3,2; 
Fl,2.> <d°,2> 

For the flaneur, a transformation takes place with respect to the street: it leads 
him through a vanished time. He strolls down the street; for him, every street is 



precipitous. It leads downward — if not to the mythical Mothers, then into a past 
that can be all the more profound because it is not his own, not private. Never- 
theless, it always remains the past of a youth But why that of the life he has 
lived? The ground over which he goes, the asphalt, is hollow. His steps awaken a 
surprising resonance; the gaslight that streams down on the paving stones throws 
an equivocal light on this double ground. The figure of the flaneur advances over 
the street of stone, with its double ground, as though driven by a clockwork 
mechanism. And within, where this mechanism is ensconced, a music box is 
palpitating <?> like some toy of long ago. It plays a tune: "From days of youth, / 
from days of youth, / a song is with me still." By this melody he recognizes what 
is around him; it is not a past coming from his own youth, from a recent youth, 
but a childhood lived before then that speaks to him, and it is all the same to him 
whether it is the childhood of an ancestor or his own. — An intoxication comes 
over the man who walks long and aimlessly through the streets. With each step, 
the walk takes on greater momentum; ever weaker grow the temptations of 
bistros, of shops, of smiling women, ever more irresistible the magnetism of the 
next streetcorner, of a distant square in the fog, of the back of a woman walking 
before him. Then comes hunger. He wants, however, nothing to do with the 
myriad possibilities offered to sate his appetite, but like an animal he prowls 
through unknown districts in search of food, in search of a woman, until, utterly 
exhausted, he stumbles into his room, which receives him coldly and wears a 
strange air. Paris created this type. What is remarkable is that it wasn't Rome. 
And the reason? Just this: does not dreaming itself take the high road in Rome? 
And isn't that city too full of themes, of monuments, enclosed squares, national 
shrines, to be able to enter tout enliere — with eveiy cobblestone, every shop sign, 
every step, and every gateway — into the passerby's dream? The national charac- 
ter of the Italians may also have much to do with this. For it is not the foreigners 
but they themselves, the Parisians, who have made Paris the holy city of the 
flaneur — the "landscape built of sheer life," as Hof mannsthal once put it. Land- 
scape — that, in fact, is what Paris becomes for the flaneur. Or, more precisely, the 
city neatly splits for him into its dialectical poles: it opens up to him as a land- 
scape, even as it closes around him as a room. — Another thing: that anamnestic 
intoxication in which the flaneur goes about the city not only feeds on the 
sensory data taking shape before his eyes but can very well possess itself of 
abstract knowledge — indeed, of dead facts — as something experienced and lived 
through This felt knowledge, as is obvious, travels above all by word of mouth 
from one person to another. But in the course of the nineteenth century, it was 
also deposited in an immense literature. Even before Lefeuve (who quite aptly 
made the following formula the title of his five-volume work), "Paris street by 
street, house by house" was lovingly depicted as storied landscape forming a 
backdrop to the dreaming idler. The study of these books was, for the Parisian, 
like a second existence, one wholly predisposed toward dreaming; the knowledge 
these books gave him took form and figure during an afternoon walk, before the 
aperitif. And wouldn't he necessarily have felt the gentle slope behind the church 
of Notre Dame de Lorette rise all the more insistently under his soles if he 



realized: here, at one time, after Paris had gotten its first omnibuses, the cheval de 
renfort was harnessed to the coach to reinforce the two other horses. <See Ml, 2- 
Ml,5.> <c°,i> 



Boredom is a warm gray fabric lined on the inside with the most lustrous and 
colorful of silks. In this fabric we wrap ourselves when we dream. We are at home 
then in the arabesques of its lining. But the sleeper looks bored and gray within 
his sheath. And when he later wakes and wants to tell of what he dreamed, he 
communicates, by and large, only this boredom. For who would be able at one 
stroke to turn the lining of time to the outside? Yet to narrate dreams signifies 
nothing else. And in no other way can one deal with the arcades — structures in 
which we relive, as in a dream, the life of our parents and grandparents, as the 
embiyo in the womb relives the life of animals. Existence in these spaces flows 
then without accent, like the events in dreams. Flanerie is the rhythmics of this 
slumber. In 1839, a rage for tortoises overcame Paris. One can well imagine the 
elegant set mimicking the pace of this creature more easily in the arcades than on 
the boulevards. Boredom is always the external surface of unconscious events. 
For that reason, it has appeared to the great dandies as a mark of distinction. <See 
D2a,l andD2a, 2.> <e*,2> 

Here fashion has opened the business of dialectical exchange between woman 
and ware. The clerk, death, tall and loutish, measures the century by the yard, 
serves as mannequin himself to save costs, and manages single-handedly the 
liquidation that in French is called "revolution." For fashion was never anything 
other than the parody of the motley cadaver, the provocation of death through 
the woman, and bitter colloquy with decay whispered between loud outbursts of 
mechanical jubilation. Tlfis is why fashion changes so quickly: she titillates death 
and is already something different, something new, as he casts about to crush her. 
For a hundred years she holds her own against him. Now, finally, she is on die 
point of quitting the field. But he erects on the banks of a new Lethe, which rolls 
its asphalt stream through arcades, the armature of the whores as a battle memo- 
rial. <See Bl,4.> <f°,l> 

When Hacklander made use of this "newest invention of industrial luxury" for 
one of his fairy tales, he too placed the marvelous dolls in the dangerous arcade 
which sister Tinchen, at the behest of the faiiy Concordia, has to wander in 
order finally to rescue her poor brothers. "Fearlessly, Tinchen stepped across the 
border into the enchanted land, all the while thinking only of her brothers. At 
first she noticed nothing unusual, but soon the way led through an enormous 
room entirely filled with toys. She saw small booths stocked with everydfing 
imaginable — carousels with miniature horses and carriages, swings and rocking 
horses, but above all the most splendid dollhouses. Around a small covered table, 
large dolls were sitting on easy chairs; and as Tinchen turned her gaze upon 
them, the largest and most beautiful of these dolls stood up, made her a gracious 
bow, and spoke to her in a little voice of exquisite refinement." The child may not 



want to hear of toys that are bewitched, but the evil spell of this slippery path 
readily takes the form, even today, of large animated dolls. But who still remem- 
bers, nowadays, where it was that in the last decade of the previous century 
women would offer to men their most seductive aspect, the most intimate prom- 
ise of their figure? In the asphalted indoor arenas where people learned to ride 
bicycles. The woman as cyclist competes with the cabaret singer for place of 
honor on Cheret's posters (the afficfws) and gives to fashion its most daring line. 
<SeeZl,2andBl,8.> <i\2> 

Few things in the history of humanity are as well known to us as the history of 
Paris. Tens of thousands of volumes are dedicated solely to the investigation of 
this tiny spot on the earth's surface. For many streets, we know about the fate of 
every single house over a period of centuries. In a beautiful turn of phrase, Hugo 
von Hofmannsthal called this city "a landscape built of pure life." And at work in 
the attraction it exercises on people is the kind of beauty that is proper to great 
landscapes — more precisely, to volcanic landscapes. Paris is a counterpart in the 
social order to what Vesuvius is in the geographic order: a menacing, hazardous 
massif, an ever-active June of revolution. But just as the slopes of Vesuvius, 
thanks to the layers of lava that cover them, have been transformed into paradisal 
orchards, so the lava of revolution provides uniquely fertile ground for the blos- 
soming of art, festivity, fashion. <See Cl,6.> <f*,3> 

Hasn't his eternal vagabondage everywhere accustomed him to reinterpreting 
the image of the city? And doesn't he transform the arcade into a casino, into a 
gambling den, where now and again he stakes the red, blue, yellow jetons of 
feeling on women, on a face that suddenly surfaces (will it return his look?), on a 
mute mouth (will it speak?) ? What, on the baize cloth, looks out at the gambler 
from every number — luck, that is — here, from the bodies of all the women, 
winks at him as the chimera of sexuality: as his type. This is nothing other than 
the number, the cipher, in which just at that moment luck will be called by name, 
in order to jump immediately to another number. His type — that's the number 
that blesses thirty -six-fold, the one on which, without even trying, the eye of the 
voluptuary falls, as the ivory ball falls into the red or black compartment. He 
leaves the Palais-Royal with bulging pockets, calls to a whore, and once more 
finds in her arms the communion with number, in which money and riches, 
otherwise the most burdensome, most massive of things, come to him from the 
fates like a joyous embrace returned to the full. For in gambling hall and bordello, 
it is the same supremely sinful, supremely punishable delight: to challenge fate in 
pleasure. That sensual pleasure, of whatever stripe, could determine the theologi- 
cal concept of sin is something that only an unsuspecting idealism can believe. 
Determining the concept of debauchery in the theological sense is nothing else 
but this wresting of pleasure from out of the course of life with God, whose 
covenant with such life resides in the name. The name itself is the cry of naked 
lust. This holy thing, sober, fateless in itself — the name — -knows no greater ad- 
versary than the fate that takes its place in whoring and that forges its arsenal in 



superstition. Thus in gambler and prostitute that superstition which arranges the 
figures of fate and fills all wanton behavior with fateful forwardness, fateful 
concupiscence, bringing even pleasure to kneel before its throne. <See 01,L> 

<g°,l> 

The father of Surrealism was Dada; its mother was an arcade. Dada, when the 
two first met, was already old. At the end of 1919, Aragon and Breton, out of 
antipathy to Montparnasse and Montmartre, transferred the site of their meet- 
ings with friends to a cafe in the Passage de l'Opera. Construction of the Boule- 
vard Haussmann brought about the demise of the Passage de I'Opera. Louis 
Aragon devoted 135 pages to tliis arcade; in the sum of these three digits hides 
the number nine — the number of muses who presided as midwives at the birth of 
Surrealism. These stalwart muses are named Ballhorn, Lenin, Luna, Freud, 
Mors, Marlitt, and Citroen. A provident reader will make way for them all, as 
discreetly as possible, wherever they are encountered in the course of these lines. 
In Paysan de Paris, Aragon conducts as touching a requiem for this arcade as any 
man has ever conducted for the mother of his son. It is there to be read, but here 
one should expect no more than a physiology and, to be blunt, an autopsy of 
these parts of the capital city of Europe, parts that could not be more mysterious 
or more dead. <See Cl,3.> <h°,l> 

The Copeniican revolution in historical perception is as follows. Formerly it was 
thought that a fixed point had been found in "what has been," and one saw the 
present engaged in tentatively concentrating the forces of knowledge on this 
ground. Now this relation is to be overturned, and what has been is to acquire its 
dialectical fixation through the synthesis which awakening achieves with the 
opposing dream images. Politics attains primacy over history. Indeed, historical 
"facts" become something that just now happened to us, just now struck us: to 
establish them is the affair of memory. And awakening is the great exemplar of 
memory — that occasion on which we succeed in remembering what is nearest, 
most obvious (in the "I"). What Proust intends with the experimental rearrange- 
ment of furniture, what Bloch recognizes as the darkness of the lived moment, is 
nothing other than what here is secured on the level of the lristorical, and collec- 
tively. There is a not-yet-conscious knowledge of what lias been: its advancement 
has die structure of awakening. <See Kl,2.> <h°,2> 

In this historical and collective process of fixation, collecting plays a certain role. 
Collecting is a form of practical memory, and of all the profane manifestations of 
the penetration of "what has been" (of all the profane manifestations of "near- 
ness") it is the most binding. Thus, in a certain sense, the smallest act of political 
reflection makes for an epoch in the antiques business. We construct here an 
alarm clock that rouses the kitsch of the previous century to "assembly." This 
genuine liberation from an epoch has the structure of awakening in the following 
respect as well: it is entirely ruled by cunning. 3 For awakening operates with 
cunning. Only with cunning, not without it, can we work free of the realm of 



dream. But there is also a false liberation, whose sign is violence. Here, too, that 
law prevails by which the exertion brings about its opposite. This fruitless exer- 
tion is represented, for the period in question here, byjugendstil. <See Hla,2 and 
Gl,7> <h°,3> 

Dialectical structure of awakening: remembering and awaking are most inti- 
mately related. Awakening is namely the dialectical, Copernican turn of remem- 
brance <Eingedenken>. It is an eminently composed reversal from the world of 
dreaming to the world of waking. For the dialectical schematism at the core of 
this physiological process, the Chinese have found, in their fairy tales and novel- 
las, the most radical expression. The new, dialectical method of doing history 
teaches us to pass in spirit — with the rapidity and intensity of dreams — through 
what has been, in order to experience the present as waking world, a world to 
which every dream at last refers. <See Kl,3.> <h°,4> 

These notes devoted to the Paris arcades were begun under an open sky of 
cloudless blue that arched above the foliage and yet was dimmed by the millions 
of leaves from which the fresh breeze of diligence, the stertorous breath of re- 
search, the storm of youthful zeal, and the idle wind of curiosity have raised the 
dust of centuries. The painted sky of summer that looks down from the arcades 
in the reading room of the Bibliotheque Nationale in Paris has stretched its 
dreamy, unlit ceiling over the birth of their insight. And when that sky opened to 
the eyes of this young insight, there in the foreground were standing not the 
divinities of Olympus — not Zeus, Hephaestus, Hermes, or Hera, Artemis, and 
Athena— but the Dioscuri. 1 <See Nl,5.> <h°,5> 



The Ring of Saturn 
or 

Some Remarks on Iron Construction 



According to Gretel Adomo, this text (Gesammelte Schriften, vol. 5 [Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1982], 
pp. 1060-1063) was "one of the first pieces Benjamin read to us in <1929 in> Konigstein" (cited in 
Gesammelte Schriften, vol. 5, p. 1350). Benjamin himself filed the text at the beginning of Convolute 
G. Rolf Tiedemann suggests that it may have been intended as a radio broadcast for young people, 
but thinks it more likely to have been a newspaper or magazine article that was never published. The 
piece was written in 1928 or 1929. 

The beginning of the nineteenth century witnessed those initial experiments in 
iron construction whose results, in conjunction with those obtained from experi- 
ments with the steam engine, would so thoroughly transform the face of Europe 
by the end of the century. Rather than attempt a historical account of this proc- 
ess, we would like to focus some scattered reflections on a small vignette which 
has been extracted from the middle of the century (as from the middle of the 
thick book that contains it), and which indicates, although in grotesque style, 
what limitless possibilities were seen revealed by construction in iron. The picture 
comes from a work of 1844 — Grandville's Another World — and illustrates the 
adventures of a fantastic little hobgoblin who is trying to find his way around 
outer space: "A bridge — its two ends could not be embraced at a single glance 
and its piers were resting on planets — led from one world to another by a cause- 
way of wonderfully smooth asphalt. The three-hundred-tliirty-three-thousandth 
pier rested on Saturn. There our goblin noticed that the ring around this planet 
was notliing other than a circular balcony on which the inhabitants of Saturn 
strolled in the evening to get a breath of fresh air." 

Gas candelabra appear in our picture as well. They could not be overlooked, in 
those days, when speaking of the achievements of technology. Whereas for us 
gas lighting often has about it something dismal and oppressive, in that age it 
represented the height of luxury and splendor. When Napoleon was interred in 
the church of Les Invalides, the scene lacked nothing: in addition to velvet, silk, 
gold and silver, and wreaths of the immortals, there was an eternal lamp of gas 
over the resting place. An engineer in Lancaster had invented a device that 
people regarded as a veritable miracle — a mechanism by which the church clock 
over the tomb was automatically illuminated by gaslight at dusk and by which 
the flames were automatically extinguished at daybreak. 



For the rest, people were accustomed to seeing gas in conjunction with cast iron 
at those elegant establishments that were just then starting to appear: the arcades. 
The leading fancy-goods stores, the chic restaurants, the best confectioners, and 
so on found it necessary to secure a place in these galleries in order to preserve 
their reputations. Out of these galleries emerged, a little later on, the great depart- 
ment stores, of which the pioneering model, Au Bon Marche, was designed by 
the builder of the Eiffel Tower. 

Iron construction began with winter gardens and arcades — that is, with genuine 
luxury establishments. Very quickly, however, it found its true range of technical 
and industrial application. What resulted were constructions that had no prece- 
dent and that were occasioned by wholly new needs: covered markets, railroad 
stations, exhibition halls. Engineers led the way. But poets, as well, displayed 
amazing foresight. Thus, the French Romantic Gautier declares: "A proper archi- 
tecture will be created the moment we begin making use of the new materials 
furnished by the new industry. The advent of cast iron enables and calls for many 
new forms, as we can see in railroad terminals, suspension bridges, and the 
arches of winter gardens." Offenbach's Parisian Life was the first theatrical piece 
to be set in a railroad station. "Railway depots," they used to be called back then; 
and they inspired the strangest notions. A decidedly progressive Belgian painter, 
Antoine Wiertz, sought permission around midcentury to decorate the halls of 
railroad stations with frescoes. 

Step by step, the technology of that era took possession of new fields; it did so in 
the face of difficulties and objections of which today we can scarcely form a 
conception. In the 1830s in England, for example, a bitter controversy arose over 
the issue of iron rails. Under no circumstances, it was argued, could enough iron 
ever be procured for the English railway system (at that time planned on only the 
smallest scale). The "steam carriages" would have to run on lanes of granite. 

Alongside the theoretical battles were ongoing practical struggles with materials. 
The story of the bridge over the Firth of Tay is an especially memorable example. 
Six years were required for the construction of this bridge: 1872 to 1878. And 
shortly before its completion, on February 2, 1877, a hurricane (of the particularly 
violent sort that assail the inlet of the Tay and that also caused the catastrophe of 
1879)' blew down two of the biggest supporting piers. And not only bridge 
construction made such demands on the patience of engineers; with tunnels, it 
was no different. When, in 1858, plans were afoot for the twelve-kilometer 
tunnel through Mont Cenis, the estimated length of time for the work was seven 
years. 

Thus, while in great things heroic efforts were expended on precedent-setting, 
groundbreaking achievements, in little matters there was often — strange to say — 
something motley. It is as though people, and "artists" in particular, did not quite 
dare to acknowledge this new material, with all its possibilities. Whereas we 



allow our steel furnishings of today to be what they are, shiny and clean, a 
hundred years ago men took great pains, by means of subtle coating techniques, 
to make it appear that iron furniture — which was already being produced by 
then — was crafted from the finest wood. It was at this time that manufacturers 
began to stake their reputations on bringing out glasses that looked like porce- 
lain, gold jewelry resembling leather straps, iron tables with the look of wicker- 
work, and other such things. 

None of these efforts succeeded in covering over the chasm which the develop- 
ment of technology had opened up between the builder of the new school and 
the artist of the old type. Raging underneath was the battle between the academic 
architect, with his concern for stylistic forms, and the engineer, who dealt in 
formulas. As late as 1805, a leader of the old school published a work with the 
title: "On the Uselessness of Mathematics for Assuring the Stability of Build- 
ings." 2 When this struggle finally, toward the end of the century, was decided in 
favor of the engineers, a reaction set in: an effort to renew art on the basis of 
technology's own rich store of forms. This was Jugendstil. At the same time, 
however, that heroic age of technology found its monument in the incomparable 
Eiffel Tower, of which the first historian of iron construction wrote: "Thus, the 
plastic shaping power recedes here before a colossal span of spiritual energy. . . . 
Every one of the twelve thousand metal fittings, each of the two and a half 
million rivets, is machined to the millimeter. . . . On this work site, one hears no 
chisel-blow liberating form from stone; here, thought reigns over muscle power, 
which it transmits via cranes and secure scaffolding.'" 




Walter Benjamin consulting the Grand Dictionnaire umuersel du dix- 
neuvihne sikle at the Bibliotheque Nationale in Paris, 1937. Photo 
by Gisele Freund. Copyright © Gisele Freund / Agence Nina 
Beskow. 




Walter Benjamin at the card catalogue of the Bibliotheque Nationale in Paris, 
Photo by Gisele Freund. Copyright © Gisele Freund / Agence Nina Beskow. 



1937. 



Expose of 1935, Early Version 



The earliest preserved draft of the expose of 1935 (it is untitled in the manuscript) may constitute 
Benjamin's first draft. Some pages appear to be missing, and for some paragraphs there are two or 
even three separate versions. We have chosen to translate only passages presenting substantial 
differences from the definitive text of the expose, which appears on pages 3-13 of tills volume. 
Passages that Benjamin crossed out appear in curved brackets! )• The complete draft is printed in 
Mas Passagen-Werk, vol. 5 of Benjamin's Gesammdte Schriften (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1982), pp. 
1223-1237; it is followed by a version which Benjamin sent to Adomo and which, with respect to die 
translated texts, contains only minor variants. 



I. Fourier, or the Arcades 



Chaque epoque reve la suivante. 
— Michelet, "Avenir! Avenir!" 

Corresponding to the form of the new means of production, which in the begin- 
ning is still ruled by the form of the old (Marx), are, in the social superstructure, 
wish images in which the new and the old interpenetrate in fantastic fashion. 
This interpenetration derives its fantastic character, above all, from the fact that 
what is old in the current of social development never clearly stands out from 
what is new, while the latter, in an effort to disengage from the antiquated, 
regenerates archaic, primordial elements. The Utopian images which accompany 
the emergence of the new always, at the same time, reach back to the primal past. 
In the dream in which each epoch entertains images of its successor, the latter 
appears wedded to elements of primal history. The reflections of the base by the 
superstructure are therefore inadequate, not because they will have been con- 
sciously falsified by the ideologues of the ruling class, but because the new, in 
order to take the form of an image, constantly unites its elements with those of 
the classless society. The collective unconscious has a greater share in them than 
the consciousness of the collective. From the former come the images of Utopia 



that have left their trace in a thousand configurations of life, from buildings to 
fashions. 

These relations are discernible in the Utopia conceived by Fourier . . . 



... In the dream in which each epoch entertains images of its successor, the latter 
appears wedded to elements of primal history — that is, to elements of a classless 
society. And the experiences of such a society — as stored in the unconscious of the 
collective — (never come to rest on the threshold of the most ancient cultures, but 
take up elements of natural history into their movement. This movement engen- 
ders,) engender, in combination with what is new, the Utopia that has left its trace 
in a thousand configurations of life, from enduring edifices to passing fashions. 



III. Grandville, or the World Exhibition 



Fashion: "Madam Death! Madam Death!" 

— Leopardi, "Dialogue between Fashion and Death" 

World exhibitions propagate the universe of commodities. Grandville's late fan- 
tasies confer a commodity character on the universe. They modernize it. Thus, 
Saturn's ring becomes a cast-iron balcony on which the inhabitants of Saturn 
take the evening air. The literary counterpart to this graphic Utopia is found in 
the books of the Fourierist Toussenel. Fashion prescribes the ritual according to 
which the commodity fetish demands to be worshipped. Grandville extends the 
scope of fashion to objects of everyday use, as well as to the cosmos. In taking it 
to an extreme, he reveals its nature. Fashion always stands in opposition to the 
organic. Not the body but the corpse is the most perfect object for its art. It 
defends the rights of the corpse before the living being, which it couples to the 
inorganic world. The fetishism that succumbs to the sex appeal of the commod- 
ity is its vital nerve. On the other hand, it is precisely fashion that triumphs over 
death. It brings the departed with it into the present. Fashion is contemporary 
with every past. 

For the world exhibition of 1867, Victor Hugo issues a manifesto . . . 



Y. Baudelaire, or the Streets of Paris 

[1] Baudelaire's genius, in its affinity for spleen and melancholy, is an allegori- 
cal genius. "Tout pour moi devient ailegorie." Paris as object of allegorical 
perception. The allegorical gaze as gaze of the alienated. Flaneur's lack of 
participation. 



The flaneur as counterpart of the "crowd." The London crowd in Engels. 
The man of the crowd in Poe. The consummate flaneur is a bohemian, a 
deracine. He is at home not in his class but only in the crowd — which is to 
say, in the city. Excursus on the bohemien. His role in the secret societies. 
Characterization of professional consjnrateurs. The end of the old boheme. 
Its dissociation into legal opposition and revolutionary opposition. 

Baudelaire's ambivalent position. His flight into the asocial. He lives with a 
prostitute. (The art theory of I'artpour I'art. It arises from the artist's pre- 
monition that he will henceforth be obliged to create for the market.} 

The motif of death in Baudelaire's poetry. It merges with his image of Paris. 
Excursus on the chthonic side of the city of Paris. Topographic traces of 
the prehistoric: the old bed of the Seine. The subterranean waterways. 
The catacombs. Legends of subterranean Paris. Conspirators and commu- 
nards in the catacombs. The undersea world of the arcades. Their impor- 
tance for prostitution. Emphasis on the commodity character of the 
woman in the market of love. The doll as wish symbol. 

The phantasmagoria of the flaneur. The tempo of traffic in Paiis. The city as 
a landscape and a room. The department store as the last promenade for 
the flaneur. There his fantasies were materialized. The flanerie that began 
as art of the private individual ends today as necessity for the masses. 

Art at war with its own commodity character. Its capitulation to the commod- 
ity with I'art pour I'art. The birth of the Gesamtkunstwerk from the spirit of 
I'artpour I'art. Baudelaire's fascination with Wagner. 

[2] Baudelaire's genius, which is nourished on melancholy, is an allegorical 
genius. "Tout pour moi devient allegoric" For the first time, with Baude- 
laire, Paris becomes the subject of lyric poetry. Not as homeland; rather, 
the gaze of the allegorist, as it falls on the city, is the gaze of the alienated 
man. 

lire flaneur is a man uprooted. He is at home neither in his class nor in his 
homeland, but only in the crowd. The crowd is his element. The London 
crowd in Engels. The man of the crowd in Poe. The phantasmagoria of the 
flaneur. The crowd as veil through which the familiar city appears trans- 
formed. The city as a landscape and a room. The department store is the 
last promenade for the flaneur. There his fantasies were materialized. 

The flaneur as bohemien. Excursus on the bohemien. He comes into being at 
the same time as the art market. He works for the wide anonymous public 
of the bourgeoisie, no longer for the feudal patron. He forms the reserve 
army of the bourgeois intelligentsia. His initial efforts on behalf of con- 
spirators in the army give way, later, to efforts on behalf of working-class 
insurgents. He becomes a professional conspirator. He lacks political 
schooling. Uncertainty of class consciousness. "Political" and "social" revo- 
lutions. The Communist Manifesto as their death certificate. The boheme dis- 



solves into a legal opposition and an anarchist opposition. Baudelaire's am- 
bivalent position between the two. His flight into the asocial. 

The motif of death in Baudelaire's poetry penetrates the image of Paris. Hie 
"Tableaux parisiens," the Spleen de Paru. Excursus on the chthonic side of 
the city of Paris. The old bed of the Seine. The subterranean channels. Leg- 
ends of subterranean Paris. Conspirators and communards in the cata- 
combs. Twilight in the catacombs. Their ambiguity. They stand midway 
between house and street, between pavilion and hall. The undersea world 
of the arcades. Their importance for prostitution. Emphasis on the com- 
modity character of the woman in the market of love. The doll as wish 
symbol. 

Tout pour moi devient Allegoric 
— Baudelaire, "Le Cygne" 

Baudelaire's genius, which is nourished on melancholy, is an allegorical genius. 
For the first time, with Baudelaire, Paris became the subject of lyric poetry . . . 



Facilis descensus Avemi. 
— Virgil 

It is the unique disposition of Baudelaire's poetry that the image of the woman 
and the image of death intermingle in a third: that of Paris. The Paris of his 
poems is a sunken city, and more submarine than subterranean. It is the city of a 
death-fraught idyll. Yet the substrate of this idyll is nothing natural, and consists 
in neither the subterranean channels of Paris nor its catacombs and the legends 
that have grown up around them. It is, rather, a social, and that is to say, a 
modern substrate. But precisely the modern, la modernite, is always citing primal 
history. Here, this occurs through the ambiguity peculiar to die social relations 
and products of this epoch. The twilight of the arcades, which contemporaries 
compared to an undersea landscape, lies over the society that built diem. Their 
construction itself is ambiguous. They stand midway between house and street, 
on the one hand; between pavilion and hall, on the other. At the same time, this 
ambiguity set the tone for the market of love. Prostitution, in which the woman 
represents merchant and merchandise in one, acquires a particular significance. 

Je voyage pour connaitre ma geographic 

The last poem oiLes Flews du mal: "Le \byage." The last journey of the flaneur: 
death. Its destination: the new. Newness is a quality independent of the use value 
of the thing. It is the last word of fashion. It is the semblance that forms the 



essence of the images which the dreaming subject of history engenders. The art 
that doubts its task must make novelty into its highest value . . . 



The press organizes the market in spiritual values, in which initially there is a 
boom. Eugene Sue becomes the first celebrity of the feuilleton. Nonconformists 
rebel against the commodity character of art. They rally round the baimer of / 'art 
pour I'art. From this watchword derives the conception of the total work of art, 
which would seal art off from the further development of technology. The Ge- 
samtkunstwerk is a premature synthesis, which bears the seeds of death within it. 
The solenm rite with which it is celebrated is the pendant to the distractions 
which surround the apotheosis of the commodity. In their syntheses, both ab- 
stract from the social existence of human beings. Baudelaire succumbs to the 
rage for Wagner. 



VI. Haussmami, or the Strategic Embellishment of Paris 



. . . increased the financial risks of Haussmannization. 

The world exhibition of 1867 marked the high point of the regime and of 
Haussmaim's power. Paris is confirmed as capital of luxury and of fash- 
ions. Excursus on the political significance of fashion. Fashion's innova- 
tions leave intact the framework of domination. For those who are ruled, 
it passes the time in which those who rule luxuriate. The insights of 
F.Th.Vischer. 

Haussmann attempts to bolster his dictatorship . . . 



Fais voir, en dejouant la ruse, 
• republique, a ces pervers 
Ta grande face de Meduse 
Au milieu de rouges eclairs. 

— Chanson d'ouvriers vers 1850 

The barricade returns to life during the Commune. It is stronger and better 
secured than ever. It stretches across the great boulevards and shields the 
trenches behind it. If the Communist Manifesto ends the age of professional con- 
spirators, then the Commune puts an end to the phantasmagoria according to 
which the proletariat and its republic are the fulfillment of 1789. This phantasma- 
goria conditions the forty years lying between the Lyons insurrection and the 
Paris Commune. The bourgeoisie did not share in this error . . . 



[1] (Balzac was the first to speak of the ruins of the bourgeoisie. But he still 
knew nothing about them. It was Surrealism which first got a glimpse of 
the field of debris left behind by the capitalist development of die forces of 
production.} 

But it was Surrealism that first opened our eyes to them. These ruins became, 
for Surrealism, the object of a research no less impassioned than that which the 
humanists of the Renaissance conducted on the renmants of classical antiquity. 
Painters like Picasso and Chirico allude to this analogy. This unrelenting con- 
frontation of the recent past with the present moment is something new, histori- 
cally. Other contiguous links in the chain of generations have existed within the 
collective consciousness, but they were hardly distinguished from one another 
within the collective. The present, however, already stands to the recent past as 
the awakening stands to the dream. The development of the forces of produc- 
tion, in the course of the previous century, shattered that century's wish symbols 
even before the monuments representing them had collapsed, and before the 
paper on which they were rendered had yellowed. In the nineteenth century, this 
development of the forces of production worked to emancipate die forms of 
construction from art, just as in the sixteenth century the sciences freed them- 
selves from philosophy. A start is made witii architecture as engineered construc- 
tion. Then comes the reproduction of nature as photography. The creation of 
fantasy prepares to become practical as commercial art. Literature submits to 
montage in the feuilleton. All these products are on the point of entering the 
market as commodities. But diey linger on the threshold. They stop halfway. 
Value and commodity enter on a brief engagement before die market price 
makes their union legitimate. From this epoch derive the arcades and interieurs, 
the exhibition halls and panoramas. They are residues of a dream world. But 
given diat the realization of dream elements, in the course of waking up, is the 
paradigm of dialectical thinking, it follows that dialectical thinking is the organ of 
historical awakening. Only dialectical dunking is equal to the recent past, because 
it is, each time, its offspring. Every epoch, in fact, not only dreams the one to 
follow but, in thus dreaming, precipitates its awakening. It bears its end within 
itself and unfolds it — as Hegel already noticed- — by cunning. The earliest monu- 
ments of the bourgeoisie began to crumble long ago, but we recognize, for the 
first time, how they were destined for tiiis end from the beginning. 



Materials for the Expose of 1935 



These materials consist of notations, schemes, and methodological reflections (Gesammelte Scliriften, 
vol. 5 [Frankfurt: Sulirkamp, 1982], pp. 1206-1223, 1250-1251), which are connected to Ben- 
jamin's work on a "general plan" for "The Arcades Project. Begun in March 1934, this work culmi- 
nated in the expose of 1935, "Paris, die Hauptstadt des XEK. Jahrhunderts." Certain of the notes, 
such as No. 3, may date from the late twenties. A relatively precise dating is possible only for No. 5, 
written February-May 1935, and for Nos. 20-25 (see Translators' Notes 9 and 10). The thematic 
ordering of the material is that of the German editor. Passages crossed out by Benjamin are in curved 
brackets { j. Editorial insertions are in angular brackets < >. Square brackets [] are Benjamin's. 
Words enclosed in double square brackets [[ ]] are later additions. The symbol <x> indicates illegible 
material. 



No. 1 

1848 December 10: election of Louis Bonaparte 

Bloc of Catholics, Legitimists, Orleanists; Napoleon promises freedom 
of instruction 

Ledru-Rollin gets 400,000 votes; Lamartine 8,000; Cavaignac 
1,500,000; Napoleon 5,500,000 

1850 Loi Falloux 

Bail for the newspapers raised to 50,000 francs 
Electoral law, making the right to vote conditional on three years' 
residence in a municipality, as certified by tax lists 

1851 Rejection of the Napoleonic amendments to the electoral law 
Victor Hugo tries in vain to mobilize the workers against the coup 

d'etat 

December 20: plebiscite; 7,500,000 yes; 650,000 no 

1852 November 20: plebiscite on reestablishment of the Empire. 7,839,000 

yes; 53,000 no; 20 percent abstaining 

1863 Tliiers and Berryer elected to the Chamber 
1866 Formation of the Tiers Parti under Ollivier 

1868 Restoration of freedom of the press and freedom of assembly 

1869 Republicans 40 seats (Gambetta, Rochefort); Union Liberale 50; Tiers 

Parti 116. Bonapartists in the minority 



1870 Plebiscite: 7,350,000 votes for the constitutional monarchy, against 
1 ,538,000 (Bonapartists and Republicans) 

1864 Concession o f the right t o strike 

1848 Abolition of the obligatory uniform for the Garde Nationale 

Increase of the number of electors through universal suffrage, from 

200,000 to over 9,000,000 
Emoluments for a member of parliament: 25 francs per day 
March 17 and April 16: violent demonstrations for the postponement 

of elections to the Constituent Assembly 
Cassation <?> of the Garde Mobile 

1831 ff. Parti du Mouvement: Laffitte, Lafayette, Bar rot 
Parti de Resistance: Perier, Mole, Guizot, Thiers 

No. 2 

Fashion 

1866 The head like a cloud, high above the valley of the dress 

Lamps in the form of vases: the rare flower "light" is put in oil 

1868 The breast covered with a fringed border 

— Architectural forms on clothes 

— Visitation of the Virgin, as theme of fashion images 

— Fashionable clothing, as theme for confectioners 

— Motifs of hedges <?>, of gossamer <?> appear on clothes 1850-1860 

— Woman as equilateral triangle (crinoline) 

— Woman as X — End of the Empire — 
Jacket as double door 

Dress as fan 

Infinite possibility of permutation with the elements of fashion 

No. 3 

The Best Book on Pais 
Mirror city (the glass-plated armoire) 
Energies of the big city: gasoline tanks 

Illuminated advertising: new type of writing (no illuminated advertising in 
the arcades) 

Signboards', old type of writing 



Gaslight in Baudelaire 
Passage de l'Opera 

Aragon's technique compared with photographic technique 

Fair in the basement ("Carnival of Paris") 

| Teleology of Par is: Eiffel Tower and motorways 

Parisian streets in French literature (statistically) 

^ The system of Parisian streets: a vascular network of imagination 

(Bernouard: Parisian dialects during the war) 

Sacre Coeur: ichthyosaur; Eiffel Tower: giraffe 

Baby Cadum [[Mine. Zalma]] 

Fireproof walls 

(Paris and the traveling <?> authors 

Aragon Vugite de reves 

Nineteenth century: kitsch, new collections 

Mirrors in the cafes : for the sake of the light, but also because the rooms are 
so small} 

No. 4 

Themes of the Arcades Project 

Entrance of the railroad into the world of dream and symbol 

(Presentation of historical knowledge according to the image of awakening) 

Fourier's "industrial fugue" as signature of an epoch that is crowned by the 
world exhibitions 

Tbe Garde Nationale, military order of industry and commerce 

(The domestic interior (furniture) in Poe and Baudelaire) 

Sponsorship of the three kingdoms for the arcade: the mineral kingdom with 
glass and iron; the vegetable kingdom with the palm: the animal kingdom 
with aquatic fauna 

The crisis that hits landscape painting with the advent of the diorama ex- 
tends to the portrait with photography 

(Wiertz as enn»bler of the diorama) 

From department store to world exhibition 

(Flaussmaim's "strategic embellishment" of Paris) 

(Fourier's archaic idyll: the cliild of nature as consumer; Pestalozzi's modern 
Utopia: the bourgeois as producer) 

(Napoleon I as last representative of revolutionary terrorism, insofar as the 
bourgeoisie is concerned) 



The not-yet-conscious knowledge of what has been stems from the now 

(History of the Paris Stock Exchange and the Salons des Etrangers} 

The past unfolds in the wax museum like distance in the domestic interior. 

No. 5 

(Themes of the Arcades Project II> 

The camouflage of bourgeois elements in the boheme. 

The boheme as form of existence of the proletarian intelligentsia. 

The ideologues of the bourgeoisie: Victor Hugo, Lamartine. On the other 
hand, Rimbaud 

Tbe bourgeoisie's maitres deplaisir: Scribe, Sue. 

Industrialization of literature, the "negro"; industrialization of literature 
through the press 

Industrial poetry of the Saint-Simonians 

Beginnings of trade in modern artworks 

[Panoramic literature} 

{Beginnings of the Gesamtkunstioerk <total work of art> in the panoramas} 
Literature and commerce (names of magazines derived from vaudevilles) 
Specialty and originality 

Inspiration for early photography: in ideas with Wiertz, in technology with 
Nadar. 

{ Arago's speech in the Chamber on photography} {/ Balzac's theory of pho- 
tography} 

[Photography at the industrial exhibition of 1855} 

Meaning of the photographic reproduction of artworks; overcoming of art 
through ph<otography> 

Photography and electric light (Nadar) 

[Attitude of the reactionary intelligentsia toward photography (Balzac)} 

[The veristic art of photography founded on the fashionable illusionism of 
the panoramas} 

Wiertz as precursor of montage (realism plus tendentiousness); stereorama 
and painting (Wiertz) 

Three aspects of flanerie; Balzac, Poe, Engels; the illusionistic, psychological, 
economic 

Flanerie as hothouse of illusion; Servandoni's project 



The untranslatable literature of flanerie. "Paris street by street and house by 
house" 

The flaneur and the collector; the archaic Paris of flanerie 

(The flaneur skirts actuality} 

{The city as a landscape and a room} 

[Egalite as phantasmagoria} 

{The tempo of flanerie and its cessation; exemplified by the restaurant and 
the means of transport} 

Indecision of the flaneur; ambiguity of the arcades; opaqueness of class rela- 
tions 

(The doll in the annex to the cocotte's} 

(Sexual-psychological interpretation of the cult of dolls; body and wax figure; 
disguise} 

Interior and museum 

(Jugendstil, or the end of the interior (Jugendstil and poster).} 
Emancipation and prostitution 

Girardin; the demoiselles of 183 1; Fourier and Feuerbach 
Emancipation and the Saint-Simonians; the cashier 

Cult of love: attempt to deploy the technical force of production in opposi- 
tion to the natural force of production 

Rise of the proletariat; its awakening in the June Insurrection 
(The labor exchanges} 

The culture of the nineteenth century as a gigantic effort to stem the forces of 
production 

{Premature syntheses. Insurance against the proletariat} 
The Garde Nationale 

Precursors of stocks and bonds 

Change in the forms of property as a result of the railroad 

Corruption in the awarding of contracts during construction on the railroad 
and during Haussmann's renovations 

{Plekhanov on the world exhibition of 1889} 
Museums and exhibitions 

(The enthronement of the commodity (advertising and exhibitions)} 



Influence of industry on language later than on the image (in the case of the 
Surrealists) 

Allegory and advertisement (Baudelaire) 

Police and conspirators; the. porte-lanternes <lantern carriers> 

(Construction has the role of the 

subconscious) 
Constmction in city planning 
The role of the big city in the 

nineteenth century 
Flaubert's style 

Image and destruction in history 
Historical anamnesis 
Not-yet-conscious knowledge 

of what has been 
(Abolition of fashion) 
Effect and expression 

(The doubt about history) 
Components of death / Excursus on 
Proust 

(The Commune as test of the revolutionary legend) 
{Fashion in Apollinaire) (Cabet and the end of fashion) 1 
(The city as object of fashion (Lefeuve)} 
Relation between teclinology and art as key to fashion 
(The phenomenon of the quar tiers ( Jules Janin)} 

Participation of women <in> the nature of the commodity, by virtue of fashion 

(Connection of fashion with death) 

(Theories of fashion: Karr / Vischer) 

Fashion and colportage: "everybody's contemporary" 2 

(Inclusion of sex in the world of matter) 

(Razing of the Passage de l'Opera during construction of the Boulevard 
Haussmann) 

(Irruption of perspective into city planning: end of the arcades) 
(Formation of workers' districts in the suburbs) 
(The end of the quartiers with Haussmann) 
(The language of the prefect of police) 
(Decline of the arcades in llierese Raquin) 



Physiognomic digressions 
the flaneur / (the bohemian) 
(the gambler) / the (dandy) / 
(the collector) 

Snob (the new) 
the new as antithesis to 
what conforms to a plan 
Fourier's serenity 
Godin and Ford 

The industrial Christ (Lamartine) 
Mercury in Fourier 



Tools and workers with Haussmann 
(End of the arcade: the bicycle palaces} 

Points of contact between Saint-Simonianism and fascism 

(The knickknack <?>) 
(The collector) 

(The curiosity shop as domestic interior) 

(Early socialism, the police, conspirators (re Fourier)} 

Workers' associations (After-effects of 1789} 

(Blurred class divisions) (The Comm<unist> Manifesto as 

(Conspirators and the boheme) conclusion of the first period} 
(Technical wonders in the service of insurrection} 

Promiscuity and hostility among the classes ; their communication in the om- 
nibus 

Huysmans describes Menilmontant 
The workers' associations 

Toppling of illusionism in the cityscape: perspectives 
(Their introduction into the interior through the mirror} 
Why was there no French Idealism? 
Sensual delights of the bourgeois 
Hedonism and cynicism 
Illusionism of the cocottes 

The arcades as dream- and wish-image of the collective 

Fermenters of intoxication in the collective consciousness 

(Phantasmagoria of space (the flaneur) ; phantasmagoria of time (the gam- 
bler)) 

(Lafargue on the gambler.} (Phantasmagoria of society: (the bohemian)} 
Atmosphere of the dream: climate 

The dream of empire; the Muses / (Basing of the first factory buildings on 
residential homes} 

(The Empire style as expression of revolutionary terrorism) 

Empire form of the first locomotives; technology under control / Treasury of 
images of technology 

Are there English influences on the Empire style? / Technology and the new 



Attaching to the first appearance of the machine under the Empire was the 
sense of a restoration of antiquity 

(Napoleon's attitude toward industrials and intellectuals} 

(The world exhibition of 1867) 

(GrandvilleandToussenel; Cabet} / (Grandville and the advertisement): 
dream and awakening 

Bourgeois hedonism 

(Rescue of the Utopians; approaches to Fourier in Marx and Engels) 
Fourier and Scheerbart; (Fourier's living on in Zola) 

(Fourier and Jean Paul) / the true meaning of Utopia: it is a precipitate of col- 
lective dreams 

(The enthronement of the commodity on a cosmic scale / Commodity and 
fashion) 

Advertisement and poster (business and politics) 

(Dominance of finance capital under Napoleon III) 
(Offenbach and the operetta) 
The opera as center 1 
(Crinoline and Second Empire) 

Polemic against Jung, who wants to distance awakening from dream. 
No. 6 

Provisional Schemata 

Revolutionary praxis 

Technique of street fighting and barricade construction 

Revolutionary mise en scene 

Proletarians and professional conspirators 

Fashion 

"everybody's contemporary" 

Attempt to lure sex into the world of matter 

No. 7 

Dialectical Schemata 

Hell — golden age 

Keywords for hell: ennui, gambling, pauperism 
A canon of this dialectic: fashion 
The golden age as catastrophe 



Dialectic of the commodity 

A canon for this dialectic to be drawn from Odradek 4 
The positive in the fetish 

Dialectic of the newest and oldest 

Fashion is a canon for this dialectic also 
The oldest as newest: the daily news 
The newest as oldest: the Empire 

No. 8 

First dialectical stage: the arcade changes from a place of splendor to a place 
of decay 

Second dialectical stage: the arcade changes from an unconscious experience 
to something consciously penetrated 

Not-yet-conscious knowledge of what has been. Structure of what-has-been 
at this stage. Knowledge of what has been as a becoming aware, one that 
has the structure of awakening. 

Not-yet-conscious knowledge on the part of the collective 

All insight to be grasped according to the schema of awakening. And 

shouldn't the "not-yet-conscious knowledge" have the structure of dream? 

— (Dream kitsch 

Parisian chronicles) (the terrifying knock on the door) 

the ugliness of the object is the terrifying knock 
on the door when we're asleep 5 

(We fashion an epoch in the history of the antiques trade and construct a 
clock by which to tell when objects are ripe for collecting.) 

We construct an awakening theoretically — that is, we imitate, in the realm of 
language, the trick that is decisive physiologically in awakening, for awak- 
ening operates with cunning. Only with cunning, not without it, can we 
work free of the realm of dream. 

Awakening is the exemplary case of remembering: the weighty and momen- 
tous case, in which we succeed in remembering the nearest (most obvious). 

What Proust intends with the experimental rearrangement of furniture is no 
different from what Bloch tries to grasp as darkness of the lived moment. 

Here the question arises : In what different canonical ways can man behave 
(the individual man, but also the collective) with regard to dreaming? And 
what sort of comportment, at bottom, is adequate to true waking being? 

We conceive the dream (1) as historical phenomenon, (2) as collective phe- 
nomenon. 



Efforts <?> to shed light on the dreams of the individual with the help of the 
doctrine of the historical dreams of the collective. 

(We teach that, in the stratification of the dream, reality never simply is, but 
rather that it strikes the dreamer. And I treat of the arcades precisely as 
though, at bottom, they were something that has happened to me} 

We have to wake up from the existence of our parents. In this awakening, we 
have to give an account of the nearness of that existence. Obedience as 
category of nearness in religious education. Collecting as profane category 
of nearness; the collector interprets dreams of the collective. 

Freud's doctrine of the dream as a phenomenon of nature. Dream as histori- 
cal phenomenon. 

Opposition to Aragon: to work through all this by way of the dialectics of 
awakening, and not to be lulled, through exhaustion, into "dream" or "my- 
thology." What are the sounds of the awakening morning we have drawn 
into our dreams? "Ugliness," the "old-fashioned" are merely distorted 
morning voices that talk of our childhood. 

No. 9 

Thesis and antithesis are to be drawn together into the dream-variation- 
image < Traum- IVandel-Bild). The aspects of splendor and misery attaching 
to the arcades are dream vision. The dialectical reversal in synthesis is 
awakening. Its mechanism. How we free ourselves from the world of our 
parents through cunning. Antinomy of the sentimental. On the hallucina- 
tory function of architecture. Dream images that rise up into the waking 
world. 

Epitome of the false redemptiomjugendstil. It proves the law according to 
which effort brings about its opposite. 

Hie motif of dialectic should be delineated specifically in reference to 
perspective 
luxury and fashion 

Theory of awakening to be developed on the basis of the theory of boredom. 
Theory of perspective in connection with Flaubert. Perspective and plush. 



, u Economic rudiments 

jj ~ the consumer 

•a |o luxury buildings 

3 J3 i fashion and boulevard 
.2 o a 

43 d U 

ct 1 ^ Reversal 

« m ^ miscarried matter 
S S o 

t3 "2 ,u altered tempo 

^ J .g date fatidique: 1893 6 

S « H 

g -3 ^ {New meaning of the arcades 

■ft 1 Aragon: new mythology 

~2 g « relation to the nineteenth century 

„ *3 awakening; 

S3 « a & 

^ & y discovery of perspective) 

S «> ki 

"fl <S I {Chapters 

» S 9 ^ Street Names / Perspective / Collecting / Interior of the 

Sj*c2 2 street / Fashion /} 

^ ^ If -c 

; - : •-' Fashion always places its fig leaf on the spot where the revo- 
lutionary nakedness of society may be found. A slight ad- 



o 



0 OJ 



^ „ t£j justment and . . . But why is this adjustment fruitful only 

Q S ^ when it is carried out on the body of the recent past? 

(Noah <?> and his shame?) 



No. 10 

(Boredom) 

(First treatment of decline: Aragon) 

Dialectic of the Magasim de nouveautes (Theory of the collector 
commodity miscarried matter Elevation of the commodity 

to the status of allegory) 

Dialectic of sentimentality (sentences from "Dream Kitsch") 7 

(Archaeology of the <x>. Dream is the earth in 
which finds are made.) 



Dialectic of flanerie the interior as street (luxury) 
the street as interior (misery) 



Dialectic of fashion pleasure and cadaver 



(Beginning: description of the present- 
day arcades 

Their dialectical development: com- 
modity / perspective 

ActuaJity of the arcades in their dream 
structure} 



(Attempt at a determination of the 
essence of street names: they are 
not pure allegories 

Mythological T<o>pography: Bal- 
zac) 



Thesis 

Flowering of the arcades under 
Louis Philippe 

The panoramas 
The magasins 
Love 



Antithesis 

Decline of the arcades at the end 
of the nineteenth century 

Plush 

Miscarried matter 
The whore 



Synthesis 

Discovery of the arcades 
The unconscious knowledge of what has 
been becomes conscious 

Theory of awakening 

Dialectic of persp. 
Dial, of fashion 
Dial, of sentim. 



(Dioramas 
Plush-perspective 
Rainy weather] 

No. 11 

Fundamental for Criticism 
Systematic exterior architecture 
Commodities — materials 
Ur-history of the feuilleton 
Golden age and hell 
Theory of phantasmagoria: culture 

More precise determination of the 
commodity 

Fetish and death's head 



Erroneous 

World exhibitions and working class 
Fourier and arcades 



Painting in the negative of the trace 

Countinghouse and chamber of com- 
merce 

Saturn problem 

Barcelona beton 



No. 12 



Methodological 

Dialectical images are wish symbols. Actualized in them, together with the 
thing <SacIie> itself, are its origin and its decline. 

What sort of perceptibility should the presentation of history possess? Nei- 
ther the cheap and easy visibility of bourgeois history books, nor the in- 
sufficient visibility of Marxist histories. What it has to fix perceptually are 
the images deriving from the collective unconscious. 

The <development> of the productive forces of a society is determined not 
only by the raw materials and instruments at that society's disposal, but 
also by its milieu and the experiences it has there. 

Waiting as form of existence of the parasitic elements. 
No. 13 

Mew lliemes and Formulations 

(With the expanded range of transportation, the informational merits of 
painting diminish. In reaction to photography it begins initially, over the 
course of half a century, to stress the elements of color in the picture. As 
Impressionism yields to Cubism, painting opens up a wider domain — one 
into which photography, for the moment, cannot follow.) 

(For a subjective point of view on the presentation of the new, as it appears at 
midcentury in the society and its milieux, no one can take responsibility: 
hence the lens <dns Objektiv>) 

Waiting and letting wait. Waiting as form of existence of the parasitic ele- 
ments. 

No. 14 

Fundamental Questions 

The historical significance of semblance <Schein> 
{What are the ruins of the bourgeoisie?} 

Where, within the new, runs the boundary between reality and semblance? 
Ur-history of the nineteenth century 

Relation between f alse consciousness and dream consciousness. Mirroring 
takes place in the dream consciousness. Collective dream consciousness 
and superstructure. 

The dialectic, in standing still, makes an image. Essential to this image is a 
semblance. 



The now of recognizability is the moment of awakening. 
In the awakening, the dream stands still. 

The historical movement is a dialectical movement. But the movement of 
false consciousness is not. This consciousness becomes dialectical also in 
the awakening. 

No. 15 

Methodological Reflections 

Make use of studies on the "now of recognizability" 

Make use of Proust's description of awakening 

Awakening as the critical moment in the reading of dream images 

Special claims of the recent past on the method of the historian 

Demarcation from cultural history 

Reread Hegel on dialectics at a standstill 

The experience of our generation: that capitalism will not die a natural death. 

Here, for the first time, the recent past becomes distant past. Primal history 
forms part of the recent past, just as mountains, seen from a great distance, 
appear to form part of the landscape lying before them. 

No. 16 

Wiese?igru?id 

Dialectical image and dialectics at a standstill in Hegel 
No. 17 

The Fourierist Utopia announces a transformation in the function of poetry 
No. 18 

Placed, thus, in the center of history, <broken off> 

As man forms the center of the horizon that, in his eyes, stretches around 
him, so his existence forms for him the center of history. Looking about 
him at the midday hour, he invites the emaciated spiiits of the past to dine 
at his table. (The historian presides) over a ghostly meal. The historian is 
the herald who summons the departed to this banquet of spirits. 

The living generation <broken off> 



No. 19 8 



{The merit of this little volume lies in the evocation of the different districts 
of a great city. It is not their picturesque aspect that concerns the author, 
nor anything exterior. It is, rather, the unique character conferred on each 
of these quartiers by the social strata informing them and the occupations 
of the residents.) 

If the speculative phenomena attendant on "Haussmannization" remain for 
the most part in shadow, the tactical interests of the reform — interests 
which Napoleon III willingly concealed behind his imperial ambitions- 
emerge more clearly. A contemporary apology for Haussmann's project is 
comparatively frank on this subject. It commends the new streets for "not 
subserving the customary tactics of the local insurrections." Before this, 
Paris had already been paved in wood so as to deprive the revolution of its 
building material. As Karl Gutzkow writes in his Pariser Briefen, "no one 
builds barricades out of blocks of wood." To appreciate what is meant by 
this, recall that in 1830 some six thousand barricades were counted in the 
city. 

Louis Philippe already had the nickname "Roi-Macon" <Mason King>. With 
Napoleon III, the mercantile, hygienic, and military forces bent on trans- 
forming the city's image were allied with the aspiration to immortalize 
<oneself > in monuments of lasting peace. In Haussmann he <x> found the 
energy necessary for implementation of the plan. Putting the energy to 
work was, of course, not easy for him. 

A careerist in the service of a usurper 



Intran 



Destmctive-Pacific Imperialism 
or 

'The Haussmannization of Paris 



.» 



III. Haussmaim and Napoleon III 
II. Strategic embellishment 
III. Fantastic accounts of Haussmann 



The careerist serving the usurper 



Strategic embellishment 
The technique of barricade fighting 
The strategic lines 
The theoretic base 
jurisprudence 
The spectacles; aesthetics 



Napoleon as pretender to the throne 
The coup d'etat and Haussmaim 
The police and Orsini's assassination 



attempt 

Haussmann and the parliament 
Haussmann's later career 



Haussmann's means 
Significance of substructions 
The railroads 
The world exhibitions 
The new city planning 



No. 20 s ' 



Plan of March 1934 



[[Portrait of Haussmann; 
destructive energies in him]] 



Paris 

Capital of the Nineteenth Century 



+Haussmann, or Strategic 

Embellishment 
Grandville, or die World Exhibition*' 
Baudelaire, or the Streets of Paris***) 
Louis Philippe, or the 

Interior****)*****) 44 ) 
'Daguerre, or the Panorama 
Fourier, or the Arcades 

[[ Psychology of the newspaper: 
die need for novelty]] 



Class warfare 
') Fetish character of the commodity 

The bolieme 

The collective unconscious 

[[Cross-schemas 

Paris Metaphysics 

Proletariat Physiognomies (?) 

Dialectics]] 



****) Fashion 

***) Flaneur 

****) Boredom * 

++ the collector 



Jugendstil (Jugendstil as end of the interior) 
Zola; Le Travail 



I. Fourier, or the Arcades 

His figure set off against the Empire / Antiquity and Cockaigne / Historical 
hedonism*** 

Fourier and Jean Paul / Why there was no French idealism 
(II. Daguerre, or die Panorama (Passage des Panoramas, 1800) 

Panoramas / Museums / Exhibitions / The premature syntheses / The 

breakthrough of the daguerreotype / Irruption of technology into the 

realm of art) 

III. Louis Philippe, or the Interior 

The dream house** / (The collector / The flaneur / The gambler] 

IV. Grandville, or the World Exhibition ^ ^ 

Happiness in machinery / The commodity in the cosmos I ~ , , 
' . , . Gambler 
Courier s dream 

Plekhanov on 1889 *° rger 
V. Haussmann, or the Embellishment of Paris 

*** Origin of the arcades and 
primal history 
** the chthonic Paris 



No. 21 

Fragments of the general layout 

VL (Haussmann, or the "Strategic Embellishment" of Paris 
Excursus on the gambler 
The demolitions of Paris 
The end of the arcades 
Technique of street- and barricade-fighting 

The political function of fashion; critique of crinoline in E Th. Vischer 
The Commune) 

I. Fourier, or the Arcades 

Transitory aims of constructions in iron. 

Moreover: iron, as the first artificial 
building material, is the first to 
undergo a development. This 
proceeded more and more rapidly in 
the course of the century. Arcades in 
Fourier are designed for dwelling. 

The Empire style 

Materialist tendencies in the bourgeoisie (Jean Paul, Pestalozzi; Fourier) 
Rise of the arcades Marx and Engels on Fourier 

The arcades in Fourier Theory of education as root of Utopia 
Fourier's afterlife in Zola 

The beginnings of iron construction / The disguising of construction 
II. (Daguerre, or the Panorama 

Excursus on art <and> technology (Beaux-Arts and Ecole Polytechnique) 
The welcoming of photography (Balzac and Arago) 
The confrontation between art and technology in Wiertz 

Railroad stations and halls as new sites for art 
The panoramas as transitional phenomenon between art and the tech- 
nique of reproducing nature 
Excursus on the later development: extension of the commodity world 

through the photo 
{Paris as panorama; the panoramic literature, 1830-1850 

(Life of the worker as subject of an idyll)} 
Photography at the industrial exhibition of 1855 
Rear-guard action by art against technology, inTalmeyr (1900)} 




III. Grandville, or the World Exhibitions 

Fashion as means of communicating commodity character to the cosmos 
Magic of cast iron in outer space and in the underworld 
Further development of the arcades in the exhibition halls; Paxton's 
Crystal Palace of 1851 



The sex appeal of the commodity 

Mobilization of the inorganic through fashion; its triumph in the doll 
(The love market of Paris} 

Paris as material of fashion; psychology of the quartier in Janin and 
Lefeuve 

(The battle between Utopia and cynicism in Grandville) 
Grandville as precursor of advertising graphics 
The world exhibition of 1867; triumph of cynicism; Offenbach as its 
demon 

Grandville and the Fourierists (Toussenel's philosophy of nature) 
The universal extension of commodity character to the world of tilings 
Body and wax figure 

Chthonic elements in Grandville / (Chthonic elements in the image of 

Paris} 
The specialite 

No. 22 
OnV 

{Critique of modernity (presumably a separate section). The new has the 
character of a semblance <Scheincharakter> and coincides with the sem- 
blance of the eternally recurrent. The dialectical semblance of the new and 
always identical is the basis of "cultural history") 

OnV 

Four digressions on boredom. The snob, who lives in the semblant world of 
the new and ever identical, has a constant companion: boredom. With 
Proust, snobbism becomes the key to the social analysis of the upper crust. 

The total work of art represents an attempt to impose myth on society (myth 
being, as Raphael rightly says <in Proudhon, Marx, Picasso (Paris, 1933) >, 
p. 171, the precondition for oeuvres d'art integrates). 

No. 23 l(l 

[Die eternal return as nightmare of historical consciousness] 
(Jung wants to distance dream from awakening} 

(Three aspects of flanerie: Balzac, Poe, Engels; the illusionistic, the psycho- 
logical, the economic} 

[Servandoni <?>] 

(The new as antithesis to what conforms to a plan} 

Allegory and advertising [the personification of commodities rather than of 
conceptsjugendstil introduces the allegorical figure to advertising] 



(The cashier as living image, as allegory of cash) 

Cult of love: attempt to bring natural production into opposition with indus- 
trial production 

[The concept of culture as the highest development of phantasmagoria] 
[The concept of eternal return: the "last stand" against the idea of progress] 
[Annihilation of the phantasmagoria of culture in the idea of eternal return] 
[Odradek and the dialectic of the commodity] 
[Attempt to banish ennui by dint of the new] 

[Waiting for the new: in the last poem <of Les Fleurs du mml> — going to meet 
the new — but running into death] 

No. 24 

(Waiting as form of existence of parasitic elements) 

Actualized in the dialectical image, together with the thing itself, are its origin 
and its decline. Should both be eternal? (eternal transience) 

[Is the dialectical image free of semblance <Sc/iein>?] 

(The now of recognizability is the moment of awakening) 

([Proust: desciiption of awakening]) 

[Hegel on dialectics at a standstill] 

(The experience of our generation: that capitalism will not die a natural 
death) 

F»r the first time, here, the recent past becomes distant past 

The Gesamtkunstwerk represents an attempt to impose myth on society (myth 
being, as Raphael rightly says, p. 171, the precondition for the oeuvre d'art 
integrate) . 

"Everybody's contemporary" and eternal recurrence 
No. 25 

The question posed in I: What is the historical object? 
The response of III: The dialectical image 

The uncommon ephemerality of the genuine historical object (flame) com- 
pared with die fixity of the philological object. Where the text is itself the 
absolute historical object — as in theology — it holds fast to the moment of 
extreme ephemerality in the character of a "revelation." 

The idea of a history of humanity as idea of the sacred text. In fact, the his- 



tory of humanity — as prophecy — has, at all times, been read out of the sa- 
cred text. 

The new and ever identical as the categories of historical semblance. — How 
stands the matter with regard to eternity? 

The dissolution of historical semblance must follow the same trajectory as 
the construction of the dialectical image 

Figures of historical semblance: I. 

II. Phantasmagoria 
III. Progress 



Materials for "Arcades 



Among Benjamin's papers are the following materials, consisting of typewritten sheets with addi- 
tions in his own and in Franz Hessel's hand. These notes and sketches (Gesammelte SchHfkn, vol. 5 
[Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1982], pp. 1341-1347) evidently relate to the abortive collaboration with 
Hessel on the arcades. Typewritten text is printed here in italics; Benjamin's longhand notations, in 
underlined italics; and Hessel's longhand notations, in roman type. Passages that are crossed out in 
the manuscript are in curved brackets { } here. 

Picture puzzles of the French Revolution or Visible World History (Paris of the 
Romans, Middle Ages, ancien regime, revolution, and so on.) Balzac 's streets 
and corners. (Sue, Hugo, and others.) 

May 1 on the Butte Rouge. 

Mew and old catacombs, Metro, wine cellars, ancient sites. 

Street vending. 

Ghetto 

live street where newspapers are printed 
Lost animals (the pound) 
The slaughterhouses 
Social fortifications. 

[Stroll along vanished town walls (ancient) 

Philip Augustus, Louis XII, Farmers-General and the last fortification, now in the 
process of being demolished. } 

Gasoline. (The perfect chauffeur in Paris) 

Mirrors. 

The fireside and the "Lanterne " 
The last fiacres 
Old signs. 

Conveniences and inconveniences ( tobacco, mailboxes, tickets, poster pillars, and so 
forth.) 



Parisians on Paris. 

Pickup, movie, streetwalker, tart, artiste, and so on. 
Paris alpine. 

Developmental and artistic histoiy of the Eiffel lower. 
Afternoon in Montmartre. 
Etiquette for mealtimes 
Inoffensive monuments 
II faut amuser les enfants 

Biography of a street (Rue Saint-Honore, or Rivoli) 

Annual fair. 

Fashion houses 

The bridges. 

Doors and windoius. 

Architectures of chance. (Posters) 

Arcades. 

Hotel 

Dance hall. 

The smallest square in Paris. 
Church windoius 

The parks from Monceau to Butte s-Chaumont. 

Street of art dealers (1,000 meters of painted canvas) 

The Sunday of the poorer classes 

lea in the Bois. 

America and Asia in Paris 

Reassuring advice for museum visits. 

Lunch hour for dressmakers ' assistants. (Fairy tale motif.) 

(Physiology of the box) 

Remarkable histoiy of the devebpment of small restaurants. 
[With Saint-Simon, Liselotte, and other revenants in Versailles.} 
All sorts of racing. 

Hie Sunday of the poorer classes. 

Staircases, windows, doors, and signboards of Paris. 

Dance luills of different districts 

Paris alpine. 

The dejeuner of dressmakers ' assistants. 



How a first-class restaurant comes into being. 

Aperitif, place , time, varieties 

Fair. 

How I drive my car in Paris 
Theater until fewer than 5 00 seats. 
(Purveyors of pleasure) 
Fashionable teas. 

Tavern with musical entertainment. 

1, 000 meters of modern art (Rue de la Boe'tie) 

Great and small labyrinth of Paris Catacombs and Paris. 

Paris translated <traduit>. 

Underground newspapers 

Parisian mirrors, f rom the bistro to Versailles. 

Types o f cocottes: streetiualliers, monies, call girls (deluxe) social relatiojis 
tarts lionesses girlfriend liaison sweetheart artiste 

Artiste serieuse. 

Toyshop saddlers harness makers Iwrdware store 
Things of yesteryear and the lilie; Sacre Ferme 1 .N. 
A walk with the secret agent. 

Small side alley in the Passage des Panoramas: service passage with iron ladders on 
the walls. 

I'isitors ' cards are made immediately; boots immediately cleaned 

Mosaic thresholds, in the style of the old restaurants in the Palais-Royal, lead to a 
diner de Paris at five francs — so broad and empty are t/iey, that one cannot be- 
lieve there is really a restaurant up there. The same is true of the entrance to the 
Petit Casino, lliereyou indeed see a ticket booth and prices of seats; but you have 
the feeling that, once through the gluss door, you would wind up on the street 
again instead of in a theater. 

Many institutes of hygiene For the biceps, hip reducer, gladiators with orthopedic 
belts Bandages round the white bellies of mannequins 

In old hairdressing salons, the Itust women with long hair, undulating "permanent 
wave," petrified coiffures. 

If these latter are petrified, the stonework of the arcades, by contrast, often hus t/ie 
effect of crumbling fxipier-mdche. 

Ridiculous "souvenirs " and bibelots — quite hideous 

Odalisques stretched out next to inkwell; priestesses raise aloft ashtrays like 
patens. 



"A la Capricieuse," lingerie de tout genre. 
Doll mender. 

Fan factory under the arch 

Bookshop on the menanine: Etreintes secretes, Art d'aimer, Affolantes Illusions, Les 
Insatiables, School of Love, Menioires d'une bonne h tout faire. In tlieir midst, 
Images d'Epinal. Harlequin be troths his daug liter. Images tf Napoleon. Artil- 
lery. Way to heaven and Ml, with caption in French and German (in devotional 
slwp on the Rue du Vol de Grace English the broad and the narrow way). 

Typographies. 

11 sitors' cards while you wait 

Everywhere, as addition to tlw progra??i, as guest star: stockings. Now lying next to 
sonte photos, now in a tavern, watched over by a girl (we think of tlie theater in 
Montrouge, where, during the day, thy hang on tlie ticket booth that opens only 
at evening) 

Stairway to the Arabic restaurant, Kebab 

Frequently, handbags (petits sacs) in open cardboard boxes, wrapped in tissue pa- 
per. 

In the building next door, where there is a gateway, almost an arcade: Mme. 
de Consolis, Maitresse de Ballet — Lecons, Cours, Numeros. Mme. %ahna, Carto- 
manciere. 

[Narrow alley } behind Hotel de Boulogne, with one window above hairdresser. The 
girl waiting below and tlie one looking out of tlie window. Tlie whole framed by 
tlie entiyway. 

<Drawing by Hessel representing the gateway mentioned> 

This in front of me (as seen from the cafe) and, to the right, the Gate of [Saint- 
Denis dedicated to] Louis the Great, with couchant lions, weapons, and 
vague trophies on pyramids. 

In tlie arcades, bolder colors are possible. Tliere are red and green combs. 

Preserved in the arcades are types of collar studs for which we no longer know tlie 
corresponding collars or shirts. 

Should a shoemakers sliop be neighbor to a confectioner's, lis display of shoelaces 
will start to resemble licorice. 

[Tliere are many stamp simps (which, with tlieir South American hummingbird 
stamps on paper stained by damp, remind tlie visitor from Berlin of ctdldhood 
and cuckoos). ) 

9ne could imagine an ideal shop in an ideal arcade — a shop which brings togetlier 
all metiers, which is doll clinic and orthopedic institute in one, which sells trum- 
pets and sliells, birdseed in fixative pans from a photographer's darkroom, ocari- 
nas as umbrella handles. 



A factory producing cockades for weddings and banquets, "finery for mar- 
rieds." 



1. (Mot long ago, a piece of old Paris disappeared — the Passage de I'Opera, 

which once led from t/ie boulevards to tlie old opera theater. Construction of the 
Boulevard Haussmann swallowed it up. And so we turn our attention to the ar- 
cades that still exist, to the brighter, livelier, and in some cases renovated ar- 
cades of the opera district, to the narrow, often empty and dust-covered arcades 
of more obscure neighborhoods. They work, the arcades — sometimes in their to- 
tality, sometimes only in certain parts — as a past become space; they harbor an- 
tiquated trades, and even those that are thoroughly up to date acquire in these 
inner spaces something archaic.) Since the light comes only from above through 
glass roofs, and all stairways to the left or right, at entranceways between the 
shops, lead into darkness, our conception of life within the rooms to which these 
stairways ascend remains somewhat shadowy. 

la. The Illustrated Guide to Paris, a complete picture of the city on the Seine and 
its environs from the year 1852, writes of the arcades: <there follows the cita- 
tion found at the beginning of "The Arcades of Paris"). 

2. At the entrance gates of the arcades (one could just as 
well say "exit gates f since, with these peculiar hybrid 
forms of house and street, eveiy gate is simultaneously 
entrance and exit) — at the entrance gates one finds, on 
either side, remarkable and sometimes enigmatic 
inscriptions and signs, which oftentimes multiply along 
the walls within where, here and there, between t/ie 
shops, a spiral staircase rises into darkness. We 
surmise that "Albert au 83" will be a hairdresser, and 
no responsibility "Maillots de llieatre " will most likely be silk tiglits, 

toward the new pink and light blue , for young singers and darners; but 

a ge: it can come tliese insistent letterings want to say more to us and 

no more in tlie something different. And should we find ourselves 

fixture crowded out by those who actually buy and sell, and 

left standing between overloaded coatracks at the 
bottom of the spiral staircase, where we read "Institut 
de Beaute du Professeur Alfred Bitterlinf we cannot 
but feel anxious. And the "Fabrique de Cravates au 
2''" — Does it make neckties for strangling? Oh, tl\e 
needlework there will be quite inoffensive, of course, 
but these dark dilapidated stairs make us feel afraid. 
But: "Union artistique de France au 3 C " — What 
can that be? (In all arcades — the wide and crowded 
ones of the boulevard, no less than the narrow deserted 
ones near the Rue Saint-Denis — there are displays of 
canes and umbrellas: serried ranks of colorful crooks) 



"{ Baudelaire, "La 
cheuelure." Redon, 
Baudelaire, who have 
made a special world out 
of hair. "Betrayed and 
sold" — that is a fate that 
first becomes intelligible 

udtMlLlhs£LJM£S£^IIsiIj. 
the head of Salome itself 
has become an ornament; 
or rather, a ghostly head 
that — now 

Salo?ne's and now Anna 



g [Often, these inner spaces harbor antiquated trades, 
and even those t/iat are thoroughly up to date will 
acquire in them something [archaic] obsolete ) 
In the wide and crowded arcades of the boulevards, 
as in the narrow deserted arcades near tlie Rue 
Saint-Denis, tliere are always displays of umbrellas 
and canes: serried ranks of colorful crooks 
[Many are the institutes of hygiene, where 
gladiators have on orthopedic belts, and there are 
bandages around the white bellies *f mannequins. } 
[In the shop windows of the hairdressers, one sees 
the last women with long hair; they have richly 
undulating masses of hair, which are "permanent 
waves" petrified coiffures* And, while these are 
turned to stone, the masonry of the walls above is 
like crumbling papier-miiche. 
Brittle, too, are the mosaic thresholds that lead you, 
in the style of the old restaurants of the Palais- 
Royal, to a "diner de Paris "for five francs; they 
mount boldly to a glass dotr, but you can hardly 
believe that behind this door is really a restaurant. 
The glass door adjacent promises a "Petit Casino" 
and allows a glimpse of a ticket booth and prices of 
seats; but were you to open it and go in, wouldn 't 
you rather come out on the street instead of into the 
space of a theater?** Or into a darkness such as 
that into which all stairs lead at the entranceways 



on either side?) 
Czyllaks— flits here and 
there undecided. ) 

**\The door, in fact, has a mirror in tlw middle and, since all 
walls are breached by mirrors, there is no telling outside from in, 
with all the equivocal illumination. Pa rts is the city of mir rors ■ ■ ■ } 

4. [In the arcades [bolder] falser colors are possible; that combs are red and green 
is not surprising, surprises no one. Snow White's stepmother had such thing s. 
And when the comb did not do its work, a red-green apple was needed. 
Ticket agencies have large numbers of seats available for gapingly empty thea- 
ters. Shall we not, however, tak e advantage of this situ ation in order to have as 
neighbor some battered <?> creature who <broken off> 
In such an agency tlie ticket was born 

"Souvenirs" and bibelots can become particularly hideous; the odalisque lies in 
wait next to the inkwell; priestesses elevate ashtrays like patens. 
Everywhere stockings play a starring role — now lying next to some photo- 
graphs, now in a doll hospital, now on a side table in a tavern, watched over 
by a girl. 



A bookstore places together on neighboring shelves [alluring manuals of the art 
of love, ) introductions to outmoded vices, accounts of strange passions and vices, 
and memoirs of a maidservant, with vividly colored Epinal prints, on which 
Harlequin betroths his daughter, Mapoleon rides through Marengo, and, close 
beside all types of artilleiy pieces, Old English burghers travel the broad path 
to hell and the narrow path of the Gospel. } 

Preserved in the arcades are types of collar studs for which we no longer know 
the corresponding collars or shirts. 

Should a shoemaker's shop umbrella handles <broken off> 

At the entrance to one of the poorest arcades, we could read: "Bureau de Place- 
ment pour le Personnel des Deux Sexes,"* founded in 1859. 

*l7ie personnel must live here — that can be inferred from the fact that a 
placement bu reau for it exists <marginal note> 
This stood above "Article de Paris, Specialites pour Forains." We followed the 
narrow dark corridor to where — between a "librairie en solde," in which 
masses of books were stacked in dusty tied-up bundles, and a shop selling only 
buttons (mother-of-pearl, and the kind that in Paris is called "de fmtaisie") — 
we discovered a sort of salon. On the pale-colored wallpaper full of figures and 
busts shone a gas lamp. By its light, an old woman sat reading. Thy say she 
has been there alone for years. 

[Having passed a stamp shop with South American hummingbird stamps on pa- 
per stained by damp, we come to an office shrouded in black: there, gold and sil- 
ver is purchased. } There, the proprietor seeks sets of teeth in gold, in wax, or 
broken* 

*And not far from there must have stood the o ffices in which, toward the 
beginning of the Biedermeier period, Doctor Miracle created his Olympia. 
For they a re the true fairies of these arcades (m ore salable and more worn 
than the life-size ones): the formerl y world-famous Parisian dolls, which 
revolved on their musical socle and bore in their arms a doll-sized basket 
out of which, at the salutation of the minor chord, a lambkin poked its 
curious muzzle <marginal note> 

But a small, red tin parasol, at the foot of a staircase close by, points the way 

coyly to a fuctoiy producing umbrella ferrules. 



"Dialectics at a Standstill" / "The Story of Old Benjamin" 
Translators' Notes / Guide to Names and Terms / Index 




The Passage Choiseul, 1908. Photographer unknown. 



Dialectics at a Standstill 

Approaches to the Passagen-Werk 
By Rolf Tiedemann 



There are books whose fate has been settled long before they even exist as books. 
Benjamin's unfinished Passagen-Werk is just such a case. Many legends have been woven 
around it since Adorno first mentioned it in an essay published in 1950. 1 Those legends 
became even more complexly embroidered after a two-volume selection of Benjamin's 
letters appeared, which abounded in statements about his intentions for the project. But 
these statements were neither complete nor coherent. 2 As a result, the most contradictory 
rumors spread about a book that competing Benjamin interpreters persistently referred to 
in the hope that it would solve the puzzles raised by his intellectual physiognomy That 
hope has remained unrealized. The answer that the fragments of the Passagen-Werk give to 
its readers instead follows Mephisto's retort, "Many a riddle is made here," with Faust's 
"Many a riddle must be solved here." 

In fact, for some years the texts that provide the most reliable information about the 
project Benjamin worked on for thirteen years, from 1927 until his death in 1940, and 
that he regarded as his masterpiece, have been available. Most of the more important 
texts he wrote during the last decade of his life are offshoots of the Passagen-Werk. If it had 
been completed, it would have become nothing less than a materialist philosophy of the 
history of the nineteenth century. The expose entitled "Paris, the Capital of the Nine- 
teenth Century" (1935) provides us with a summary of the themes and motifs Benjamin 
was concerned with in the larger work. The text introduces the concept of "historical 
schematism" (5:1150)/ which was to serve as the basic plan for Benjamin's construction 
of the nineteenth century. On the other hand, "Das Kunstwerk im Zeitalter seiner techni- 
schen Reproduzierbarkeit" (The Work of Art in the Age of Technological Reproducibil- 
ity; 1935-1936) has no thematic connection with the Passagen-Werk (dealing with 
phenomena belonging to the twentieth rather than to the nineteenth century), but is 
nevertheless relevant from the point of view of methodology. In that essay, Benjamin tries 
to "pinpoint the precise spot in the present my historical construction would take as its 
vanishing point' (Letters, 509). The great, fragmentary work on Baudelaire, which came 
into being in the years 1937-1939, offers a "miniature model" of The Arcades Project. The 
methodological problems raised by the "Work of Art" essay were, in their turn, addressed 
once more in the theses "Uber den Begrilfder Geschichte" (On the Concept of History). 
In Adorno's opinion, these theses "more or less summarize the epistemological considera- 
tions that developed concurrently with The Arcades Project?* What survives of this proj- 
ect — the countless notes and excerpts that constitute the fifth volume of Benjamin's 



Notes for this essay begin on page 1012. 



Gesammelle Schriften — rarely go theoretically beyond positions that have been formulated 
more radically in the texts mentioned above. Any study of the Passagen-Werk (Benjamin's 
intentions hardly lay themselves open to a simple perusal) must therefore deal with the 
"Work of Art" essay, the texts devoted to Baudelaire, and the theses "On the Concept of 
History." These must always be present to the student's mind, even though they are 
manifestly autonomous — writings either introductory to the Passagen-Werk or distinct 
from it. 

The published volumes of the Passagen- Werk begin with two texts in which Benjamin 
presents the project in summary, first in 1935 and again in 1939. Together with the early 
essay "Der Saturnring, oder Etwas vom Eisenbau" (The Ring of Saturn, or Some Re- 
marks on Iron Constraction), these texts are the only ones belonging to the Arcades 
complex that may be said to be complete. They were not, however, intended for publica- 
tion. The earlier, German one was written for the Institut fur Sozialforschung, which, as a 
result, accepted the Passagen-Werk as one of its sponsored research projects. The other 
text, written in French, came into being at Max Horkheimer's instigation: Horkheimer 
hoped to make use of it to interest an American patron in Benjamin. The most important 
part, as well as the lengthiest section, of Volume 5 of the Gesammelte Scltriften consists of 
the manuscript of the "Aufzeichnungen und Materialien" (Notes and Materials; here 
called the "Convolutes"), which is subdivided thematically. This is die manuscript that 
had been hidden in the Bibliotheque Nationale during World War II. 

Benjamin probably worked on this manuscript from the fall or winter of 1928 until the 
end of 1929, and then again from the beginning of 1934. The last entries were made in 
the spring of 1940, immediately before Benjamin fled Paris. The present order of the 
notes does not correspond to the order in which they were originally composed. It seems 
that Benjamin would begin a new convolute, or sheaf of notes, whenever a new theme 
suggested itself and demanded to be treated. Within the different sheafs that were com- 
posed simultaneously, the notes may evince the chronological order in which they were 
written down. Yet even this chronology is not always identical with that of the notes' 
actual conception. At the beginnings of those rubrics that had guided his research in its 
earliest stage, we find notes Benjamin incorporated from older manuscripts. Here the 
notes have been rearranged, and therefore the first pages of the respective collections of 
material follow certain clear principles. By contrast, rubrics either added to or newly 
begun from 1934 onward generally owe their order to the coincidences of Benjamin's 
studies or, even more so, to his reading. 5 

The section "Erste Notizen" (5:991-1038), here called "First Sketches," consists of 
consecutive notes that were begun about the middle of 1927 and terminated in December 
1929 or, at the latest, by the beginning of 1930. TTiey are published in their entirety, even 
diough their contents have for the most part been incorporated into the larger "Convo- 
lutes" section. It is only with their help that we can trace the "transformation process" that 
determined the transition from the first stage of the work to the second. The first of the 
"Friihe Entwiirf e" (Early Drafts) entitled "Passagen" (Arcades) , dates back to the very 
first phase of the work, mid-1927, when Benjamin intended to collaborate with Franz 
Hessel on a journal article. The draft may well have been written by Benjamin and Hessel 
together. "Pariser Passagen II" (here called "The Arcades of Paris") shows Benjamin's 
attempts in 1928 and 1929 to write the essay he thought the Ptssagen-Werk would be- 
come. Benjamin wrote these texts in a format totally unusual for him and on very 
expensive handmade paper, which he never used before or after. One can easily imagine 
that he approached their composition as he would a festive occasion. But he did not get 
very far. The discrete texts, whose sequence he did not establish, are soon interspersed 



with and finally overgrown by quotations and bibliographic notes, and in places with 
commentary. Both the "Convolutes" and the "First Sketches" are published in extenso as 
they are found in the manuscript, but "The Arcades of Paris" is treated in a different 
manner. The notes and quotations in this manuscript were never really worked out: they 
must have either been transferred to the "Convolutes" or been discarded. They have 
therefore not been included in this edition. Only fully formulated texts have been publish- 
ed; their order has been established by the editor. These texts, among the most important 
and, if I may say so, the most beautiful of Benjamin's texts, surface again at various places 
in the "Convolutes." Published as a whole, however, they convey an impression of the 
essay Benjamin mulled over but never actually wrote. The last text, "The Ring of Saturn, 
or Some Remarks on Iron Construction," also belongs to the first phase of his project. It 
may, in fact, be a journal or newspaper article, an offshoot of the Passagen-Werk which 
never made it into print. 

The fragments of the Passagen-Werk can be compared to the materials used in building 
a house, the outline of which has just been marked in the ground or whose foundations 
are just being dug. In the two exposes that open the fifth volume of the Gcsammelte 
Schriften, Benjamin sketches broad outlines of the plan as he had envisaged it in 1935 and 
in 1939. The five or six sections of each expose should have corresponded to the same 
number of chapters in the book or, to continue the analogy, to the five or six floors of the 
projected house. Next to the foundations we find the neatly piled excerpts, which would 
have been used to construct the walls; Benjamin's own thoughts would have provided the 
mortar to hold the building together. The reader now possesses many of these theoretical 
and interpretive reflections, yet in the end they almost seem to vanish beneath the very 
weight of the excerpts. It is tempting to question the sense of publishing these oppressive 
chunks of quotations — whether it would not be best to publish only those texts written by 
Benjamin himself. These texts could have been easily arranged in a readable format, and 
they would have yielded a poignant collection of sparkling aphorisms and disturbing 
fragments. But this would have made it impossible to guess at the project attempted in the 
Passagen-Werk, such as the reader can discern it behind these quotations. Benjamin's 
intention was to bring together theory and materials, quotations and interpretation, in a 
new constellation compared to contemporary methods of representation. The quotations 
and the materials would bear the full weight of the project; theory and interpretation 
would have to withdraw in an ascetic manner. Benjamin isolated a "central problem of 
historical materialism," which he thought he could solve in the Passagen-Werk, namely: 

In what way is it possible to conjoin a heightened graphicness <Anschaulichkeit> to 
the realization of the Marxist method? The first stage in this undertaking will be to 
carry over the principle of montage into history. That is, to assemble large-scale 
constructions out of the smallest and most precisely cut components. Indeed, to 
discover in the analysis of the small individual moment the crystal of the total event. 
(N2,6) c 

The components, the structural elements, are the countless quotations, and for tliis reason 
they cannot be omitted. Once familiar with the architecture of the whole, the reader will 
be able to read the excerpts without great difficulty and pinpoint in almost every one that 
element which must have fascinated Benjamin. The reader will also be able to specify 
which function an excerpt would have served in the global construction — how it migbt 
have been able to become a "crystal" whose sparkling light itself reflects the total event. 
The reader will, of course, have to draw on the ability to "interpolate into the infinitesi- 
mally small," as Benjamin defines the imagination in Einbalinstrasse (One-Way Street). 7 



For the reader endowed with such an imagination, the dead letters Benjamin collected 
from die holdings of the Bibliotheque Nationale will come to life. Perhaps even the 
building Benjamin did not manage to build will delineate itself bef ore die imaginatively 
speculative eye in shadowy outlines. 

These shadows, which prevent us from making a surveyable, consistent drawing of die 
architecture, are often traceable to problems of a philological nature. The fragments, 
which are mostly short and of ten seem to abbreviate a thought, only rarely allow us to 
glimpse how Benjamin planned to link. them. He would often first write down ideas, 
pointed scribbles. It is impossible to determine whether he planned to retain them in the 
course of his work. Some theoretical notes contradict each other; others are hardly 
compatible. Moreover, many of Benjamin's texts are linked with quotations, and the mere 
interpretation of those citations cannot always be separated from Benjamin's own posi- 
tion. Therefore, to assist the reader in finding his bearings in the labyrinth this volume 
presents, I shall briefly sketch the essentials of Benjamin's intentions in his Passagen-Werk, 
point out the theoretical nodes of his project, and try to approach explication of some of 
its central categories. 

The Passagen-Werk is a building with two completely different floor plans, each belonging 
to a particular phase of the work. During the first phase, from about mid- 1927 to the fall 
of 1929, Benjamin planned to write an essay entitled "Pariser Passagen: Eine dialektische 
Feerie" (Paris Arcades: A Dialectical Fairyland).' His earliest references to it in letters 
characterize the project as a continuation of One-Way Street (Letters, 322), though Ben- 
jamin meant a continuation less in terms of its aphoristic form than in the specific kind of 
concretization he attempted there: "this extreme concreteness which made itself felt there 
in some instances — in a children's game, a building, and a situation in life" — should now 
be captured "for an epoch" (Letters, 348). Benjamin's original intention was a philosoplii- 
cal one and would remain so for all those years: "putting to the test" (die Probe anf das 
Exempel) "to what extent you can be 'concrete' in historical-philosophical contexts" (Let- 
ters, 333). He tried to represent the nineteenth century as "commentary on a reality" 
(0°,9), rather than construing it in the abstract. We can put together a kind of "catalogue 
of themes" from the "First Sketches" about the Passagen-Werk. The catalogue shows us 
what the work was supposed to treat at this level: streets and warehouses, panoramas, 
world exliibitions, types of lighting, fashion, advertising and prostitution, collectors, the 
flaneur and the gambler, boredom. Here the arcades themselves are only one theme 
among many. They belong to those urban phenomena that appeared in the early nine- 
teenth century, with the emphatic claim of the new, but they have meanwhile lost their 
functionality. Benjamin discovered die signature of the early modern in the ever more 
rapid obsolescence of the inventions and innovations generated by a developing capital- 
ism's productive forces. He wanted to recover diat feature from the appearances of the 
unsightly, intentione recta, the physiognomic way: by showing rags, as a montage of trash 
(0°,36). In One-Way StreetMvi thinking had similarly lost itself in the concrete and particu- 
lar and had tried to wrest his secret directly, without any theoretical mediation. Such a 
surrender to singular Being is the distinctive feature of this thinking as such. It is not 
affected by the rattling mechanisms of undergraduate philosophy, with its transcendental 
tablets of commandments and proliibitions. Rather, it limits itself to the somewhat limit- 
less pursuit of a kind of gentle empirical experience" (Empirie). Like Goethe's Empirie, it 
does not deduce the essence behind or above the thing — it knows it in the things them- 
selves. 

The Surrealists were the fir st to discover the material world characteristic of the nine- 



teenth century, and in it a specific myt/tologic modc.rne. It is to that modem mythology that 
Aragon devotes the preface to his Paysan de Paris, while Breton's Nadja reaches up into its 
artificial sky. In his essay "Surrealism," which he called an "opaque folding screen placed 
before the Passagen-Werk" (Letters, 348), Benjamin praised the SuiTealists as "the first to 
perceive the revolutionary energies that appear in the 'outmoded,' in the first iron con- 
structions, the first factory buildings, the earliest photos, the objects that begin to be 
extinct, grand pianos in the salon, the dresses of five years ago, fashionable restaurants 
when the vogue has begun to ebb from them." 9 This stratum of material, the alluvium of 
the recent past, also pertains to the Passagen- Werk. Just as Aragon, sauntering through the 
Passage de l'Opera, was pulled by a vague de reves into strange, unglimpsed realms of the 
Real, so Benjamin wanted to submerge himself in liitherto ignored and scorned reaches of 
history and to salvage what no one had seen before him. 

The nearly depopulated aquarium liumain, as Aragon described die Passage de l'Opera 
in 1927, two years after it had been sacrificed to the completion of the inner circle of 
boulevards — the ruins of yesterday, where today's riddles are solved — was mimatched in 
its influence on the Passagen-Werk (see Letters, 488). Benjamin kept quoting the lueur 
glauqae of Aragon's arcades: the light that objects are immersed in by dreams, a light that 
makes them appear strange and vivid at the same time. If the concept of the concrete 
formed one pole of Benjamin's theoretical armature, then the Surrealist theory of dreams 
made up the other. The divagations of the first Arcades "sketch" take place in the field of 
tension between concretization and the dream. 10 Through the dream, the early Surrealists 
deprived empirical reality of all its power; they maltreated empirical reality and its pur- 
posive rational organization as the mere content of dreams whose language can be only 
indirectly decoded. By turning the optics of the dream toward the waking world, one 
could bring to birth the concealed, latent thoughts slumbering in that world's womb. 
Benjamin wanted to proceed similarly with the representation of history, by treating the 
nineteenth-century world of things as if it were a world of dreamed things. Under capital- 
ist relationships of production, history could be likened to the unconscious actions of the 
dreaming individual, at least insofar as history is man-made, yet without consciousness or 
design, as if in a dream. "In order to understand the arcades from the ground up, we sink 
them into the deepest stratum of the dream" (F°,34). If the dream model is applied to the 
nineteenth century, then it will strip the era of its completeness, of that aspect that is gone 
forever, of what has literally become history. The means of production and way of life 
dominant in that period were not only what they had been in their time and place; 
Benjamin also saw the image-making imagination of a collective unconscious at work in 
them. That imagination went beyond its historical limits in the dream and actually 
touched the present, by transferring "the thoroughly fluctuating situation of a conscious- 
ness each time manifoldly divided between waking and sleeping," which he had discov- 
ered in psychoanalysis, "from the individual to the collective" (G°,27). Benjamin wanted 
to draw attention to the fact that arcliitectonic constructions such as the arcades owed 
their existence to and served the industrial order of production, while at the same time 
containing in themselves sometliing unfulfilled, never to be fulfilled within the confines of 
capitalism — in diis case, the glass architecture of the future Benjamin often alludes to. 
"Each epoch" has a "side turned toward dreams, the cliild's side" (F°,7). The scrutiny this 
side of history was subjected to in Benjamin's observation was designed to "liberate the 
enormous energies of liistory . . . that are slumbering in the 'once upon a time' of classical 
liistorical narrative" (0°,71). 

Almost concurrently with his first notes for the Passagen-Werk, Benjamin included in 
his writings many protocols of his own dreams; this was also when he began to experi- 



ment with drugs. Both represented attempts to break the fixations and the encrustations 
in wliich thinking and its object, subject and object, have been frozen under the pressure 
of industrial production. 11 In dreams as in narcotic intoxication, Benjamin watched "a 
world of particular secret affinities" reveal itself, a world in which things enter into "die 
most contradictory communication" and in which they could display "indefinite affini- 
ties" (A°,4-5). Intoxication and the dream seemed to unlock a realm of experiences in 
which the Id still communicated mimetically and corporeally with things. Ever since his 
earlier philosophical explorations, Benjamin sought a concept of experience that would 
explode the limitations set by Kant and regain "the fullness of the concept of experience 
held by earlier philosophers," which should restore the experiences of theology. 12 But the 
experiences of the Surrealists taught him diat it was a matter not of restoring theological 
experience but of transporting it into the profane: 

These experiences are by no means limited to dreams, hours of hashish eating or 
opium smoking. It is a cardinal error to believe that, of "Surrealist experiences," we 
know only the religious ecstasies or die ecstasies of drugs. . . . But the tine, creative 
overcoming of religious illumination certainly does not lie in narcotics. It resides in a 
profane illumination, a materialistic, anthropological inspiration to which hashish, 
opium, or whatever else can give a preliminary lesson. (81V, 2:208-209) 

Benjamin wanted to carry such profane illuminations into history by acting as an inter- 
preter of the dreams of die nineteenth-century world of things. The epistemic intention 
manifest here seems to fit in with the context of Benjamin's soon-to-be-formulated theory 
of mimetic ability, which is, at its core, a theory of experience. 13 The dieory holds that 
experience rests on the ability to produce and perceive similarities — an ability diat under- 
went significant change in the course of species liistory. In the beginning a sensuous, 
qualitative type of behavior of men toward things, it later transformed itself phylogeneti- 
cally into a faculty for apperceiving nonsensuous similarities, which Benjamin identified 
as the achievements of language and writing. Vis-a-vis abstracting cognition, his concept 
of experience wanted to maintain immediate contact widi mimetic behavior. He was 
concerned about "palpable knowledge" (geftlMtes Wissen), which "not only feeds on the 
sensory data taking shape before his eyes, but can veiy well possess itself of abstract 
knowledge — indeed, of dead facts — as something experienced and lived through" (e°,l). 
Images take the place of concepts — the enigmatic and vexing dre;un images which hide all 
that falls through the coarse mesh of semiotics — and yet diose images alone balance the 
exertions of cognition. The nineteenth-century language of images represents that cen- 
tury's "deepest level of sleep" (G°,27) — a sleep that should be awakened by the Passagen- 
Wtrk. 

Benjamin knew that tliis motif of awakening separated him from the Surrealists. They 
had tried to abolish the line of demarcation between life and art, to shut off poetry in 
order to live writing or write life. For the early Surrealists, both dream and reality would 
unravel to a dreamed, unreal Reality, from which no way led back to contemporaiy 
praxis and its demands. Benjamin criticized Aragon for "persisting within the realm of 
dreams" and for allowing mythology to "remain" with him (H°,17). Aragon's mythology 
remains mere mythology, impenetrated by reason. Surrealist imagery evens out the differ- 
ences separating Now from Then; instead of bringing the past into the present, it drives 
"things back into the distance again" and remains bound, "in the historical sphere, [to] a 
romantic distance" (C°,5). Benjamin, on the odier hand, wanted "to [bring] things near," 
to allow them to "step into our lives" (I°,2). What linked his methods to Surrealist ones, 



die immersion of what has been into layers of dreams, represented not an end in itself for 
the Passagen- Werk, but rather its methodological arrangement, a kind of experimental 
setup. The nineteenth century is the dream we must wake up from; it is a nightmare that 
will weigh on the present as long as its spell remains unbroken. According to Benjamin, 
the images of dreaming and awakening from the dream are related as expression is related 
to interpretation. He hoped that the images, once interpreted, would dissolve the spell. 
Benjamin's concept of awakening means the "genuine liberation from an epoch" (h°,3), in 
the double sense of Hegel's Aujhebung; the nineteenth centiuy would be transcended in 
that it would be preserved, "rescued" for the present. Benjamin defines "the new, the 
dialectical method of doing history" in these words: "with the intensity of a dream, to pass 
through what has been [das Gewesene], in order to experience the present as the waking 
world to which the dream refers" (F°,6). This concept is based on a mystical conception of 
liistory that Benjamin was never to abandon, not even in liis late theses "On the Concept 
of History." Every present ought to be synchronic with certain moments of history, just as 
every past becomes "legible" only in a certain epoch — "namely, the one in wliich human- 
ity, nibbing its eyes, recognizes just this particular dream image as such. It is at this 
moment that the histoiian takes up . . . the task of dream interpretation" (N4,l). Toward 
this end, we need not a dragging of the past into the mythological, but, on the contrary, a 
"dissolution of 'mythology' in the space of liistory" (H°,17). Benjamin demanded a "con- 
crete, materialist meditation on what is nearest" (das Nacliste); he was interested "only in 
the presentation of what relates to us, what conditions us" (C°,5). In this way the liistorian 
should no longer try to enter the past; rather, he should allow the past to enter his life. A 
"pathos of nearness" should replace the vanishing "empathy" (I°,2). For the historian, 
past objects and events would not then be fixed data, an unchangeable given, because 
dialectical tliinking "ransacks them, revolutionizes them, turns them upside down" 
(D°,4); this is what must be accomplished by awakening from the dream of the nineteenth 
century. That is why for Benjamin the "effort to awaken from a dream" represents "the 
best example of dialectical reversal" (D°,7). 

The key to what may have been Benjamin's intention while working on the first phase 
of the Passugeji-Werk may be found in the sentence, "Capitalism was a natural phenome- 
non with which a new dream-filled sleep came over Europe, and, tlirough it, a reactivation 
of myttiical forces" (Kla,8). Benjamin shares his project, the desire to investigate capital- 
ism, with historical materialism, from which he may well have appropriated the project in 
the first place. But the concepts he uses to define capitalism — nature, dream, and myth — 
originate from the terminology of his own metaphysically and theologically inspired 
thought. The key concepts of the young Benjamin's philosophy of history center around 
a critique of myth as the ordained heteronomous, which kept man banished in dumb 
dependence throughout prehistory and which has since survived in the most dissimilar 
forms, both as unmediated violence and in bourgeois jurisprudence. 14 The critique of 
capitalism in the first Arcades sketch remains a ciitique of myth, since in it the nineteenth 
century appears as a domain where "only madness has reigned until now." "But," Ben- 
jamin adds, "every ground must at some point have been turned over by reason, must 
have been cleared of the undergrowth of delusion and myth. This is to be accomplished 
here for the terrain of the nineteenth century" (G°,13). His inteipretation recognizes 
fonris still unliistorical, still imprisoned by myth, forms that are only preparing them- 
selves, in such an interpretation, to awaken from myth and to take away its power. 
Benjamin identifies them as the dominant forms of consciousness and the imagery of 
incipient high capitalism: the "sensation of the newest and most modern," as well as the 



image of the "eternal return of the same" — both are "dream formations of events," 
dreamed by a collective that "knows no history" (M°,14). He speaks in direct theological 
terms in his interpretation of the modern as "the time of hell": 

What matters here is that the face of the world, the colossal head, precisely in what 
is newest never itself changes — that this "newest" remains in all respects the same. 
This constitutes the eternity of hell and the sadist's delight in innovation. To deter- 
mine the totality of traits which defme this "modernity" is to represent hell. (G°,17) 

Since it is a "commentary on a reality," which sinks into the historical and interprets it as 
it would a text, theology was called upon to provide the "scientific mainstay" of the 
Passagen-Werk (0°,9), though at the same time politics was to retain its "primacy over 
history" (h°,2). At the time of the first Arcades sketch, Benjamin was concerned less with a 
mediation of theological and political categories than with their identity. In this he was 
very much like Ernst Bloch in Geist der Utopie (Spirit of Utopia), which he explicitly took 
as his model. He repeatedly had recourse to Blochian concepts to characterize his own 
intentions, as in "fashion inheres in the darkness of die lived moment, but in the collective 
darkness" (O 0 , 11). Just as for Bloch the experiencing individual has not yet achieved 
mastery over himself at the moment of experiencing, for Benjamin the historical phenom- 
ena remain opaque, unilluminated for the dreaming collective. In Bloch's opinion, indi- 
vidual experience is always experience of the immediate past; in the same way, 
Benjamin's interpretation of the present refers to the recent past: action in the present 
means awakening from the dream of history, an "explosion" of what has been, a revolu- 
tionary turn. He was convinced that "the whole set of issues with which this project is 
concerned" would be "illuminated in the process of the proletariat's becoming conscious 
of itself" (0°,68). He did not hesitate to interpret these facts as part of the preparation for 
the proletarian revolution. "The dialectical penetration and actualization of former con- 
texts puts the truth of all present action to the test" (0°,5). It is not the action itself but its 
theory that is at stake here. Tliis defines the task of the historian as "rescuing" the past or, 
as Benjamin formulated it with another concept taken from Bloch, "awakening a not-yet- 
conscious knowledge of what has been" <H°,17) by applying the "theory of not-yet- 
conscious knowing ... to the collective in its various epochs" (O°,50). At this stage, 
Benjamin conceived of the Passagen-Werk as a mystical reconstitution: dialectical thinking 
had the task of separating the future-laden, "positive" element from the backward "nega- 
tive" element, after which "a new partition had to be applied to this initially excluded, 
negative component so that, by a displacement of the angle of vision . . ., a positive 
element emerges anew in it too — something different from that previously signified. And 
so on, ad infinitum, until the entire past is brought into die present in a historical apocatas- 
tasis" (Nla,3). In this way, the nineteenth century should be brought into the present 
within the Passagen-Werk. Benjamin did not think revolutionary praxis should be allowed 
at any lesser price. For him revolution was, in its liighest form, a liberation of the past, 
which had to demonstrate "the indestructibility of the highest life in all things" (0°,1). At 
the end of the 1920s, theology and communism converged in Benjamin's thought. The 
metaphysical, liistorical-philosophical, and theological sources diat had nurtured both his 
esoteric early writings and his great aesthetic works until Unsprung des deutsdten Trauer- 
spiels (Origin of the German Trauerspiel) were still flowing and would also nurture die 
Passagen-Werk. 

The Passagen-Werk was supposed to become all of that, and it became none of that — to 
echo a famous plirase of Benjamin's (D°,6). He inteixupted work in the fall of 1929 for 



various reasons. Retrospectively, he placed responsibility on problems of representation: 
the "rhapsodic nature" of the work, which he had already announced in the first sketch's 
subtitle, "a dialectical fairyland" (Letters, 488). "fire "illicit 'poetic'" formulation he then 
thought he was obliged to use was irreconcilable with a book that was to have "our 
generation's decisive historical interests as its object" (Scholem Letters, 165). Benjamin 
believed that only historical materialism could safeguard those interests; the aporias he 
encountered while composing the Passage n-Werk, then, undoubtedly culminated in the 
project's position in relation to Marxist theory. Though Benjamin professed his commit- 
ment to Communist party politics to begin with, he still had to convince himself of the 
necessity to proceed from a political creed to the theoretical study of Marxism, which he 
thought could be appropriated for his purposes even prior to his actual study. His inten- 
tion was to secure the Passagen-Werk "against all objections . . . provoked by metaphys- 
ics"; "the whole mass of thought, originally set into motion by metaphysics," had to be 
subjected to a "recasting process" which would allow the author to "face with equanimity 
the objects orthodox Marxism might mobilize against the method of the work" (Letters, 
489). Benjamin traced the end of his "blithely archaic philosophizing, imprisoned by 
nature," which had been the basis of the "romantic form" and the "rhapsodic naivete" of 
the first sketch, to conversations with Adorno and Horkheimer that he characterized as 
"historic" (Letters, 488-489). These took place in September or October 1929, in Frank- 
furt and Konigstein. In all probability, both Horkheimer and Adorno insisted in dis- 
cussions of the submitted texts — mainly the "Early Drafts" published with the 
Passagen-Werk — that it was impossible to speak sensibly about the nineteenth century 
without considering Marx's analysis of capital; it is entirely possible that Benjamin, who 
at that time had read hardly anything by Marx, was influenced by such a suggestion. 15 Be 
that as it may, Benjamin's letter to Scholem of January 20, 1930, contains the statement 
that he would have to study certain features of both Hegelian philosophy and Capital in 
order to complete his project (Letters, 359). Benjamin had by no means concluded such 
studies when he returned to the Passagen-Werk four years later. The "new face" (5:1103) 
the work unveiled, due not a little to Benjamin's political experiences in exile, revealed 
itself in an emphatic recourse to social history, which had not been wholly relinquished in 
the first sketch but which had been concealed by that sketch's surrealist intentions. None 
of the old motifs were abandoned, but the building was given stronger foundations. 
Among the themes added were Haussmann's influence, the straggles on the barricades, 
railways, conspiracies, compagnonnage , social movements, the Stock Exchange, economic 
history, the Commune, the history of sects, and the Ecole Polytechnique; moreover, 
Benjamin began assembling excerpts on Marx, Fourier, and Saint-Simon. This thematic 
expansion hardly meant that Benjamin was about to reserve a chapter for each theme (he 
now planned to write a book instead of an essay). The book's subject was now defined as 
"the fate of art in the nineteenth century" (Letters, 517) and thus seemed more narrowly 
conceived than it had been. Iliat should not be taken too literally, however: the 1935 
expose, after all, in which Benjamin most clearly delineates his intentions in his work's 
second stage, still lists every theme the Passagen-Werk was to treat from the outset: ar- 
cades, panoramas, world exhibitions, interiors, and the streets of Paris. This expose 's title, 
"Paris, the Capital of the Nineteenth Century," remained the definitive title and was 
appropriated for another expose — a French prospectus — in 1939. Tliis prospectus con- 
tains a decisive reference to "the new and far-reaching sociological perspectives" of the 
second sketch. Benjamin wrote that these new perspectives would yield a "secure frame- 
work of interpretive interconnections" (Letters, 490). But his interpretation was now 
supposed to trace the book's subject matter — the cultural superstructure of nineteenth- 



century France — back to what Marx had called the fetish character of commodities. In 
1935 the "unfolding of this concept" would "constitute the center" of the projected work 
(Scholem Letters, 159), and by 1938 the "basic categories" of the Passagen-Werk would 
"converge in the determination of the fetish character of commodities" (5:1166). This 
notion surfaces only once in the first sketch (0°,38); it was then by no means clear that 
commodity fetishism was destined to form the central schema for the whole project. 
When Benjamin wrote the first expose in 1935, he was probably still unfamiliar with the 
relevant discussion in Marx's writings. He apparently only began to "look around ... in 
the first volume of Capital'''' after completing the expose (5:1122). He was familiar with the 
theory of commodity fetishism mainly in Lukac's version; like many other left-wing 
intellectuals of his generation, Benjamin largely owed his Marxist competency to the 
chapter on reification in Lukacs's History and Class Consciousness. 

Benjamin wished to treat culture in the era of high capitalism like Lukac's translation 
back into philosophy of the economic fact of commodity fetishism, as well as his applica- 
tion of the category of reification to the antinomies of bourgeois thought. Marx showed 
that capitalist production's abstraction of value begets an ideological consciousness, in 
which labor's social character is reflected as objective, thing-like characteristics of the 
products of that labor. Benjamin recognized the same ideological consciousness at work in 
the then-dominant "reified conception of culture," which obfuscated the fact that "the 
creations of the human mind . . . owe not just their origin, but also the ways in which they 
have been handed down, to a continuing social labor" (5:1255). The fate of nineteenth- 
century culture lay precisely in its commodity character, which Benjamin thereupon 
represented in "cultural values" as phantasmagoria. Phantasmagoria: a Blendwerk, a decep- 
tive image designed to dazzle, is already the commodity itself, in wliich the exchange 
value or value-form hides the use value. Phantasmagoria is the whole capitalist produc- 
tion process, which constitutes itself as a natural force against the people who carry it out. 
For Benjamin, cultural phantasmagorias express "the ambiguity peculiar to the social 
relations and products of this epoch" (Expose of 1935, section V). In Marx, the same 
ambiguity defines "the economic world of capitalism": an ambiguity "exemplified quite 
clearly in the machines wliich aggravate exploitation rather than alleviate the human lot" 
(K3,5). ITie concept of phantasmagoria that Benjamin repeatedly employs seems to be 
merely another term for what Marx called commodity fetishism. Benjamin's term can 
even be found in Marx's writings: in Capitals first chapter (on fetishism), in the famous 
passage about the "definite social relation" which molds labor under capitalist conditions 
of production, that very relation is said to "assume ... the phantasmagoric form of a 
relation between things" for the people concerned. 1 '' Marx had in mind the circumstances 
of the bourgeois economy's "necessarily false" consciousness, which is no less false for 
being necessary. Benjamin's interest in culture was less for its ideological content, how- 
ever, whose depth is unearthed in ideology critique, than for its surface or exterior, wliich 
is both promising and deceptive. "Hie creations and life-styles that were mainly condi- 
tioned by commodity production and which we owe to the previous century" are "sensu- 
ously transfigured in their immediate presence" (5:1256). Benjamin was interested in that 
immediate presence; the secret he was tracking in the Passagen-Werk is a secret that comes 
to appear. The "luster with which the commodity-producing society surrounds itself" 
(5:1256) is phantasmagorical — a luster that hardly has less to do with the "beautiful 
appearance" of idealist aesthetics than with commodity fetishism. Phantasmagorias are 
the "century's magic images" (1:1153); they are the Wunschbilder, the wish symbols or 
ideals, by which that collective tried "both to overcome and to transfigure the immaturity 
of the social product and the inadequacies in the social organization of production" 



(Expose of 1935, section I). To begin with, the phantasmagoria seems to have a transfigur- 
ing function: world exhibitions, for example, transform the exchange value of commodi- 
ties by fading, as in a film, from the abstractness of their valuation. Similarly, the collector 
transfigures things by divesting them of their commodity character. And in this same way, 
iron construction and glass architecture are transfigured in the arcades because "the 
century could not match the new technical possibilities with a new social order" (5:1257). 
As Benjamin in late 1937 came across Auguste Blanqui's L' Eternite par les ashes — a cosmo- 
logical phantasmagoria written by the revolutionary while in prison — he reencountered 
his own speculation about the nineteenth century as Hades. The semblance character 
(Scheiiilmfte) of all that is new and that the century liked to show off as modern pax 
excellence was consummated in its highest concept, that of progress, which Blanqui 
denounced as a "phantasmagoria of history," as "something so old it predates - thinking, 
which struts about in the clothes of the New," as the eternal recurrence of the same, in 
which mankind figures "as one of the damned" (5:1256). Benjamin learned from Blanqui 
that the phantasmagoria embraced "the most bitter criticism," the harshest indictment of 
society" (5:1256-1257). The transfiguring aspects of phantasmagoria change to enlighten- 
ment, into the insight "that mankind will remain under the power of mythical fear as long 
as phantasmagoria has a place in that fear (5:1256). The century always transcends the 
"old social order" in its cultural phantasmagoria. As "wish symbols," the arcades and 
interiors, the exhibition halls and panoramas are "residue of a dream world." They are 
part of Blochian dreaming ahead, anticipating the future: "Every epoch, in fact, not only 
dreams the one to follow, but, in dreaming, precipitates its awakening. It bears its end 
within itself." Insofar as dialectical thinking tries to define as well as to expedite this end of 
decaying bourgeois culture, it became f or Benjamin the "organ of historical awakening" 
(Expose of 1935, section VI, end). 

"The property appertaining to the commodity as its fetish character attaches as well to 
the commodity-producing society — not as it is in itself, to be sure, but more as it repre- 
sents itself and thinks to understand itself whenever it abstracts from the fact that it 
produces precisely commodities" (X13a). That was hardly Marx's opinion. He identifies 
the fetish character of the commodity through the fact that the features of man's labor 
appear to him as what they are: "as material relations between persons and social relations 
between things." 17 The analysis of capital establishes the quid pro quo of commodity 
fetishism as objective, not as a phantasmagoric. Marx would necessarily have rejected the 
notion that the commodity-producing society might be able to abstract from the fact that 
it produces commodities in any other way than by really ceasing to produce commodities 
in the transition to a higher social formation. It is not difficult — though also not very 
productive — to point out Benjamin's miscomprehensions of Marxist theory. 

Benjamin showed little interest in a Marxist theory of art, which he considered "one 
moment swaggering, and the next scholastic" (N4a,2). He valued three short sentences by 
Proust more highly than most of what existed in the field of materialist analysis (K3,4). 
The majority of Marxist art theorists explain culture as the mere reflection of economic 
development; Benjamin refused to join them. He viewed the doctrine of aesthetic reflec- 
tion as already undeirut by Marx's remark that "the ideologies of the superstructure 
reflect relations in a false and distorted maimer." Benjamin followed this remark with a 
question: 

If the infrastructure in a certain way (in the materials of thought and experience) 
determines the superstructure, but if such determination is not reducible to simple 
reflection, then how should it be characterized ? As its expression. The superstruc- 



ture is the expression of the infrastructure. The economic conditions under which 
society exists are expressed in the superstructure, precisely as, with the sleeper, an 
overfull stomach finds not its reflection but its expression in the contents of dreams, 
which, from a causal point of view, it may be said to "condition." (K2,5) 

Benjamin did not set out according to ideology critique; 18 rather, he gave way to the 
notion of materialist physiognomies, which he probably understood as a complement, or 
an extension, of Marxist theory. Physiognomies infers the interior from the exterior; it 
decodes the whole from the detail; it represents die general in die particular. Nominal- 
istically speaking, it proceeds from the tangible object; inductively it commences in the 
reahn of the intuitive. The Passage n-Werk "deals fundamentally with the expressive char- 
acter of the earliest industrial products, the earliest industrial architecture, the earliest 
machines, but also the earliest department stores, advertisements, and so on" (Nla,7). In 
that expressive character, Benjamin hoped to locate what eluded the immediate grasp: the 
Signatw; the mark, of the nineteenth century. He was interested in the "thread of expres- 
sion": "the expression of the economy in its culture will be presented, not the economic 
origins of culture" (Nla,6). Benjamin's trajectory from the fir st to the second sketch of the 
Passagen-Werk documents his efforts to safeguard his work against die demands of histori- 
cal materialism; in this way, motifs belonging to metaphysics and theology survived 
undamaged in the physiognomic concept of the epoch's closing stage. To describe the 
expression of economics in culture was an attempt "to grasp an economic process as 
perceptible Z7r-phenomenon, from out of which proceed all manifestations of life in the 
arcades (and, accordingly, in the nineteenth century)" (Nla,6). Benjamin had already 
enlisted Goethe's primal phenomenon (Urpluinomen) to explicate his concept of truth in 
Origin of the German Trailers piel: 19 the concept of "origin" in the Trauerspiel book would 
have to be "a strict and compelling transfer of this Goethean first principle from the realm 
of nature to that of history." In the Passagen-Werk, then: 

I am equally concerned with fathoming an origin. To be specific, I pursue die origin 
of the forms and mutations of the Paris arcades from their beginning to their decline, 
and I locate this origin in die economic facts. Seen from the standpoint of causality, 
however (and that means considered as causes), these facts would not be primal 
phenomena; they become such only insofar as in their own individual develop- 
ment — "unfolding" might be a better term — they give rise to the whole series of the 
arcade's concrete liistorical forms, just as the leaf unfolds from itself all the riches of 
the empirical world of plants. (N2a,4) 

Metaphysical subtleties and theological niceties reappear here in the theory of epistemol- 
ogy, even though they seemed vanquished after diey learned of their ironic unmasking by 
economics. Plow could f/r-phenomena, which represent themselves as the expression of 
economic facts, distinguish themselves from those ideas in Benjamin's Trauerspiel book 
which represent themselves by empirical means? Benjamin resolves this problem with his 
early notion of a monadological truth, wliich presides at every phase of the Passagen-Werk 
and remains valid even in the theses "On the Concept of History" Whereas in the 
Trauerspiel book the idea as monad "contains the image of the world" in itself, 20 in the 
Passagen-Werk the expression as W-phenomenon contains the image of history in itself. 
The essence of capitalist production would be comprehended vis-a-vis the concrete his- 
torical forms in which the economy finds its cultural expression. The abstractions of mere 
conceptual thinking were insufficient to demystify this abhorrent state of affairs, such that 
a mimetic-intuitive corrective was imposed to decipher the code of the universal in the 



image. Physiognomic thought was assigned the task of "recognizing the monuments of 
the bourgeoisie as ruins even before they have crumbled" (Expose of 1935, section VI, 
end). 

The prolegomena to a materialist physiognomies that can be gleaned from the Pas- 
sagen-Werk counts among Benjamin's most prodigious conceptions. It is the program- 
matic harbinger of that aesthetic theory which Marxism has not been able to develop to 
tliis day. Whether Benjamin's realization of his program was capable of fulfilling its 
promise, whether his physiognomies was equal to its materialist task, could have been 
proven only by the actual composition of the Passagen-Werk itself. 

Modified concepts of history and of the writing of history are the link between both 
Arcades sketches. Their polemical barbs are aimed at the nineteenth-century notion of 
progress. With the exception of Schopenhauer (by no coincidence, liis objective world 
bears the name "phantasmagoria"), idealist philosophers had turned progress into the 
"signature of historical process as a whole" (N13,l) and by doing so had deprived it of its 
critical and enlightenment functions . Even Marx's trust in the unf olding of the productive 
forces hypostatized the concept of progress, and it must have appeared untenable to 
Benjamin in light of the experience of the twentieth century. Similarly, the political praxis 
of the worker's movement had forgotten mat progress in terms of proficiency and infor- 
mation does not necessarily mean progress for humanity itself — and that progress in the 
domination of nature corresponds to societal regress. 21 In the first Arcades sketch Ben- 
jamin already demanded "a philosophy of history that at all points has overcome the 
ideology of progress" (0°,5), one such as he later worked out in the historical-philosophi- 
cal theses. There the image of history reminds the reader more of Ludwig Klages's lethal 
juggling with archetypal images (Urbildaj and phantoms than of the dialectic of the f orces 
and the relations of production. It is that Angel of History who appears in one of the 
theses as an allegory of the historical materialist (in Benjamin's sense) 22 and who sees all 
history as a catastrophe "which keeps piling wreckage upon wreckage and hurls it in front 
of his feet" {Illuminations, p. 259). The Angel abolishes all categories which until then 
have been used for representing liistory: this materialist sees the "everything 'gradual' 
about becoming" as refuted, and "development" is shown to be only "seeming" (F°,6; 
Kl,3). But more than anything else, he denounces the "establishment of a continuity" 
(N9a,5) in history, because the only evidence of that continuity is that of horror, and the 
Angel has to do with salvation and redemption. The Passagen-Werk was supposed to 
bring nothing less than a "Copernican revolution" of historical perception (F°,7; K.1,1-3). 
Past history would be grounded in the present, analogous to Kant's epistemological 
grounding of objectivity in the depths of the subject. The first revolution occurred in the 
relationship in which subject and object, present and past meet in historical perception: 

Formerly it was thought that a fixed point had been found in "what has been," and 
one saw the present engaged in tentatively concentrating the forces of knowledge on 
this ground. Now this relation is to be overturned, and what has been is to become 
the dialectical reversal — the irruption of awakened consciousness. Politics attains 
primacy over history. The facts become something that just now fir st happened to 
us, first struck us; to establish them is the affair of memory. (Kl,2) 

The historical line of vision no longer falls from the present back onto history; instead it 
travels from history forward. Benjamin tried to "recognize today's life, today's forms in 
the life and in the apparently secondary, lost forms" of the nineteenth century (Nl,ll). 
•ur contemporary interest in a liistorical object seems "itself preformed in that object, 



and, above all," it feels "this object concretized in itself and upraised from its former being 
into the higher concretion of now-being \Jetztseins] (waking being!)" (K2,3). The object of 
history goes on changing; it becomes "historical" (in this word's emphatic sense) only 
when it becomes topical in a later period. Continuous relationships in time, widi which 
liistory deals, are superseded in Benjamin's thought by constellations in which the past 
coincides with the present to such an extent that the past achieves a "Now" of its "recog- 
nizability." Benjamin developed this "Now of Recognizability," which he sometimes re- 
ferred to as his theory of knowledge (5:1148), from a double frontal position against both 
idealism and positivistic historicism. While the latter tried to move the historical narrator 
back into the past, so that he could comprehend "emphatically" (solely from within) the 
whole of the Then, which filled "homogeneous, empty time" as a mere "mass of data" 
(Illuminations, p. 264), idealist constructions of history, on the other hand, usurped the 
prospect of the future and posited in history the existence of the natural plan of a process, 
which runs on autonomously and can, in principle, never be completed. Both relegate 
"everything about history that, from the very beginning, has been untimely, sorrowful, 
unsuccessful" (Trailers piel, p. 166) to forgetting. The object of that materialist historical 
narrative Benjamin wanted to try out in the Passagen-Werk would be precisely what 
liistory started but did not carry out. That the lineaments of the past are first detectable 
after a certain period is not due to the historian's whim; it bespeaks an objective historical 
constellation: 

History is die object of a construct whose site is not homogeneous, empty time, but 
time filled by now-time [Jetztzeit]. Thus, to Robespierre ancient Rome was a past 
charged with now-time, which he blasted out of the continuum of history. The 
French Revolution viewed itself as Rome incarnate. It quoted ancient Rome. (Illumi- 
nations, p. 263) 

Benjamin wished to continue along tliis line in the Passagen-Werk. The present would 
provide the text of the book; history, the quotations in that text. "To write history . . . 
means to cite history" (Nil, 3). 

Benjamin's Copernican revolution of liistorical intuition also (and above all) meant that 
the traditional concept of truth was to be turned on its head: 

Resolute refusal of the concept of "timeless truth" is in order. Nevertheless, truth is 
not — as Marxism would have it — a merely contingent function of knowing, but is 
bound to a nucleus of time lying hidden witliin the knower and the known alike. 
This is so true that the eternal, in any case, is far more the ruffle on a dress than 
some idea. (N3,2) 

The temporal core of history cannot be grasped as really happening, stretching forth in 
the real dimension of time; rather it is where evolution halts for a moment, where the 
dynamis of what is happening coagulates into stasis, where time itself is condensed into a 
differential, and where a Now identifies itself as the "Now of a particular recognizability." 
In such a Now, "tmth is charged to the bursting point with time" (N3,l). The Now would 
have thus shown itself to be the "inmost image" (0°,81) of the arcades themselves, of 
fashion, of the bourgeois interior — appearing as the image of all that had been, and whose 
cognition is the pith of the Passagen-Werk. Benjamin invented the term "dialectical im- 
ages" for such configurations of the Now and the Then; he defined their content as a 
"dialectic at a standstill." Dialectical image and dialectic at the standstill are, without a 
doubt, the central categories of die Passagen-Werk. Their meaning, however, remained 
iridescent; it never achieved any terminological consistency. 23 We can distinguish at least 



two meanings in Benjamin's texts; they remain somewhat undivulged, but even so cannot 
be brought totally in congruence. Once — in the 1935 expose, which in this regard sum- 
marizes the motifs of the first draft — Benjamin localized dialectical images as dream and 
wish images in the collective subconscious, whose "image-maldng fantasy, which was 
stimulated by the new" should refer back to the "Z7?-past": "In the dream, in which each 
epoch entertains images of its successor, the latter appears wedded to elements of Ur- 
history — that is, to elements of a classless society. And the experiences of such a society — 
as stored in the unconscious of the collective — engender, through interpenetration with 
what is new, the Utopia" (Expose of 1935, section I). The modem is said to quote 
T/j'-bistoiy "by means of the ambiguity peculiar to the social relations and products of this 
epoch." In turn, "Ambiguity is the manifest imaging of dialectic, the law of dialectics at a 
standstill. This standstill is Utopia, and the dialectical image, therefore, dream image. Such 
an image is afforded by the commodity per se: as fetish" (Expose of 1935, section V). 
These statements drew the resolute criticism of Adorno, who could not concede that the 
dialectical image could be "the way in which fetishism is conceived in the collective 
consciousness," since coirunodity fetishism is not a "fact of consciousness" (Letters, 495). 
Under the influence of Adorao's objections, Benjamin abandoned such lines of thought; 
the corresponding passages in liis 1939 expose were dropped as no longer satisfactory to 
their author (see 5:1157). By 1940, in the theses "On the Concept of History," "dialectic 
at a standstill" seems to function almost like a heuristic principle, a procedure that enables 
the historical materialist to maneuver his objects: 

A historical materialist cannot do without the notion of a present which is not a 
transition, but in which time stands still and has come to a stop. For this notion 
defines the present in which he himself is writing history. . . . Materialist historiogra- 
phy ... is based on a constructive principle. Thinking involves not only the flow of 
thoughts, but their arrest as well. Where thinking suddenly stops in a configuration 
pregnant with tensions, it gives that configuration a shock, by which it ciystallizes 
into a monad. A historical materialist approaches a historical subject only where he 
encounters it as a monad. In this structure he recognizes the sign of a messianic 
cessation of happening, or, put differently, a revolutionary chance in die fight for the 
oppressed past. {Illuminations, pp. 264-265) 

In fact, Benjamin's thinking was invariably in dialectical images. As opposed to the 
Marxist dialectic, which "regards every . . . developed social form as in fluid move- 
ment," 2 ' 1 Benjamin's dialectic tried to halt the flow of the movement, to grasp each 
becoming as being. In Adorno's words, Benjamin's philosophy "appropriates the fetish- 
ism of commodities for itself: everything must metamorphoze into a tiling in order to 
break the catastropliic spell of things." 25 His philosophy progressed imagistically, in that it 
sought to "read" historical social phenomena as if they were natural historical ones. 
Images became dialectical for this philosophy because of the historical index of every 
single image. "In the dialectical image" of this philosophy, "what has been within a 
particular epoch is always simultaneously 'what has been from time immemorial'" (N4,l). 
By so being, it remained rooted in the mythical. Yet at the same time, the historical 
materialist who seized the image should possess the skill to "fan the spark of hope in the 
past," to wrest historical tradition "anew . . . from a conformism that is about to over- 
power it" (Illuminations, p. 255). Through the inunobilizing of dialectic, the historical 
"victors" have their accounts with history canceled, and all pathos is shifted toward 
salvation of the oppressed. 

For Benjamin, freezing the dialectical image was obviously not a method the historian 



could employ at any time. For him, as for Marx, historiography was inseparable from 
political practice: the rescuing of the past through the writer of history remained bound to 
the practical liberation of humanity. Contrasted with the Marxist conception, however, 
according to which "capitalist production begets, with the inexorability of a law of nature, 
its own negation ," 26 Benjamin's philosophy preserves anarcliist and Blanquian elements: 

In reality, there is not one moment that does not carry its own revolutionary oppor- 
tunity in itself. . . . The particular revolutionary opportunity of each historical mo- 
ment is confirmed for the revolutionary thinker by the political situation. But it is no 
less confirmed for him by the power this moment has to open a very particular, 
heretofore closed chamber of the past. Entry into this chamber coincides exactly 
with political action. (1:1231) 

Political action, "no matter how destructive," should always "reveal itself as messianic" 
(1:1231). Benjamin's historical materialism can hardly be severed from political messian- 
ism. In a late note, perhaps written under the shock of the Hitler-Stalin pact, Benjamin 
formulated as "the experience of our generation: that capitalism will not die a natural 
death" (Xlla,3). In that case, the onset of revolution could no longer be awaited with the 
patience of Marx; rather, it had to be envisaged as the eschatological end of history: "the 
classless society is not the ultimate goal of progress in history but its rupture, so often 
attempted and finally brought about (1:1231). Myth is liquidated in the dialectical image 
to make room for the "dream of a thing" (1:1174); this dream is the dialectic at a standstill, 
the piecing together of what liistory has broken to bits (see Illuminations, p. 257), the 
tikkun of the Lurian Kabbalah. 27 Benjamin did quote the young Marx, who wanted to 
show "that the world has long possessed the dream of a thing that, made conscious, it 
would possess in reality" (N5a,l). But for the interpreter of dialectical images, true reality 
cannot be inferred from existing reality. He undertook to represent the imperative and the 
final goal of reality as "a preformation of the final goal ofhistoiy" (N5,3). The awakening 
from myth would follow the messianic model of a history immobilized in redemption as 
the histoiian of the Passagen-Werk had imagined it. In his dialectical images, the bursting 
of time coincides with "the birth of authentic historical time, the time of truth" (N3,l). 
Since the dialectical images belong in such a way to messianic time, or since they should 
at least let that time reveal itself as a flash of lightning, messianism is introduced as a kind 
of methodology of historical research — an adventuresome undertaking if ever there was 
one. "lire subject of historical knowledge is the struggling, oppressed class itself" {Illumi- 
nations, p. 260); one may imagine the historian of the dialectic at a standstill as the herald 
of that class. Benjamin himself did not hesitate to call him "a prophet turned backward," 
borrowing a phrase from FrieArich Schlegel (1 :1237); he did not dismiss the Old Testa- 
ment idea that prophecy precedes the Messiah, that the Messiah is dependent on proph- 
ecy. But Benjamin's historiographer is "endowed with a weak messianic power, a power to 
which the past has a claim." The historian honors that claim when he captures that 
"image of the past that is not recognized by the present as one of its own concerns" and 
thus "threatens to disappear irretrievably" {Illuminations, pp. 256-257). Benjamin was 
able to recognize only the mythical Ever-Same (Immergleiclie) in historical evolutions and 
was unable to recognize progress, except as a Sprung — a "tiger's leap into the past" {Illumi- 
nations, p. 263), which was in reality a leap out of history and the entry of the messianic 
kingdom. He tried to match this mystical conception of history with a version of dialectics 
in which mediation would be totally eclipsed by reversal, in which atonement would have 
to yield to criticism and destruction. His "blasting" the dialectical image "out of the 
continuum of histoiical process" (NHa,3) was akin to that anarcliistic impulse which tries 
to stop history during revolutions by instituting a new calendar, or by shooting at church 



clocks, as during the July revolution in Paris. Trie gaze, which exorcized images from 
objects blasted loose from rime, is the Gorgon gaze at the "fades lippocratica of history," 
the "petrified primordial landscape" of myth (l'rauerspiel, p. 166). But in that mystical 
moment when past and present enter "lightning-like" into a constellation — when the true 
image of the past "flashes" in the "now of its recognizability" (N9,7) — that image becomes 
a dialectically reversing image, as it presents itself from the messianic perspective, or (in 
materialistic terms) the perspective of the revolution. 

From this perspective of "messianic time," Benjamin defined the present as catastrophe 
(1:1243), as the prolongation of that "one single catastrophe" which meets the Angelus 
Novus when he looks back on past history. It might appear as if Benjamin wished to 
reintroduce the "large hyphen between past and future," 28 which was thought to be 
eradicated after Marx. Yet even Benjamin's late work does not fully forgo historical 
reference. Henri Focillon defined the classical in art as "bonkeur rapide," as the chair ou 
achme of the Greeks, and Benjamin wanted to use that definition for his own concept of 
messianic standstill (see 1:1229). lire dialectic at a standstill, the final coming to rest, the 
ending of the historical dynamic which Hegel, following Aristotle, wished to ascribe to 
the state, was, for Benjamin, prefigured only in art. A "real definition" of progress, 
therefore, could emerge only from the vantage point of art, as in the Passagen-Werk: 

In every true work of art there is a place where, for one who removes there, it blows 
cool like the wind of a coming dawn. From this it follows that art, which has often 
been considered refractory to every relation with progress, can provide its true 
definition. Progress has its seat not in the continuity of elapsing time but in its 
interferences. (N9a,7) 

In this sense, it may even be possible to save that problematic definition from the first 
expose, according to which in the dialectical image the mythical, £/r-historical experiences 
of the collective unconscious "engender, through interpenetration with what is new, the 
Utopia" — and that Utopia "has left its trace in a thousand configurations of life, from 
enduring edifices to passing fashions" (section I). Benjamin devised his dialectic at a 
standstill in order to make such traces visible, to collect the "trash of history," and to 
"redeem" them for its end. He undertook the equally paradoxical and astonishing task of 
presenting history in the spirit of an anti-evolutionary understanding of history. As a 
"messianic cessation of the event," it would have devolved upon the dialectic at a stand- 
still to bring home in the Passagen-Werk the very insight Benjamin had long assimilated 
when he began that project: "the profane . . . although not itself a category of this [messi- 
anic] Kingdom, is at least a category, and one of the most applicable, of its quietest 
approach." 29 Benjamin's concept of profane illumination would remain "illuminated" in 
this way to the end; his materialist inspiration would be "inspired" in the same way, and 
his materialism would prove theological in the same way, despite all "recasting processes." 
Benjamin's historical materialism was historically true only as the puppet, "wliich enlists 
the services of theology." Nevertheless, it was supposed to "win" (Illuminations, p. 253). 
One can be excused for doubting whether this intricate claim could ever be honored. In 
that case, the reader, who has patiently followed the topography of the Passagen-Werk, 
including all the detours and cul-de-sacs this edition does not veil, may think he is, in the 
end, faced with ruins rather than with virginal building materials. What Benjamin wrote 
about German l'rauerspiel however, holds true for the Passagen-Werk: namely, that "in the 
ruins of great buildings the idea of the plan speaks more impressively than in lesser 
buildings, however well preserved they are" (l'rauerspiel, p. 235). 

—Translated by Gary Smith and Andre Lefevere 



The Story of Old Benjamin 



By Lisa Fittko 



This account was written in English, in November 1980, by Lisa Fittko, who accompanied Benjamin 
across the Pyrenees to the French-Spanish border at die end of September 1940 (and who later 
settled in the United States). It is printed in English in Gesammelte Schriften, vol. 5 (Frankfurt: 
Suhrkamp, 1982), pp. 1184-1194, with supplementary material (letters) relating mainly to the un- 
solved mystery of the "large black briefcase" which Benjamin was carrying. Included (p. 1203) is 
Benjamin's last letter, dated Port-Bou, September 25, 1940, and addressed both to Henny Gurland, 
who was with him at the end (see Gershom Scholem, Walter Benjamin: The Story of a Friendship, 
trans. Harry Zohn [New York: Schocken, 1981], pp. 224-226), and to Theodor Adorno; it is in 
French, in a form reconstructed from memory by Heimy Gurland, who had felt it necessary to 
destroy the original: "In a situation presenting nowayout,I have no other choice but to make an end 
of it. It is in a small village in the Pyrenees, where no one knows me, that my life will come to a close 
[va s'achever}. 1 1 ask you to transmit my thoughts \jjense'es\ to my friend Adorno and to explain to him 
the situation in wliich I 6nd myself. Tliere is not enough time remaining for me to write all the letters 
I would like to write." 

This happened exactly f orty years ago. I finally have to keep my promise to write down 
the story. People keep saying: Just write it the way it was . , . 

I do remember everything that happened; I think I do. That is, I remember the facts. 
But can I re-live those days? Is it possible to step back and into those times when there was 
no time for remembering what normal life was like, those days when we adapted to chaos 
and struggled for survival . . . ? 

lite distance of the years — f orty of them — has put events for us into perspective, many 
believe. It seems to me, though, that this perspective, under the pretense of insight, easily 
turns into simple hindsight, reshaping what was. . . . How will my recollections stand up 
against this trap? 

And where do I start? 

September 25, 1940 
Port-Vendres (Pyrenees Onentales, France) 

I remember waking up in that narrow room under the roof where I had gone to sleep a 
few hours earlier. Someone was knocking at the door. It had to be the little girl from 
downstairs; I got out of bed and opened the door. But it wasn't the child. I rubbed my 
half-closed eyes. It was one of our friends, Walter Benjamin — one of the many who had 
poured into Marseilles when the Germans overran France. Old Benjamin, as I usually 
referred to him, I am not sure why — he was about forty-eight. Now, how did he get here? 

"Gnadige Fran" he said, "please accept my apologies for this inconvenience." The 
world was coming apart, I thought, but not Benjamin's politesse. "Iltr Herr Gemahl" he 



continued, "told me how to Slid you. He said you would take me across the border into 
Spain." He said what? Oh well, yes, "mein Hen Gemahl" — my husband — would say that. 
He would assume that I could do it, whatever "it" might be. 

Benjamin was still standing in the open door because there was no room for a second 
person between the bed and the wall. Quickly I told him to wait for me in the bistro on 
the village square. 

From the bistro, we went for a walk so that we could talk without being overheard. My 
husband had no way of knowing, I explained, but since my arrival here at the border 
region last week I had found a safe way to cross the frontier. I had started by going down 
to the port and chatting with some of the longshoremen. One of them led me to the union 
steward, who in turn directed me to Monsieur Azema, the mayor of the next village, 
Banyuls-sur-Mer: the man, I had been told back in Marseilles, who would help me find a 
safe road for those of our family and friends who were ready to cross over. An old 
socialist, he was among those who had aided the Spanish republic by passing desperately 
needed doctors, nurses, and medicine across the border during the Spanish civil war. 

What a great person, this Mayor Azema, I went on to tell Benjamin. He had spent 
hours with me working out every detail. Unfortunately, the famous road along the 
cemetery walls of Cerberes was closed. It had been quite easy, and a good number of 
refugees had used it for a few months, but now it was heavily guarded by the Gardes 
Mobiles. On orders of the German Commission, no doubt. The only truly safe crossing 
that was left, according to the mayor, was "la route Lister. "* "That meant that we had to 
cross the Pyrenees farther west, at a greater altitude; it meant more climbing. 

"That will be all right," Benjamin said, "as long as it is safe. I do have a heart condi- 
tion," he continued, "and I will have to walk slowly. Also, there are two more persons who 
joined me on my trip from Marseilles and who also need to cross the border, a Mrs. 
Gurland and her teenage son. Would you take them along?" 

Sure, sure. "But Mr. Benjamin, do you realize that I am not a competent guide in this 
region? I don't really know that road, I have never been up that way myself. I have a piece 
of paper on which the mayor penciled a map of the route from his memory, and then he 
described to me some details of turns to be taken, a hut on the left, a plateau with seven 
pine trees which has to remain to our right or we will end up too far north; the vineyard 
that leads to the ridge at the right point. You want to take the risk?" 

"Yes," he said without hesitation. "The real risk would be not to go." 

Glancing at him, I remembered that this was not Benjamin's first attempt to get out of the 
trap. Impossible for anyone who knew about his former try to forget it. The apocalyptic 
atmosphere in Marseilles in 1940 produced its daily absurd story of attempted escape: 
plans around fantasy boats and fable captains, visas for countries unknown to Atlas, and 
passports from countries that had ceased to exist. One had become accustomed to learn- 
ing through the Daily Grapevine which foolproof plan had suffered today the fate of a 
House of Cards. We still were able to laugh — we had to laugh — at the comic side of some 
of these tragedies. The laughter was irresistible when Dr. Fritz Fraenkel, with frail body 
and gray mane, and his friend Walter Benjamin, with his sensitive scholar's head and 
pensive eyes behind thick glasses, were, through bribery, smuggled on a freighter, dressed 
up as French sailors. They didn't get very far. 

Luckily, they did get away, though, due to the generalized state of confusion. 

We agreed that we would try to see Mayor Azema once more, this time together, so that 
we could both memorize every detail. I notified my sister-in-law — she, the baby, and I 

* General Lister of the Spanish Republican Army had led his troops along that route. 



were going to cross the border and go to Portugal the next week — and I went to Banyuls 
widi Benjamin. 

Here I have a lapse of memory. Did we dare to take die train in spite of the constant 
border checks'. 3 1 doubt it. We must have walked the six or eight kilometers from Port-Ven- 
dres on the rocky path which by now was familiar to me. I do remember finding the 
mayor in his office, how he locked die door and then repeated liis instructions and 
answered our questions. 

Two days before, alter he had drawn the sketch of the road for me, he and I had 
stepped to die window and he had pointed out the directions, the far-away plateau with 
the seven pine trees, and somewhere high up there the crest which we would have to 
cross. "On paper, it looked like an easy walk," I had said, "but it seems that we have to 
cross die high Pyrenees. . . ?" He had laughed; "That's where Spain is, on the other side 
of the mountains." 

He now suggested that we take a walk this afternoon and do die first part of the route 
to test whether we would find our way. "You go up to this clearing here," he said pointing 
it out on his sketch. "Then you return and check it out with me. You spend the night at the 
inn and tomorrow morning around fi ve o'clock, while it is still dark and our people go up 
to their vineyards, you star t out again and go all the way to the Spanish border." Benjamin 
asked how far it was to the clearing. "Less than an hour . . . well, certainly not more than 
two hours. Just a nice walk." We shook hands. "Je vmis reinercie injiniment, Monsieur- le 
Maire," I heard Benjamin say. I can still hear his voice. 

We got his companions who had been waiting at the inn and explained our plan. They 
seemed to be cooperative, not the complaining kind that I dreaded so much in ticklish 
situations. We walked slowly, like tourists enjoying the scenery. I noticed that Benjamin 
was carrying a large black briefcase which he must have picked up when we had stopped 
at the inn. It looked heavy and I offered to help him carry it. "This is my new manu- 
script," he explained. "But why did you take it for this walk?" "You must understand that 
this briefcase is the most important thing to me," he said. "1 carmot risk losing it. It is the 
manuscript that must be saved. It is more important than I am." 

This expedition won't be easy, I thought. Walter Benjamin and his puzzling ways. 
That's just what he is like. When trying to pass for a sailor in the port of Marseilles, had 
he toted the briefcase? But I better keep my mind on the road, I said to myself, and try to 
figure out Azema's directions on the little map. 

Here was the empty shed the mayor had mentioned, so we weren't lost . . . not yet. 
Then we found the path with a slight turn to the left. And the huge rock he had described. 
A clearing! That must be it. We had made it, alter almost three hours. 

This was about one third of die total route, according to Azema. I don't remember it as 
being difficult. We sat down and rested for a while. Benjamin stretched out on the grass 
and closed his eyes, and I thought it must have been tiring for him. 

We were ready to start the descent, but he didn't get up. "Are you all right?" I asked. 

"I am fine," he answered, "you three go ahead." 

"And you?" 

"I am staying here. I am going to spend the night here, and you will join me in the 
morning." 

This was worse than I had expected. What do I do now? All I can do is try and reason 
with him. This was wild mountain territory, there could be dangerous animals. As a 
matter of fact, I knew that diere were wild bulls. It was late September and he had nothing 
with which to cover himself. There were smugglers around, and who knew what they 
might do to him. He would have nothing to eat or drink. Anyhow, this was insane. 



He said that his decision to spend the night at the clearing was unshakable since it was 
based on simple reasoning. The goal was to cross the border so that he and his manuscript 
would not fall into the hands of the Gestapo. He had reached one third of this goal. If he 
had to return to the village and then do the entire way again tomorrow, his heart would 
probably give out. Ergo, he would stay. 

I sat down again and said: "Then I too will stay." 

He smiled. "Will you defend me against your wild bulls, giiddige FrauV 
My staying would not be reasonable, he explained quietly. It was essential that I check 
back with Azema and that I get a good night's sleep. Only then would I be able to guide 
the Gurlands back before sunrise without possible error or delay, and continue to the 
border. 

Of course, I knew all that. Above all, I had to get hold of some bread without ration 
stamps, and perhaps some tomatoes and black-market ersatz marmalade, to keep us going 
during the day. I think I had only tried to shock Benjamin into abandoning his plan, but 
of course it hadn't worked. 

On the descent, I tried to concentrate on the road so that I would be able to find my way 
in the dark the next morning. But my mind kept nagging: he shouldn't be up there alone, 
this is all wrong. . . . Had he planned it this way all along? Or had the walk exhausted him 
so much that he had decided to stay only after we arrived? But there was this heavy 
briefcase that he had taken along. Were his survival instincts intact? If in danger, what 
would his peculiar way of reasoning tell him to do? 

During the winter, before France's surrender, my husband and Benjamin had been 
together in one of the camps where the French government imprisoned the refugees from 
Nazi Germany — together with the Nazis. They were at the Camp de Vernuche, close to 
Nevers. In one of their conversations Benjamin, a heavy smoker, revealed that he had quit 
smoking a few days ago. It was painfi.il, he added. "Wrong timing," Hans told him. Seeing 
Benjamin's inability to handle "the adversities of outer life which sometimes come . . . like 
wolves" 1 — at Vernuche all of life was adversity — Hans had become used to helping him 
cope. 

He now tried to show Benjamin that in order to tolerate crises and keep one's sanity, 
the fundamental rule was to look f or gratifications, not punisliments. Benjamin answered, 
"I can bear the conditions in the camp only if I am forced to immerse my mind totally in 
an effort. To quit smoking requires this effort, and it will therefore save me." 

The next morning everything seemed to be going well. The danger of being seen by the 
police or customs guards was greatest when leaving the village and starting up the foot- 
hills. Azema had insisted: start out before sunrise, mingle with the vineyard workers on 
your way up, don't carry anything except a musette, don't talk. That way the patrols can't 
distinguish you from the villagers. Mrs. Gurland and her young son, to whom I had 
explained these rules, carefully followed them, and I had no trouble finding the way. 

The closer we came to the clearing, the more tense I grew. Will Benjamin be there? 
Will he be alive? My imagination started turning like a kaleidoscope. 

Finally. Here is the clearing. Here is old Benjamin. Alive. He sits up and gives us a 
friendly look. Then I stare at his face — what has happened? Those dark purple blotches 
under his eyes — could they be a symptom of a heart attack? 

He guessed why I stared. Taking off his glasses and wiping his face with a handker- 



chief, he said: "Oh that. The morning dew, you know. The pads inside the frames, see? 
llrey stain when they get damp." 

My heart stopped beating in my throat and slipped back down to where it belonged. 

From here on, the ascent was steeper. Also, we began to be repeatedly in doubt about 
which direction to take. To my surprise Benjamin was quite able to understand our little 
map, and to help me keep our orientation and stick to the right road. 

The word "road" became more and more symbolic. There were stretches of a path, but 
more often it became a hardly discernible trail among boulders — and then the steep 
vineyard which I will never forget. 

But first I have to explain what made this route so safe. 

Following the initial descent, the path ran parallel to the widely known "official" road 
along the crest of the mountain chain, which was quite passable. "Our" road — the Route 
Lister and an old, old smugglers' path — ran below and somewhat tucked inside the 
overhang of the crest, out of the sight of the French border guards patrolling above. At a 
few points the two roads approached each other closely, and there we had to keep silent. 

Benjamin walked slowly and with an even measure. At regular intervals — I believe it 
was ten minutes — he stopped and rested for about one minute. Then he went on, at the 
same steady pace. He had calculated and worked this out during the night, he told me: 
"With this timing I will be able to make it to the end. I rest at regular intervals — I must 
rest before I become exhausted. Never spend yourself." 

What a strange man. A crystal-clear mind; unbending inner strength; yet, a wooly- 
headed bungler. 

The nature of his strength, Walter Benjamin once wrote, is "patience, conquerable by 
nothing." 2 Reading this years later, I saw him again walking slowly, evenly along the 
mountain path, and the contradictions within him lost some of their absurdity. 

Mrs. Gurland's son, Jose — he was about fifteen years old — and I took turns carrying the 
black bag; it was awfully heavy. But, I recall, we all showed good spirits. There was some 
easy, casual conversation, turning mostly around the needs of the moment. But mainly, 
we were quiet, watching the road. 

Today, when Walter Benjamin is considered one of the centuiy's leading scholars and 
critics — today I am sometimes asked: What did he say about the manuscript? Did he 
discuss the contents? Did it develop a novel philosophical concept? 

Good God, I had my hands full steering my little group uphill; philosophy would have 
to wait till the downward side of the mountain was reached. What mattered now was to 
save a few people from the Nazis; and here I was with this — this — komischer Kaia, ce drole 
de type — this curious eccentric. Old Benjamin: under no circumstances would he part with 
his ballast, that black bag; we would have to drag the monster across the mountains. 

Now back to the steep vineyard. There was no path. We climbed between the vinestalks, 
heavy with the almost ripe, dark and sweet Banyuls grapes . I remember it as an almost 
vertical incline; but such memories sometimes distort the geometry. Here, f or the first and 
only time, Benjamin faltered. More precisely, he tried, failed, and then gave formal notice 
that this climb was beyond his capability. Jose and I took him between us; with his arms 
on our shoulders, we dragged him and the bag up the hill. He breathed heavily, yet he 
made no complaint, not even a sigh. He only kept squinting in the direction of the black 
bag. 



After the vineyard, we rested on a narrow hillside — the same plateau where we met our 
Greek a few weeks later. But that is another story. The sun had climbed high enough to 
warm us, so it must have been about four to five hours since we had started out. We 
nibbled on the food I had brought in my musette, but nobody ate much. Our stomachs had 
shrunk during the last months — first the concentration camps, then the chaotic retreat — 
la pagaille, or The Total Chaos. A nation on the run, moving south; at our backs the 
empty villages and ghost towns — lifeless, soundless, till the rattling of the German tanks 
gulped up the stillness. But, again, that is another story, a very long one. 

While we rested, I thought that this road across the mountains had turned out to be 
longer and more difficult than we could have guessed from die mayor's description. On 
the other hand, if one were familiar with the terrain and didn't carry anything, and were 
in good shape, it might really take considerably less time. Like all mountain people, 
Monsieur Azema's ideas of distance and time were elastic. How many hours were "a few 
hours" to him? 

During the following winter months, when we did this border crossing sometimes 
twice or even three times a week, I often thought of Benjamin's self -discipline. I thought of 
it when Mrs. R. started whining in the middle of the mountains: "... don't you have an 
apple for me . . .1 want an apple . . .,* and when Fraulein Mueller had a sudden fit of 
screaming ("acro-dementia," we called it) ; and when Dr. H. valued his fur coat more than 
his safety (and ours). But these again are different stories. 

Right now I was sitting somewhere high up in the Pyrenees, eating a piece of bread 
obtained with sham ration tickets, and Benjamin was requesting the tomatoes: "With 
your kind permission, may I . . . ?" Good old Benjamin and his Castilian court ceremony. 

Suddenly, I realized that what I had been gazing at drowsily was a skeleton, sun 
bleached. Perhaps a goat? Above us, in the southern blue sky, two large black birds 
circled. Must be vultures — I wonder what they expect from us. . . . How strange, I 
thought; the usual me would not be so phlegmatic about skeletons and vultures. 

We gathered ourselves up and began trudging on. The road now became reasonably 
straight, ascending only slightly. Still, it was bumpy and, for Benjamin, it must have been 
strenuous. He had been on his feet since seven o'clock, after all. His pace slowed down 
some more and he paused a little linger, but always in regular intervals, checking his 
watch. He seemed to be quite absorbed by the job of timing himself. 

Then we reached the peak. I had gone ahead and stopped to look around. The view came 
on so sudden, for a moment it struck me like a. fata morgana. D«wn there below, from 
where we had come, the Mediterranean reappeared. On the other side, ahead, steep 
cliffs — another sea? But of course, the Spanish coast. Two worlds of blueness. In our back, 
to the north, Catalonia's Roussillon country. Deep down Lm Cote Veimeille, the autumn 
earth in a hundred shades of Vermillion. I gasped: never had I seen anything so beautiful. 

I knew that we were now in Spain, and that from here on the road would run straight 
until the descent into the town. I knew that now I had to turn back. The others had 
the necessary papers and visas, but I could not risk being caught on Spanish soil. But, 
no, I could not yet leave this group to themselves, not quite yet. Just another short 
stretch . . . 

Putting down on paper the details which my memory brings back about this first time I 
crossed the border on the Route Lister, a nebulous picture surfaces from wherever it has 
been buried all these years. Three women — two of them I know vaguely — crossing our 



road; through a haze, I see us standing there and talking for a short while. They had come 
up a different road, and they then continued their way down to the Spanish side sepa- 
rately. The encounter did not particularly surprise or impress me, since so many people 
were trying to escape over die mountains. 

We passed a puddle. The water was greenish slimy and stank. Benjamin knelt down to 
drink. 

'You can't drink this water," I said, "it is filthy and surely contaminated." The water- 
bottle I had taken along was empty by now, but thus far he hadn't mentioned that he was 
thirsty. 

"I do apologize," Benjamin said, "but I have no choice. If I do not drink, I might not be 
able to continue to the end." He bent his head down towards the puddle. 

"Listen to me," I said. "Will you please hold it for a moment and listen to me? We have 
almost arrived; just a short while and you have made it. I know you can make it. But to 
drink this mud is unthinkable. You will get typhus . . ." 

"True, I might. But don't you see, the worst that can happen is that I die of typhus . . . 
AFTER crossing the border. The Gestapo won't be able to get me, and the manuscript 
will be safe. I do apologize." 

He drank. 

The road was now running gently downhill. It must have been about two o'clock in 
the afternoon when the rocky wall gave way, and in the valley I saw the village, very 
close. 

"That is Port-Bou down there! The town with the Spanish border control where you 
will present yourselves. This street leads straight down. A real road!" 

Two o'clock. We had started out at five in the morning, Benjamin at seven. A total of 
almost nine hours. 

"I have to go back now," I continued. "We are in Spain — we have been in Spain for 
almost an hour. The descent won't take long; it's so close that you can see every house 
from here. You will go directly to the border post and show your documents: the travel 
papers, the Spanish and Portuguese transit visas. When you have your entry stamp, you 
take the next train to Lisbon. But you know all that. ... I must go now, auf Wieder- 
sehen . . ." 

For a moment, my eyes followed them as they were walking down the road. It's time 
now for me to get out of here, I thought, and started to walk back. I walked on and felt: 
This isn't alien country any more, I am no stranger here, as I was only this morning. It 
also surprised me that I was not tired. Everything felt light, I was weightless and so was 
the rest of the world. Benjamin and his companions must have made it by now. How 
beautiful it was up here! 

Within two hours I was back down in Banyuls. Nine hours uphill, two hours down. 

During the following months, by the time we were able to find our way blindfolded, we 
once made it up to the border in two hours, and a few times in three to four hours. That 
was when our "freight" was young, strong, in good form and, above all, disciplined. I 
have never seen these people again, but from time to time a name comes up and suddenly 
something clicks. Henry Pachter, historian: Heinz and liis friend, all-time record two 
hours. Or Prof. Albert Hirschman, economist at Princeton: young Hennant. I was criti- 
cally ill when he came down to the border. He pressured a French hospital into admitting 
me, then crossed over, guided by my husband, in about three hours. I will write that story 
down another time. 



For aJl that came later, Ilien, back in Banyuls, after my first trip on the Lister route, I 
thought: Good old Benjamin and his manuscript are safe, on the other side of the 
mountains. 

In about a week the word came: Walter Benjamin is dead. He took his life in Port-Bou the 
night af ter his arrival. 

The Spanish border authorities had informed the group that they would be returned to 
France. New orders, just received from Madrid: Nobody can enter Spain without the 
French exit visa. (Several different versions* exist of the reason Spain gave this time for 
closing the border: apatrides^ may not travel through Spain; or Spanish transit visas issued 
in Marseilles were invalid.) Whatever the new directive was, it was lifted soon. Had there 
been time for the news to reach the French side of the frontier, crossings would have been 
halted while watching developments. We were living in the "Age of New Directives"; 
every governmental office in every country of Europe seemed to devote full time to 
decreeing, revoking, enacting, and then lifting orders and regxilations. You just had to 
leam to slip through holes, to turn, to wind, and to wriggle your way out of this ever- 
changing maze, if you wanted to survive. 

But Benjamin was not a wriggler . . . 

". . .Jautse debrouiller": one has to cut through the fog, work one's way out of the 
general collapse — -that had become the only possible way of life in France. To most, it 
meant things like buying forged bread tickets or extra milk for the kids or obtaining some 
kind, any kind of permit; in other words, to get something that didn't officially exist. To 
some, it also meant to get such things by "collaborating." For us, the apatrides, it was 
primarily a matter of staying out of concentration camps and escaping from the Gestapo. 

But Benjamin was no debroidllard . . . 

In liis remoteness, what counted was that his manuscript and he were out of the reach 
of the Gestapo. The crossing had exhausted him and he didn't believe that he could do it 
again— he had told me so during our climb. Here, too, he had calculated everything in 
advance: he had enough morphine on him to take his life several times over. 

Impressed and shaken by his death, the Spanish authorities let his companions con- 
tinue their travel. 

July 1980 

During a recent conversation with Professor Abrarnsky from London, we talked about 
Walter Benjamin and his work, and I mentioned his last walk. 

Tben I got a call from Professor Gershom Scholem, a trustee of Benjamin's literary 
estate and his closest friend. He had heard from Abranisky about our conversation and 
wanted to know more. I gave him a summarized description of the events on that day 
almost forty years ago. 

He asked for every detail concerning the manuscript: 

"There is no manuscript," he said. "Until now, nobody knew that such a manuscript 
ever existed." 

I am hearing: there is no manuscript. Nobody knows about the heavy black briefcase 
carrying the papers that were more important to him than anything else. 

* see F. V. Grunfeld, Hannah Arendt, G. Scholem et al. 

t Stateless persons, literally "People without Fatherland"-official French term for refugees from 
Nazi Germany whose citizenship had been taken away by the Nazi government. 



Haimali Arendt has written about the "little hunchback"* whose threat Benjamin felt 
throughout his life and against whom he took all precautions. Benjamin's "system of pro- 
visions against possible danger . . . invariably disregarded the real danger," she says. 3 

But it seems to me now that the "real danger" was not disregarded by Walter Benjamin 
during that night in Port-Bou; it was just that his real danger, his reality, differed from 
ours. He must have met again the little hunchback in Port-Bou ... his very own, the 
Benjamin hunchback, and he had to come to terms with him. 

Perhaps I will go to Port-Bou and try to pick up some tracks, to retrace what happened 
on that side of the mountains forty years ago, with the help of some of our old friends 
down there. 

Perhaps there will be another ending to this story. 



* A German fairy-tale figure who causes all of life's misfortunes; he trips you, he breaks your 
favorite toy, he spills your soup. 



Translators' Notes 



Abbreviations 

GS Walter Benjamin, Gesammelte Schriften, 7 vols. (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1972-1989). 

J.L. Jean Lacoste, translator of the Passagen-Werk into French: Para, capitate du XLY' si'ecle 
(Paris: Editions du Cerf, 1989). 

R.T. Rolf Tiedemann, editor of the Passagen-Werk, GS, vol. 5 (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1982). 

SW Walter Benjamin, Selected Writings. Volume 1: 1913-1926 (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard 
University Press, 1996). Volume 2: 1927-1934 (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University 
Press, 1999). 

Previously published translations have been modified, where necessary, to accord with the passages 
cited by Benjamin. 



Expose of 1935 

This synopsis of 77;e Arcades Project, titled "Paris, die Hauptstadt des XIX. Jahrhunderts" 
{GS, vol. 5, pp. 45-59), was written by Benjamin in May 1935 at the request of Friedrich 
Pollock, codirector of the Institute of Social Research in New York. It was first published 
in Walter Benjamin, Schriften, 2 vols. (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1955). The translators are 
indebted to the previous English translations by Quintin Hoare (1968) and Edmund 
Jephcott (1978). 

1. The magasin de nouveaides offered a complete selection of goods in one or another 
specialized line of business; it had many rooms and several stories, with a large staff 
of employees. The first such store, Pygmalion, opened in Paris in 1793. The word 
nouveaide means "newness" or "novelty"; in the plural, it means "fancy goods." 

2. Honore de Balzac, "Histoire et physiolgie des boulevards de Paris," in George Sand, 
Honore de Balzac, Eugene Sue, et al., Le Diable d Paiis, vol. 2 (Paris, 1846), p. 91. 
[R.T] See Al,4 in the Convolutes. 

3. Karl Boetticher, "Das Prinzip der Hellenischen und Germanischen Bauweise bin- 
sichtlich der Obertragung in die Bauweise unserer Tage" (address of March 13, 
1846), in Z um hundertjahrigen Geburtstag Karl Bottichers (Berlin, 1906), p. 46. [R.T] 
See F 1 , 1 in the Convolutes. 

4. Sigfried Giedion, Batten in Frankreich (Leipzig, 1928), p. 3. [R.T] 

5. Paul Scheerbart, Glasarcldtektur (Berlin, 1914). [R.T] In English, Glass Architecture, 
trans. James Palmes (New York: Praeger, 1972). 



6. Jules Michelet, "Avenir! Avenir!" Europe, 19, no. 73 (January 15, 1929): 6. [R.T.] 

7. See Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Die deutsche Ideologic (The German Ideology), 
part 2; in English in Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 5, trans. C. P. Magill 
(New York: International Publishers, 1976). The passage in question is on pp. 513— 
514. 

8. Seejean Paul, "Levana, oder Erziehungslehre" (1807); in English, "Levana, or Doc- 
trine of Education," trans. Erika Casey, in Jean Paul: A Reader (Baltimore: Jolms 
Hopkins University Press, 1992), pp. 269-274. 

9. A.J. Wiertz, "La Photographie," in Wiertz, Oeuvres litteraires (Paris, 1870), pp. 309IF. 
[R.T.] See Yl,l in the Convolutes. 

10. Ferdinand Langle and Emile Vanderburch, Louis-Bronze et le Saint-Simonien: Parodie 
de Loids XI (Theatre du Palais-Royal, February 27, 1832), cited in Theodore Muret, 
L'Histoire par le theatre, 178.9-1851 (Paris, 1865), vol. 3, p. 191. 

11. Actually, it was Ernest Renan; see G4,5 and G13a,3 in the Convolutes. 

12. Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der franzdsischen Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 
1864), vol. 4, p. 52. [R.T.] 

13. Marx, Das Kapital, vol. 1 (1867); in English, Capital trans. Samuel Moore and Ed- 
ward Aveling (1887; rpt. New York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 76. 

14. Giacomo Leopardi, "Dialogo della moda e della morte" (1827); in English in Leop- 
arili, Essays and Dialogues, trans. Giovanni Cecchetti (Berkeley: University of Califor- 
nia Press, 1982), p. 67. 

15. Charles Baudelaire, "A Martyr," in Baudelaire, Flowers of Evil, trans. Wallace Fowlie 
(1964; rpt. New York: Dover, 1992), p. 85. 

16. Baudelaire, "The Swan," ibid., p. 75. 

17. Virgil, The Aeneid, trans. Allen Mandelbaum (New York: Bantam, 1971), p. 137 
(book 6, line 126). Benjamin cites the Latin. 

18. "The Voyage," in Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du null, trans. Richard Howard (Boston: 
Godine, 1982), pp. 156-157. 

19. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, ed. Claude Pichois (Paris, 1976), vol. 2, p. 27. [R.T.] 
Idem, "Pierre Dupont," in Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and 
Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. (University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), 
p. 53. 

20. Confession d'un lion devenu vieux [Confession of a Lion Grown Old] (Paris, 1888), 4 
pp., was published anonymously, without year or place, by Baron Haussmann. [R.T.] 

21. For Lafargue's comparison, see 04,1 in the Convolutes. [R.T.] 

22. Maxime Du Camp, Paris: Ses organes, ses fonctions et sa vie dans la seconde moitie du 
XIX C siecle, 6 vols, (Paris, 1869-1875). [R.T.] See Walter Benjamin, Charles Baude- 
laire: Ein Lyriker im ^eitalter des Hochkapitalismus , in GS, vol. 1, pp. 589-590; in 
English, Charles Baudelaire: A Lync Poet in the Era oj High Capitalism, trans. Harry 
Zohn (London: Verso, 1976), pp. 85-86. 

23. Anonymous, Paris desert: Lamentations d'un Jeremie haussmannue [Deserted Paris: 
Jeremiads of a Man Haussmannized] (Paris, 1868). [R.T.] 

24. Engels' critique of barricade tactics is excerpted in Ela,5 in the Convolutes, [R.T.] 

25. The verse derives from Pierre Dupont; see a7,3 in the Convolutes. [R.T.] 

26. Frederic Le Play, Les Ouvriers europeens: Etudes sur les travaux, la vie domestique et la 
condition morale des populations ouvrieres de VEurope, precedees d'un expose de la methode 
d 'observation (Paris, 1855). [R.T.] 

27. See p. 24 and note 22 of the Expose of 1939. 

28. See C2a,8 in the Convolutes. 



Expose of 1939 

The second expose, "Paris, Capitale du XIX emc siecle" (Gesammelte Schriften, vol. 5, 
pp. 60-77), was written by Benjamin in March 1939, in French, at the request of Max 
Horkheimer, who was attempting to enlist a New York banker named Frank Altschul as a 
backer for Tlte Arcades Project. For this expose, Benjamin added a theoretical Introduction 
and Conclusion. In reformulating his German expose in French, he made a number of 
significant changes, particularly with regard to Fourier (A, II), Louis Philippe (C, II and 
III), and Baudelaire (D, Hand III), while dropping much factual material. See his letter to 
Horkheimer of March 13, 1939, in GS, vol. 5, p. 1171. In our translation of the second 
expose, we have tried to reproduce the of ten subtle divergences from the wording of the 
first, as well as the numerous verbal parallels (where it is a question of translating a 
translation). 

1. See Sla,2 in the Convolutes. The formula does not appear in Schopenhauer. [R.T.] 

2. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Die heilige Familie (1845); in English, The Holy 
Family, trans. Richard Dixon and Clemens Dutt, in Marx and Engels, Collected Works, 
vol. 4 (New York: International Publishers, 1975), p. 81. 

3. Charles Fourier, Theorie des quatre mouvements et des destinies generates (1808); in 
English in Fourier, The Theory of the Four Movements, trans. Ian Patterson (Cambridge: 
Cambridge University Press, 1996), p. 22. 

4. Tony Moilin, Paris en Van 2000 [Paris in the Year 2000] (Paris, 1869). See C5a,3 in the 
Convolutes. 

5. Marx and Engels, Werke (Berlin: Dietz, 1969-), vol. 3, p. 502: "die kolossalische 
Anschauung der Menschen." 

6. Actually, it was Ernest Renan; see G4,5 and G13a,3 in the Convolutes. 

7. Sigmund Englander, Geschichte der franxasisdien Arbeiter-Associationen (Hamburg, 
1864), vol. 4, p. 52. [R.T.] 

8. Marx, Das Kapital, vol. 1 (1867); in English, Capital, trans. Samuel Moore and 
Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 76. 

9. Alphonse Toussenel, Le Monde des oiseaux: Onuthologie fxissionnelle , vol. 1 (Paris, 
1853), p. 20. See W8a,2 in the Convolutes. 

10. Giacomo Leopardi, "Dialogo della moda e della morte" (1827); in English in Leop- 
ardi, Efsays and Dialogues, trans. Giovanni Cecchetti (Berkeley: University of Califor- 
nia Press, 1982), p. 67. 

11. Guillaume Apollinaire, Le Poete assassine (1916); in English in Apollinaire, "The Poet 
Assassinated" and Other Stories, trans. Ron Padgett (San Francisco: North Point Press, 
1984), p. 46. 

12. Charles Baudelaire, " A Martyr," in Baudelaire, Flowers of Evil, trans. Wallace Fowlie 
(1964; rpt. New York: Dover, 1992), p. 85. 

13. Friedrich Nietzsche, Thus Spoke J^arathustra (1891), trans. R.J. Hollingdale (Balti- 
more: Penguin, 1961), p. 286. "Affliction" translates Heimsuclmng. 

14. Marcel Proust, Du Cote de chez Swann (Swann's Way, 1913); in English in Proust, 
Remembrance of Tlangs Past, vol. 1, trans, C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New "&rk: Random 
House, 1925), p. 179. The expression faire catleya ("doing a cattleya") is Swann's 
euphemism for making love. 

15. Reference is to the conclusion of Henrik Ibsen's play The Master Builder (1892). 
Throughout this section, in the original French, Benjamin uses the standard term 
modern style (in quotation marks) to refer to Jugendstil. 

16. Baudelaire, "The Swan," in The Complete Verse, trans. Francis Scarfe (London: Anvil 
Press, 1986), p. 176. 



17. "The Seven Old Men," in Baudelaire, Flowers of Evil (New "fork: Harper and Broth- 
ers, 1936), p. 185 (trans. Edna St. Vincent Millay). 

18. "The Voyage," in Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mat, trans. Richard Howard (Boston: 
Godine, 1982), pp. 156-157. 

19. Ibid., p. 156. 

20. Spleen came into French in 1745, from English; ideal in 1578, from Latin (idealis). 

21. Confession d'un lion devenu vieux [Confession of a Lion Grown Old] (Paris, 1888), 4 
pp., was published anonymously, without year or place, by Baron Haussmann. [R.T.] 

22. Apparently, a correction of the earlier expose (see p. 13). 

23. Louis-Auguste Blanqui, Instructions pour une Prise d'Armes: L'Eternite par les astres — 
Hypothese astronomique (Paris: Societe Encyclopedique Franchise, 1972), pp. 167-169. 
See D7; D7a. Benjamin first came upon this text by Blanqui at the end of 1937. 

Convolutes 

The central portion of the manuscript of "The Arcades Project (GS, vol. 5, pp. 79-989) 
consists of 426 loose sheets of yellowish paper, each folded in half to form a 14 X 22 cm. 
folio, of which sides 1 and 3 are inscribed in Benjamin's tiny handwriting, with sides 2 and 
4 left blank. These folios are gathered into thirty-six sheafs (the German word Konvolut 
means "sheaf" or "bundle") in accordance with a set of themes keyed to the letters of the 
alphabet. The titles of the convolutes, as well as the numbering of the individual entries, 
derive from Benjamin. In regard to the ordering, the use of lowercase a (as in "Ala,l") 
denotes the third page of a folio. The letters without coiresponding titles in the Overview 
may indicate that Benjamin planned further convolutes. 

In addition to Benjamin's cross-references (signaled with small squares) to rubrics of 
different convolutes, or to rubrics without convolutes, many of the citations and reflec- 
tions in the manuscript are marked with a system of thirty-two assorted symbols (squares, 
triangles, circles, vertical and horizontal crosses — in various inks and colors), which do 
not appear in the published text. The symbols are linked to papers that Benjamin en- 
trusted to Georges Bataille and that were discovered in the Bataille archive of the Bib- 
liotheque Nationale in 1981. These papers contain a detailed plan for the Baudelaire book 
on which Benjamin was working in 1937-1938; the encoded items from the convolutes 
(more than 60 percent from Convolute j) are grouped there under a set of headings 
representing themes of the Baudelaire book as a whole. About half of the material was 
then further organized for the composition of the 1938 essay "Das Paris des Second 
Empire bei Baudelaire" (Tbe Paris of the Second Empire in Baudelaire). 

'Die convolutes were composed concurrently (rather than consecutively) in two stages: 
from the fall or winter of 1928 to the end of 1929, and from the beginning of 1934 until 
May 1940. The German editor of the Passagen-Werk, Rolf Tiedemann, provides a more 
specific dating of the entries on the basis of photocopies of manuscript pages made by 
Benjamin in June 1935 and December 1937 (GS, vol. 5, p. 1262). Within a particular 
convolute, the entries follow a roughly chronological order (some having been written 
earlier, then revised and transf erred to the manuscript of the convolutes). 

On the typographic differentiation between Benjamin's reflections and Benjamin's 
citations in the "Convolutes" section, see the Translators' Foreword. 

A [Arcades, Mugusins de Nouveuutes, Sales Clerks] 

1. Arthur Rimbaud, Complete Works and Selected Letters, trans. Wallace Fowlie (Chicago: 
University of Chicago Press, 1966), p. 254 (Illuminations, "Sale"). 



2. The Passage du Caire was the first glass-covered arcade in Paris outside the Palais- 
Royal. It opened in 1799, one year before the more luxurious Passage des Panoramas. 

3. Space in a stock exchange set apart for unofficial business. 

4. The Utopian Vision of Charles Fowier, ed. and trans. Jonathan Beecher and Richard 
Bienvenu (1971; rpt. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1983), pp. 242-244. 

5. Friedrich Engels, Tlie Condition of the Working Class in England, trans. Florence 
Wischnewetzky (1886; rpt. New York: Penguin, 1987), p. 74 ("The Great Towns"). 

6. Tlie Utopian Vision of Charles Fourier, p. 245. 

7. Ibid., pp. 242-245 (translation of sentences 2-4 added). 

8. The Egyptian campaign of Napoleon Bonaparte took place in 1798-1799. 

9. Heinrich Heine, Jewish Stories and Flebrew Melodies (New York: Markus Wiener, 
1987), p. 122 (trans. Hal Draper). "Her" refers to the poet's wife. 

10. Possibly a pun on epicier, "grocer." The final e in both epee arid scie'e has been sawed 
off; the sign is thus a typographical joke. 

11. One of three main divisions of Balzac's writings. 

12. From "Lutetia," Roman name for Paris. See CI, 6. 

13. G. K. Chesterton, Charles Dicliens (1906; rpt. New York: Schocken, 1965), pp. 119— 
120. Corresponding to the sixth sentence quoted here, the translation used by Ben- 
jamin has: "Chaque boutique, en fait, eveillait en lui l'idee d'line nouvelle." 

14. De la justice dans la Revolution et dans leglise (On Justice during the Revolution and in 
the Church) 3 volumes (1858). 

15. Charles Baudelaire, Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis 
E. Hyslop, Jr. (University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), p. 52. 
The reference is to Hugo's book of poems Les Orientales (1829). 

16. Balzac, Gaudissart tlie Great, trans. James Waring, in Balzac's Works (Philadelphia: 
Gebbie Publishing, 1899), vol. 1, p. 343. 

17. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, trans. Louise Varese (New York: New Directions, 1947), 
p. 60 ("The Generous Gambler"). 

18. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare" and Other Prose Writings, trans. Norman Cameron 
(1950; rpt. New York: Haskell House, 1975), p. 156 ("Fusees," no. 2). 



It [Fashion] 

1. Giacomo Leopardi, "Dialogo della moda et della morte" (1827); in English in Leop- 
ardi, Essays and Dialogues, trans. Giovanni Cecchetti (Berkeley: University of Califor- 
nia Press, 1962), p. 67. 

2. Rainer Maria Rilke, Duino Elegies, trans. J. B. Leisbman and Stephen Spender (New 
York: Norton, 1939), p. 53 (fifth elegy). 

3. Marginal annotation by Theodor W. Adonio: "I would think: counterrevolutions." 
[R.T.] 

4. Fan of Iris and 77ie Moon (a Self-Portrait) appear in Grandville's Un Autre Monde 
(1844); "the Milky Way ... as an avenue illuminated by gas candelabra" is doubtless 
an allusion to the plate entitled An Interplanetaiy Bridge. [R.T.] 

5. See Walter Benjamin, Ursprung des deutschen Trauerspiels, GS,vo\. 1, p. 294. [R.T.] In 
English, The Ongin of German Tragic Drama, trans. John Osborne (London: Verso, 
1977), p. 115. 

6. Guillaume Apollinaire, " The Poet Assassinated" and Other Stories, trans. Ron Padgett 
(San Francisco: North Point Press, 1984), pp. 45-47 (section 13). 



7. Andre Breton, Naijt, trans. Richard Howard (New York: Grove Weidenfeld, 1960), 
p. 152. 

8. See N3,2. [R.T.] 

9. Apollinaire, "file Poet Assassinated" and Other Stories, p. 46. 

10. La Muette de Portici (The Mute Girl of Portici), opera by D. F. E. Auber. A duet from 
this work, 'Amour sacre de la patrie," is said to have been used as a signal for the 
Revolution of 1830 in Brussels. 

11. A. E. Brehm (1829-1884), German zoologist, was the author of Tierleben (Life of 
Animals), 6 vols. (1864-1869). On Helen Grund, a friend of Franz Hessel, see the 
preface byJ.-M. Palmier to the French translation of Hessel's Spazieren in Berlin, 
entitled Promenades dans Berlin (Grenoble: Presses Universitaires de Grenoble, 1989), 
pp. 17ff. [J.L.] 

12. Paul Valery, "On Italian Art," in Degas, Manet, Moruot, trans. David Paul (1960; rpt. 
Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1989), pp. 220, 224-225. 

13. This passage does not appear in the English edition of von Jhering (also spelled 
"Ihering"), Law «.( a Means to an End, trans. Isaac Husik (New York: Macmillan, 
1921). 

14. Allusion to Louis Napoleon's coup d'etat of December 2, 1851. Both the Second of 
December and the crinoline represent the triumph of reactionism. 

15. Georg Simmel, "Fashion," trans, anonymous, International Quarterly, 10, no. 1 (Octo- 
ber 1904), p. 136. 

16. Ibid., p. 143, 

17. This passage does not appear in the 1904 English translation of "Die Mode." 

18. Simmel, "Fashion," p. 133. 

19. Ibid., p. 151. 

20. Valery, "About Corot," in Degas, Manet, Morisot, p. 150. 

21. Jules Michelet, llie People, trans. John P. McKay (Urbana: University ofllinois Press, 
1973), p. 44. 

22. An echo of Mephistopheles' speech at lines 2038-2039, in Goethe's Faust, Part 1. 

23. Henri Focillon, Tlie Life of Forms in Art, trans. Charles Beecher Hogan and George 
Kubler (1948; rpt. New York: Zone Books, 1989), pp. 85, 87. 

24. The essay, originally published in £eitschrifl fur Soiialforscliung, 6 (1937), is in GS, 
vol. 2; see p. 497, note 50. [R.T.] In English: "Eduard Fuchs: Collector and Histo- 
rian," trans. Knut TarnowsM, Mew German Critique, 5 (Spring 1975); see p. 51, note 
49. 

25. Hermann Lotze, Microcosimis, trans. Elizabeth Hamilton and E. E. Constance Jones 
(New York: Scribner and Welford, 1888), vol. 1, pp. 486-487. 

C [Ancient Paris, Catacombs, Demolitions, Decline of Paris] 

1. Virgil, The Aeneid, trans. Allen Mandelbaum (New York: Bantam, 1971), p. 137 
(Book 6, line 126). Benjamin cites the Latin. 

2. Guillaume Apollinaire, Oeuures poetiques (Paris: Gallimard, 1956), p. 39 (Alcoob, 
"Zone"). [R.T.] In English: Alcools: Poems, 1898-1913, trans. William Meredith (Gar- 
den City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1964), p. 3. 

3. Certain of these muses of Surrealism can be identified more precisely: Luna, the 
moon; Kate Greenaway (1846-1901), English painter known for her illustrations of 
children's books; Mors, death; Geo de Merode (1875-1966), French dancer who 
epitomized the demimonde; Dulcinea, the beloved of Don Quixote and the image of 
idealized woman; Libido, an allusion to Freud; Baby Cadum, publicity and advertis- 



ing; Friederike Kempner (1836-1904), German poet and socialite. A comparison 
with the two other "catalogues of muses" (see F°,4 and F°,ll in "First Sketches") 
reveals that Dulcinea is a variant of Ibsen's Hedda Gabler, and that Benjamin thought 
of adding the painter Angelika Kauffmann (1741-1807), a friend of Goethe's. An- 
other list, presumably the earliest, is found in "The Arcades of Paris" (h°,l). [J.L.] 
Countess Gescbwitz, a lesbian artist, is a character in Frank Wedekind's Erdgeist and 
Die Bilclise der Pandora, plays which inspired Alban Berg's unfinished opera Lulu. The 
identity of Tipse remains a mystery. When Benjamin writes that the mother of Surre- 
alism was eine Passage, he plays on the feminine gender of the noun in German. 

4. The passage is cited in Benjamin's German translation. For the original French, see 
GS, vol. 5, p. 1326. 

5. The reference is to Goethe's Fmist, Part 2, Act 1 (lines 6264fF.), in which Faust visits 
"the Mothers" — vaguely denned mythological Sgures — in search of the secret that 
will enable him to discover Helen of Troy. 

6. See Hla,3. 

7. Louis Aragon, Paris Peasant, trans. Simon Watson Taylor (1971; rpt. Boston: Exact 
Change, 1994), p. 14. 

8. "Know thyself." 

9. Victor Hugo, Les Miserables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
ern Library, 1992), p. 103. 

10. Paris vecu (Paris, 1930). See C9a,l. 

11. Hugo, Les Miserables, p. 737. 

12. Ibid., pp. 859-860. 

13. Charles Baudelaire, Selected Letters, trans. Rosemary Lloyd (Chicago: University of 
Chicago Press, 1986), pp. 141-142. 

14. Baudelaire, Les Flews du rnal, trans. Richard Howard (Boston: Godine, 1882), p. 90 
("The Swan"). 

15. Marcel Raymond, From Baudelaire to Surrealism, trans. G. M. (1950; rpt. London: 
Methuen, 1970), p. 170. 

16. Jules Romains, Men of Good Will, vol. 1, trans. Waire B. Wells (New York: Alfred A. 
Knopf, 1946), p. 146. 

17. Oswald Spengler, llie Declim of the West, vol. 2, trans. Charles Francis Atkinson 
(New York: Knopf, 1928), p. 107. 

D [Boredom, Eternal Return] 

1. Jakob van Hoddis (Hans Davidsohn), Weltende (1911), in Gesammelte Diclitungen 
(Zurich, 1958), p. 466 ("Klage"). [R.T.] 

2. Johann Peter Hebel, Werke (Frankfurt am Main, 1968), vol. 1 , p. 393. [R.T.] 

3. In the collection L'Aatographe (Paris, 1863). [J.L.] 

4. Ae re perennius: "more lasting than brass." Taedium vitae: tedium of life. 

5. The Rue des Colonnes — formerly the Passage des Colonnes, transformed into a 
street in 1798 — is located near the Stock Exchange. [ J.L.] 

6. Cited in French without references. Reading "bien des aventures" (F°,18 in "First 
Sketches") for "lieu des aventures." 

7. Louis Aragon, Paris Peasant, trans. Simon Watson Taylor (1971; rpt. Boston: Exact 
Change, 1994), p. 71. 

8. See note for B°,4 ("First Sketches"). 

9. See Ferdinand Hardekopf, Gesaminelte Diclitungen (Zurich, 1963), pp. 50ff. [R-T] See 
alsoB°,5 ("First Sketches"). 

10. "Time" and "weather." 



11. Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 398. 

12. Andre Gide, "Upon Rereading Les Plaisirs et les jours after the Death of Marcel 
Proust" trans. Blanche A. Price, in Gide, Pretexts: Reflections on Literature and Moral- 
ity, ed. Justin O'Brien (New York: Meridian, 1959), p. 279. 

13. Dolce far niente: Italian for "sweet idleness." Images d'Epitialwere sentimental religious 
posters produced in the town of Epinal in southeastern France. Jean Lacoste suggests 
that Mogreby may be Maghrebin, the magician in "Aladdin and the Marvelous 
Lamp," in the Mardrus translation of Les Mille et Une Mats (1925). Compare 
"Naples," in SW, vol. 1, p. 419. 

14. This passage involves some wordplay in the German: sich die £eit vertreiben / aus- 
treiben, as opposed to die £eit laden / zu sicli einladen. 

15. Jules Michelet, 'llie People, trans. John P. McKay (Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 
1973), p. 46. 

16. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paris of His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), p. 268. Described is a 
scene from Offenbach's operetta La Vie parisienne (1866). 

17. Charles Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modem Life," in "Tlie Painter of Modern Life" 
and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan Mayne (1964; rpt. New York: Da Capo Press, 
1986), p. 26. 

18. Ibid., pp. 28-29. 

19. Ibid., p. 29. 

20. Ibid., p. 10. 

21. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, trans. Francis Scarfe (London: Anvil Press, 1986), 
p. 232. 

22. An earlier version of this passage appears in The Correspondence of Walter Benjamin, 
trans. Manfred R. Jacobson and Evelyn M. Jacobson (Chicago: University of Chi- 
cago Press, 1994), p. 549 (where Benjamin announces his "rare find"). 

23. Friedrich Nietzsche, Tlie Will to Power, trans. Walter Kaufmann and R. J. Hollingdale 
(New York: Vintage, 1968), pp. 35, 36. 

24. Ibid., p. 38. 

25. Ibid., pp. 546-547. 

26. Ibid, p. 548. 

27. Ibid., p. 550. 

28. Ibid., p. 549. 

29. Griinderjahre: years of reckless financial speculation, in this case following the Franco- 
Prussian War of 1870-1871. 

30. Nietzsche, Ecce Homo, trans. Walter Kaufmann (New York: Vintage, 1969), p. 219: 
"Here no 'prophet' is speaking, none of those gruesome hybrids of sickness and will 
to power whom people call founders of religions." 

31. Jean Jacques Rousseau, Tlie Confessions, trans. J. M. Cohen (Baltimore: Penguin, 
1954), p. 415. 

32. The Portable Nietzsche, trans. Walter Kaufmann (New York: Viking, 1954), pp. 101- 
102 (The Gay Science). 

E [Haussmamiizatioii, Barricade Fighting] 

1. Friedrich Engels, Introduction to Karl Marx, The Class Struggles in E'ance, 1848 to 
1850, trans, anonymous (New York: International Publishers, 1964), pp. 22-23. 

2. Marx, The Class Struggles in France, p. 44. 



3. Benjamin is quoting from an open letter by the economist Frederic Bastiat to La- 
martine, according to which the latter is actually citing Fourier. [R.T.J 

4. Le Corbusier, The City of Tomorrow and Its Planning, trans. Frederick Etchells (1929; 
rpt. New York: Dover, 1987), p. 156. 

5. Ibid., p. 155. See E5a,6. 

6. Ibid., p. 261. 

7. Andre Breton, Nadja, trans. Richard Howard (New York: Grove, 1960), p. 152. 

8. Gisele Freund, Photographic and biirgerliche Gesellschctft: Eine kunstsoziologisclie Stadie 
(Munich, 1968), p. 67. [R.T.] 

9. Le Corbusier, The City of Tomorrow, p. 156. Next sentence: "And in destroying chaos, 
he built up the emperor's finances!" 

10. In chapter 14 of his popular Utopian novel of 1888, Looking Backward: 2000-1887, 
Edward Bellamy describes a continuous waterproof covering let down in inclement 
weather to enclose sidewalks and streetcomers. 

11. After the government, in July 1833, had bowed to public resistance and abandoned 
its plan to build fortifications around the city of Paris, it took its revenge by arresting 
a number of individuals (including four students from the Ecole Polytechnique) 
thought to be illegally manufacturing gunpowder and arms. The group was acquitted 
in December. G. Pinet, Histoire de I'Ecole polytechnique (Paris: Baudry, 1887), pp. 214— 
219. 

12. This passage does not appear in the English-language edition: Gustav Mayer, Frie- 
drich Engels, trans. Gilbert Highet and Helen Highet (1936; rpt. New York: Howard 
Fertig, 1969). 

13. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paru: Offenbach and the Paris of His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938) p. 190. 

14. See below, E10a,3. 

15. Honore de Balzac, Pere Goriot, trans. Henry Reed (New York: New American Li- 
brary, 1962), p. 275. 

16. Tlw Essential Rousseau, trans. Lowell Bair (New York: New American Library, 1974), 

p. 17: 

17. Friedrich Engels, The Housing Question, trans, anonymous in Marx and Engels, Col- 
lected Works, vol. 23 (New York: International Publishers, 1988), p. 365. 



F [Iron Construction] 

1. Emended to read "glass'' in the German edition. 

2. From hdbleur, "boastful chatterbox." A character in Grandville's book of illustrations 
Un autre monde. See Fantastic Illustrations of Grandville (New York: Dover, 1974), p. 49. 

3. The term for "railroad" in German, Eisenbahn, means literally "iron track." The term 
came into use around 1820 and, unlike Ehenbaknhqf '(which became simply Ba/mhof), 
continued to be used after steel rails had replaced the iron. 

4. Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; ipt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 362n. "Form of the tool," at the end, trans- 
lates Korperform des Werkzeugs (literally, "bodily form"), and this is the term taken up 
by Benjamin in parenthesis. 

5. "Mehr Licfit/": Goethe's last words. 

6. The German Halle and the English "hall" derive from a Germanic noun meaning 
"covered place," which in turn is traced back to an Indo-European root signifying "to 
cover, conceal." "Hall" is cognate with "hell." In earlier times, the hall — in contrast to 



the room — was a spacious, half -open structure (with a roof supported by pillars or 
columns) designed to provide shelter from rain or sun. 

7. Actually known as the Palais des Machines, it was built for the world exhibition of 
1889 by the engineers Contamin, PieiTon, and Chartron. [J.L.] The quotation, given 
without references, is in German. 

8. On July 28, 1835, during a parade by the Garde Nationale down the Boulevard du 
Temple, the Corsican conspirator Giuseppe Fieschi made an unsuccessful attempt on 
the life of Louis Philippe. His "infernal machine" — a device made of several guns 
rigged to fire simultaneously — killed eighteen people. 

9. Victor Hugo, Notre-Dame of Paris, trans. John Sturrock (New York: Penguin, 1978), 
p. 27. 

10. Constructed by Viel and Barrault for the exhibition of 1855 on the Chainps-Elysees. 
[J-L.] 

11. Hugo, Notre-Dame of Paris, pp. 150-151. 

12. The cast-iron bridge of Coalbrookdale, in Shropshire, was built by T. F. Pritchard. 
[J.L.] 

13. Jules Michelet, The People, trans. John P. McKay (Urbana: University of Dlinois Press, 
1973), pp. 45,43n. 



G [Exhibitions, Advertising, Grandville] 

1. Alexander von Humboldt's last and greatest work, Kosmos (5 vols., 1845-1862), was 
translated into nearly all European languages. The schwindenden Doppehterne (disap- 
pearing twin stars) are discussed in volumes 1 and 3. 

2. Victoria! A New World! Joyous Proclamation of the Fact That on Our Planet, Especially in 
t lie Northern Hemuplwre We Occupy, a Total Alteration in Temperature Has Begun, Thanks 
to the Increase in Atmospheric Warmth. 

3. 1867 was the year of Offenbach's biggest box-office success, La Grancle-Duchesse cle 
Gerolstein, with libretto by Henri Meilhac and Ludovic Halevy. 

4. After Paxton's designs were initially rejected by die London Building Committee in 
1850, he published them in the London News, and public response to his unusual 
concept was so overwhelmingly favorable that the committee capitulated. 

5. The advertisement appears in Benjamin's German translation. Original French in 
GS, vol. 5, pp. 1327-1328. 

6. Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), pp. 76-77, 

7. Ibid, p. 76. 

8. The Crystal Palace was destroyed by a spectacular fire at Sydenham in south London 
in 1936. 

9. At the end of the second Opium War (1856-1860), allied English and French forces 
captured Peking and burned the Chinese emperor's summer palace. 

10. The royal ordinance of January 13, 1819, provided for the public exhibition of the 
products of French industry "in the rooms and galleries of the Louvre," at intervals 
not exceeding every four years; a jury was to decide which exhibitors deserved 
rewards from the government. 

11. That is, 1801, according to the French revolutionary calendar. 

12. Tlie Mysteries of Paris (1842-1843), enormously popular novel by Eugene Sue. 

13. Hugh Walpole, The Fortress (1932; rpt. Phoenix Mill, England: Alan Sutton Publish- 
ing, 1995), pp. 248, 247, The description of the "monster lodging-house" mentioned 



in Gl.1,1 is on p. 239. Benjamin cites the text in German (with an English title); 
translator unknown. 

14. A. Toussenel, Passional ^oology; Or, Spirit of the Beasts of France, trans. M. Edgeworth 
Lazarus (New York: Fowlers and Wells, 1852), pp. 140, 142. 

15. Ibid., p. 355. 

16. Ibid, pp. 337-339. 

17. Ibid, p. 340. 

18. Ibid, pp. 135, 136. 

19. Ibid, p. 346. 

20. Ibid, pp. 91-92. 

21. Ibid, pp. 346, 347. 

22. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, pp. 293-294. 

23. Victor Hugo, Les Miserables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
ern Library, 1992), p. 767. 

24. The International Working Men's Association (the First International), the General 
Council of which had its seat in London, was founded in September 1864. 

25. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, p. 76. "Material immaterial" translates sinnlich iibersinnlich. 

26. For another English version, translated from the Russian, see Nikolai Gogol, Ara- 
besques, trans. Alexander Tulloch (Ann Arbor, Mich.: Ardis, 1982), p. 130. 

27. J. W. Goethe, "Nachtgedanken," Gedenkausgabe, vol. 1, Sdmtliche Gedichte (Zurich, 
1961), p. 339. [R.T.] In English in Selected Verse, trans. David Luke (London: Pen- 
guin, 1964), p. 75. SeeJ22a,l. 

28. Charles Baudelaire, The Minor of Art, trans. Jonathan Mayne (London: Phaidon, 
1955), p. 84. 

29. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), pp. 79-80. 

30. See SW, vol. 2, pp. 85-90 ("Main Features of My Second Impression of Hashish"). 
Also below, 12,6, Mla,l, and Mla,3. 

H [The Collector] 

1. Letter of December 30, 1857, to his mother. In Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, ed. and 
trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. (London: Oxford University Press, 
1957), p. 135. 

2. Dr. Miracle and Olympia, the automated puppet, appear in Les Contes d'Hoffmann 
(1881), an opera by Jacques Offenbach. Dr. Miracle has been interpreted as genius of 
death; see Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paris of his Time, 
trans. Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938) p. 355. 

3. The Passage du Pont-Neuf. See Therese Raqidn, trans. Leonard Tancock (New York: 
Penguin, 1962), pp. 31-35. First published in 1867. 

4. This reference remains obscure. 

5. Phaedrus, 247c. 

6. August Strindberg, "The Pilot's Trials," in Strindberg, Tales, trans. L.J. Potts (Lon- 
don: Chatto and Wmdus, 1930), pp. 45, 46, 50. 

7. Baudelaire, Artificial Paradise, trans. Ellen Fox (New York: Herder and Herder, 1971), 
p. 68. 

8. But see below, H2,7; H2a,l, on the singular "gaze" (Blick) of the collector. 

9. Charles Dickens, The Old Curiosity Shop (London: Heron Books, 1970), p. 16 (ch. 1). 
10. llieodor W. Adomo, "On Dickens' The Old Curiosity Simp: A Lecture," in Notes to 

Literature, vol. 2, trans. Shierry Weber Nicholsen (New York: Columbia University 



Press, 1992), p. 177. Adomo's essay was first published in the Frankfurter J^eitung 
(April 18, 1931), pp. 1-2. The passages from Dickens are in chs. 12 and 44, respec- 
tively. 

11. Karl Marx, "Economic and Philosopliical Manuscripts [of 1844]" in Karl Marx: 
Selected Writings, ed. David McLellan (New "fork: Oxford University Press, 1977), 
p. 91. 

12. The Portable Karl Marx, trans. Eugene Kamenka (New fork: Viking Penguin, 1983), 
p. 151. 

13. Marx, Selected Writings, p. 92. 

14. Ibid., pp. 91-92. 

15. This passage is not found in the English-language edition of Johan Huizinga's book 
The Waning of the Middle Ages (New York: Doubleday Anchor, 1954). 

16. In this passage, "dispersion" translates J^erstreuung, "profundity" translates Tiefsinn, 
and "patchwork" translates Stiickwerk, 

17. Marcel Proust, The Past Recaptured, trans. Frederick A. Blossom, in Remembrance of 
Tilings Past, vol. 2 (New York: Random House, 1932), p. 1070. On the collector's 
relation to memory and the world of things, compare Q,°,7 in "First Sketches." 

I [The Interior, The Trace] 

1. "Know thyself." 

2. Le Corbusier, The City of Tomorrow and Its Planning, trans. Frederick Etchells (1929; 
rpt. New York: Dover, 1987), p. 259. 

3. See I4a,2. In Sue's novel The Mysteries of Paris, the archvillain Ferrand, whose accom- 
plice is a perfidious priest, is done in by the wiles of the Creole Cecily. 

4. Jacques-Emile Blanche, Mes modeles (Paris, 1929), p. 117. Barres' phrase, which Ben- 
jamin misquotes in French, is: "Un conteur arabe dans la loge de la portiere!" [R.T.] 

5. This whole passage is adapted from the protocol to Benjamin's second experience 
with hashish in January 1928. See SW, vol. 2, pp. 85-90. 

6. See GS, vol. 6, p. 567 (where the passage is attributed to Ernst Bloch). 

7. Marcel Proust, "About Baudelaire," in Proust, A Selection from His Miscellaneous Writ- 
ings, trans. Gerard Hopkins (London: Allan Wmgate, 1948), p. 199. Citing, respec- 
tively, from Baudelaire, Pieces Condamnees, "Une martyre," Pieces condamnees. 

8. Soren Kierkegaard, Stages on Life's Way, trans. Walter Lowrie (1940; rpt. New fork: 
Schocken, 1967), p. 30. 

9. Theodor W. Adorno, Kierkegaard: Construction of the Aesthetic, trans. Robert Hullot- 
Kentor (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1989), p. 60. "Primordial" 
translates urgeschichtlich. See pp. 48-49, on Kierkegaard as rentier. 

10. Ibid., pp. 43-44 (the term inte'rieur has been translated after the first sentence). The 
passage from Kierkegaard is in Eitlwr/Or, vol. 1, trans. David F. Swenson and Lillian 
M. Swenson, with revisions by Howard A.Johnson (1944; rpt. New York: Anchor, 
1959), pp. 384-386. 

11. In Ibsen's Tie Master Builder (1892), Mrs. Solness had kept nine dolls hidden from 
her husband until a fire destroyed her family estate, catalyzing Somess's career of 
building homes for happy f amilies. See Four Major Plays, trans. James McFarlane and 
Jens Arup (New York: Oxford University Press, 1981), pp. 314-315, 335. 

12. "Wolmen als Transitivum — im Begriffdes 'gewohnten Lebens' z.B." 

13. The reign of Louis Philippe became known as the Middle-of-the-Road Regime (Juste 
Milieu). In a speech of 1831, he stated: "We must not only cherish peace; we must 
avoid everything that might provoke war. As regards domestic policy, we will en- 



deavor to maintain a juste milieu." Cited in Daumier: 120 Great Litlwgraplis, ed. 
Charles F. Ramus (New York: Dover, 1978), p. xi. 

14. Marx, Tlie Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844, trans. Martin Milligan (New 
York: International Publishers, 1964), pp. 155-156. 

15. Paul Valery, "The Place of Baudelaire," in Leonardo, Poe, Mallanne, trans. Malcolm 
Cowley and James R. Lawler (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1972), p. 203. 

16. A rather fantastic house near Versailles which Balzac built in 1838 and left in 1840. 

17. Baudelaire, Pans Spleen, trans. Louise Varese (New York: New Directions, 1947), 
p. 33. 

18. Honore de Balzac, Modeste Mignon, trans, anon. (New York: Fred de Fau, 1900), 
p. 68. 

19. Georg Sinunel, The Philosophy of Money, 2nd ed., trans. Tom Bottomore and David 
Frisby (London: Routledge, 1990), pp. 459-462. 

20. Joseph Conrad, "The Shadow-Line" and Two Other Tales (New York: Anchor, 1959), 
pp. 189, 193. 

21. Jean Jacques Rousseau, T/ie Confessions, trans. J. M. Cohen (Baltimore: Penguin, 
1953), p. 280. 

J [Baudelaire] 

1. Pierre de Ronsard, Oeuvres completes, vol. 2 (Paris: Pleiade, 1976), p. 282. [R.T.] 

2. Paul Valery, "The Place of Baudelaire," in Leonardo, Poe, Mallanne, trans. Malcolm 
Cowley and James R. Lawler (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1972), pp. 195, 
197-198. 

3. Le poncif: the banal, the trite; a conventional piece of writing, a cliche. Baudelaire 
writes in his notebook: "To create a new commonplace {poncif} — that's genius. I 
must create a commonplace." "My Heart Laid Bare" and Other Prose Writings, trans. 
Norman Cameron (1950; rpt. New York: Haskell House, 1975), p. 168 ("Fusees," no. 
20). See also Baudelaire's "Salon of 1846," section 10. 

4. Baudelaire's article "Richard Wagner and Tannhduser in Paris" appeared on April 1, 
1861. 

5. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare," p. 198: "Praise the cult of images (my great, my 
unique, my primitive passion)" ("My Heart Laid Bare"). Pimitive passion can be 
translated as "earliest passion." Baudelaire's note could refer to the importance that 
pictures (images) had for him when he was a child; his father was an art lover and 
amateur painter. (He died when Baudelaire was six.) 

6. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), pp. 53, 52. Pierre Du- 
pont's Chants et chansons appeared in 1851. Baudelaire writes to his guardian Ancelle, 
on March 5, 1852, that Louis Napoleon's coup d'etat of the previous December had 
"physically depoliticized" him (Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 50). 

7. Baudelaire had appeared on the barricades during the three-day revolution of Febru- 
ary 1848. 

8. In order to save Baudelaire from "the sewers of Paris," and to punish him for his 
monetary extravagance, his stepfather, General Aupick, sent him on a sea voyage to 
Calcutta. After departing in June 1841, and surviving a hurricane off the Cape of 
Good Hope, Baudelaire disembarked in Reunion and returned to France in February 
1842. 

9. Selected Letters of Cliarles Baudelaire, trans. Rosemary Lloyd (Chicago: University of 
Chicago Press, 1986), p. 142. 



10. The Minor of Art: Critical Studies by Charles Baudelaire, trans. Jonathan Mayne (Lon- 
don: Phaidon, 1955), pp. 282-283. The phrase "those spires 'whose fingers point to 
heaven'" (montrant du doigt le del), translates a line from Wordsworth's poem "The 
Excursion" (book 6, line 19), itself a citation from Coleridge. See TVs? Mirror of Art, 
p. 282n2. 

11. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, trans. Louise Varese (New York: New Directions, 1947), p. 8 
("To Every Man His Cliimera"). 

12. Albert Thibaudet, French Literature from 1795 to Our Era, trans. Charles Lam Mark- 
mann (New York: Funk and Wagnalls, 1967), p. 289. 

13. G. K. Chesterton, Charles Dickens (1906; rpt. New York: Schocken, 1965), p. 47. 
Reference is to the period of Dickens' youth when he worked in a factory pasting 
labels on blacking-bottles. In Benjamin's French edition, "That wild word" is trans- 
lated as "Ce mot baroque." 

14. Ibid., p. 60. 

15. Valery, Leonardo, Poe, Mallartw, p. 207. 

16. In August 1857, after the publication of Les Fleurs du mal, Baudelaire arid his publish- 
ers were tried and found guilty of offending public morality; they were fined and six 
poems in the collection were suppressed. The verdict cites the "indecent realism" of 
the images. 

17. Valery, Leonardo, Poe, Mallarme, p. 195. 

18. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, pp. 318-319 ("Advice to Young Men of Letters"). L'Art 
romantique was originally published in 1869 as volume 3 of the first collected edition 
of the poet's works; the title was evidently supplied by the editors. 

19. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 69 ("The Respectable Drama and Novel"). 

20. Ibid., p. 73 ("The Pagan School"). 

21. Ibid., p. 77. 

22. Ibid. 

23. Ibid., p. 76. The passage conveys Baudelaire's disgust with certain classical notions of 
beauty, suggested by laplastique, "sculpted form" or "fine shaping." 

24. Ibid., pp. 241-242. 

25. Ibid., p. 251. 

26. Ibid., p. 263. 

27. Ibid., p. 262. 

28. Ibid., pp. 265-266 ("Theodore de Banville"). 

29. Ibid., p. 278. 

30. Ibid., pp. 285-286. 

31. Ibid., p. 289. 

32. Ibid., p. 147. 

33. Ibid, pp. 144, 146. 

34. Ibid, p. 146. 

35. Ibid, p. 56. 

36. Ibid, pp. 51-52, 52-53. 

37. Ibid, p. 58 ("Pierre Dupont"). 

38. Ibid, p. 205. 

39. Ibid., p. 222 ("Richard Wagner and Tannhauser'm Paris"). 

40. Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern Life" and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan Mayne 
(1964; rpt. New York: Da Capo, 1986), p. 206. The reference that follows is to Jules 
Michelet's Histoire de France au seitieme si'ede (1855). 

41. Baudelaire, "Painters and Etchers," in Art in Paris, 1845-1862, trans. Jonathan 
Mayne (London: Phaidon, 1965), pp. 220-221. Compare J2,l. 



42. Baudelaire, "The Painter of 'Modern Life,' 'p. 21 ('"The Painter of Modern Life"). 

43. Ibid., p. 24. 

44. Ibid., p. 32. 

45. Ibid., p. 40. 

46. Baudelaire, Selected Writings on Art and Literature, trans. P. E. Charvet (1972; rpt. 
New York: Penguin, 1992), p. 435. 

47. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, pp. 296-297 ("The Painter of Modern Life," section 4, 
"Modernity"). Baudelaire here anticipates Nietzsche's critique of the antiquarian in 
the second of the Unieitgemasse Betrachtungen: Vom Nutxen unci Michteil tier Hutorie jiir 
das Leben <On the Advantage and Disadvantage of History for Life>. In the sentence 
that follows tliis quotation from Baudelaire, Benjamin delineates a dialectical process 
that is somewhat blurred in translation: the stamp of time that, literally, "impresses 
itself into" antiquity (sich in sie eindriickt) brings out of it (treibt . . . am ihr lienor) — 
that is, brings into relief — the allegorical configuration. 

48. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 296; and "Tlie Painter of Modern Life," pp. 14, 16. 
"Spleen et ideal" is the fir st book of Les Fleurs du mal. 

49. Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern Lifef-pp. 29, 12. 

50. Ibid., pp. 8, 66. 

51. Ibid., pp. 10,11. 

52. Ibid., p. 48. 

53. Ibid., p. 3. 

54. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal, trans. Richard Howard (Boston: Godine, 1982), p. 77. 

55. Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern Life," p. 32. 

56. Ibid., p. 14. SeeJ6a,2. 

57. Selected Letters of C/tarles Baudelaire, pp. 79-80. Baudelaire had received a copy of 
Alphonse Tbussenel's book L'Esprit cles betes. 

58. Baudelaire's unsuccessful effort to gain membership in the Academie Francaise at the 
end of 1861 entailed mandatory visits to each of the forty Academicians. He was 
received by about half of them before he withdrew his application. 

59. Selected Letters of Charles Baudelaire, p. 210 (November 13, 1864, to Ancelle). 

60. Victor Hugo, Poems, trans, anonymous (Boston: Harcourt Bindery, 189?), pp. 190, 
192. "Les Metamorphoses du vampire" (Metamorphoses of the Vampire) and "Les 
Petites Vieilles" (The Little Old Women) are poems in Les Fleurs du mal. For Athalie's 
dream of her dead mother, Jezabel, see scene 5 of Act 2 of Racine's At Italic (1691). 

61. Jules Laforgue, Selected Writings, trans. William Jay Smith (New York: Grove Press, 
1956), p. 212. References are to Baudelaire's poems "Le Balcon" and "Le Serpent qui 
danse," in Les Fleurs du mal. 

62. Laforgue, Selected Writings, p. 213. 

63. Ibid. 

64. Ibid., pp. 215-217. Citations from Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 173 ("Medita- 
tion"), p. 14 ("Elevation"), p. 82 ("The Clock"), p. 87 ("Parisian Landscape"). 

65. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, ed. and trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslopjr. 
(London: Oxford University Press, 1957), p. 51 ("PauvreBelgique"). 

66. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Baref-p. Ill ("My Heart Laid Bare"). 

67. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, trans. Francis Scarfe (London: Anvil, 1986), pp. 326- 
327. 

68. Laforgue, Selected Writings, p. 211. 

69. Ibid., p. 213. 

70. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, trans. Cluistopher Isherwood (1930; rpt. Westport, 
Conn.: Hyperion, 1978), pp. 113-114. 



71. See The Mirror of Art, p. 51. Baudelaire quotes from E. T. A. Hoffmann's Hb'chst 
wstreute Gedanken, part of the "Kreisler papers" on music, named af ter the author's 
popular mouthpiece,Johannes Kreisler. 

72. Baudelaire delivered the first of five public lectures in Brussels on May 2, 1864. It was 
well received, but the other four were dismal failures. 

73. This is a play on the famous words of Hemi of Navarre. When he assumed the 
French throne in 1593, as Henri IV, he converted to Catholicism with the words, 
"Paris vaut bien une messe." 

74. The Letters of Gustave Flaubert, 1830-1857, trans. Francis Steegmuller (Cambridge, 
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1980), pp. 232-233 (letter ofjuly 13, 1857). 

75. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 7 (letter of February 18, 1860, to Armand Fraisse). 

76. "Elsewhere! Too far, too late, or never at all! / Of me you know nothing, I nothing of 
you — you / whom I might have loved and who knew that too!" "In Passing," Les 
Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 98. 

77. Selected Letters of C/iarles Baudelaire, p. 175 (circa December 16, 1861, in reference to 
Les Fleurs du mat). 

78. Gide, "Preface to Les Fleurs du mal,'" in Pretexts (New York: Meridian, 1959), p. 257 
(trans. Blanche A. Price). 

79. Ibid., pp. 257-258. Gide quotes at the beginning from Baudelaire's first draft of a 
preface to Les Fleurs du mal. For the passages from Baudelaire's journals, see "My 
Heart Laid Baref'p. 166 ("Fusees," no. 17). 

80. Gide, Pretexts, p. 257 

81. Ibid., p. 256. 

82. Ibid., p. 258. 

83. Citations from Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), pp. 170 ("Madrigal triste"), 37 ("Le 
Vampire"), 129 ("Fenmies damnees"). 

84. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare," p. 200 ("My Heart Laid Bare"). Lemaitre's text 
has degout instead of horreur, 

85. Baudelaire, Flowers of Evil, trans. Wallace Fowlie (1964; rpt. New York: Dover, 1992), 
p. 85. 

86. Citations from Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard) pp. 20 ("IJEnnemi"), 22 ("Bo- 
hemiens en Voyage"), 62 ("Chant d'automne"). 

87. Selected Letters of Cluirles Baudelaire, p. 130. The passage continues: "This idea came 
to me when I was leafing through Hyacinthe Langlois' history of the 'Dance of Death' 
theme" (letter to Nadar, 1859). SeeJ26,2. 

88. Gide, Pretexts, p. 259. The reference is to a sentence in Baudelaire's private journals; 
see "My Heart Laid Bare" p. 155 ("Fusees," no. 1). 

89. Edgar Allan Poe, "The Imp of the Perverse," in Poe, The Complete lales and Poems 
(New York: Modern Library, 1938), p. 281. 

90. Rene Laforgue, The Defeat of Baudelaire, trans. Herbert Agar (London: Hogarth, 
1932), pp. 163, 165. 

91. Ibid., pp. 141, 143. Laforgue writes: ". . , the passive role, that of the woman, of the 
prisoner." 

92. Ibid., p. 71. 

93. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, p. 8. The editors date the letter August 13. 

94. "New Notes on Edgar Poe," actually Baudelaire's third essay on Poe, served as a 
preface to his second volume of translations, published in 1857. The article on Gau- 
tier appeared in 1859. Fmr the passages on passion, see Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, 
pp. 133, 162-166. 

95. Ovid, Metamorphoses, book 1, lines 84-85. ( J.L.] See Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid 
Bare," p. 157 ("Fusees"). 



96. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 362. 

97. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, p. 69. 

98. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, p. 135: "I haven't forgotten, near the city" and "The 
greathearted servant of whom you were jealous." After his father's death in 1827, 
Baudelaire lived for a time, along with his mother and nursemaid Mariette, in a 
house at Neuilly, just outside Paris. 

99. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, p. 123 ("The Salon of 1846"). 

100. Selected Letters ofCliarles Baudelaire, p. 218. 

101. ' Je n e pou vais aimer . . . que s i 1 a mort melait son souffle a celui d e 1 a Beaute ! " Cited 
in Seilliere without references. Possibly an adaptation of a passage in "The Philoso- 
phy of Composition": "Of all melancholy topics, what ... is the most melancholy? 
Death. . . . And when ... is tliis most melancholy of topics most poetical? . . . When 
it most closely allies itself to Beauty: the death ... of a beautiful woman is . . . the 
most poetical topic in the world— and . . . the lips best suited for such a topic are 
those of a bereaved lover." Poe, "The Fall of the House of Usher" and Other Writings 
(Hannondsworth: Penguin, 1986) p. 486. (Thanks to William Vance for this refer- 
ence.) 

102. Baudelaire, Correspondance (Paiis: Gallimard, 1973), vol. 1, p. 410 (July 9, 1857, to 
Caroline Aupick). [R.T.] In English in Selected Letters ofCliarles Baudelaire, p. 97. 

103. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes (Paris: Pleiade, 1976), vol. 1, p. 102 ("Rive parisien"). 
[R.T.] In English in Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. Howard), p. 107: "Architect of such 
conceits / 1 sent submissive seas / into the jewelled conduits / my will erected there." 

104. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, pp. 26-27. 

105. Jules Romains, Men of Good Will, vol. 1, trans. Warre B. Wells (New York: Knopf, 
1946), p. 396. Citation from Baudelaire's "Elevation," Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. 
Howard), p. 14. 

106. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. Howard), pp. 88, 45. 

107. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 203 ('Je n'ai pas pour maitresse"). [R.T.] 
Sarah was Baudelaire's first mistress. 

108. See "The Bad Glazier," in Paris Spleen, pp. 12-14; and Gide's novel of 1914, Les 
Caves clu Vatican , translated by Dorothy Bussy as Laf iaclio 's Adventures (Garden City, 
N.Y.: Doubleday, 1953), p. 183, where one finds the theory of the acte gratuit put 
into practice by Lafcadio's wanton murder of a pious old fool. 

109. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 141. 

110. Flower:; of Evil (trans. Fowlie), p. 107. 

111. Citations from Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. Howard), pp. 77, 164, 107, 156. "Delpliine et 
Hippolyte" is the subtitle of the longer of the two poems entitled "Femmes dam- 
nees." 

112. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. Howard), p. 73. 

1 13. Ibid., p. 72 ("A l'heure ou les chastes etoiles / Ferment leurs yeux appesantis"). 

114. Ibid., p. 97 ("crispe comme un extravagant"). 

115. Baudelaire, T/ie Complete Verse, p. 159. 

116. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 156. 

117. Ibid., p. 41. 

118. The Works of Stefan George, trans. Olga Marx and Ernst Morwitz (1949; rpt. New 
York: AMS Press, 1966), p. 6 (Odes, 1890). 

119. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 116 ("The Solitary's Wine"). 
Compare the passage on Baudelaire and Berg in Theodor W. Adonio, Alban Berg: 
Master of the Smallest Link, trans. Juliane Brand and Christopher Hailey (Cam- 
bridge: Cambridge University Press, 1991), p. 120. 

120. J. W. Goethe, Selected Verse, trans. David Luke (New York: Penguin, 1964), p. 75. 



121. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, p. 120. 

122. Baudelaire, Tlte Prose Poems and "La Fanfkrlo" trans. Rosemary Lloyd (New York: 
Oxford University Press, 1991), p. 44 ("The Crowds"). 

123. "C'est un genie sans frontieres." The last word is translated as "limits" in Baudelaire 
as a Literary Critic, p. 241 ("Reflections on Some ofMy Contemporaries"). 

124. Hugo, Poems, pp. 190, 192, 193 (in the sequence titled Les Orientales). 

125. The Poems of Victor Hugo (New York: Little, Brown, 1909), pp. 175, 177 (trans. 
Henry Carrington) . 

126. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, p. 96. 

127. Bourdin's article appeared in his father-in-law's paper on July 5, 1857, nine days 
before Thierry's favorable notice. It has been suggested that the conservative paper 
Le Figaro was at least partly responsible f or the charges brought against Baudelaire. 
SeeJ27a,3. 

128. Probably a reference to the warning cut into stone above the Gate of Hell: "Lasciate 
ogne speranza voi ch'intrate" ("Abandon all hope, ye who enter here"). See Dante 
Alighieri, The Inferno, trans. John Ciardi (New York: New American Library, 1954), 
p. 42 (Canto 3). 

129. "Reve parisien" is dedicated to Guys. 

130. See the end of Baudelaire's third draft for a preface to Les Fleurs du mal, in The 
Complete Verse, p. 389. Re: "the whole piece about Andromache." 

131. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 2, p. 68. [R.T.] From "Notes sur Les Liauons 
dangereuses" (ca. 1864). "Sand est inferieure a Sade." Compare J49a,l. 

132. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 5 f'Au Lecteur"). [R.T.] In English in The 
Complete Verse, p. 53. 

133. Baudelaire, "The Exposition Universelle, 1855," in The Mirror of Art, pp. 213-214. 

134. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 2, p. 132. [R.T.] In English in Baudelaire as a 
Literary Ciitic, p. 238 ("Reflections on Some of My Contemporaries"). 

135. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare," p. 178. 

136. Sainte-Beuve's article "Sur les prochaines elections de l'Academie" (On the Forth- 
coming Academy Elections) contained a rather condescending section on Baude- 
laire as an "exemplary candidate, a nice young man." 

137. The Apocrypha, Revised Standard Version (New York: Oxford University Press, 
1977), p. 181 (40.8). 

138. The dates are erroneous. Questions de critique (2nd ed.) appeared in 1889; Eisais sur 
la litterature contemporaine, in 1892; Nouveaux essais sur la litterature contemporaine, in 
1895; arid Evolution de la poesie lyrique en France, in 1894. [R.T.] 

139. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare" p. 177 ("My Heart Laid Bare"). Benjamin's 
phrase at the end of this entry is "Das Historische ins Intime projiziert." 

140. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 194. [R.T.] The notes in question were 
prepared by Baudelaire for the trial against Les Fleurs du mal, 

141. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare/'p. 195 ("My Heart Laid Bare"). 

142. Baudelaire, Flowers of Evil (trans. Fowlie), p. 85 ("Destruction"). 

143. See Eugene Crepet, Cliaries Baudelaire (Paris: Leon Vanier, 1906), pp. 288-289. 
When Baudelaire, out walking with Asselineau on the boulevard, wants to have 
dinner at the early hour of 5 P.M., Asselineau, who has a head cold, assents on 
condition they go to his place first to get another handkerchief. Baudelaire, protest- 
ing that Asselineau must still have two or three places left on his present handker- 
chief sufficient to blow his nose during dinner, holds out his hand and cries, "Show 
me!" 

144. Theophile Gautier, A History of Romanticism, trans, anonymous (1909; rpt. New 
York: Howard Fertig, 1988), pp. 301, 300. 



145. Baudelaire, Correspondance (Paris: Gallimard, 1973), vol. 1, p. 30 (to his mother, 
probably written in Paris, 1845). [R.T.] In English in Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, 
p. 32. 

146. Baudelaire had written, on March 4, 1863, "So you really do want to compromise 
my dignity in a social set in which you've compromised your own?" Selected Letters 
of Charles Baudelaire, p. 193. For his letter of March 6, see pp. 193-194. The female 
admirer was Frederique O'Connell, a painter whom Baudelaire mentions in the 
"Salons" of 1846 and 1859. 

147. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, p. 133. The fine was reduced from 300 francs to 50 
francs as a result of this letter. 

148. Baudelaire, "The Painter *f Modern Lifefp. 156 ("On the Essence of Laughter"). 

149. Ibid., p. 150. 

150. Ibid., p. 157. 

151. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 43. 

152. Poe, The Complete Tales and Poems, p. 478 ("The Man of the Crowd"). 

153. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 127. Compare the classic distinction between imagi- 
nation and fancy in Chapters 4 and 13 of Coleridge's Biographia Literaria (1817). 

154. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 131. The sentence is a virtual quotation from Poe's 
"The Poetic Principle." 

155. Baudelaire, The Mirror oj Art, p. 251. 

156. Ibid., p. 268. Thejournal in question was Le Siecle. 

157. Ibid., p. 273. Pro domo: for his own cause. 

158. Ibid., p. 274 ("Ce . . . je ne sais quoi de malicieux"). 

159. Alfred de Vigny, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1 (Paris, 1883), pp. 251-252. [R.T.] 

160. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 297 ("au plus noir de l'abime, /Je vois distincte- 
ment des mondes singuliers"). 

161. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, p. 286. Sursum, ad sidera: upward, to the stars. Vital 
lampada: torch of life. 

162. Ibid., p. 283. 

163. Ibid., p. 233. 

164. Ibid., p. 224. 

165. Baudelaire, Intimate journals, pp. 29, 31. Baudelaire's word for both "ecstasy" and 
"intoxication" is ivresse. 

166. Ibid., p. 33. 

167. Ibid., p. 32. 

168. Ibid., pp. 73-74. 

169. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare ," 'pp. 155, 197. 

170. Baudelaire: A Self-Portrait, p. 87. 

171. Selected Letters of Charles Baudelaire, p. 159 (October 11, 1860). 

172. T/ie Letters of Victor Hugo, vol. 2, ed. Paul Meurice (Boston: Houghton, Mifflin, 
1898), p. 152. 

173. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 315. 

174. Baudelaire, Intimate "Journals, p. 39. 

175. Baudelaire as a Literaty Critic, p. 307. Baudelaire's article first appeared November 
24, 1845, in Le Cwsaire-Satan and was republished a year later in LEcho. 

176. Baudelaire, T lie Minor of Art, p. 124. "Politics of art" translates Kunstpolitik. 

177. Attributed to Poulet-Malassis by Marcel Ruff in his edition of Baudelaire, Oeuvres 
completes (Pans: Seuil, 1968), p. 50 (where the entire sheet is reproduced). 

178. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, p. 8. 

179. Baudelaire, The Mirror oj Art, p. 118. 

180. "A Strange Man's Dream"— poem in Les Flews du mal. 



181. See Selected Letters ofC/iarles Baudelaire, pp. 114-115. 

182. Title of the volume of Baudelaire's criticism published posthumously in 1868 by 
Asselineau and Banville. 

183. Baudelaire, The Mirrw of Art, p. 191. 

184. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 80. 

185. Ibid., p. 81. 

186. Ibid., pp. 83-84. 

187. Ibid., p. 83. 

188. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, pp. 195-196. 

189. Ibid., p. 38. 

190. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, pp. 43-45. 

191. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, p. 246. 

192. Ibid., pp. 46, 68. 

193. Ibid., p. 12. 

194 . Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 97. Gauloiserie: licentious or improper remark, 
coarse jest. 

195. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare," -p. 189. "In unison" here translates en societe. 

196. Ibid., p. 166. 

197. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 45. 

198. Baudelaire, The Minor oJArt, pp. 222-223 ("The Salon of 1859"); Flowers of Evil 
(trans. Fowlie), p. 97 ("The Voyage"). 

199. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, p. 99. On gaulouerie, see note 194 above. Vaudevilles 
were light theatrical entertainments with song and dance. 

200. Ibid., p. 103 ("la loi fatale du travail attrayant"). 

201. Ibid., p. 68. Rolf Tiedemann points out that the emphasis on "fathomless" {insondes) 
is Benjamin's. 

202. Ibid., p. 13. 

203. Edmond andjules de Goncourt, The Goncourt Journals, 1851-1870, trans. Lewis 
Galantiere (Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, Doran, 1937), p. 35. 

204 . Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 152 ("Femmes damnees: Delphine et Hip- 
polyte"). [R.T.] In English in The Flowers of Evil, ed. Marthiel and Jackson Mathews 
(New %rk: New Directions, 1963), p. 152 (trans. Aldous Huxley). 

205. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, p. 3 ("Artist's Confiteor"). 

206. This article is not found in Le 7«m/.m ofjune 4, 1917. [R.T.] 

207. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare "-p. 160 ("Fusees"). 

208. Baudelaire, Le s Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 136 ("A Voyage to Cythera"). 

209. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 84 ("My Heart Laid Bare"). 

210. Gide, "Baudelaire and M. Faguet," Pretexts, p. 168. 

211. Ibid., pp. 168, 170. Baudelaire's phrase is from "The Salon of 1859" {The Minor »f 
Art, p. 232). Gide emphasizes the importance of the critical faculty to Baudelaire's 
poetic production. 

212. Gide, Pretexts, p. 167. 

213. Ibid., p. 159. 

214. Ibid., p. 163n. Baudelaire's phrase, 'Je hais le mouvement," is from "La Beaute." In 
English in Flowers of Evil (trans. Fowlie), p. 37. 

215. Proust, preface to Paul Morand, Fancy Goods, trans. Ezra Pound (New "Vbrk: New 
Directions, 1984), pp. 5-6. For die line from Baudelaire's "Femmes damnees," see 
J41a,2. 

216. See Proust, preface to Morand, Fancy Goods, pp. 6-8: "Sainte-Beuve, whose stupid- 
ity displays itself to the point where one asks whether it isn't a feint or a coward- 



ice. . . . [He] thinks he has been very good to Baudelaire ... in the complete dearth 
of encouragement." 

217. Marcel Proust, "About Baudelaire," in Marcel Proust: A Selection from His Miscellane- 
ous Writings, trans. Gerard Hopkins (London: Allan Wmgate, 1948), p. 192. Proust 
cites the fourteenth stanza of "The Little Old Women;" Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. 
Howard), pp. 95-96. 

218. Marcel Proust: A Selection, p. 204. 

219. Ibid., p. 194. 

220. Etienne Pivert de Senancour, Obermann, trans, anonymous (London: Philip Wellby, 
1903), p. 231 (letter 52). Senancour actually wrote "naturelle a l'honune." 

221. This passage does not appear in the English translation of Joseph de Maistre, "The 
Saint-Petersburg Dialogues," in The Works of Joseph de Maistre, trans. Jack Lively 
(New York: Macmillan, 1965). 

222. Selected Letters o f C/tarles Baudelaire, p. 123. 

223. Ibid., p. 151 (ca. March 1860). 

224. Baudelaire, T/ie Prose Poems and "La Fa?ifarlo,"p. 115. 

225. Marcel Proust: A Selection, pp. 191, 190. 

226. Ibid., p. 199. Proust's phrase, several times cited in succeeding entries of Convolute 
J, is "un etrange sectionnement du temps." 

227. Ibid., p. 199. Passages by Baudelaire are from The Complete Verse, pp. 236, 71. 

228. Marcel Proust: A Selection, p. 202. 

229. Ibid., pp. 203-204 (passages from Vigny translated into English). 

230. Thomas a Kempis, De imitatione Christi, in Thomas a Kempis, Opera Omnia, vol. 7 
(Freiburg, 1904), p. 38. [R.T.] In English in The Imitation of Cloist, trans, anony- 
mous (1504; rpt. London: J. M. Dent, 1910), pp. 38-39 ("On Love of Silence and 
Solitude"): "What canst thou see elsewhere that thou canst not see here? Lo here 
heaven earth and all elements and of these all things are made." 

231. Baudelaire: A S elf-Portrait, p. 43. 

232. Ibid, p. 54. 

233. Ibid, p. 65 ("hastily written in order to earn some money"). 

234. Ibid, p. 68. 

235. Ibid, p. 95. 

236. Ibid, p. 102. 

237. Selected Letters of Charles Baudelaire, p. 97. 

238. Baudelaire: A Self- Portrait, p. 172. 

239. Ibid, p. 174. 

240. Selected Letters of Cliarles Baudelaire, p. 190. 

241. Ibid, p. 195. 

242. The article, by Arthur Arnould, "Edgar Poe: L'homme, l'artiste et Poeuvre," appear- 
ing in the Apriljune, and July issues, referred to Baudelaire's translations. 

243. Baudelaire: A Self Portrait, p. 234. 

244. Selected Letters o f Cliarles Baudelaire, p. 237. 

245. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, pp. 62, 63 (written in an album for Mme. Francine 
Ledoux in 1851, just before the appearance of "L'Ecole pai'enne"). 

246. Ibid, p. 74. 

247. "The Painter of Modem Life," p. 36. 

248. See GS, vol. 1, p. 647n. [R.T.] In English in Benjamin, "On Some Motifs in Baude- 
laire," Illuminations, p. 200nl7. 

249. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 258. 

250. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare," pp. 171, 173-174. 



251. Ibid., pp. 171, 172, 173. Nietzsche's doctrine of "the last man" is in section 5 of 
"Zarathustra's Prologue," in Also sprach Zarathxntra (Thus Spoke Zarathustra) . 

252. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare,"]). 190. 

253. Ibid., p. 179. The note continues: "Nevertheless, a most vivid liking for life and 
pleasure." 

254. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, p. 42 ("La verite, pour etre multiple, n'est pas dou- 
ble"). 

255. Ibid., p. 18. 

256. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 82. 

257. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 114 (missing sentence supplied) . 

258. Ibid., p. 118. 

259. Baudelaire as a Litermy Critic, p. 75. "Gist" is intended to translate Gehalt, a term 
derived from Goethe. See Benjamin, GS, vol. 2, p. 105 (Gehalt as innere Form), and 
vol. 4, p. 107 (Gehalt as unity of Form and Inlialt). In English in Benjamin, SJV, vol. 
1, pp. 18,459. 

260. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, pp. 75, 77. 

261. SeeJ44a,2. Les Epaves (Flotsam) was published in 1866; "Tableaux parisiens" is the 
second section of Les Flews clu mal. 

262. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 76. 

263. See Baudelaire, Para Spleen, pp. 50-51. 

264. Ibid., p. 7. On being roused from an opium trance. 

265. Baudelaire, Tlie Mirror of Art, pp. 3-4. 

266. He says this in his "Notes stir Les Liaisons dangereuses" (ca. 1864); see Oeuvres 
completes, ed. RufF, p. 644, and note toJ27,3 (note 131 in Convolutej). 

267. "A man of good will." 

268. Baudelaire as a Liter aiy Critic, p. 134. 

269. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 136; "My Heart Laid Bare,"-p. 177. 

270. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 181. 

271. SeeJ44,5. 

272. A play on words is lost here: "diiig-fest gemacht . . . gegen die verdinglichte Welt." 

273. Selected Letters of Charles Baudelaire, p. 244 (to Sainte-Beuve). 

274. Ibid., p. 245. Followed by: "In truth, forgive me! i'm wandering. I've never dared 
say so much to you." 

275. Ibid., p. 148. 

276. Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern Life," -p. 195. On le pomifsee note toJl,l (note 3 
in Convolutej). 

277. Ibid., p. 188. 

278. Ibid., p. 182. 

279. Ibid., pp. 176-177. 

280. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 75 ("Spleen II"). For the citation 
from Claudel, which appears in German here, see J33,8. On "souvenirs," see 0°,76 
in "First Sketches." 

281. See Hermann Usener, Gbtternamen: Versuch einer Lehre von der religidsen Be- 
gnffsbildung (Bonn, 1896). [R.T.] 

282. In Les Fleurs du mal. 

283. Benjamin, Tlie Origin tf German Tragic Drama, trans. John Osborne (London: 
Verso, 1977), p. 226. "Experience," in this entry, translates Erfahrung. 

284. Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern £z/f,"pp. 152-153. 

285. Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic Drama, p. 227. "Experience," in tliis entry, 
translates Erlebnis. 

286. Ibid., p. 183. 



287. Ibid. 

288. Ibid., p. 230. "Illusion" in this citation translates Scliein. 

289. Ibid., p. 232. 

290. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 144. 

291. Baudelaire, Les Fleitrs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 170. "Experiences," in this entry, 
translates Erlebnisse, whereas, inJ55,13 below, it translates Erjuhrungen. 

292. Baudelaire, The Flowers of Evil, pp. 197-198 (trans. Sir John Squire). 

293. Ibid., p. 192 (trans. Doreen Bell). 

294. Baudelaire, Les Fleitrs du mal (trans. Howard), pp. 165; 164. 

295. Ibid., p. 80. 

296. Poem in Les Fleurs du mal. 

297 '. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 33. 

298. Ibid., p. 31. 

299. Ibid., p. 155. 

300. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, pp. 231-232. 

301. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 136. 

302. Baudelaire, The Flowers of Evil, p. Ill (trans. Roy Campbell) . 

303. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 144. 

304. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard) , p. 164. 

305. Ibid., p. 165. 

306. SeeJ15,l. 

307. Baudelaire, The Flowers of Evil, p. xxx (trans. Jackson Mathews). 

308. Ibid., p. xxix. 

309. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 115 (versiied). 

310. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 45 ('Je te domie ces vers"). 

311. Ibid., p. 17 ("Les Phares"). 

312. Baudelaire, Flowers of Evil (trans. Fowlie), p. 31. 

313. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), pp. 18-19. 

314. An allusion to the later philosophy of Edmund Husserl. 

315. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 65. 

316. Benjamin indicates in "Zentralpark" (no. 23) that these thoughts, as well as the 
words quoted in J57a,2, come from his friend Adrierme Monnier, publisher and 
bookseller, with whom he evidently had several conversations about Baudelaire. 
See Benjamin, GS, vol. 1 , p. 673. In English in "Central Park," trans. Lloyd Spencer, 
Neiu German Critique, no. 34 (Winter 1985), pp. 43-44. 

317. For the source of the quotations, see note 316 above. Le Rogue: temper, choler, bad 
humor. 

318. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 206. Benjamin indicates in "Zentralpark" (no. 25) 
that the remarks in this passage, and in the following one on Gemutlichkeit ("cozi- 
ness"), stem from Bertolt Brecht. 

319. See note toJl,l. 

320. "Tendenz seiner Lyrik zur Scheinlosigkeit." 

321. In the German text, the numbering of the entries goes directly fromJ58a,6 toJ59,2; 
there is noJ59,l. 

322. SeeJl,6. 

323. Title of prose poem 46 in Spleen de Paris (in English in Paiis Spleen, p. 94). ("Perte 
d'aureole" can also be translated as "loss of aura") 

324. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 45. It is actually the sentence before this one in 
"Fusees" ("This book is not for my wives, my daughters, or my sisters") that 
Baudelaire used in die first and second drafts of a preface to Les Fleurs du mal. 



325. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 89 ("Les Petites Vieilles"). [R.T.] In English 
in The Complete Verse, p. 180. 

326. Baudelaire, 111 e Complete Verse, p. 197. 

327. Or, alternatively: The figure of impotence is the key to Baudelaire's solitude. 

328. Mayeux and the ragpicker {chiffonnier philosophe) are characters created by die artist 
Charles Travies de Wlers (1804-1859), discussed by Baudelaire in "Quelques cari- 
caturistes francais" (Some French Caricaturists). Thomas Vireloque is a creation of 
Gavarni, and the Bonapartist Ratapoil is a creation of Daumier. See hi, 9. The 
Parisian urchin Gavroche is a character in Hugo's Les Miserables. 

329. Baudelaire, Les Flews du mal (trans. Howard), p. 62. 

330. "Girls" is in English in the original. See J66,8. 

331. Friedrich Nietzsche, Die froldiche Wissenschqft (book 4, no. 295). [R.T.] In English in 
Joyful Wisdom, trans. Thomas Common (New York: Frederick Ungar, 1960), p. 229. 

332. Soren Kierkegaard, Eit/ier/Oi; vol. 1, trans. D. F. Swenson and L. M. Swenson, rev. 
H. A.Johnson (1944; rpt. New York: Anchor, 1959), p. 36. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du 
mal (trans. Howard), p. 75. 

333. Kierkegaard, Eit/ier/Ot; vol. 1, p. 41. 

334. Ibid., p. 281. 

335. Ibid., p. 287. 

336. Ibid. 

337. Ibid., pp. 221-222. 

338. Kierkegaard, Either/Or, vol. 2, trans. Walter Lowrie, rev. Howard A. Johnson 
(1944; rpt. New York: Anchor, 1959), p. 164. 

339. Ibid., p. 234. On the "strange sectioning of time," seeJ44,5. 

340. Baudelaire, 7h Minor of Art, p. 267. 

341. Gottfried Keller, "Tod und Dichter," Werke, vol. 1 (Zurich, 1971), p. 385. [R.T.] 

342. Engels, "Socialism: Utopian and Scientific" (excerpt from Anti-DiihringBrsi publish- 
ed in French in 1880), in Marx and Engels, Basic Writings on Politics and Philosophy, 
ed. Lewis Feuer (New York: Anchor, 1959), p. 77 (trans. E. Aveling). See W15a,l. 

343. Immanuel Kant, Critique of Practical Reason, trans. Lewis White Beck (Chicago: 
University of Chicago Press, 1949), p. 258. 

344. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, ed. Pichois, vol. 1, p. 76 ("Le Gout du neant"). [R.T.] 
In English in 7he Complete Verse, p. 160. 

345. "Tire Saint-Petersburg Dialogues," in The Works of Joseph de Maistre, trans. Jack 
Lively (New York: Macmillan, 1965), pp. 203-204. 

346. Ibid., p. 253. 

347. Ibid., pp. 268-269. 

348. Ibid., p. 276. 

349. "A dire mystery." 

350. The Works of Joseph de Maistre, p. 254. 

351. Baudelaire, T)ie Flowers of Evil, p. 145 ("Destruction," trans. C. F. Maclntyre). 

352. A term popularized by the National Socialists beginning in the early 1920s. 

353. Bertolt Brecht, Gesamrnelte Werke, 8 vols. (Frankfurt am Main: 1967), vol. 4, 
pp. 271-273 ("Ich bin ein Dreck"). [R.T.] In English in Brecht, Poems: 1913-1956, 
ed.Jolin Willett and Ralph Manheim (New York: Methuen, 1987), pp. 135-136 ("A 
Reader for Those Who Live in Cities"). 

354. Lorettes was a term originated by the journalist Nestor Roqueplan in 1840 for ladies 
of easy virtue, many of whom lived in the reconstructed quarter surrounding the 
church of Notre-Dame de Lorette. 

355. Jules Renard, Journal inedit, 1887-1895 (Paris, 1925), p. 11. [R.T.] Citation above 
from Baudelaire's "The Irremediable," in The Complete Verse, p. 166. Tie conversa- 



tion between the jack of hearts and the queen of spades is at the end of "Spleen I." 
Compare J69, 2. 

356. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 121. 

357. Baudelaire, Correspondance , vol. 2, p. 584. [R.T.] 

358. Baudelaire, Artificial Paradise, trans. Ellen Fox (New York: Herder and Herder, 
1971), pp. 7-8. Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 114 ("Ragpickers' Wme"). 

359. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 205. 

360. Ibid., p. 211. On the "sectioning of time," seeJ44,5. 

361. Baudelaire, "Lovers' Wine," Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 117 ("tourbillon 
intelligent"). 

362. "Lesbos," Les Fleurs dumal (trans. Howard), p. 124. 

363. Ibid., p. 132. 

364. Ibid., p. 60. 

365. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 162. 

366. Poe, The Complete lales and Poems, p. 449. The plirase "mental pendulous pulsa- 
tion" appears in die Baudelaire translation used by Benjamin as "vibration du 
pendule mental" ("vibration of the mental pendulum"). 

367. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 150. 

368. Ibid., p. 31; "My Heart Laid Bare" p. 157. 

369. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 160. 

370. Ibid., p. 162. 

371. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 77 

372. Ibid., pp. 166 ("other, brighter worlds" translates "mondes singuliers"); 174. 

373. Baudelaire, Vers retrouves: Juvenilia, Sonnets, introduction and notes by Jules 
Mouquet (Paris, 1929), pp. 57-59. [R.T.] In English in The Complete Verse, p. 378; 
Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 81. 

374. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1: Les Fleurs du mal. Les Epaves, ed. Jacques 
Crepet, 2nd ed. (Paris, 1930), p. 449. [R.T.] 

375. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 250. 

376. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), pp. 11, 12. 

377. Ibid., p. 175. 

378. Allusion to the "familiar eyes" of the poem "Correspondences," in Baudelaire, The 
Flowers of Evil, p. 12 (trans. Richard Wilbur). 

379. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 168. 

380. Baudelaire, "Bohemiens en voyage," Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 18. [R.T.] 

381. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 152 ("LeMortJoyeux"). 

382. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 32. 

383. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 197. 

384. Ibid., p. 193 ("The Dance ofDeath"); Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 116; The 
Complete Verse, p. 86. 

385. The Flowers of Evil, p. 91 (trans. Anthony Hecht). 

386. Ibid. 

387. Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), pp. 36-37 ("De Profundis Clamavi"). 

388. Goethe, Faust, trans. Walter Kaufmann (New York: Anchor, 1963), p. 469 (line 
11,582). 

389. SeeJ43a,3 ("versent quelque heroisme au coeur des citadins"). 

390. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 91 ("Et qui, dans ces soirs d'or ou I'on se sent 
revivre'"— Benjamin's emphasis. [R.T.] hi English in The Complete Verse, p. 183 ("The 
Little Old Women," section 3). 

391. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 90. [R-T] In English in The Complete Verse, 
p. 182 ("The Little Old Women," section 2). 



392. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 94. 

393. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 196 ("I have not forgotten ..." and "The great- 
hearted servant . . . , "as numbered in the edition of 1861). 

394. Ibid., p. 169 ("Parisian Landscape"). 

395. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 93 ("Le Squelette laboureur"). [R.T.] In 
English in The Complete Verse, p. 187. 

396. Baudelaire, The Floiuers if Evil, p. 128 (trans. Edna St. VmcentMillay). 

397. Baudelaire, Conespondance , vol. 2, p. 585. [R.T.] 

398. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare" 'p. 170. Benjamin interprets Baudelaire's "grands 
jours" as "Tage der Wiederkehr." 

399. Baudelaire, Oemres completes, vol. 1, p. 94 ("Le Crepuscule du soir"). [R.T.] In 
English in Les Fleurs clu mal (trans. Howard), p. 99. 

400. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 85. 

401. "Selige Sebnsucht," from Goethe's West-Ostlic/ier Divan; in English in Selected Verse, 
trans. David Luke (New York: Penguin, 1964), p. 240. 

402. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 144. Goethe, West-Eastern Divan, trans. J. Whaley 
(London: Oswald Wolff, 1974), p. 213 ("Resonances"). The emphasis, as Rolf 
Tiedemann points out, is Benjamin's. 

403. Marx, The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte, trans, anonymous (New York: 
International Publishers, 1963), pp. 43-44. 

404. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Correspondence, 1846-1895, trans. Dona Torr 
(London: Martin Lawrence, 1934), p. 50. The "ass" in question is Louis Bonaparte, 
who had just dissolved the National Assembly and the Council of State and, a year 
later, was to be proclaimed Emperor Napoleon III. The Eighteenth Brumaire (No- 
vember 9, 1799) is the date of Napoleon I's coup d'etat, in which he overthrew the 
Directory and dissolved the Council of Five Hundred. 

405. Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 38, trans. Peter and Betty Ross (New York: 
International Publishers, 1982), p. 511. 

406. Marx, The Eighteenth Brumaire qfLouu Bonaparte, p. 23. 

407. Ibid., p. 25. 

408. Ibid., pp. 69-70. 

409. Ibid., p. 83. 

410. Ibid., pp. 111-112. 

411. Ibid., p. 120. 

412. Ibid., p. 129. 

413. Fecliten: "to fence" and "to go begging." 

414. Marx, The Eighteenth Brmmire, p. 134. 

415. Ibid., p. 130. 

416. Ibid., p. 131. 

417. Ibid., p. 134. Marx's note at this point: "In his work Cousine Bette, Balzac delineates 
the thoroughly dissolute Parisian philistine in Crevel, a character which he draws 
after the model of Dr. Veron, the proprietor of Le Constitutionnel." 

418. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 192 ("Pro jets d'tui epilogue pour l'edition de 
1861"). [R.T.] In English in The Complete Verse, p. 250. 

419. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, p. 43. 

420. Ibid., p. 44. 

421. Friedrich Nietzsche, Ecce Homo, trans. Walter Kaufmaim (New York: Vintage, 
1969), pp. 297-298. On the Fort du Taureau, see the Conclusion to the Expose of 
1939. 

422. In English in the original. 

423. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 122 ("Lc Reniement de Saint Pierre"). [R.T] 



In English in The Complete Verse, p. 228. Double meaning of the word IVirtsc/iqfl: 
"husbandry" and "lodging"; "farm" and "public inn." Baudelaire refers to life as an 
aubergc ("inn") at the conclusion of Les Paradis artijiciels. 

424. Goethe, Selected Verse, p. 240. 

425. Auguste Blanqui, L'Etemitepar les astres (Paris, 1872), p. 74. [R.T.] 

426. Blanqui, L'Eteniite' par les astres, p. 74. [R.T.] Baudelaire, Les Flews du mal (trans. 
Howard), p. 93; and The Complete Verse, p. 179. 

427. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 87 ("Les Sept Vieillards"). [R.T.] In English 
in The Complete Verse, p. 177. 

428. Emile Verhaeren, Les Villes tentaadaires (Paris, 1904), p. 119 ("LAme de la ville"). 
[R.T.] 

429. Allusion to the Gospels. See Mark, 4:21. 

430. Baudelaire, The Flowers of Evil, p. Ill (trans. Roy Campbell). 

431. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare,' 'p. 110 ("The Poem of Hashish," section 4). 

432. Ibid., p. 111. 

433. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), pp. 359-360. 

434. Baudelaire, The Flowers of Evil, trans. James McGowan (New York: Oxford Univer- 
sity Press, 1993), p. 25. 

435. See Friedrich von Bezold, Das Fortleben der antiken Gutter im mittelalterliclwn Human- 
ismus (Bonn and Leipzig, 1922). [R.T.] 

436. Reference has not been traced. 

437. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 104 ("Le Crepuscule du matin"). [R.T.] In 
English in The Complete Verse, p. 203: "The debauched made their way homeward, 
racked by their labors." 

438. Baudelaire, The Flowers t/Evil, p. 12, "Correspondences" (trans. Richard Wilbur). 

439. Marx, The Eigltteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte, p. 106. 

440. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 5 ("To the Reader"). 

441. 'Jerky gait" {pas saccade) is from Nadar's description of Baudelaire: see Benjamin, 
GS, vol. 1, p. 583 n.35. [R.T.] In English in C/iarles Baudelaire: A Lyric Poet in tlw 
Era of High Capitalum, trans. Harry Zohn (London: Verso, 1973), p. 80. The phrase 
of Baudelaire's is from "The Salon of 1846" (The Mirror of Art, p. 128). 

442. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, p. 76. 

443. Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic Drama, p. 155. Acedia: sloth. 

444. Nietzsche, Philosophy in tlw Tragic Age of t/w Greeks, trans. Marianne Cowan (Wash- 
ington, D.C.: Regnery Gateway, 1962), p. 67. 

445. Nietzsche, The Will to Power, trans. Walter Kaufmami and R.J. Hollingdale (New 
York: Vintage, 1968), p. 21 (no. 31). 

446. Ibid., p. 143 (no. 247). 

447. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 174 ("The Abyss"). Nietzsche, 
Thus Spoke Zcirathustra, trans. R.J. Hollingdale (Baltimore: Penguin, 1961), p. 167 
("The Stillest Hour"). 

448. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal (trans. Howard), p. 164. 

449. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, pp. 338-339. 

450. Arthur Rimbaud, Complete Wtrks, Selected Letters, trans. Wallace Fowlie (Chicago: 
University of Chicago Press, 1966), p. 239. 

451. Ibid., p. 175. 

452. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare "-p. 168 ("Fusees"). See note tojl.l. 

453. A paperbound documentary literature popular in Paris during the 1840s. See Ben- 
jamin's C/iarles Baudelaire: A Lyric Poet in the Era of High Capitalism, pp. 35-36. 



454. "Die Moderne hat die Antike wie einen Alb, der im Schlaf liber sie gekommen ist." 
Alb can also mean "incubus." 

455. Baudelaire, "To a Woman Passing By" The Floiuers of Evil (trans. McGowan), 
p. 189. 

456. Baudelaire, "The "Voyage," The Complete Verse, p. 247. The Life and Writings of Tur- 
got, ed. W. Walker Stephens (London: Longmans, Green 1895), p. 310. 

457. Hermann Lotze, Microcosmus, trans. Elizabeth Hamilton and E. E. Constance Jones 
(New York: Scribner and Welford, 1888), vol. 2, p. 387. The excerpt quoted in 
J83a,2 is found on p. 388. 

458. See the story ofjacob and Esau in Genesis 25, verses 29-34. 

459. Benjamin, "Surrealism," trans. Edmund Jephcott, in SW,vo\. 2, p. 213. 

460. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare" -p. 107 ("lire Poem of Hashish"). 

461. See Brecht, Gesammelte Werke, vol. 8. pp. 408-410 ("Die Schonheit in den Gedi- 
chten des Baudelaire") for the derivation of J84a,2, 3, and 4. [R.T.] 

462. Baudelaire, Oeuures completes, vol. 2, p. 709. [R.T.] In English in "Tlie Painter of' 
Modern Lijfef'p. 26. 

463. Baudelaire, The Flowers of Evil, p. 201 (trans. Robert Lowell). 

464. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare,'' 'p. 160. 

465. Ibid., pp. 200-201. 

466. Ibid., pp. 190, 199 ("My Heart Laid Bare"). "Qu'est-ce que l'amour? Le besoin de 
sortir de soi . . . et l'arriste ne sort jamais de lui-meme." 

467. Baudelaire, Intimate Journals, p. 85. 

468. Ibid., p. 67. 

469. Johan Huizinga, The Waning of the Middle Ages, trans. F. Hopman (New York: 
Anchor, 1954), pp. 145-146. 

470. Ibid., p. 210. 

471. Title of a book published in Paris in 1844 lampooning various actresses, such as 
Rachel, and playwrights, such as Francois Ponsard. Jacques Crepet republished the 
work in 1938, claiming Baudelaire as one of the authors. 

472. Joseph de Maistre, Oeuvres completes (Lyons, 1884), vol. 5, pp. 102ff. [R.T.] This 

passage is not found in the translation of de Maistre cited above (note 345). 

473. Goethe, Tirquato Tasso, Act V, scene 5 (lines 3432fF.). [R.T.] In English in Tarquato 
Tasso, trans. Alan and Sandy Brownjohn (London: Angel Books, 1985), p. 136. 

474. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, p. 169 ("Townscape"). Ruff's emphasis. Compare 
the discussion in M. A. Ruff, Baudelaire, trans. Agnes Kertesz (New York: New York 
University Press, 1966), pp. 120-121, where comparaisons crues is rendered as "fresh- 
hewn comparisons." 

475. Trans. Arthur Symons, The Symbolist Movement in Literature (1919; rpt. New York: 
Dutton, 1958), p. 67. 

476. Baudelaire: A Self Portrait, p. 41. 

477. Ibid., p. 195 (letter to his mother of December 31, 1863). 

478. Text written in French by Benjamin. 

479. Friedrich Scblegel, "Lucinde" and t/ie Fragments, trans. Peter Firchow (Minneapolis: 
University of Minnesota Press, 1971), pp. 67-68. 

480. Ibid., pp. 63-64. 

481. Ibid., pp. 65-66. 

482. Baudelaire, Oeuvres completes, vol. 1, p. 94 ("Le Crepuscule du soir"). [R.T.] In 
English in The Flowers of Evil, p. 120 (trans. David Paul). 

483. The election of Louis Napoleon as president in 1848, with more than twice as many 
votes as all other candidates combined. 

484. The cite Doree ("gilded city" from the name of M. Dore, one-time owner of the land) 



was a site in Paris occupied by workers from the national workshops in 1848, and 
gradually transformed into a sink of corruption. [J.L.] 

485. See Marx, Capital, vol. 1, pp. 435-437 ("Modern Manufacture"). 

486. Marcel Proust, Remembrance ofTlungs Past, vol. 1, trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New 
York: Random House, 1925), p. 126. Proust goes on, in this paragraph, to define 
evil in terms of indifference to the suffering one causes. On the note by Anatole 
France mentioned by Benjamin at this juncture, see J17a,l. 

487. Proust, Remembrance of Things Past , vol. 1, p. 62. 

488. Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic Drama, p. 227. SeeJ53a,4. 

489. Benjamin later wrote Spekulant (speculator) over Miissiggdnger (idler) without strik- 
ing the latter. [R.T.] 

490. Baudelaire, Selected Letters, p. 151. 

491. Proust, Remembrance ofThings Past, vol. 1, p. 819. 

492. Ibid., p. 490. For the passage on Meryon, seeJ2,l. 

493. Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mod (trans. Howard), p. 5. Proust, Remembrance ofTlungs 
Past, vol. 2, The Captive, trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New York: Random House, 
1929), pp. 645-646. 

494. Proust, Remembrance ofThings Past, vol. 2, p. 449. 

495. Written by Benjamin in French. 

496. Jean Jacques Rousseau, Tlie Confessions, trans. J. M. Cohen (Baltimore: Penguin, 
1954), p. 593. 

497. Baudelaire as a Literary Clitic, p. 116 (preface to "Berenice"). 

498. Oswald Spengler, The Decline of the West, vol. 2, trans. Charles Francis Atkinson 
(New York: Knopf, 1928), pp. 101-102. 

499. Ibid., p. 104. 

500. "Les Sept Vieillards" was written and published in 1859, as part of the series 
Fantomes parisiens. 

501. Max Horkheimer, "Materialism and Morality," in Between Philosophy and Social 
Science, trans. G. Frederick Hunter, Matthew S. Kramer, and John Torpey (Cam- 
bridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 1993), p. 40. 



K [Dream City and Dream House, . . . Jung] 

1. Benjamin quotes here from Regis Messac, Le "Detective Ntvel" et I'infiuence de la 
pensee scientifique (Paris, 1929), p. 420. [R.T.] 

2. Eingedenken: Benjamin's coinage from the preposition eingedcidi ("mindful of") and 
the verb gedenken ("bear in mind," "remember"). This verbal noun has a more 
active sense than Erinnenmg ("memory"). 

3. For the relevant passage from Proust, see K8a,2. On "the darkness of the lived 
moment," see Enist Bloch, The Principle of Hope, trans. Neville Plaice, Stephen 
Plaice, and Paul Knight (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 1986), p. 290. 

4. Firderung, which, in mining, has the sense of "drawing up," "hauling to the sur- 
face." Benjamin, like Heidegger, plays on the archaic verb we sen ("to be") embedded 
in the Gewesenen ("what has been"); he cites the being in what has been. Com- 
pare D°,6, on the power of "dis tillin g" the present as inmost essence of what has 
been. 

5. Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig arid Berlin, 1928), p. 3. [R.T.] 

6. The reference is to Ambrose Bierce's short story "An Occurrence at Owl Creek 
Bridge," published in 1891 (part of Bierce's collection In t/ie Midst of Life). Ben- 



jarnin's phrase, in the second sentence of this entry, is "magnetopathische Experi- 
ence." 

7. Benjamin contrasts Proust's Erlebnis with our Erfahrung ("was Proust . . . erlebte, das 
haben wir . . . zu erfahren"). The former is, for Benjamin, an experience of the 
moment; the latter is long experience over time, the fruit of work and tradition. 
Erfalirungis formed out of multiple Erlebnusen (GS, vol. 1, p. 1183). Compare mla,3, 
andm2a,4. 

8. Ernst Bloch, Heritage of Our Times, trans. Neville Plaice and Stephen Plaice 
(Berkeley: University of California Press, 1991), p. 313. 

9. Karl Marx, A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy, trans. S. W. Ryazanskaya 
(New York: International Publishers, 1970), p. 217. 

10. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 354. 

11. Ibid., pp. 359-60. 

12. It is not certain whether Benjamin wrote Auswic/dunghere or Auswirhmg. 

13. Marcel Proust: A Selection from His Miscellaneous Writings, trans. Gerard Hopkins 
(London: Allan Wingate, 1948), p. 233. 

14. That "doleful something." 

15. This letter from Theodor Adorno to Benjamin has not been preserved. But see 
Adorno's Minima Moralia, section 29. [R.T.] In English in Minima Moralia, trans. 
E. F. NJephcott (London: Verso, 1974), p. 49. 

16. The obelisk was originally erected in the Egyptian city of Luxor by Ramses II. In 
1831, it was transplanted to the Place de le Concorde in Paris. Under the name of the 
Place de la Revolution, this square had served as the site of guillotining from 1793 to 
1795. 

17. Victor Hugo, The Man Wlm Laughs, trans. Joseph L. Blamire (1889; rpt. Milpitas, 
Calif.: Atlantean Press, 1991), p. 151. The sleeping town in question is actually 
Melcombe Regis, next to Weymouth, on tile coast of England. 

18. C. G.Jung, "Analytic Psychology and Weltanschauung," trans. R. F. C. Hull, Col- 
lected Worlis, vol. 8 (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1960), p. 376. 

19. Jung, Modern Man in Search of a Soid, trans. W. S. Dell and Cary F. Baynes (New 
York: Harcourt, Brace, 1934), pp. 110; 228. 

20. Ibid., p. 241. 

21. Aldous Huxley, Beyond the Mexique Bay (London: Chatto arid Windus, 1934), pp. 56, 
60. 

22. This passage does not appear in the English-language edition of Huizinga, The Wan- 
ingof the Middle Ages (1949; rpt. Garden City, N.Y.: Anchor, 1954). 

23. Theodor Reik, Surpiise and the Psycho-Analyst: On the Cmijecture and Comprehension of 
Unconscious Processes, trans. Margaret M. Green (New York: Dutton, 1937), pp. 129- 
131. "Memory" here translates GedMchtnis; "reminiscence" translates Erinnerung. 

24. Ibid., p. 130. "Experience" here translates Erlebnis. 

25. Marcel Proust, Remembrance of Hangs Past, vol. 2 (New York: Random House, 1932), 
p. 619 (T/ie Captive, trans. C. K. Scott MoncriefF). 

26. Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 1, trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New York: 
Random House, 1925), pp. 33-34 (Swann's Wky). MoncrielF translates la ine moire 
volontaire here as "an exercise of the will." 

27. Ibid., p. 5. 

28. Ibid., p. 779 {The Guer mantes JVky). 

29. Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 2, pp. 1030-1031 (T/ie Past Recaptured, trans. 



Frederick A. Blossom). The lines by Baudelaire are from Les Fleurs du mal, trans. 
Richard Howard (Boston: Godine, 1982), pp. 31 ("The Head of Hair"), 30 ("By 
Association"). 

L [Dream House, Museum, Spa] 

1. See Le Corbusier, The City of Tomorrow and Its Planning, trans. Frederick Etchells 
(1929; rpt. New "fork: Dover, 1987), pp. 163-178. In this entry and elsewhere, 
"glance" translates Blick, which in earlier usage meant "a flashing," "a lighting up," "a 
shining." 

2. Andre Breton, Nadja, trans. Richard Howard (New York: Grove, 1960), p. 112. 

3. Possible allusion to the rite of incubation practiced in the temples of Aesculapius in 
ancient Greece. (See L3,l.) The incubant would sleep within the precincts of the 
temple for the purpose of receiving a dream vision of the healing god. Often these 
sanctuaries were equipped with theaters, gynmasia, and baths. On the other hand, 
Benjamin might be alluding here to the hospitals of Paris, such as the Hotel-Dieu 
(near Notre Dame), a large classical-style building with an inner courtyard, ornamen- 
tal gardens, frescoes, and long arcaded galleries around the courtyard and in the 
interior. "Corridors," in tliis entry, translates Wandelhallen. "Turn into their recovery" 
translates Hirer Gesundung entgegenwandeln. And "watering place," here, translates 
Brunnenlialle (literally, "hall of fountains"), elsewhere translated as "spa" and "medici- 
nal spring." 

4. Castan's panopticon was located inside the so-called Linden Arcade or Kaisergalerie 
in Berlin, before moving across the street in 1888. 

5. Victor Hugo, Les Muerables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
em Library, 1992), p. 1089. 

6. Ibid, p. 1090. 

7. Ibid, pp. 1098-1099. 

8. Ibid, pp. 1093, 1099. 

9. Ibid, pp. 1094, 1095, 1096. 

10. SeeI4a,l,andR2,2. [R.T.] 

11. Charles Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, trans. Louise Varese (New York: New Directions, 
1947), p. 60. ("The Generous Gambler"). 

12. That is, he travels back into the ghost world. (Compare L2,7.) "Gate-way," here, 
translates Tor- Weg: threshold as passage, or passage as threshold. 

13. Hugo, Les Miserable s, p. 644. 

M [The Flaneur] 

1. Hugo von Hofmannsthal, "Der Tor und der Tod" (1894), Gesammelte Werhe, ed. 
Herbert Steiner (1952), p. 220. [R.T.] 

2. Victor Hugo, Les Muerables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
em Library, 1992), p. 513. 

3. "Um sich zu denken" is what appears in the manuscript; denken is arguably a slip of 
the pen for decken ("in order to coincide with one another"), which would accord with 
Uberdec/iung ("covering," "overlap") in the first sentence. [R.T.] 

4. See "Hashish in Marseilles," in SW, vol. 2, p. 677. "Intoxicated," in this entry and 
elsewhere in the Arcades, translates rauschhaft. 

5. Last three sentences adapted from the protocol to Benjamin's second experience with 



hashish (GS, vol. 6, p. 564; in English in SW, vol. 2, p. 88). See also 12,6; I2a,l; 
R2a,3; and G°,5. 

6. "Far-ofF times and places" translates Lander- and Zeitenfernen, which could be ren- 
dered more literally as "geographic and temporal distances." At issue is a spatiotem- 
poral "superposition" (Mla,l). 

7. Marcel Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 1, trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New 
York: Random House, 1925), p. 137. 

8. Voyage autour de ma chambre (Voyage around My Room) : title of a work published in 
1794 by Xavier de Maistre, brother of Joseph. The work describes experiences under- 
gone during a period of imprisonment when, as a soldier in the Piedmontese army, 
the author was being held in Turin and had to find compensation in mental traveling. 

9. This citation could not be verified. [R.T.] 

10. Hugo, Les Miserable*, p. 374. 

11. The Directory: executive body in charge of the French government from 1795 to 
1799. Les Incroyables (the Incredibles) : name given to a group of young men at this 
time who affected a studied elegance in their dress and speech. 

12. "Des Schmetterlings zweifelnder Hugel." See J. C. F. Schiller, SamtlicJw Werke (Mu- 
nich, 1965), vol. 1, p. 229: "mit zweifelndem Flugel/ Wiegt der Schmetterling sich 
iiber dem rotlichen Klee." See also Benjamin's notes on his first and second hashish 
experiences, in GS, vol. 6, pp. 560, 562. [R.T.] 

13. Volumes 11-15 of Hoffmann's Ausgewahlten Schriftcn appeared in 1839, published by 
Brodhag Verlag in Stuttgart. The following citation from Julius Eduard Hitzig appears 
in vol. 15, pp. 32-34. [R.T.] 

14. Tlie Letters of Charles Dickens, ed. Kathleen Tillotson, voL 4 (Oxford: Oxford Univer- 
sity Press, 1977), pp. 612-613 (August 30, 1846, to John Forster). 

15. Friedrich Engels, 77te Condition of tlie Working Class in England, trans. Florence 
Wisclmewetzky (1886; rpt., with revisions by V. G. Kierran, London: Penguin, 
1987), pp. 68-69. 

16. More exactly, 1857. See M7,9. [R.T.] 

17. Prior to 1859, in the years when Paris comprised only twelve municipal wards, "the 
thirteenth arrondusemenf was a name for illicit amours. [J.L.] 

18. Karl Marx and Fiiedrich Engels, The German Ideology, in Collected Works, vol. 5 (New 
York: International Publishers, 1976), p. 64 (trans. Clemens Dutt). 

19. Original title: "Exkurs iiber die Soziologie der Sinne." Translated by Robert E. Park 
and Ernest W. Burgess, in Introduction to tlie Science of Sociology, 2nd ed. (Chicago: 
University of Chicago Press, 1970); see p. 150. 

20. Hugo, Les Miserables, p. 514. See also 04,3. 

21. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, trans. Louise Varese (New York: New Directions, 1947), 
p. 45. 

22. Baudelaire, Artificial Paradise, trans. Ellen Fox (New York: Herder and Herder, 1971), 
pp. 101-102. 

23. Balzac, Seraphita, trans. Clara Bell (New York: Hippocrene, 1989), p. 6. 

24. Balzac, Cousin Pons, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 1968), p. 132. 

25. Baudelaire, The Prose Poems and "La Fanfarlo," trans. Rosemary Lloyd (New York: 
Oxford University Press, 1991), p. 44 ("The Crowds"). 

26. Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, pp. ix-x. 

27. Ibid., p. 77. 

28. G. K. Chesterton, Charles Dickens (1906: rpt. New York: Schocken, 1965), pp. 44-45. 
We have taken the liberty of altering the phrase Chesterton cites from Pickwick 
Papers, "the key of the street," to accord with cuirent usage. 



29. Ibid., pp. 45-46. "Drifting" is translated in Benjamin's text as Jlaner. 

30. Ibid., p. 46. 

31. Ibid., pp. 178-179 (citing letter of August 30, 1846, to John Forster). 

32. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paris *f His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New "fork: Knopf, 1938), p. 213 (desciibing an 
operetta by Offenbach) . 

33. Ibid., pp. 75, 76-77. For the remark by Alfred de Musset, see "Le Boulevard de 
Gand," in Musset, Oeuvres completes (Paris: Seuil, 1964), p. 896. [J.L.] 

34. Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris, p. 79 (second sentence added) . 

35. Paul Valery, "The Place of Baudelaire," in Leonardo, Poe, Mallarme, trans. Malcolm 
Cowley and James R. Lawler (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1972), p. 203. 

36. C. G.Jung, Collected Works, vol. 10, trans. R. F. C. Hull (Princeton: Princeton Univer- 
sity Press, 1978), p. 48. 

37. This passage does not appear in the anonymous English translation: Eugene Sue, The 
Mysteries of Paris (Sawtry, Cambridgeshire: Dedalus, [1989?]). 

38. In Balzac, Splendeurs et ms'eres cles courtisanes, part 2, in Oeuvres completes, vol. 15 
(Paris, 1913), pp. 310ff. [R.T.] In English, A Harlot High and Low, trans. Rayner 
Heppenstall (Harmondsworth: Penguin, 1970), p. 270. 

39. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), pp. 338-339. 

40. Ibid., p. 294. 

41. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare" and Other Prose Writings, trans. Norman Cameron 
(1950; rpt. New York: Haskell House, 1975), p. 169 ("Fusees," no. 21). See M15a,3. 

42. Baudelaire, "T/ie Painter of Modern Life" and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan Mayne 
(1964; rpt. New York: DaCapo, 1986), p. 9. 

43. Jules Romains, Men of Good Will, vol. 1, trans. Warre B. Wells (New York: Knopf, 
1946), p. 157. 

44. Ibid., p. 136 ("A Little Boy's Long Journey"). 

45. Ibid., pp. 399-400. 

46. Hugo, Les Miserables, p. 884 ("Enchanttnents and Desolations," section 5). For the 
passage in Gerstacker, see I,4a, 1 , and R2,2. 

47. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare," p. 188. 

48. Baudelaire, Selected Letters, trans. Rosemary Lloyd (Chicago: University of Chicago 
Press, 1986), pp. 59-60. 

49. Poe, Complete Tales and Poems (New York: Modem Library, 1938), p. 476 ("The Man 
of the Crowd"). 

50. Baudelaire, "My Heart Laid Bare,"p. 169. 

51. Balzac, Gaudissart t/te Great, trans. James Waring (Philadelphia: Gebbie, 1899), 
p. 346. 

52. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, trans. Francis Scarfe (London: Anvil, 1986), p. 377. 

53. Bertolt Brecht, Poems, 1913-1956, trans. Ralph Manheim et al. (New York: 
Methuen, 1987), p. 131 ("A Reader for Those Who Live in Cities"). 

54. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 181. 

55. See M8a,l. On the "physiologies," a paperbound documentary literature popular in 
Paris during the 1840s, see Benjamin, Charles Baudelaire; A Lyric Poet in the Era of 
High Capitalism, trans. Harry Zohn (London: Verso, 1973), pp. 35-36. See also 
J82a,3. 

56. Georg Sinnnel, The PMlosophy of Money, 2nd ed., trans. Tom Bottomore and David 



Frisby (London: Routledge, 1990), p. 477. The last phrase can be rendered more 
literally as "the all too pressing nearness." 

57. "Voila ce qui fait de l'observation artistique une chose bien differente de Pobservation 
scientifique: elle doit surtout etre instinctive et proceder par l'imagination, d'abord." 
Gustave Flaubert, Coirespondance (Paris: Conard, 1926-1954) vol. 4, p. 230 (letter of 
June 6-7, 1853, to Louise Colet). 

58. The Letters of Gustave Flaubert, 1830-1857, trans. Francis Steegmuller (Cambridge, 
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1980), p. 203 (letter of December 23, 1853, to 
Louise Colet; see Madame Bovary, part 2, chap. 9). 

59. "The Letters of Gustave Flaubert, 1857-1880, trans. Francis Steegmuller (Cambridge, 
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1982), p. 89 (September 29, 1866, to George 
Sand). 

60. Shelley, Poetical Works, ed. Thomas Hutchinson and G. M. Matthews (1905; rpt. 
London: Oxford University Press, 1970), pp. 350-351. Benjamin cites a translation 
by Brecht, from the latter's manuscript. 

61. The Collected Tales and Plays of Nikolai Gogol, trans. Constance Garnett, rev. Leonard 
J. Kent (New York: Pantheon, 1964), p. 78. See E. T. A. Hoffmann, "My Cousin's 
Comer Window," in "Tlie Golden Pot" and Other Tales, trans. Ritchie Robertson 
(New York: Oxford University Press, 1992), pp. 379-380. 

62. Hoffmann, "The Golden Pot" pp. 399-400. 

63. Ibid., p. 380. 

64. Hegel: The Letters, trans. Clark Butler and Christiane Seiler (Bloomington: Indiana 
University Press, 1984), p. 650. 

65. Allusion to Virgil's Aeneid, book 6, lines 296ff.: "Here starts the pathway to the 
waters of / Tartarean Acheron. A whirlpool thick / with sludge, its giant eddy seeth- 
ing, vomits / all of its swirling sand into Cocytus." Trans. Allen Mandelbaum (New 
York: Bantam, 1971), p. 142. 

66. Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, trans. Jonathan Mayne (London: Phaidon, 1955), 
p. 283 ("The Salon of 1859," section 8). 

67. Jeanjacques Rousseau, Reveries of the Solitary Walker, trans. Peter France (New York: 
Penguin, 1979), p. 35. 

68. Valery, Poems in the Rough, trans. Hilary Corke (Princeton: Princeton University 
Press, 1969), p. 155. 

69. Balzac, The Wild Ass's Skin, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 1977), p. 108. 

70. Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 1, trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New York: 
Random House, 1925), p. 596 (Within a Budding Grove). 

71. Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 2 (New York: Random House, 1932), p. 1084 
(The Past Recaptured, trans. Frederick A. Blossom). 



N [On the Theory of Knowledge, Theory of Progress] 

In translating Convolute N, we have greatly benefited from the previous translation of 
this convolute, "Re the Theory of Knowledge, Theory of Progress," by Leigh Haf rey and 
Richard Sieburth, originally published in Philosophical Forum (Fall- Winter, 1983-1984), 
and reprinted in Benjamin: Philosophy, History, Aesthetics, ed. Gary Smith (Chicago: Uni- 
versity of Chicago Press, 1989), pp. 38-83. 

1. Karl Marx, Selected Writings, ed. David McLellan (New York: Oxford University 
Press, 1977), p. 38. 



2. Reference is to Louis Aragon, Le Paysan de Paris (Paris, 1926). [R.T.] On the not-yet- 
conscious knowledge of what has been, see Kl,2. 

3. "Restoration of all things." Derived from Jewish apocalyptic, Stoic, and Neoplatonic- 
Gnostic traditions, the concept originally referred to the recurrence of a specific 
planetary constellation. 

4. Adonio, Kierliegaard: Construction of the Aesthetic, trans. Robert Hullot-Kentor (Min- 
neapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1989), p. 54. The Kierkegaard passage is 
from The Concept of Irony. For the passage from Benjamin cited by Adorno, see 
Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic Drama, trans. John Osborne (London: Verso, 
1977), p. 166. The fades hippocratica is a death mask, 

5. GeorgSimmel, Goethe (Leipzig, 1913), esp. pp. 56-61; see also Benjamin, GS, vol. 1, 
pp. 953-954. [R.T.] "Origin" here translates Unprung. 

6. See Martin Heidegger, Being and Time, trans. John Macquarrie and Edward Robin- 
son (New York: Harper and Row, 1962), Division 2, Chapter 5. On truth as "the 
death of the intentio" (parenthesis below), see Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic 
Drama, p. 36. On time in the dialectical image, see Q^,21 in "First Sketches." 

7. This sentence could not be found among Keller's epigrams. [R.T.] 

8. The passage occurs in the Introduction to the Kritik der Polituclien Okonomie, in Karl 
Marx and Friedrich Engels, Werke (Berlin, 1964), vol. 13, pp. 640ff. [R.T.] In English, 
"Introduction to a Critique of Political Economy," in Marx and Engels, The German 
Ideology, trans, anonymous (New York: International Publishers, 1970), pp. 149-150. 

9. Friedrich Engels, Socialism, Utopian and Scientific, trans. Edward Aveling (1935; rpt. 
Westport, Conn.: Greenwood, 1977), p. 68. Rolf Tiedemann informs us that Ben- 
jamin wrote in his manuscript, instead of "aus damonischen Herrschern," the truly 
"strange" words "und damonischen Herrscher." The sentence would then read: 
"they can, in the hands of associated producers and master demons, be transformed 
into willing servants." 

10. Maix, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 28. Marx distinguishes between Forsclmng 
(research) and Darstellung (presentation, application) . 

1 1 . Jules Michelet, The People, trans John P. McKay (Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 
1973), pp. 18-19. 

12. Marx, Selected Writing!,, p. 37. 

13. Marx and Engels, The German Ideology, vol. 1, trans. Clemens Dutt, in Marx and 
Engels, Collected Works, vol. 5 (New York: International Publishers, 1976), p. 91. 

14. Marx, Selected Writings, p. 38. 

15. Ibid., p. 66 (italics added). 

16. Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 5, p. 92 (The German Ideology). 

17. Marx and Engels, The Holy Family, in Collected Works, vol. 4 (New York: International 
Publishers, 1975), p. 128 (trans. Richard Dixon and Clemens Dutt). 

18. Paul Valery, "The Place of Baudelaire," in Leonardo, Poe, Mallarme, trans. Malcolm 
Cowley and James R. Lawler (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1972), p. 203. 
See I5a,5. 

19. Marx and Engels, Selected Correspondence, trans. I. Lasker (Moscow: Progress Publish- 
ers, 1975), pp. 434-435. 

20. Benjamin's introduction to Jochmann's "Die Riickschritte der Poesie" The Regres- 
sions of Poetry) appears in GS, vol. 2, pp. 572-585. 

21. Benjamin's reference to the "apoll<i>nischen Schnitt" remains obscure. The French 
translator of the Passagcn-Werk renders this as "section d'or" ("golden section"), while 
the Italian translators offer the emendation "taglio di Apelle" ("Apelles' section"), 



with reference to the fourth-century B.C. Greek painter who, in a contest, divided a 
narrow line by one yet narrower and of a different color. 

22. This phrase (literally, "to go to the many") means "to die." It occurs, for example, in 
Petronius: "And now he's gone, joined the great majority" (lumen abiit adplares). The 
Satyrwon, trans. William Arrowsmith (New "fork: New American Library, 1959), 
p. 50 (ch. 42). (Thanks to William Wyatt for this reference.) 

23. Valery, Leonardo, Poe, Mallarme, p. 197. 

24. G. G.Jung, "On the Relation of Analytical Psychology to Poetry," in Jung, Complete 
Works (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1970-1992), vol. 15, pp. 82-83 (trans. 
R. EC. Hull). 

25. C. G.Jung, "The Spiritual Problem of Modern Man," in Jung, Modem Man in Search 
of a Soul, trans. W. S. Dell and Cary F. Baynes (New York: Harcourt, Brace, 1934), 
p. 237. 

26. Blanqui's last work is L'Eternite par les astres; see D5a,l, and the entries following. 
Heidegger's outline of a Problemgesclichte ("history of problems") in Being and Time, 
paragraph 3, may stand behind Benjamin's reference to the philosopher here. 

27. See Benjamin, GS, vol. 2, p. 578. [R.T.] 

28. See August Strindberg, To Damascus III, in Plays of Confession and Therapy, trans. 
Walter Johnson (Seattle: University of Washington Press, 1979), p. 196. 

29. Marx and Engels, Selected Cotrespondewe , p. 434 (Engels to Mehringjuly 14, 1893). 

30. Turgot, "Second Discourse on the Successive Advances of the Human Mind," in On 
Progress, Sociology and Economics, trans. Ronald L. Meek (London: Cambridge Uni- 
versity Press, 1973), p. 46. 

31. Ibid., pp. 44, 46. 

32. Ibid., p. 58. Benjamin has "perfection" for "reflection." Limes is Latin for "boundary," 
"limit." 

33. Ibid., p. 52. 

34. Ibid, p. 105. 

35. The Life and Writings of Turgot, ed. W. Walker Stephens (London: Longmans, Green, 
1895), p. 320. 

36. Hermann Lotze, Microcosmis, trans. Elizabeth Hamilton and E. E. Constance Jones 
(New York: Scribner and Welford, 1888), vol. 2, p. 144. 

37. Ibid, p. 146. 

38. Friedrich Holderlin, Samtliclie Werke (Stuttgart, 1954), vol. 6, p. 92 (letter of Septem- 
ber 1793, to his brother). [R.T.] 

39. Lotze, Microcosmus, vol. 2, p. 172. 

40. Ibid, p. 171. 

41. Ibid, pp. 173-174. 

42. Simmel, Tlie Philosophy of Money, 2nd ed, trans. Tom Bottomore and David Frisby 
(New York: Routledge, 1990), p. 447. 

43. Lotze, Microcosmus, vol. 2, p. 147. 

44. Ibid, p. 148. 

45. Ibid, pp. 151-152. 

46. Ibid, p. 154. 

47. Ibid, p. 157. 

48. Baudelaire, "The Poem of Hashish," in "My Heart Laid Bare" and Other Prose Writ- 
ings, trans. Norman Cameron (1950; rpt. Haskell House, 1975), p. 102. Baudelaire 
claims here to be citing verbatim the letter of an unnamed woman. 

49. The Letters qfGustave Flaubert, 1857-188$, trans. Francis Steegmuller (Cambridge, 
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1982), p. 24. 



50. This passage is not found in the English-language edition of The Waning of ' the Middle 
Ages (New York: Anchor, 1954). 

51. Karl Korsch, Karl Marx, trans, anonymous (1938; rpt. New York: Russell and 
Russell, 1963), p. 106. 

52. Ibid., pp. 190-191. Korsch cites Hegel's Vorlesungen iiber die Philosophic der Geschiclite 
<Lectures on the Philosophy of History> (General Introduction, 2, i, a). 

53. Korsch, Karl Marx, p. 182. 

54. Ibid., p. 234. 

55. Ibid., p. 196. Korsch quotes from Marx and Engels, Gesamtaasgabe (Berlin, 1927- 
1930), vol. 1, part v, p. 403. (Die deatsche Ideologie). 

56. Korsch, Karl Marx, pp. 227-229. Korsch refers to the preface to Marx's J?urKritik der 
politischen Okonomie (1859). 

57. Korsch, Karl Marx, pp. 168-169. Korsch cites phrases from Die deutsclie Ideologie and 
from Georgi Plekhanov, Fundamental Problems oj'Marxum (1908). 

58. Korsch, Karl Marx, p. 83. Quotation from Bacon is from the Novum Organum, book 1 : 
"For it is rightly said that truth is the daughter of time and not of authority." 

59. Korsch, Karl Marx, pp. 78-80. 

60. The citation is from Guez de Balzac, letter of March 7, 1634: "And because I am not 
avaricious either in eye or in soul, I consider the emeralds of your peacocks as great a 
prize as those of the lapidary." In Proust, Cor?espondance, vol. 2: 1896-1901 , ed. 
Philip Kolb (Paris: Plon, 1976), pp. 52-53. Proust's letter is dated by the editor 
mid-April 1896. The book in question is Les Plaisirs et les jours. 

61. Honore de Balzac, The Wild Ass's Skin, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 
1977), pp. 35, 37, 38, 40. 

62. Henri Focillon, The Life of Forms in Art, trans. Charles Beecher Hogan and George 
Kubler (1948; rpt. New York: Zone, 1989), pp. 153-154, 148-149. 

63. Ibid., pp. 102-103. 

64. Ibid., p. 47. 

O [Prostitution, Gambling] 

1. This passage is drawn from The Reminiscences and Recollections of Captain Gronow: 
Being Anecdotes of the Camp, Court, Clubs, and Society, 1810-1860, vol. 1 (New York: 
Scribner and Welford, 1889), pp. 122-123 ("The Salon des Etrangers in Paris"), a 
text originally written in English. (Thanks to Susan Jackson for this reference.) We 
translate here the informative German translation used by Benjamin. On the Salon 
(Cercle) des Etrangers, see the Guide to Names and Terms, and "First Sketches," 
L°,19; Benjamin's "Marquis de Sevry" seems to be a mistake for the Marquis de 
Li vry mentioned by Gronow (pp. 120-121). 

2. Louis Aragon, Paris Peasant, trans. Simon Watson Taylor (1971; rpt. Boston: Exact 
Change, 1994), p. 14. 

3. Ibid., p. 60. 

4. Schwelle, cognate with the English word "sill," has the root sense of "board," "struc- 
tural support," "foundation beam." According to current information, it is etymologi- 
cally unrelated to scltwellen. 

5. Friedrich Schiller, Uallenstein's Death (act 1, scene 4), in "The Robbers" and "Wallen- 
stein," trans. F.J. Lamport (London: Penguin, 1979), p. 328. For the citation from La 
Bruyere, seeJ87,4 (?). 

6. Langue verte, the Parisian slang catalogued by Alfred Delvau in bis Dictionnaire de la 
langue verte, first published in Paiis in 1865. See P3a,4. 



7. Anatole France, The Garden of Epicurus, trans. Alfred Allinson (New York: Dodd, 
Mead, 1923), pp. 22-25. 

8. The first passage uses the familiar form of the second-person dative, Dir. The other 
passage, within the single quotation marks, uses the formal form, Sie. 

9. As distinct from the official stockbrokers (agents de clmnge), these "outside brokers" 
(courtiers de la coulisse) were unauthorized. They took their name "from their habit of 
trading on the outskirts of the Bourse crowd — the wings of a theater, in French, being 
named coidisse." See William Parker, Tl\e Paris Bourse ami French Finance (New York: 
Columbia University Press, 1920), p. 26. Compare g3,2. 

10. That is, of Napoleon, 1798-1799. 

11. Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 3.8, trans. Peter Ross and Betty Ross (New 
York: International Publishers, 1982), p. 91 (letter of November-December 1846). 

12. Compare a4,l. Neither this nor the preceding passage appears in the English transla- 
tion of Mayer's biography of Engels (see note to E9a,6). 

13. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paris of His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), p. 254. 

14. Marx, The Economic and P/iilosophic Manuscripts *f 1844, trans. Martin Milligan (New 
York: International Publishers, 1964), p. 151. 

15. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), pp. 450-451. 

16. Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris, pp. 298, 133. Les Filles de marbre was produced in 1853; 
Froufrou, in 1869. 

17. Charles Fourier, The Theory of the Four Movements, trans. Ian Patterson (New York: 
Cambridge University Press, 1996), p. 148. 

18. "Events," in this entry, translates Ereignisse; "contexts of experience" translates Er- 
fahrungsiusammenhangen (which suggests "continuity of experience"). 

19. Johan Huizinga, The Waning of the Middle Ages, trans. F. Hopman (1949; rpt. New 
York: Anchor, 1954), p. 149. 

20. Honore de Balzac, T/ie Wild Ass's Skin, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 
1977), p. 23. 

P [The Streets of Paris] 

1. Cited by Benjamin in Latin without source. 

2. Street of Bad Boys, Sausage-Maker Street, Street of Dirty Words, Street of the Head- 
less Woman, Street of the Fishing Cat, Street of the Thickset Villain. 

3. Victor Hugo, Les Miserables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
em Library, 1992), p. 1100. 

Q [Panorama] 

1. Panoramas were introduced in France in 1799 by the American engineer Robert 
Fulton. But it was a certain James Thayer who, after acquiring the patent, developed 
the two rotundas on the Boulevard Montmartre which were separated by the arcade 
known as the Passage des Panoramas. These large circular tableaux, painted in 
trompe-l'oeil and designed to be viewed from the center of the rotunda, displayed 
scenes of battles and cities: "View of Paris," "Evacuation of Toulon by the English," 
"Encampment at Boulogne," "Rome," "Athens," 'Jemsulem." As the number of 
panoramas increased and their popularity grew, new forms made their appearance: 
the cosmorama at the Palais-Royal, later transfeired to Rue Vivienne; the neorama of 
M. Allaux, with its interior scenes; the georama, withits general and detailed views of 



different parts of the world. But the decisive invention remains the diorama of Da- 
guerre and Bouton, which was opened in 1822 on the Rue Sanson, near the Boule- 
vard Saint-Martin, and then installed on the Boulevard de Bonne-Nouvelle. The 
pictures were painted on cloth transparencies, which by 1831 were being used with 
various lighting effects. The installation burned down in 1839, together with the 
laboratory where Daguerre and Niepce conducted their first experiments in photog- 
raphy. [J.L.] 

2. See Honore de Balzac, Rre Goriot, trans. Henry Reed (New York: New American 
Library, 1962), pp. 53-56 (end of Part One). 

3. Andre Breton, Nadja, trans. Richard Howard (New York: Grove Press, 1960), p. 148. 

4. The georama was a large hollow globe or spherical chamber that was lined with a 
cloth depicting the geography of the eardi's surface, to be viewed by a spectator from 
inside. 

5. Marcel Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 1 , trans. C. K. Scott Moncrieff (New 
York: Random House, 1925), p. 709 {Within a Budding Grove). 

6. Charles Dickens, Tlie Old Curiosity Simp (London: Heron Books, 1970), p. 267 (ch. 
27). 

7. Presumably, the picturesque and mechanized theater constructed by M. Pierre on the 
Carrefour Gaillon. [J.L.] 

8. G. K. Chesterton, Cliarles Dickens (1906; rpt. New York: Schocken, 1965), pp. 117— 
118. 

9. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and live Paris of His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), p. 42. 

10. Word coined in 1789 by patentee Robert Barker (1739-1806), Scottish portrait 
painter and reputed inventor of panoramas. The patent mentioned in the passage 
following dates from 1800. (Floreal was the eighth month in the Revolutionary 
calendar established in 1793.) 

11. Charles Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, trans. Jonathan Mayne (London: Phaidon, 
1955), p. 284. 

R [Mirrors] 

1. "So weiss man weder ein noch aus vor zweifelhafter Helle," The idiom nicht aas noch 
ein wissen ("not know which way to turn") is here taken literally ("know neither 'out' 
nor 'in'"). 

2. Louis Aragon, Paris Peasant, trans. Simon Watson Taylor (1971; rpt. Boston: Exact 
Change, 1994), p. 14. 

3. See note to Mia, 3. "Ambiguity," in the present passage, translates ^iveideutigkeit 
(zwei-deutig: capable of two interpretations). "The whispering of gazes" is English for 
Blickwispern. Compare c°,3, in "The Arcades of Paris." 

4. Theodor W. Adomo, Kierliegaard: Construction of the Aesthetic; trans. Robert Hullot- 
Kentor (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1989), pp. 41-42. The 
Kierkegaard citation is from vol. 1 of Either /Or, trans. David F. Swenson and Lillian 
M. Swenson, rev. Howard A. Johnson (1944; rpt. New York: Anchor, 1959), pp. 349- 
350. 

S [Painting, Jugendstil, Novelty] 

1. Goethe, Faust, trans. Walter Kaufmann (New York: Anchor, 1963), p. 36 (lines 
6838-6839). 



2. Anatole France, The Garden of Epicurus, trans. Alfred Allinson (New York: Dodd, 
Mead, 1923), p. 129. 

3. Seejulien Benda, The Betrayal of the Intellectuals, trans. Richard Aldington (1928; rpt. 
Boston: Beacon, 1955), p. 166 (letter of August 13, 1789, from an Englishman, Ar- 
thur Young); and Anatole France, "The Procurator of Judaea," in Mot/ier of Pearl, 
trans. Frederic Chapman (New York: Dodd, Mead, 1922), p. 26. 

4. Franz Kafka, The Trial, trans. Willa and Edwin Muir, rev. E. M. Butler (1935; rpt. 
New York: Schocken, 1968), p. 163. 

5. Sein undZeit (Halle, 1927J. [R.T.] 

6. Hugo von Hofmannsthal, Selected Prose, trans. Mary Hottinger, Tania Stern, and 
James Stern (New York: Pantheon, 1952), p. 364. The Bach der Freunde (Book of 
Friends) was compiled from Hofmannsthal's notebooks of 1917-1922 and from 
quotations, and was first published in 1922. 

7. Sketch for a play; now in Hofmannsthal, Gesammelte Werlw, vol. "S,Dramen (Frankfurt 
am Main, 1957), pp. 491-493. [R.T.] Aside from the reference to Freud, the uniden- 
tified citations at the end of S2,3 are in French. 

8. Theodor W. Adorno, "Arabesken zur Operette," in Die Rampe: Blatter des Deutschen 
Schauspielhauses (Hamburg, 1931-1932), p. 5. Adorno speaks of the "negative eter- 
nity of the operetta." [R.T.] 

9. Benjamin refers to the great Catalan architect Antonio Gaudi (1852-1926). 

10. Adorno, Kierhgaard: Construction $f tlie Aesthetic, trans. Robert Hullot-Kentor (Min- 
neapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1989), pp. 45-46. The passage from Repeti- 
tion describes the apartment Kierkegaard occupied during his residence in Berlin in 
1843. 

11. Ovid, Metamorphoses, trans. Rolfe Humphries (Bloomington: Indiana University 
Press, 1955), p. 73 (die reference is to Narcissus). 

12. "... denJugendj^V bis in seine Auswirkung in d\e.]ugzn&bewegung verfolgend." 

13. Charles Baudelaire, Paris Spleen, trans. Louise Varese (New York: New Directions, 
1947), p. 5 ("The Double Room"). 

14. Paul Valery, Degas, Manet, Morisot, trans. David Paul (Princeton: Princeton Univer- 
sity Press, 1960), p. 152 ("About Corot"). 

15. Karl Marx, Selected IVritings, ed. David McLellan (New York: Oxford University 
Press, 1977), p. 338. 

16. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), p. 143. 

17. Ibid., pp. 44, 45. 

18. Tagebuch einer Verlorenen {Diary of a Lost Woman), anonymous memoir of a prosti- 
tute, ed. Margarete Bohme (Berlin, 1905). The reference to Alfred Capus that follows 
remains obscure. [R.T.] 

19. Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, trans. Francis Scarfe (London: Anvil, 1986), p. 55. 

20. "Loss of a Halo," section 46 of Par-is Spleen. 

21. Baudelaire, "Flowers of Evil" and Other Works, trans. Wallace Fowlie (1964; rpt. New 
York: Dover, 1992), p. 27. 

22. Baudelaire, "The Sun" ("Le Soleil"), in The Complete Verse, p. 171. 

23. Friedrich Nietzsche, Thus Spoke Zarathastra, trans. R.J. Hollingdale (1961; rpt. Balti- 
more: Penguin, 1968), p. 286 ("The Shadow"). 

24. Ibid., p. 315 ("Among the Daughters of the Desert"). 

25. See Henrik Ibsen, The Wild Duck, in "Hedda Gabler" and Other Plays, trans. Una 
Ellis-Fennor (1950; rpt. Hannondsworth: Penguin, 1982), pp. 243-244 ("the saving 
lie . . . is the stimulating principle of life, ... to keep life going"). 



26. Paul Valery, History and Politics, trans. Denise Follet and Jackson Mathews (Prince- 
ton: Princeton University Press, 1962), pp. 271-272. 

27. Paul Valery, Analects, trans. Stuart Gilbert (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 
1970), p. 11. 

28. Marcel Proust, Remembrance of Tilings Past, vol. 1, trans. C. K. Scott MoncriefF (New 
York: Random House, 1925), pp. 489-490. 

29. Ibid., p. 490. 

T [Modes of Lighting] 

1. "Illuminated by nocturnal torches." 

2. Apparent reference to a collection of fairy tales and humor, Die blaue Bibliothek cles 
Feenreiclis, der Kobolde, J<werge and Gnomen; oder Deutschlands ^auber?iidrche7i, Her- 
rengeschichlen, unci Schwanke zu ergotzlicher und bilclencler Unterlialtungjiir die Jugend 
und Erwachsene (published in the 1840s). 

3. The H6tel de Ville (City Hall) was the meeting place of radical republican leaders in 
1848; at the end of February, immediately after the abdication of Louis Philippe, 
members of the Chamber of Deputies proceeded there to join with these leaders and, 
under heavy pressure from the crowd outside, to proclaim a provisional republic. 

4. See "Blind Men," in Baudelaire, Les Fleurs du mal, trans. Richard Howard (Boston: 
Godine, 1982), p. 97; and "My Cousin's Comer Window" in E. T. A. Hoffmann, 
"The Golden Pot" and Other Tales, trans. Ritchie Robertson (New York: Oxford Uni- 
versity Press, 1992), p. 394. 

5. Edgar Allan Poe, Tlie Complete Tales and Poems (New York: Modern Library, 1938), 
p. 464. Poe goes on to recommend the Argand lamp. 

U [Saint-Simon, Railroads] 

1. Ateliers nationaux: an emergency relief agency, set up during the February Revolution 
of 1848, that attracted thousands of unemployed workers from all over France; it 
eventually satisfied neither radicals nor moderates and was abolished by the newly 
elected conservative majority in May, without any program of public works to replace 
it. 

2. On Bourdin, seeJ27a,3. 

3. Friediich Engels, "Ludwig Feuerbach and the End of Classical Gennan Philosophy," 
in Karl Marx and Friediich Engels, Basic Writings on Politics and Philosophy, ed. Lewis 
S. Feuer (New York: Anchor, 1949), p. 205. 

4. Henri Saint-Simon, Selected Writings on Science, lndusliy and Social Organization, trans. 
Keith Taylor (New York: Hohnes and Meier, 1975), p. 210 (from L'Organisateur, 
1820). On the replacement of "the government of persons ... by the administration 
of things," see Friedrich Engels, "Socialism: Utopian and Scientific," in Marx and 
Engels, Collected Works, vol. 24 (New York: International Publishers, 1989), p. 321 
(trans. Edward Aveling) . 

5. Henri Saint-Simon, Selected Writings on Science, Industry and Social Organiziation, 
p. 237 (from Du Systime industriel, 1821). 

6. Henri Saint-Simon, Social Organization, the Science of Man, and Other Writings, trans. 
Felix Markham (1952; rpt. New York: Harper, 1964), p. 18 ("Introduction to the 
Scientific Studies of the Nineteenth Century," 1808). 

7. The passage quoted by Chevalier is evidently a free rendering of one of the maxims 
on industry from Benjamin Franklin's preface to the 1758 edition of his Poor Richard 



Imfxroved. The preface was extensively reprinted (and frequently revised) under such 
titles as The Way to Wealth. 

8. Reference to the quarrel, at the end of 1831, between Enf antin (who soon withdrew 
to his estate at Menilmontant, with forty disciples) and other leading Saint-Simonians, 
including Bazard, Rodrigues, and Leroux, over the question of relations between the 
sexes. 

9, Saint-Simon married the young writer and musician Sophie de Champgrand in Au- 
gust 1801; having just assumed the role of patron of the sciences, he was in need of a 
hostess. The marriage was dissolved, by mutual consent, in June 1802. "I used 
marriage as a means of studying scientists" (Selected Writings on Science, Industry and 
Social Organization, p. 19). 

10. Auguste Comte became Saint-Simon's assistant in 1817, following his expulsion from 
the Ecole Polytechnique for insubordination. It was in 1824 — after seven years of 
collaboration — that a long-standing dispute between the two men finally led Comte 
to withdraw his support. 

11. See al5,2-4, and pi, 3. Evadamism: Eve + Adam + ism. Le Mapah (mater + pater) 
was the name taken by a sculptor named Ganneau, around 1835, in forming a cult 
that advocated the complete equality — and ultimate fusion — of men and women. 

12. See p2,5, and entries following. 

13. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspondence, 3rd ed., trans. I. Lasker 
(Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1975), p. 82. 

14. Siefried Kracauer, Orpheus in Pans: Offenbach and t lie Paris of His Time, trans. Gwenda 
David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), p. 95. 

15. One of two cemeteries in the old Constantinople district of Pera (now called Beyoglu) 
in Istanbul, on the north side of the Golden Horn, lliere was a grand and a petit 
Champ des Morts, both destroyed by fire and renovations in the course of the 
nineteenth century. 

16. Honore de Balzac, Gaudissart the Great, trans. James Waring (Philadelphia: Gebbie, 
1899), pp. 351-352. 

17. Plan conceived by Napoleon I for blocking English merchandise from entering the 
Continent. 

18. Honore de Balzac, The Wild Ass's Skin, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 
1977), p. 60. 

V [Conspiracies, Compagnonnage] 

Compagnonnage refers to trade guilds, solidarity associations among workers. The word 
comes from compagnon: "companion," "workman," "journeyman." A central feature of 
compagnonnage, up through the middle of the nineteenth century, was the tour de France, in 
which journeymen artisans traveled to various towns of France seeking employment in 
order to complete their professional training. The tour generally lasted three to four years 
and culminated in the production of a masterwork. 

1. The aimy was persuaded to disarm by the passive conduct of the Garde Nationale. 

2. The trial of Erienne Cabet for sedition. 

3. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Collected Worlts, vol. 10 (New York: International 
Publishers, 1978), pp. 316-319, 312-313, 312 (trans. Christopher Upward). 

4. Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 17, trans. Rodney Livingstone (New York: 
International Publishers, 1981), pp. 79-80 (Hen Pig/ [I860]). 

5. Societe des Saisons: name of a secret society established by Blanqui, in 1837, with the 



aid of two other young republicans. It utilized classical conspiratorial techniques to 
form a tightly disciplined and hierarchical organization. Three years earlier, Blanqui 
had founded its predecessor, the secret revolutionary Societe des Families, and in 
1832 he had been a member of the republican Societe des Amis du Peuple, which 
espoused a Saint-Simonian doctrine. 

6. In the aftermath of the July Revolution, the ministers of Charles X were arrested and, 
in December, put on trial. Throughout the trial, troops of the Garde Nationale, led by 
the marquis de Lafayette, were required to control the crowds who gathered in the 
streets to demand the death sentence for the ministers. The latter were sentenced to 
life imprisonment on December 24, 1830, but they were all granted amnesty in 1836. 

7. Victor Hugo, Les Miserables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
em Library, 1992), p. 732 ("Facts from which History Springs, and which History 
Ignores"). 

8. Ibid., p. 730. 

9. Fifth month (January 20-February 18) of the French revolutionary calendar, adopted 
in October 1793 by the First Republic. 

10. This question from the catechism of neophyte revolutionaries of the Societe des 
Families — a question that was presented in evidence at the trial of Blanqui and other 
members of the organization in 1836 — was answered: "One must make a social revo- 
lution." See Alan B. Spitzer, Tlie Revolutionaiy 'theories of Louis Auguste Blanqui (1957; 
rpt. New York: AMS Press, 1970), pp. 90, 92. Marx, too, calls for a social revolution. 

11. Compagnon actually derives from the Old French word compaignon, which in turn 
comes from the Vulgar Latin companio (com, "with" + pants, "bread"). The word, 
meaning originally "one who eats bread with another," is unrelated to compos, "com- 
pass." 

12. Related to the English word "vent," an obsolete term for "sale," "hostelry." The 
French word uente may have originally referred to a stand of timber. 

13. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), p. 356. 

14. Mara, Tlie Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte, trans, anonymous (New York: 
International Publishers, 1963), p. 75. The Society of tlie Tenth of December was 
founded by Louis Napoleon in 1849 (as Marx writes in the sentence immediately 
preceding), on the pretext of establishing a charitable association (see V6,3). Napo- 
leon was elected president of the republic on December 10, 1848. 

W [Fourier] 

1. Charles Fourier, Harmonian Man: Selected Writings ofCliarles Fourier, ed. Mark Poster 
(New York: Anchor, 1971), p. 151 (trans. Susan Hanson). 

2. Alphonse Toussenel, Passional ^oolog}>; or, Spirit of tlie Beasts, trans. M. Edgeworth 
Lazams (New York: Fowlers and Wells, 1852), pp. 293, 289-290, 347-348. 

3. Friedrich Engels, "Socialism: Utopian and Scientific," in Karl Marx and Friedrich 
Engels, Basic Writings on Politics and Philosophy, ed. Lewis S. Feuer (New York: An- 
chor, 1959), p. 76 (trans. Edward Aveling). 

4. Heinrich Heine, French Affairs: Letters from Paris, trans. Charles Godfrey Leland 
(New York: Dutton, 1906), p. 460. 

5. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Collected Works, vol. 5 (New York: International 
Publishers, 1976), pp. 512-514 (The German Ideology, vol. 2, trans. C. P. Magill). 

6. "Sullied also are those who buy from merchants in order immediately to sell; for they 
gain nothing unless they employ many deceptions. And, in truth, nothing is more 



shameful than fraud." Cicero, De Officiis (Treatise on Duty), trans. Walter Miller 
(Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1921), p. 153. 

7. This passage is not found in the English-language edition of Charles Fourier, Tlie 
Theory of the Four Movements, trans. Iaii Patterson (Cambridge, England: Cambridge 
University Press, 1996). 

8. "Mesh" translates Fourier's engremge. "Machinal" translates Benjamin's maschinell, 
which is distinguished from mechanutuck, "mechanistic" (W4,4). 

9. In the summer of 1835, the Mew York Sun reported that Herschel, by means of a giant 
telescope, had observed paradisal woods and meadows, hills and valleys, even living 
organisms on the surface of the moon. News of these "discoveries" spread through- 
out Europe. 

10. Jules Michelet, T Ik People, trans. John P. McKay (Urbana: University of Dlinois Press, 

1973), p. 171n. 

11. Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 4 (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 
p. 81 (The Holy Family, trans. Richard Dixon and Clemens Dutt). 

12. Toussenel, Passional ^oology, pp. 351-352. 

13. Ibid., pp. 334-335. 

14. Ibid., p. 341. 

15. Ibid., pp. 231-232. 

16. Karl Marx, The Economic and Philosophic Manusaipts of 1844, trans. Martin Milligan 
(New York: International Publishers, 1964), p. 132. 

17. Charles Gide, Introduction to Design for Utopia: Selected Writings *f Charles Fourier, 
trans. Julia Franklin (1901; rpt. New York: Schocken, 1971), p. 15. 

18. Ibid., p. 16. 

19. Ibid., p. 21. 

20. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspondence, 3rd ed., trans. I. Lasker 
(Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1975), p. 351 (Engels to Karl Kautsky, April 26, 
1884); Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 26 (New York: International Publish- 
ers, 1990), p. 204 (Engels, The Origin of the Family, trans, anonymous). 

21. Marx and Engels, Selected Correspondence, p. 172. 

22. Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 38, trans. Peter Ross and Betty Ross (New 
York: International Publishers, 1982), p. 13. Engels alludes to Galatians 3.24, and to 
Revelation 21 .1-2, in the New Testament. 

23. See below, W14,l and entries following. 

24. Fourier, Theoiy of the Four Movements, p. 38n. 

25. Fourier, The Utopian Vision of Charles Fourier, trans. Jonathan Beecher and Richard 
Bienvenu (1971; rpt. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1983), pp. 308-309. 

26. Ibid., p. 319 (first clause only). 

27. Fourier, Theory of the Four Movements, p. 22. 

28. Harmlosiglieit, meaning also "ingenuousness." 

29. Fourier, Harmonian Man, p. 182. 

30. Fourier, Utopian Virion, p. 319. 

31. Ibid., pp. 320-321, 318-320. 

32. The petites hordes are made up of two-tbirds boys; the petites bandes, of two-thirds 
girls. 

33. Fourier, Harmonian Man, p. 332. 

34. Fourier, Utopian Virion, p. 316. 

35. Ibid.,p.316n. 



36. As a child, Fourier would fill his room with elaborately arranged flowers. See his 
Utopian Vision, p. 406, on the "language of flowers." 

37. Fourier, Design for Utopia, p. 207n. 

38. Marx and Engels, Basic Writings on Politics and Pliilosophy, p. 77. Compare J64,2. 

39. Fourier, Utopian Vision, p. 217. 

40. A Step to Parnassus — the title of a dictionary of prosody and poetic phrases once used 
in English schools as an aid in Latin versification. In general, the term refers to any 
dictionary of this type. 

41. Fourier, Utopian Vision, p. 232. 

42. There are references to Fourier scattered throughout Die heilige Familie. Compare 
W7,8. 

43. Charles Baudelaire, The Mirror of Art, trans. Jonathan Mayne (London: Phaidon, 
1955), pp. 170-171 ("Some French Caricaturists"). 

X [Marx] 

1. Karl Marx, The Economic and Philosop/uc Manuscripts of 1844, trans. Martin Milligan 
(New York: International Publishers, 1964), pp. 142-143. 

2. Ibid., p. 144. 

3. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Collected Works, vol. 5 (New York: International 
Publishers, 1976), pp. 44-45 (The German Ideology, vol. 1, trans. Clemens Dutt). 

4. Ibid., p. 53n. The authors refer to three revolutionary songs of the period of the 
French Revolution; the refrain of the last was: "Ah! 9a ira, ca ira, 9a ira! Les aristo- 
crates a la lanterne!" ("All, it will certainly happen! Hang the aristocrats from the 
lamppost!"). 

5. Marx, Economic and Philosopldc Manuscripts of 1844, pp. 120-121. 

6. Ibid., pp. 139-140. 

7. Ibid., p. 143. 

8. Ibid., p. 136. 

9. Ibid., p. 183. "Annulling of objectivity" translates AufJiebung der Gegenstdndlichkeit. 

10. Ibid., pp. 132-134. 

11. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 292. 

12. Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 3, trans. Ernest Untermann (1909; rpt. New York: Interna- 
tional Publishers, 1967), p. 545. Marx cites G. M. Bell, The Philosop/iy of Joint-Stock 
Banking (London, 1840), p. 47. 

13. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, p. 313. 

14. Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 2, trans, anonymous (New York: International Publishers, 
1967), pp. 390, 234. The first passage cited by Fischer is not found in this text. 

15. See Gesammelte Schiften von Karl Marx unci Friedrich Engels: Von Man 1841 bis Man 
1844 (Stuttgart, 1902), p. 259 (lead article in the Kolnische Zeitimg, no. 179). [R.T.] 

16. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, pp. 505-506. 

17. Ibid., p. 166. 

18. Ibid, pp. 168, 90. 

19. Ibid, pp. 93-94 ("Exchange"). Hegel's Philosophy of Right, trans. T. M. Knox (Lon- 
don: Oxford University Press, 1952), p. 240. "Symbol," in these passages, translates 
Zeichen. 

20. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, p. 9 1 . "Primitive" translates natarwiiclisig. 

21. Ibid, p. 88. 



22. Ibid., p. 86 ("Fetishism of Commodities"). 

23. Ibid., pp. 51,83. 

24. Ibid., p. 64 ("The Form of Value or Exchange Value"). 

25. Ibid., p. 79 ("The Fetishism of Commodities and the Secret Thereof"). 

26. Ibid., p. 72. 

27. Ibid., p. 64. The note cited by Benjamin below does not appear in the English transla- 
tion of the text. 

28. Ibid., p. 80. 

29. Ibid., p. 84-85. 

30. Marx, "Critique of the Gotha Program," in Maix and Engels, Basic Writings on 
Politics andPldlosojhy, ed. Lewis S. Feuer (New "fork: Anchor, 1959), pp. 112-113. 

31. Ibid., pp. 117,115. 

32. Ibid, p. 119. 

33. Ibid, p. 121. 

34. Benjamin quotes from memory. See Fiiedrich von ScbiJler, Sdintliclie Werhe, vol. 1 
(Munich, 1965), p. 303. [R.T.] In English in The Poems and Ballads of Schiller, trans. 
Edward Bulwer-Lytton (New York: Clark and Maynard, 1864), p. 266: "By deeds 
their titles common men create — / The loftier order are by birthright great" ("Votive 
Tablets"). 

35. Marx, Capital, vol. l,pp. 184-185 ("The Production of Surplus Value"). 

36. Georg Sinirael, Tlie Philosofliy of Money, 2nd ed, trans. Tom Bottomore and David 
Frisby (London: Routledge, 1990), pp. 424-425, 425-426, 426, 426-427. "Cogniz- 
ability" translates Erkennbarkeit. 

37. Ibid, pp. 393-394. 

38. Karl Korsch, Karl Marx, trans, anonymous. (1938; rpt. New "fork: Russell and 
Russell, 1963), p. 127. 

39. Simmel, Philosophy of Money, pp. 482-483. 

40. Korsch, Karl Marx, p. 122. 

41. Ibid, p. 128. Marx wrote the inscription in English. With regard to Benjamin's 
comparison that follows, Rolf Tiedemaim points to the concluding section of One- 
Way Street, "To the Planetarium," but it seems more likely that Benjamin is thinking 
here of the street sign. Dante's inscription is found at the beginning of Canto 3 of The 
Inferno (line 9): "Lasciate ogne speranza, voi ch'intrate" ("Abandon all hope, ye who 
enter here"). Trans. John Ciardi (New York: Signet, 1954), p. 42. 

42. Korsch, Karl Marx, p. 132n. 

43. Ibid, pp. 131-136. 

44. Ibid., pp. 140-142. 

45. Ibid, p. 134. 

46. Ibid, pp. 151-153. 

47. Ibid, pp. 90-91. Text written by Marx in French, In English in Marx, Selected Writ- 
ings, ed. David McLellan (New York: Oxford University Press, 1977), p. 198 (The 
Poverty qfPidlosophy). 

48. Korsch, Karl Marx, pp. 134, 137. 

49. Ibid, pp. 123-124. 

50. Ibid, pp. 124-126. 

51. Ibid, pp. 154-155. It is Benjamin who underlines the third sentence from the end. 

52. Ibid, p. 154. 

53. Ibid, pp. 233-234. Compare U5,3. 

54. Ibid, p. 232, 

55. Ibid, p. 117. 



56. Ibid, pp. 198-199. 

57. Ibid, pp. 201-202. 

58. Ibid., p. 50n. The passage from Marx is in Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 1 
(New York: International Publishers, 1975), p. 203 ("The Philosophical Manifesto of 
the Historical School of Law," trans. Clemens Dutt). 

59. From G. W. F. Hegel, Encyclopedia of the Philosophical Sciences, trans. William Wallace, 
in Hegel: Selections, ed. Jacob Loewenberg (New York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 
1929), pp. 237-238. 

60. Marx, "On the Jewish Question," Selected Writings, pp. 54-56. 

61. Now in GS, vol. 2, pp. 476-478. In English in Walter Benjamin, "One-Way Street" and 
Other Writings (London: Verso, 1979), pp. 359-361. 

62. Theodor Adomo, In Search of Wagner, trans. Rodney Livingstone (London: Verso, 
1981), pp. 82-83. It might be said that the method of citation in The Arcades Project, 
the polyphony of the text, works precisely to counter the phantasmagoria Adomo 
speaks of. 

Y [Photography] 

1. Feenstilcke (a translation of the French feeries) are theatrical spectacles involving often 
pantomime, the appearance of supernatural characters like fairies and enchanters, 
and the use of stage machinery to create elaborate scenic effects. 

2. Anicet Bourgeois and Adolphe Dennery, Gaspard Hauser, drama in four acts (Paris, 
1838). [R.T.] 

3. Nadar's account, "Paris souterrain," was 6rst published in 1867, in connection with 
the Exposition Universelle. His photographs of the catacombs (former quarries refit- 
ted to house skeletons from overfull cemeteries) in 1861-1862, and of the Paris 
sewers in 1864-1865, in which he employed his patented new process of photogra- 
phy by electric light, followed on his experiments with aerial photography. See the 
catalogue of the exhibition Nadar (New York: Metropolitan Museum of Art, 1995), 
pp. 98-100, 248 (plate 93 shows one of Nadar's mannequins in the sewer). 

4. Nadar actually interviewed the famous chemist on the latter's hundredth birthday. 
Eight of the series of twenty-seven instantaneous photos are reproduced in Nadar, 
pp. 102-103. 

5. Honore de Balzac, Cousin Pons, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 1968), 
pp. 131, 133. 

6. Nadar helped organize an exhibition of the work of Constantin Guys in 1895. 

7. Charles Baudelaire, "T/ie Painter of Modern Life" and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan 
Mayne (1964; rpt. New York: Da Capo, 1986), p. 201. 

8. Charles Baudelaire, Selected Writings on Art and Literature, trans. P. E. Charvet (1972; 
rpt. London: Penguin, 1992), pp. 295-296. 

9. Ibid, p. 225. 

10. Baudelaire, The Mirror o f Art, trans. Jonathan Mayne (London: Phaidon, 1955), 
pp. 230-231; "factual exactitude" translates exactitude materielle. 

11. Les Maries de la tour Eiffel (Marriage and the Eiffel Tower), ballet scenario of 1921. 
"Experience," in this entry, translates Erlebnis. 



Z [The Doll, The Automaton] 

1 . Puppe, in German, can mean "puppet" as well as "doll." 



2. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspondence, 3rd ed., trans. I. Lasker 
(Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1975), pp. 129-130. 

3. Tlie Poems of Hesiod, trans. R. M. Frazer (Norman: University of Oklahoma Press, 
1983), p. 98. 

4. Charles Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modem Life" and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan 
Mayne (1964; rpt. New York: Da Capo, 1986), pp. 36-37 (citing La Bruyere, Les 
Caracteres, "Des Femmes," section 2, and Juvenal, Satire VI). Benjamin refers here to 
Baudelaire's poem "LIAmour du mensonge," in Les Fleurs da mal. 

5. The epigram quoted here is actually by Antipatros of Sidon, a Greek poet who 
flourished around 120 B.C., and whose work is represented (together with that of 
Antiphilos) in the Palatine Anthology, the tenth-century Byzantine compilation of 
Greek poetic epigrams, of which the only manuscript was found in Count Palatine's 
library in Heidelberg. It is Antipatros whom Marx cites in volume 1 of Das Kapital; 
see Capital, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt New York: Interna- 
tional Publishers, 1967), p. 385. Aristotle's discussion of the slave as "living instru- 
ment" is in book 1, chapter 3 of his Politics, trans. Benjamin Jo wett, in The Basic Works 
of Aristotle, ed. Richard McKeon (New York: Random House, 1941), p. 1131. 



a [Social Movement] 

1. In France, in the nineteenth century, state engineers, in charge of public works, were 
distinguished from civil engineers, who were employed not by the state but by mu- 
nicipalities or private individuals. [J.L.] 

2. That is, "The People's Hive" 

3. Ecrivains publics: persons who, for a fee, would write out letters and docmnents for 
those who could not write. 

4. On June 25, the archbishop of Paris, Monsignor Affre, was killed by a stray bullet in 
the Faubourg Saint- Antoine while trying to arrange a cease fire. 

5. Fifteen thousand workers confronted the Garde Nationale in the streets of Lyons, and 
suffered some 600 casualties before capitulating. 

6. In 1830, students of the Ecole Poly technique led an attack on the Swiss Guards at the 
Baby lone barracks and the Louvre; one student was killed. 

7. Jules Michelet, Tlie People, trans. John P. McKay (Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 
1973), p. 86. 

8. In La Chartreuse de Parme (chapter 3). For Flaubert's descriptions, see part 3, chapter 
1, of L'Education sentimentale. Compare the passage by Nescio with Benjamin's idea of 
"interpretation in detail" (Ausdeutung in den Einzelheiten) in N 2,1. 

9. See "Mutualists," in the "Guide to Names and Terms." In response to a new law 
limiting free assembly, a republican insurrection broke out, on April 13, 1834, in the 
Marais district of Paris. During the quick suppression, all the occupants of a house on 
the Rue Transnonain were killed by General Bugeaud's troops, an incident depicted 
by Daumier in liis lithograph of 1834, Rue Transnonain. See Baudelaire's essay 
"Quelques caricaturistes francais," and Figure 29 in this volume. 

10. Victor Hugo, Les Miserables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
ern Library, 1992), p. 1107 (re 1832). 

11. Ibid., pp. 970-971 (re June 5, 1832); pp. 730-731 and 734-735 (re April 1832). 
Emeute: "riot," "disturbance." 

12. Ibid., pp. 924-925. 

13. Langes, perhaps a misprint for langues, "languages." 

14. Benjamin writes in English: "selfmade-man." 



15. Honore de Balzac, Eugenie Grandet, trans. Marion Ayton Crawford (New York: 
Penguin, 1955), p. 126. 

16. Karl Marx, The Eighteenth Bnimaire of Louis Bonaparte, trans, anonymous (New York: 
International Publishers, 1963), p. 24. The sentence continues: "and hence necessar- 
ily suffers shipwreck." 

17. Henrich Heine, French Affairs, in The Works of H enrich Heine, vol. 8, trans. Charles 
Godfrey Leland (New York: Dutton, 1906), p. 515. 

18. G. W. F. Hegel, The Philosophy ofHutory, trans.J. Sibree (1899; rpt. New York: Dover, 
1956), pp. 86-87. 

19. Honore de Balzac, Tlie Countiy Parson, trans, anonymous (New York: Fred De Fau, 
1923), p. 182. 

20. Michelet, The People, pp. 111-112, 60. 

21. Gustav Mayer, Friedrich EngeU, trans. Gilbert Highet and Helen Highet (1936; rpt. 
New York: Howard Fertig, 1969), p. 87. At issue is the drafting of the Communist 
Manifesto. 

22. Ibid.', p. 76. 

23. Ibid., p. 78. 

24. Ibid., p. 86. Engels' second visit to Palis took place in October and November 1847. 

25. Karl Marx, The Revolutions of 1848: Political Writings, vol. 1, ed. David Fernbach 
(London: Penguin, 1973), pp. 131-132 (trans, anonymous). The essay actually ap- 
peared on June 29, 1848. 

26. Ibid., p. 134. 

27. Mayer, Friedrich Engels, p. 102. On May 15, 1848, after a demonstration in favor of 
Poland, a mob invaded the precincts of the newly elected, conservative Constituent 
Assembly; order was restored by the Garde Nationale.June 25 was the last full day of 
the insuiTection; General Brea, General Negrier, and Deputy Charboiinel were killed 
by rebels. General Cavaignac rejected the rebels' proposals in negotiations the next 
morning and launched an attack on the last rebel stronghold, in the Faubourg Saint- 
Antoine. 

28. Karl Marx, Selected Writings, ed. David McLellan (New York: Oxford University 
Press, 1977), p. 339 (the original text is in English; the translation cited by Benjamin 
begins: "unseren guten Freund, unseren Robin Hood . . .") . 

29. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspondence, 3rd ed., trans. I. Lasker 
(Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1975), p. 146. 

30. Ibid., pp. 146-147. 

31. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Collected Works, vol. 38, trans. Peter Ross and Betty 
Ross (New York: International Publishers, 1982), pp. 66-67 (Engels to the Commu- 
nist CoiTespondence Committee). 

32. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspondence, 1846-1895, trans. Dona 
Torr (New York: International Publishers, 1942), p. 256. 

33. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paris of His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), pp. 251-252. 

34. Ibid., p. 196. 

35. Ibid., p. 100. 

36. This system had been established by the law of February 8, 1817, and was designed to 
put the new moneyed elite into power. 

37. Blanqui appeared "at the height of the July Revolution in Mile, de Montgolfier's 
salon. Blackened with gunpowder and blood, the young militant crashed his rifl e butt 
against the floor and cried triumphantly: 'Enfonces, les Romantiques!'" Alan B. 
Spitzer, The Revolutionary Theories of Louis Auguste Blanqui (1957; rpt. New York: 
AMS Press, 1970), p. 49, citing GefFroy, LEnferme. 



38. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), pp. 252-253. 

39. July 28, 1830, the second day of the three days of rioting in Paris known as les trois 
gloneuses ("the three glorious days"). See "July Revolution" in the "Guide to Names 
and Terms." 

40. See al,3, which concerns the February Revolution, 
h [DauinierJ 

1. The pear {poire also means "fool") was Philipon's emblem for Louis Philippe; it 
became famous as an illustration in history books for generations afterward. The 
career of Robert Macaire was traced by Daumier in two series of lithographs, from 
1836 to 1838 and from 1841 to 1843. The character was first created on the stage by 
the actor Frederick Lemaitre in a melodrama of 1823, and later in his own play Robert 
Macaire, suppressed in 1834. This archetype of the adroit swindler, who gave the 
name "Macairism" to all corruption and speculation, was based on Emile de Gi- 
rardin. 

2. Charles Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern Life" and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan 
Mayne (1964; rpt. New York: Da Capo, 1986), p. 177 ("Some French Caricaturists"). 

3. Ibid., p. 179, 

4. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paris of His Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), pp. 176-177. 

5. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), p. 75. 

d [Literary History, Hugo] 

1. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), pp. 267 (1861) and 53 
(1851). 

2. Novel by Theophile Gautier, published 1835. 

3. According to Alfred Delvau's Dictionnaire de la langue verte, 2nd ed. (Paris: Emil 
Dentu, 1867), an ange gardien ("guardian angel") is "a man whose trade . . . consists in 
leading drunks back to their domiciles, to spare them the disagreeable experience of 
being run over or robbed." 

4. L'Esprit des lois (The. Spirit of Laws; 1748) was a book by Montesquieu which pro- 
foundly influenced political thought in Europe and America. 

5. "Idols of Fortune." 

6. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, p. 152 (letter of August 30, 1857, from Hugo to Baude- 
laire). The poems referred to are, in English, "The Seven Old Men" and "The Little 
Old Women." See Baudelaire's letter of September 23(?), 1859, to Hugo, in Selected 
Letters of Charles Baudelaire, trans. Rosemary Lloyd (Chicago: University of Chicago 
Press, 1986), p. 135: "['Les Petites Vieilles'] was written with the aim ofimitatingyou." 

7. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, pp. 56-57, 56. "We who light the lamp early while the 
cock crows, we whom an uncertain wage recalls, before dawn, to the anvil." 

8. The last passage is translated in Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, p. 233. The other- 
passage by Baudelaire is from the letter to the editor that was published in Le Figaro 
of April 14, 1864. 

9. Tlie title of this poem, which appears in a collection signed by "Savinien Lapointe, 
Workman Cobbler," and introduced by Sue, plays on the double meaning of edioppe, 



"workshop" and "graver" or "burin" (the tool used by a cobbler to engrave on 
leather). In an engraving that accompanies the poem, Lapointe is shown working 
leather in his shop and, in a caption, lauding Sue as "an eminent surgeon wielding the 
scalpel" that will remove France's social ills — "scalpel" deriving from the same Latin 
root as eclioppe. The work is thus a poem in praise of Sue's scalpel from the eclioppe of 
Lapointe in both senses. 

10. Part 5 ("JeanValjean"),book3. 

11. Grandet the miser, Nucingen the German banker, and Bridau the amorous artist 
figure mainly in the novels Eugene Grandet, Splendeurs et miseres des courtisanes, and 
Illusions perdues, respectively. Balzac's Albert Savants (1842) is about a mail who 
labors for years to marry an Italian duchess. 

12. Victor Hugo, Les Misirables, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
em Library, 1992), p. 864. 

13. Honore de Balzac, The Country Doctor, trans. G. Burnham Ives (Philadelphia: George 
Barrie, 1898), p. 202. 

14. Honore de Balzac, The Peasantry, trans. Ellen Marriage and Clara Bell (New York: 
A, L. Burt, 1899), p. 113. 

15. Characters in Henri Murger's Scenes de la vie boheme. Marcel is a painter and Rodol- 
phe a journalist, poet, and playwright. 

16. Characters, respectively, in Hugo's plays Ruy Bias and Manon de Lorme, and in his 
novels Le Roi s 'amuse, Notre-Dame de Paris, and Les Miserables. 

17. Honore de Balzac, Cousin Pons, trans. Herbert J. Hunt (London: Penguin, 1968), 
pp. 132-133. 

18. G. K. Chesterton, C/iarles Dickens (1906; rpt. New York: Schocken, 1965), p 247. 

19. Ibid., pp. 106, 237. 

20. Siegfried Kracauer, Orpheus in Paris: Offenbach and the Paru of Hu Time, trans. 
Gwenda David and Eric Mosbacher (New York: Knopf, 1938), p. 188. 

21. Paul Valery, "The Place of Baudelaire," in Valery, Leonardo, Poe, Mallarme, trans. 
Malcolm Cowley and James R. Lawler (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1972), 
p. 199. 

22. Les Memoires du diable and La Closerie des Genets are serial novels by Frederic Soulie. 
Oil menent les mauvais chemins and La Derniere Incarnation de Vtutrin are titles of 
sections in Balzac's Splendeurs et miseres des courtisanes. 

23. Baudelaire as a Literaiy Critic, pp. 257, 256-257. Borel was "the leader of a group of 
stormy young Romantic writers called bousingos, presumably because of the wide- 
brimmed sailor-like hat which they affected" (Hyslops' introduction, p. 256). 

24. Charles Baudelaire, "The Painter of Modern Life" and Other Essays, trans. Jonathan 
Mayne (1964; rpt. New York: Da Capo, 1986), p. 119. 

25. Charles Baudelaire, The Prose Poems and "La Fanfarlo," 'trans. Rosemary Lloyd (New 
York: Oxford University Press, 1991), p. 106. 

26. Chesterton, Cluirles Dickens, p. 232. 

27. "I ask myself — What are they seeking in the heavens, all those blind men?" In 
Baudelaire, The Complete Verse, trans. Francis Scarfe (London: Anvil, 1986), p. 185 
("Blind Men," 1860). The poem cited, "Ce que dit la Bouche d'ombre" (What the 
Mouth of Darkness Says), is from Hugo's volume Les Contemplations (1856). [R.T.] 

28. lliis passage does not appear in Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and 
Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New York: International Publishers, 1967). It can be 
found in the second German edition oiKapital (1872), in a note at the end of the first 
paragraph of the famous section on commodity fetishism (part 1, chapter 1, sec- 
tion 4). 



29. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, p. 552n. 

30. "Der Urspmng der Zeitung aus dem Geiste der Rhetorik," playing on the title of 
Nietzsche's fir st book, Die Gebart der Tragbdie aus dem Geiste der Musik. 

g [The Stock Exchange, Economic History] 

1. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, 7'he Holy Family, trans. Richard Dixon and Clemens 
Dutt, in Marx and Engels, Collected Works, vol. 4 (New York: International Publish- 
ers, 1975), pp. 123-124. 

2. Colomba (1840) is a novel by Prosper Merimee. The Cominendatore appears in the 
final scene of Mozart's opera Don Giovanni. 

3. Date of Napoleon's abdication before the Allied armies at Fontainebleau. The letter 
that follows uses the tu form of address as a sign of the writer's contempt. 

4. The author goes on (pp. 57-58) to describe the "debacle" in which he was "taken," 
by a speculator dealing in rabbit fur, to the tune of 12 francs, 15 centimes — a loss that 
proves ruinous for his finances. 

5. Honore de Balzac, "The Maranas, trans. G. Buniham Ives (Philadelphia: George Bar- 
rie, 1899), p. 126. 

6. The Utopian Vision of C/iarles Fourier, trans. Jonathan Beecher and Richard Bienvenu 
(1971; rpt. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1983) pp. 253-254. 

7. Karl Mara, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 24. 

k [The Commiine] 

1. Agnes de Meranie (1846), a drama by Francois Ponsard, is about a twelfth-century 
queen of France who was dethroned on orders from Pope Innocent III. Colas (1819), 
a play by Victor Ducange, concerns an eighteenth-century Huguenot executed on 
false charges by an intolerant Toulouse parliament. Charles IX, ou L'Ecole des rois 
(1788) is a verse tragedy by Mariejoseph Chenier about a cowardly sixteenth-cen- 
tury king; it was a favorite with revolutionary audiences. 

2. Cartes de civisme were identity cards which the Commune's Committee on Public 
Safety made compulsory for all citizens in May 1871, in response to heightened fears 
of spies. 

3. Rimbaud: Complete Works, Selected Letters, trans. Wallace Fowlie (Chicago: University 
of Chicago Press, 1966), p. 89 ("The Hands of Jeanne-Marie"). 

4. It appears to have escaped Benjamin's notice that Courbet, in the caricature, is not 
standing on just any broken column but on the remains of the Place Vendome 
colunm, which was torn down during the Commune — an act of destruction for 
which the painter was later convicted. [R.T.] See Figure 36 in this volume. 

5. A reference to the dismemberment of Poland in 1815, after the Congress of Vieima. 

6. Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, trans. Gilbert Highet and Helen Highet (1936; rpt. 
New York: Howard Fertig, 1969), p. 220. 

7. Ibid., pp. 220-221. 

8. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspoiulence , 3rd ed., trans. I. Lasker 
(Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1975), pp. 82-83. 

9. Henrik Ibsen, Letters and Speeches, ed. Evert Sprinchorn (New York: Hill and Wang, 
1964), p. 106 (trans. Nilsen Laurvik and Mary Morison). 

10. After the victory at Sedan and the capture of Napoleon III, on September 1, 1870, 
Prussian forces advanced on Paris and, by September 23, had surrounded the city. 



The siege lasted until the end of January, when an armistice was signed, ending the 
Franco-Prussian War. 

11. In the course of "Bloody Week" (May 21-28, 1871), the Communards resisted 
Thiers's forces street by street, retreating toward the heart of Paris. In their despera- 
tion, they executed a number of hostages, including the archbishop of Paris. 

12. At issue is Thiers's art collection. 

1 [The Seine, The Oldest Paris] 

1. Originally added to the temple at Luxor by Ramses II, the obelisk was installed on 
the Place de la Concorde in 1831. The prince de Joinville was Francois Ferdinand 
Philippe d'Orleans, son of Louis Philippe. 

2. Victor Hugo, Les MiserMes, trans. Charles E. Wilbour (1862; rpt. New York: Mod- 
em Library, 1992), pp. 1100-1101. 

in [Idleness] 

1. Plato, The Collected Dialogues, ed. Edith Hamilton and Huntington Cairns (New 
York: Pantheon, 1963), pp. 1397-1398 (Laws, 832a, trans. A.E. Taylor). 

2. "Leisure" translates Musse; "idleness" translates Miissiggang; and "world at large" 
translates Lebewelt. On idleness, compareJ87a,2-3. 

3. Karl Marx, The Revolutions of 1848: Political Writings, vol. 1, ed. David Fembach 
(London: Penguin, 1973), p. 192 (from the Ncue rlwinische £eitung, Dec. 15, 1848). 
"Indolence" translates Faulheit. 

4. "Experience" here translates die Erfahrung; "immediate experience," das Erlebnis. In 
the passages that follow in this convolute, the former is also translated by "long 
experience" and "connected experience," and the latter by "individual experience" 
and "experience" preceded by the definite or indefinite article. (Exceptions are indi- 
cated in angle brackets and notes.) Erfahrung (etymologically rooted in the notion of 
"going through") presupposes tradition and continuity; Erlebnis, something more 
spontaneous, entails shock and discontinuity. In notes connected with the composi- 
tion of "Uber einige Motive bei Baudelaire" <Some Motifs in Baudelaire>, Benjamin 
writes that experiences in the sense of Erlebnisse are "by nature unsuitable for literary 
composition," and "work is distinguished by the fact that it begets Erfalirungen out of 
Erleb?iissen" (GS, vol. 1, p. 1183). See also, in the text below, "First Sketches," QJ,24-, 
and SW, vol. 2, pp. 553 (on Erfaltrung) and 582 (on erlebte Erjkhrung). 

5. Which is to say, tradition translated into the language of shock. 

6. Max Horkheimer, 'Traditional and Critical Theory," in Horkheimer, Critical Theory, 
trans. MatthewJ. O'Connell (New York: Continuum, 1995), pp. 234-236; and idem, 
"Remarks on Philosopliical Anthropology," in Horkheimer, Between Philosophy and 
Social Science, trans. G. Frederick Hunter, Matthew S. Kramer, and John Torpey 
(Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 1993), p. 664. 

7. ". . . der gelaufigen Erfahrung den Erlebnischarakter abzumerken." In the sentence 
following, "the experience" translates die Erfahrung. 

8. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), pp. 333-334. 

9. Reprinted in GS, vol. 2, p. 447, lines 13-20, and p. 448, lines 16-33. [R.T.] In Eng- 
lish, "The Storyteller," in Illuminations, trans. Harry Zohn (New York: Schocken, 
1969), pp. 91-92, 92-93 (section 9). 

10. Literally, "gilded youth," fashionable and wealthy young people; specifically, in 
France, the fashionable set of the reactionary party in 1794. 



11. Gleic/iscJialtung ("alignment" — term used by the Nazis as a euphemism for the elimi- 
nation of undesirable persons from public and professional life), chiming here with 
Umschaltung ("gearing" or "switching") in the preceding sentence. "Empathy" trans- 
lates Einfuhlung. 

12. Jeanjacques Rousseau, 'Tlie Confessions, trans. J. M. Cohen (Baltimore: Penguin, 
1954), p. 591. The passage continues: "The idleness I love ... is the idleness of a 
child. ... I love ... to follow nothing but the whim of the moment." 

13. The Letters of Gustave Flaubert, 1857-1880, trans. Francis Steegmuller (Cambridge, 
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1982), p. 24. "Mon ame est triste et j'ai lu tous les 
livres" is Benjamin's exquisite misquotation of the opening of Mallanne's poem 
"Brise marine" (see J87,5). The line from Goethe is from Faust, trans. Louis Macneice 
(New York: Oxford University Press, 1952), p. 19 (part 1, line 354). 

14. Oswald Spengler, The Decline of the West, vol. 2, trans. Charles Francis Atkinson 
(New York: Knopf, 1928), p. 100. 

15. Ibid., p. 90. 

p [Anthropological Materialism, History of Sects] 

1. Christian Dietrich Grabbe, Werke und Briefe, vol. 1 (Darmstadt, 1960), pp. 142£f. 
[R.T.] 

2. Daumier's series of forty lithographs on career women was published under the title 
Les Bas-bleus in Le Clmrivari in 1844. It was followed by series on socialist women and 
divorced women. 

3. The Mew Oxford Annotated Bible (New York: Oxford University Press, 1977), p. 1202 
(Matthew 23.9). On the woman caught in adultery, seejohn 8.1-11. 

4. John 2.1-11. 

5. Honore de Balzac, The Girl with the Golden Eyes, trans. G. B. Ives, with Walter 
Robins and E. P. Robins (Philadelphia: George Barrie, 1896), p. 310. Curtius is 
concerned here with the opening paragraph of Balzac's novel, in which Paris is 
presented as a city of masks. 

6. See Gustav Mayer, Friedrich Engels, trans. Gilbert Highet and Helen Highet (1936; 
rpt. New York: Howard Fertig, 1969), pp. 14-16. The passages quoted by Benjamin 
are not found in this English edition. 

7. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Selected Correspondence, 3rd ed., trans. I. Lasker 
(Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1975), pp. 18-19. 

8. Baudelaire as a Literary Critic, trans. Lois Boe Hyslop and Francis E. Hyslop, Jr. 
(University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press, 1964), p. 336. 

r [Ecole Polyteeliiiique] 

1 . See "Ecole Polytechnique" in the "Guide to Names and Terms." 

2. Jules Michelet, The Rople, trans. John P. McKay (Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 
1973), pp. 195-196. Reference is to the extremely severe winter of 1794-1795 (Year 
III, according to the Revolutionary calendar), after the guillotining of Robespierre, 
on July 28, 1794, had ended the Reign of Terror. 

3. Honore de Balzac, The Country Parson, Irans. anonymous (New York: Fred De Fau, 
1923), p. 187. 

4. In 1833, Thiers had presented to die Chamber of Deputies a project for erecting 
detached forts outside the city. The proposal was abandoned; but in 1840, on ac- 
count of new threats of war, a royal ordinance directed that Paris be encircled by 
fortifications. This project was implemented in February 1841. The resulting enceinte 



(destroyed in 1 9 1 9) took in a number of neighboring townships, such as Montmartre 
and Belleville, which were not administratively attached to the capital until 1859. 
[J.L.] 

5. Karl Marx, The Revolutions of 1848: Political Writings, vol. 1, ed. David Fembach 
(London: Penguin, 1973), pp. 129-130. 

First Sketches 

1. Le Peril bleu (The Blue Peril) was published in Paris in 1911. [R.T.] 

2. Benjamin knew Carl Gustav Cams' Paris journal through excerpts in Rudolf Bor- 
chardt's anthology Der Deutsche in cler Landschaft (Munich, 1927), and through the 
texts selected by Eckart von Sydow (Leipzig, 1926); see his review of these two books 
in GS, vol. 3, pp. 91-94 and 56-57. [R.T.] 

3. See note 9 in Convolute D. 

4. Allusion to the stabilization of the franc by Raymond Poincare in June 1928. [ J.L.] 

5. The Theatre de Comte was located in the Passage des Panoramas before being 
moved to the Passage Choiseul in 1826. It combined demonstrations of physical 
agility, prestidigitation, and ventriloquy with playlets performed by child actors. 
[ J.L.] On the shop names, see below, E°,5. 

6. Jacques de Lacretelle, "Le Reveur parisien," Nouvelle Revue francaise, 166 (July 1, 
1927), pp. 23-39. [R.T] 

7. Benjamin this time may have in mind not the character in E. T. A. Hoffmann (see 
Hl,l) but a large musichall built in 1893 on the Boulevard des Capucines. [J.L.] 

8. The Petit-Coblentz is the name which, during the Directory (1795-1799), was given 
to a part of the Boulevard des Italiens that was frequented mainly by emigres. [ J.L.] 

9. The Passage du Pont-Neuf was situated between the Rue Mazarine and the Rue de 
Seine, in the sixth arrondissement. The old Passage Henri IV was located near the Rue 
des Bons-Enfants, in the first arrondissement, [J.L.] On Zola's Tlvr'ese Raquin, see 
Hl,3. 

10. The Passage du Bois-de-Boulogne became the Passage du Prado in 1929. [ J.L.] 

11. Le Fantome de I'Opera, a novel by Gaston Leroux, was published in Paris in 1910. 
After E°,30, a page was cut out of the manuscript. [R.T] 

12. L'Hermite de la Chaussee d'Antin, ou Observations sur les moeurs et les usages paiisiens au 
commencement du XIX C siede, by Victor Joseph Jouy (1764-1846), was first published 
as a newspaper serial and later collected in various book formats. The frontispiece of 
the 1813 edition is a drawing of the author sitting, quill in hand, at his writing desk in 
his library. Projected on the wall above him is an illuminated scene of Parisian street 
life; under this drawing is the following inscription in longhand: "My cell is like a 
CAMERA •BSCURA in which external objects are recalled." 

13. A piece a tiroirs is an episodic play in which the scenes unfold, one after another, like a 
row of drawers opening and closing in a chest. Gutzkow's term is Scliubladenstilck. 

14. "Street lamp"; in argot, "policeman." [J.L.] 

15. It was Bordier-Marcet who invented the ring-shaped, hanging lampe astrale, whose 
light filtered down from above. [J.L.] 

16. The Encyclopaedia Britannica of 1875 (vol. 3, p. 36) indicates that a "Mr. Vallance of 
Brighton" first had the idea of utilizing the pneumatic principle — that is, a vacuum- 
tube system — to transport passengers. Experiments were run in the 1840s. [J.L.] 

17. See Rene Crevel, "L'Esprit contre la raison," Calders du Sud (December 1927). [J.L.] 

18. See T2a,3, and the entry on Nodier in the "Guide to Names and Terms." 

19. A cheval glass, or swing-mirror. 

20. Compare CI, 3, including note 3, and F°,10. 



21. Benjamin wrote this sketch in French. 

22. Quoted in French without indication of source. 

23. See Marcel Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 1, trans. C. K. Scott MoncriefF 
(New York: Random House, 1925), pp. 1023 and 995, respectively. 

24. Louis Aragon, Paris Peasant, trans. Simon Watson Taylor (1971; rpt. Boston: Exact 
Change, 1994), p. 71. 

25. Charles Baudelaire, Artificial Paradise, trans. Ellen Fox (New York: Herder and 
Herder, 1971), p. 68. 

26. Ibid. See H2,l. 

27. Anatole France, The Garden of Epicurus, trans. Alfred Allinson (New York: Dodd, 
Mead, 1923), p. 129. 

28. SeeBl,5. 

29. Or "dream face" (Traumgesicht). 

30. See Walter Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic Drama, trans. Jolm Osborne 
(London: Verso, 1977), pp. 44-48, clearly a central passage for the logic of Ben- 
jamin's theory of reading. "Myriorama": a landscape picture made of a number of 
separate sections that can be put together in various ways to form distinct scenes. 

31. Rainer Maria Rilke, "Puppen: Zu den Wachspnppen von Lotte Pritzel," in Samtliclie 
Werke, vol. 6 (Frankfurt am Main, 1966), pp. 1063-1074. [R.T.] 

32. Benjamin's work on the poet Christoph Friedrich Heinle disappeared in 1933, to- 
gether with Heinle's literary remains. [R.T.] The nod (numai) of the gods is intermit- 
tent. 

33. Reference is to the thirteenth of Giacomo Leopard's Pensieri, in the edition prized by 
Benjamin, Gedanken (Leipzig, 1922), pp. 16ff. [R.T.] In English: Pensieri, trans. W. S. 
Di Piero (Baton Rouge: Louisiana State University Press, 1981), pp. 46-47, on the 
subject of anniversaries. "Actualization" here, as in K2,3, translates Vergegenwdrtigung, 
"Making things present," here as in H2,3, translates sich gegenwdrtig madien. "The 
bodily life" translates das leibliche Leben. 

34. See note 3 in Convolute S. 

35. Presumably the writer Lothar Brieger-Wasservogel, who at one time was a friend of 
Benjamin's wife, Dora. [R.T.] 

36. See, in particular, Goethe's Versuch einer Witterungslehre of 1825. [R.T.] 

37. See note 4 in Convolute D. 

38. That is, "time" and "weather." 

39. Reading betten here (as in PI, 10) for leiten, 

40. Mode unci JTynismus (Fashion and Cynicism), by Friedrich Theodor Vischer; see I°,l 
andj°,l. [R.T.] 

41. The object of this reference to the Baudelaire-Buch has not been identified. (Benjamin 
had been collecting materials on Baudelaire for Tlie Arcades Project since the end of 
the 1920s, though his plan for making a book on Baudelaire out of these materials 
evidently did not take shape until 1938; see GS, vol. 1, p. 1160, 6.1.) 

42. See Proust, Remembrance of Things Past, vol. 2 (New York: Random House, 1932), 
p. 385 ( The Captive, trans. C. K. Scott MoncriefF). (Thanks to Julia Prewitt Brown for 
this reference.) 

43. ...monde — unci die Mode. 

44. "Know thyself." 

45. Possibly refers to the description of the streets of Palis at the beginning of "Ferragus," 
the first episode of Balzac's Histoire des treize. [ J.L.] 

46. Heinvich Mann, Eugenie, oder Die Bitrgerzeit (Berlin, Vienna, Leipzig, 1928). [R.T.] 

47. Sigfried Giedion, Bauen in Frankreich (Leipzig and Berlin, 1928), p. 3. [R.T.] 

48. See note 6 in Convolute K. 



49. Proust, A la RedwrcJie du temps perdu, vol. 1 (Paris, 1954), pp. 644ff. [R.T.] In English 
in Remembrance of Tilings Past, vol. 1, p. 490 {Witldn a Budding Grove). See SI 1,1. 

50. See note 12 in Convolute M. 

51. On the former plan, see note 7 in Convolute S; and on the latter, see the fragments in 
Hugo von Hofmannsthal, Samtliche Werke, vol. 29 (Frankfurt, 1978), pp. 202-206. 
[R.T.] 

52. Andre Breton, Mad/a, trans. Richard Howard (New York: Grove Weidenfeld, 1960), 
p. 152. 

53. Proust, Remembrance oj Things Past, vol. 1, p. 323. (Renferme; stuffy, close. Ca sent le 
renferme: "It smells musty in here.") 

54. Benjamin had planned to write on Ludwig Tieck's novella Der Blonde Eckbert, pub- 
lished in 1812. [R.T.] 

55. Perhaps Aragon, Palis Peasant, pp. 81-84. 

56. 'This passage appears also in Benjamin's review "Krisis des Darwinisnius?" published 
in Die literwisclw Welt, April. 12, 1929 {GS, vol. 4, p. 534). [R.T.] 

57. "Agnoszierung des Jetzt' in den Dingen." The term agnosziert, "acknowledged," 
shows up inJ51a,6. 

58. Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), pp. 83-84; vol. 3, trans. Ernest Untennann 
(1909; rpt. New York: International Publishers, 1967), pp. 25-210, esp. 173ff. See, in 
this volume, Rolf Tiedemann, "Dialectics at a Standstill," note 1 5 . 

59. Louis Schneider, Les Maitres de I'operettefrancaue: Offenbach. (Paris, 1923). [R.T.] 

60. Le Guide historique et anecdotique de Paris: LHistoire de Paris, de ses monuments, de ses 
revolutions, de ses cele'brite's, de sa vie artistique, scientifique , mondaine, published under 
the direction of E. Cuervo-Marquez (Paris, 1929). [R.T.] 

61. H ie memoirs of Prince Metternich, published in two volumes. [R.T.] 

62. La Muette de Portici (The. Mute Girl of Portici), by Daniel Auber, was regarded as the 
archetype of grand opera. See note 10 in Convolute B. 

63. "Eager for new things." 

64. Henri See, Franzosuche Wirtsclutftsgeschichte (French Economic History), vol. 1 (Jena, 
1930). [R.T.] 

"The Arcades of Paris" 

1. See note 2 in Convolute H. 

2. Seitenhimmeln, possibly an error in transcription; in Q3,2, Benjamin has Seidenhim- 
meln, "silken skies." And in the third sentence of tliis passage, instead of Land, Q3,2 
reads Band, "ribbon." See "Moonlit Nights on the Rue la Boetie," in SW, vol. 2, 
pp. 107-108. 

3. In German, List, which originally meant "knowledge" and refeired to techniques of 
hunting and war, to magical abilities and artistic skill. 

4. Greek name for Castor and Pollux, twin sons of Leda who were transformed by Zeus 
into the constellation Gemini. They had a cult in Lacedaemon, where they were 
symbolized by the dokana, two upright pieces of wood coimected by two crossbeams. 
Presumably an allusion to Benjamin's collaboration with Franz Hessel. 

"The Ring of Saturn" 

1. See GS, vol. 7, pp. 232-237. In English in SW, vol. 2, pp. 563-567. 

2. Charles-Francois Viel, De I'Impuissance des mathematiques pour assurer la solidite des 
batimens, et recherches sw la construction des ponts (Paris, 1805). [R.T.] 



3. Alfred Gotthold Meyer, Eisenbaaten: Hire Geschicliie and Asthetik (Esslingen, 1907), 
p. 93. [R.T.] Compare F4a,2. 

Materials for the Expose of 1935 

1. In Etienne Cabet's novel Voyage en Icarie (1839), the narrator learns that in Icaria 
"fashion never changes; that there are only a certain number of different shapes for 
hats — toques, turbans, and bonnets; and that the model for each of these shapes had 
been . , . decided upon by a committee." Oeavres d'Etienne Cabet, 3rd ed. (Paris: 
Bureau du Pbpulaire, 1845), p. 137. See B4,2. 

2. See B2,5. See also section 3 of the "Expose of 1935, Early Version." 

3. Presumably a reference to Fourier. 

4. See Franz Kafka, "The Cares of a Family Man," in Kafka, The Complete Stories (New 
York: Schocken, 1971), pp. 427-429 (trans. WillaMuir and Edwin Muir). Odradek is 
a diminutive creature, resembling a flat star-shaped spool for thread, who can stand 
upright and roll around, but can never be laid hold of, and has no fixed abode. You 
might think he was a broken-down remnant, but in bis own way he is perfectly 
finished. He can talk, but often remains mute. 

5. Could also be construed as "the knocking that startles us out of sleep." 

6. "Fateful date": possibly an allusion to the dramatic Socialist gains, that year, in the 
Chamber of Deputies. 

7. "Traumkitsch" (first published in 1927) is in GS, vol. 2, pp. 620-622; in English in 
SW, vol. 2, pp. 3-5. Benjamin is concerned here with "distilling" the "sentimentality 
of our parents." 

8. The second stage of work on The Arcades Project began in early 1934, when Benjamin 
was commissioned to write an article in French on Haussmann for Le Monde, a 
periodical edited at that time by Alfred Kurella. The article was never written, but 
Benjamin's preliminary studies remain, in the form of the drafts and outline printed 
here as No. 19. The first draft is in French; the second and third drafts are in German. 
The outline begins in French and switches to German after the second "embellisse- 
ment strategique." 

9. The schemes printed as Nos. 20 and 21 were preparatory to the drafting of the 
expose of 1935. The first is dated by Benjamin himself; the second most likely dates 
from the beginning of May 1935. The reflections contained in No. 22 appear to 
belong to a more extended scheme, which has not been preserved. 

10. Nos. 23, 24, and 25 apparendy date from after the drafting of the expose of 1935. No. 
25 was written by Benjamin on the back of a letter of December 22, 1938, addressed 
to liim; while clearly connected to central concerns of the Arcades complex, it could 
relate as well to the project of a book on Baudelaire or to the theses "Uber den Begriff 
der Geschichte" (On the Concept of History) . 

"Dialectics at a Standstill" 

The following notes are by Rolf liedemann. Citations from the "Con volutes," the "First 
Sketches," and the "Early Drafts" are referenced by tags for the individual entries. 

1. Translated as "A Portrait of Walter Benjamin," in T. W. Adorno, Primis, trans. Samuel 
Weber and Shierry Weber (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 1981), pp. 221-241. 

2. See Walter Benjamin, Briefe, ed. Gershom Scholem and Theodor W. Adorno (Frank- 
furt: Suhrkamp, 1966), passim. In English in The Coirespondence of Walter Benjamin, 



trans. Manfred R. Jacobson and Evelyn M. Jacobson (Clricago: University of Chi- 
cago Press, 1994). Subsequent references to the Correspondence will appear in the text 
as "Letters." For a complete compilation of Benjamin's statements in letters about the 
Passagen-Werk (witliin the limits of available correspondence), see Benjamin, Gesam- 
melte Schriften, vol. 5 (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1982), pp. 1081-1183 (annotations by 
Rolf liedemann). Subsequent references to the Gesammelte Schriften will appear in the 
text in parentheses, volume number followed by page number — e.g., "5:1063." 

3. See The Correspondence o f Walter Benjamin and Gershom Scholem, 1932-1940, trans. 
Gary Smith and Andre Lefevere (New York: Schocken, 1989), p. 121. Subsequent 
references to this work will appear in the text as "Scholem Letters." 

4. Adomo, Prisms, p. 239. 

5. See Rolf liedemann, Dialektik im Stillstand (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1983), pp. 190- 
191, n. 18a, on the current legend of a "rearrangement" of the "Aufzeichnungen und 
Materialien" in the Passagen-Werk. 

6. According to Adorno, Benjamin's intention was "to eliminate all overt commentary 
and to have the meanings emerge solely through a shock-like montage of the mate- 
rial. . . . His magnum opus, the crowning of his antisubjectivism, was to consist solely 
of citations" (Adorno, Prisms, 239). Though this thought may seem typical of Ben- 
jamin, I am convinced that Benjamin did not intend to work in that fashion. There is 
no remark in the letters attesting to this. Adomo supports his position with two 
entries from the Passagen-Werk itself (see Nl,10 and Nla,8), which can hardly be 
interpreted in that way. One of these already turned up in the "First Sketches" of 1928 
or 1929 (see O c, ,36), at a time when Benjamin stated that he was still considering an 
essay, which he had begun in the "Early Drafts" — by no means, however, in the form 
of a montage of quotations. 

7. "One-Way Street," in Benjamin, Selected Writings, Vol. 1: 1913-1926 (Cambridge, 
Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1996), p. 466. Subsequent references to the Selected 
Writings will appear in the text as SW. 

8. This had been preceded by the plan — which probably did not last long — to collabo- 
rate vnth Franz Hessel on an article about arcades. See 5:1341. 

9. "Surrealism," in Benjamin, Selected Writings, Vol. 2: 1927-1934 (Cambridge, Mass.: 
Harvard University Press, 1999), p. 210. 

10. Here and in what follows, references to the first and second sketch are in the same 
manner that Benjamin referred to them in his letter to Gretel Adorno of August 16, 
1935: merely in quotation marks, so to speak. No single text is meant by "sketch"; the 
"second sketch," especially, does not denote the 1935 expose. Benjamin had in mind 
the concept of the work, such as it can be inferred from an interpretation of the 
totality of the notes from both stages of his project. 

11. See Hermann Schweppenhiiuser, "Propaedeutics of Profane Illumination," in On Wal- 
ter Benjamin: Critical Essays and Recollections, ed. Gary Smith (Cambridge, Mass.: 
MIT Press, 1988), pp. 33-50. 

12. See mainly "On the Program of the Coming Philosophy," Pldlosop Ideal Forum 15, 1-2 
(Fall- Winter 1983-1984), pp. 41-51, now in SW, 1:100-110; this citation originates 
from an early fragment "Uber die Walnnehmung," 6:33-38 {SW, 1:93-96). 

13. See "Doctrine of the Similar," in SW, 2:694-698; and "On the Mimetic Faculty," SW, 
2:720-722. One of the latest texts in the "First Sketches" to the Passagen-Werk seems 
to be a germinating cell of Benjamin's theory of mimesis (see 5:1038; Q^,24). 

14-. See Rolf Tiedemann, Studien zur P/ulosophie Walter Benjmnins, 2 ntl ed. (Frankf urt: 

Suhrkamp, 1973), pp. 76-77, 98-99. 
15. In the "First Sketches," in which economic categories are used either metaphysically 



or in a desultory fashion, we find uncommented references to two passages in the Erst 
and third volumes of Capital, and these references are to the "original edition" (see 
5:1036; Q^,4). 'Ifiis could be especially instructive in the case of the first volume, 
whose first edition of 1867 — the original edition referred to — is very rare and is 
almost never cited. We may surmise that Horkheimer or Adomo referred Benjamin 
to the pages in question during the "historical conversations" in the fall of 1929. The 
library of the Institut fur Sozialforschung owned, at that time, a copy of the original 
edition, and at least Horkheimer was wont to quote from scarce editions. This conjec- 
ture is corroborated when one checks the relevant passage in the first edition of 
Capital: it deals with the definitive formulations of commodity fetishism — that is, the 
very concept whose "unfolding" would be "the central core" of the second Passagen- 
Werk sketch. Since the manuscript of the "First Sketches" was abandoned shortly 
after this entry, it is very possible that Benjamin's abandoning the manuscript may 
have been caused by the obstacles created by the suggestion that it was necessary for 
him to read Capital. Finally, a letter from Adomo to Horkheimer of June 8, 1935, 
which is absent from the fifth volume because it was made available only after the 
edition's publication, may well turn speculation into certainty. Adomo characterizes 
the first expose as "an attempt to unlock the nineteenth century as 'style' by means of 
the category of 'commodity as dialectical image."' He adds: "This concept owes as 
much to you as it is close to me (and as I have been beholden to it for many years) . In 
that memorable conversation in the Hotel Carlton [in Frankfurt] which you, Ben- 
jamin, and I had about dialectical images, together with Asja Lacis and Gretel, it was 
you who claimed that feature of a historical image as central for the commodity; since 
that conversation, both Benjamin's and my thoughts on this matter have been reor- 
ganized in a decisive way. The Kierkegaard book [by Adomo] contains their rudi- 
ments, the 'Arcades' sketch embraces them quite explicitly." 

16. Karl Marx, Capital, vol. 1, trans. Samuel Moore and Edward Aveling (1887; rpt. New 
York: International Publishers, 1967), p. 72. 

17. Ibid., p. 73. 

18. See Jiirgen Habennas, "Walter Benjamin: Consciousness-Raising or Rescuing Cri- 
tique," in Smith, ed., On Walter Benjamin: Critical Essays and Recollections, pp. 90-128. 

19. SeeTiedemann, Studien, pp. 79-89. 

20. Walter Benjamin, The Origin of German Tragic Drama, trans. John Osborne (London: 
Verso, 1977), p. 48. Subsequent references to this work will appear in the text as 

Trauerspiel. 

21. See Walter Benjamin, "Theses on the Philosophy of History," in Benjamin, Illumina- 
tions, trans. Harry Zohn (New York: Schocken, 1969), pp. 260-261. Subsequent 
references to this work will appear in the text as Illuminations. 

22. See Tiedemann, "Historical Materialism or Political Messianism?" Philosophical Fo- 
rum 15, nos. 1-2 (Fall-Winter 1983-1984), pp. 71-104. 

23. Benjamin never brought himself to define these categories at length, yet they are the 
basis of all his thoughts on the Passagen-Werk, which he identified with the "world of 
dialectical images" and for which dialectic at a standstill was to be "the quintessence 
of the method" (P°,4). He apparently developed the theory of dialectical images 
mainly in conversations with Adomo. Although both concepts are absent from Ben- 
jamin's publications during his lifetime, the "dialectical image" appears — with refer- 
ence to its Benjaminian origins — in Adomo's Habilitationsschrift on Kierkegaard, 
which was published in 1933 (Adorno, Kierliegaard: Construction of the Aesthetic, trans. 
Robert Hullot-Kentor [Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1988]). I shall 
here only allude to the fact that Adomo's interpretation of the concept differs from 



Benjamin's in more than mere nuances. In his Kierkegaard book, Adorno equated 
the dialectical image with allegory, and later he also seems to liken it to phantasmago- 
ria (see N5,2, and 5:1136). Benjamin characterized Adorno's definition of the "antin- 
omy of appearance and meaning" as "fundamental" for both allegory and 
phantasmagoria, but he found it "confusing" in its application to the "dialectical 
image" (1:1174). The difference might be found in the connection Benjamin made 
between the dialectical image and elements of messianism — a connection to which 
Adorno, the more scrupulous Marxist, could not accede. One may try to put it this 
way: the phantasmagorias of the arcade or the collector as such are not dialectical 
images in Benjamin's sense; both the arcades and the collector become dialectical 
images only when the liistorical materialist deciphers them as phantasmagorias. But in 
Benjamin's opinion, the key that allows the historical materialist to unlock the code 
remains connected to the discovery of a messianic force in history (see 1:1232). 

24. Marx, Capital, p. 20. 

25. Adorno, Piisms, p. 233. 

26. Marx, Capital, p. 763. 

27. See Gershom Scholem, Major Trends in Jewish Mysticism, 3rd ed. (London: Thames 
and Hudson, 1955), pp. 283-287; and idem, On the Kabbalah audits Symbolism, trans. 
Ralph Manheim (New York: Schocken, 1965), pp. 126ff. See also Hedemann, 
Dialektik im Stilhtand, pp. 102ff. 

28. Karl Marx, Briefe aus den " Deutsch-Franzosischen Jahrbuchern," in Karl Marx and 
Friedrich Engels, Werke, vol. 1, 2nd ed. (Berlin: Dietz, 1957), p. 346. 

29. Walter Benjamin, "Theologico-Political Fragment," in Benjamin, Reflections, trans. 
Edmund Jephcott (New York: Schocken, 1978), p. 312. 

"The Story of Old Benjamin" 

1. Walter Benjamin, Briefe, vol. 1, ed. Gershom Scholem and Theodor W. Adorno 
(Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1966), p. 298. In English: The Correspondence of Walter Ben- 
jamin, 1910-1940, trans. Manfred R. Jacobson and Evelyn M. Jacobson (Chicago: 
University of Chicago Press, 1994), p. 206 (letter of February 24, 1923, to Florens 
Cliristian Rang). 

2. In Agesilaus Sa?Uander. The translation here is by Lisa Fittko. See GS, vol. 6, p. 521 
(August 12, 1933). hi English in Walter Benjamin, Selected Writings, vol. 2 (Cam- 
bridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1999), p. 713. 

3. Hannah Arendt, Men in Dark Times (New York: Harcourt, Brace and World, 1968), 
p. 161. 



Guide to Names and Terms 



Abdel Krim (1885-1963). Leader of die Moors in die Rif region of Morocco. Ultimately 
defeated by French and Spanish forces in 1926, and exiled to Reunion. 

About, Edmond (1828-1885). French novelist, playwright, and journalist. 

Absalom. Son of King David in the Old Testament. He revolts against liis father and is 
killed. See 2 Samuel 18. 

Academie Francaise. Body founded in 1634 to promote the advancement of French 
literature. 

Adler, Max (1873-1937). Austrian lawyer, student of Neo-Kantian and positivist philoso- 
phy He was active in the Austrian Social Democratic Party, and cofounder of Marx- 
Studien (1904). Author of Soziologie des Marxismus (1930-1932). 

Aime Martin, Antoine-Louis (1786-1841). Man ofletters, professor, and librarian at the 
Bibliotheque Sainte-Genevieve in Paris. 

Alberti, Leon Battista (1404-1472). Italian architect, painter, writer; first to investigate 
the laws of perspective. Author of De re aedificatoria (1452). 

Albertus Magnus. Pseudonym of Albert von Bollstadt (1193?— 1280), German theolo- 
gian, scientist, and philosopher. He was reputed to be a magician because of his scien- 
tific pursuits. Canonized in 1932. 

Alhambra. Fortress and palace erected by the Moors near Granada, Spain, in the thir- 
teenth and early fourteenth centuries. 

Ambigu. Parisian theater built in 1827; a central venue for popular melodramas. It was 
demolished in 1966. 

Amiel, Henri (1821-1881). Swiss poet and philosopher; aurfior of the introspective 
Journal intime (1883-1884). 

Anarcharsis. Scythian sage who, according to Herodotus, traveled widely to learn the 
customs of many nations. 

Axicelle, Narcisse-Desh e (1801-1888). French lawyer. In 1844 Baudelaire's mother ap- 
pointed him as her son's legal guardian. 

Annenkov, Pavel (18 12-1882). Russian man ofletters, personally acquainted with Marx 
in the 1840s. 

Ansel liitz, Ottomar (1846-1907). Polish-born German photographer who conducted 
experiments in high-speed photography; invented a tachyscope that was a forerunner 
of the motion-picture apparatus. 

Antony. Play by Alexandre Dumas (1831). Its melancholy, star-crossed hero influenced a 
generation of young Frenclunen. 

Arago, Francois (1786-1853). Scientist who investigated the theory of light and electro- 
magnetism; director of the Paris observatory (1830). He took part in the July Revolu- 



tion and was minister of war in the Provisional Government (1848). Opponent of 
Napoleon III. 

Arago, Jacques (1790-1855). Brother of Francois Arago; traveler, novelist, and play- 
wright. 

Aragon, Louis (1897-1982). Novelist, poet, essayist; a leader of the Dadaists and later of 
the Surrealists. Author of Feu dejoie (1920), Une Vague de reves (1924), Le Paysan de 
Paris (1926), Lei Voyages de I'Imperiale (1940). 

Argand, Aime (1755-1803). Swiss physicist; inventor of a highly effective oil lamp. 

Artois, comte d'. Title granted (1757) by Louis XV of France to his grandson, later 
Charles X. 

Assassins. Islamic sect of the eleventh to thirteenth centuries that considered the murder 

of its enemies a religious duty. 
Asselineau, Charles (1820-1874). French critic and bibliophile. Close friend and later 

editor and biographer of Baudelaire, who reviewed his collection of short stories, La 

Double Vie, in 1859. 

Atala (1860). Fragmentary epic by Chateaubriand. Set in Louisiana in the eighteenth 

century and dealing with the lives of American Indians, it is said to mark the beginning 

of the Romantic movement in French literature. 
IMtelier. A monthly of French artisans and workers, inlluenced by Christian socialism, 

and committed to a moderate line. Published in Paris 1840 to 1850. It was subtitled 

Or gone special de la classe laborieuse redige par des ouvriers exdusivement. 
Auber, Daniel-Francois-Esprit (1782-1871). Regarded as the founder of French grand 

opera, he collaborated with Eugene Scribe on thirty-eight stage works between 1823 

and 1864. Chapel master to Napoleon III. 
Aubert, Gabriel (1787-1847). Former notary who, for many decades, operated a very 

successful print shop at 15 Galerie Vero-Dodat. Published the greater part of Dau- 

mier's works. 

Aubert,Jacqeust (d. 1753). French violinist and composer of operas, sonatas, ballets. 

Aupick,Jacques (1789-1857). Soldier, ambassador, senator; stamped out the insurrec- 
tion organized by Blanqui in Paris in 1839. He was stepfather to Baudelaire, who 
turned against him. 

Austerlitz. Town in southern Czechoslovakia where, on December 2, 1805, Napoleon 
decisively defeated the Russian and Austrian armies of Czar Alexander I and Emperor 
Francis II. 

Azai's, Pierre-Hyacinthe (1766-1845). French philosopher. In his Systeme universel (1800- 
1818), he developed a theory of forces and of "universal equilibrium." 

Babeuf , Francis (1760-1797). Agitator and journalist during the French Revolution, 
advocating equal distribution of land and income. He organized a conspiracy to over- 
throw the Directory and return to the constitution of 1793; stabbed himself before 
being summoned to the guillotine. Author of a manifesto on social equality (1796). 

Babou, Hippolyte (1824-1878). Critic and novelist, friend of Baudelaire. 

Baby Cadum. Publicity. From the rosy-faced image of Bebe Cadum, symbol launched in 
France in 1912 for the popular Cadum soap. 

Babylone. Neighborhood of Paris (today Sevre-Babylone). 

Bachofen, Johann (1815-1887). Swiss anthropologist and jurist. Author of works on 
Roman civil law and of Das Mutterrecht (1861), the first scientific history of the family 
as a social institution. 

Bailly, Jean (1736-1793). French scholar and politician. As mayor of Paris (1789), he 
imposed martial law and called up the Garde Nationale to keep order (1791); lost 
popularity and was guillotined. 



Bairam. Either of two Muslim religious festivals following the fast of Ramadan. 
Ballliorn,Johann (1528-1603). Printer famous for his disastrous emendations (identity 

with figure named in h°,l is speculative). 
Baltard, Louis (1764-1846). French architect and engraver; professor at the Ecole des 

Beaux- Arts and the Ecole Polytechnique. 
banquets. During the last months of Louis Philippe's reign, in 1847, the opposition 

organized a series of so-called Reform banquets, at which speakers called for electoral 

ref orms. 

Banville, Theodore de (1823-1891). Poet, playwright, critic. Close friend of Baudelaire 

and, with Charles Asselineau, editor of his works. 
Barbara, Charles (1822-1886). Satirical writer active in the 1840s; associated with Le 

Corsaire and the group of bohemians around Henri Murger. 
Barbes, Armand. Republican leader. Co-conspirator with, and later archenemy of, 

Louis-Auguste Blanqui, with whom he was imprisoned in the 1850s. 
Barbey d'Aurevilly, Jules (1808-1889). French critic and novelist; long-time friend of 

Baudelaire. 

Barbier, Auguste (1805-1882). Poet whom Baudelaire admired but criticized f or moral- 
istic tendencies. His Iambes (1831) satirized the monarchy of Louis Philippe. 

Barnum, Phineas (1810-1891). American showman, connected with the circus business. 
Opened "The Greatest Show on Earth" in Brooklyn in 1871. 

Barrault, Emile (1799-1869). Saint-Simonian writer and politician who published in Le 
Globe and wrote many works on Saint-Simonianism. 

Barres, Maurice (1862-1923). Writer and politician. Called for the restoration of "na- 
tional energy" to France. 

Barrot, Odilon (1791-1873). Leader of the liberal opposition in France prior to February 
1848. From December 1848 to October 1849, he headed the ministry supported by 
monarchists. 

Barthelemy, Auguste (1796-1867). French poet and satirist. He edited the weekly jour- 
nal Nemesis, which attacked the government of Louis Philippe in 1831-1832. Collabo- 
rated with Joseph Mery from 1824 to 1834. 

Basilidians. Followers of Basilides, an Alexandrian Gnostic of the early second century, 
who preached a radical dualism and transcendence of the Creator-God of the Jews. 

Batignolles. Village that became part of Paris in 1860; a meeting place of artists and 
politicians in the nineteenth century. 

Bazard, Saint- Amand (1791-1832). Socialist, follower of Saint-Simon, and organizer of 
the French Carbonari (Charbonniers) . He gave a long series of lectures in Paris (1828- 
1830), which won many adherents to Saint-Simonianism. 

Beaumont, Charles (1821-1888). French graphic artist, contributor to Le Charivari. 
Illustrated works by Hugo and Sue. 

Belgrand, Eugene (1810-1878). Engineer who modernized sewer service for the City of 
Paris. Arranged official support for Nadar's photography of the sewers. Author of Les 
Travaux souterrains de Paris (1875). 

Bellamy, Edward (1850-1898). American author of Looking Backward (1888), a Utopian 
romance based on socialist principles. 

Bellange. Pseudonym of Francoisjoseph Belanger (1744-1818), French architect famous 
for his innovative use of iron in the construction of the cupola of the old grain market 
in Paris. 

Belle Isle. Island in the Bay of Biscay. From 1849 to 1857, it was a place of detention for 
French political prisoners; in particular, workers involved in the Paris uprising of June 
1848 were imprisoned there. 



Belleville. Working-class neighborhood in Paris. 

Benda, Julien (1867-1956). French philosophical critic. Among his works are La 
Bergsonisme, ou Une Philosop/iie sur la mobilite (1912) and La Fin de leternel (1929). 

Beraldi. Perhaps a mistake for Berardi, Leon (1817-?), journalist and director of 
EIndependance beige. 

Beranger, Pierre (1780-1857). Immensely popular lyric poet of liberal political sympa- 
thies. 

Beraud, Henri (1885-1958). Novelist and essayist who promoted nationalism and anti- 
Semitism. Author of Le Vitriol de la lune (1921; Goncourt prize). 

Bergeret, Madame. Character in Anatole France's series L'Histoire contemporaine (1896- 
1901). 

Berl, Emmanuel (1892-1976). French writer and journalist, associated with the circle of 
Surrealists around Breton and Aragon. 

Berlioz, Hector (1803-1869). French composer, a pioneer of modem orchestration. 

Bernard, Claude (1813-1878). Noted physiologist. Investigated the sympathetic nerv- 
ous system and the chemical phenomena of digestion. 

Bernardin de Saint-Pierre,Jacques (1737-1814). Writer who anticipated French roman- 
ticism. Audior of Paul et Virgime (1788). 

Bernouard, Francois. French publisher. Friend of Benjamin during the 1920s and 1930s. 

Bernstein, Eduard (1850-1932). German writer and politician. Co-editor of Der Sozial- 
demokrat (1881-1890). Associate of Engels. 

Berry, Charles Ferdinand (1778-1820). Last duke of Berry, a nephew of Louis XVIII; in 
exile 1789-1814. His assassination in Paris by a fanatical Bonapartist led to a reaction- 
ary swing, countered by conspiracies. 

Berryer, Pierre- Antoine (1790-1868). French lawyer and political figure; legitimist. 

Bertin. Family famous for its association with Le Journal des de'bats, which Louis-Francois 
Bertin (1766-1841) purchased in 1799 and ran with his brother, Louis-Francois Bertin 
de Vaux (1771-1842). The sons of the former, Armand (1801-1854) and Francois- 
Edouard (1797-1871) took over as editors from their father. 

Bibliogmphie de la France. Official weekly list of published books delivered by law to the 
Bibliothcque Nationale. 

Biedermeier, Style of furniture in Germany (ca. 1815-1848), characterized by forms that 
are simpler and more sober than those of the Empire style, and by floral motifs. Also a 
style of landscape and genre painting. 

Bierce, Ambrose (1842-P1914). American journalist and short-story writer. Served in 
the Civil War. He established his reputation with witty and caustic writings; his later 
work is of ten bitter and gruesome. 

Biot,Jean Baptiste (1774-1862). French mathematician, physicist, and astronomer. 

Bisson, Louis- Auguste. Pioneer photographer and early friend of Nadar, who owned a 
copy of Bisson's portrait of Balzac (1842). 

Blanc, Louis (1811-1882). Socialist leader and journalist. Sponsored a guarantee of 
employment to workers during the Provisional Government of 1848. Author of Histoire 
de la Revolution Jiancaise (1847-1862). 

Blanqui,Jer6me (1798-1854). French economist; brother of Louis- Auguste Blanqui. 

Blanqui, Louis-Auguste (1805-1881). Radical activist and writer committed to perma- 
nent revolution. After a classical lyceum education in Paris, he studied law and medi- 
cine, but devoted himself to conspiracy in the Carbonari and other secret societies, 
becoming a leading socialist agitator. He was often wounded in street fighting and spent 
a total of forty years in prison, yet maintained a fiery patriotism. Author of L'Etermte 
par les astres (1872) and Critique social (1885). 



Blondel, Jacques Francois (1705-1774). Architect whose ideas greatly influenced his 

contemporaries. He opened in Paris the first art school to teach architecture (1743), and 

taught at the Academie Royale d'Architecture from 1756. 
Bliicher, Gebhard (1742-1819). Prussian field marshal. Defeated Napoleon at Laon 

(1814) and aided in the victory at Waterloo (1815), after which his army occupied 

Paris. 

Boetticher, Karl Heinrich von (1833-1907). German architectural theorist; advisor to 
Bismarck. Author of Tektonik der Hellenen (1844-1852). 

Bohme, Margarete. Editor of Tagebuch einer Verlorenen (Diary of a Lost Woman; 1905). 

Boileau, Nicolas (1636-1711). Critic and poet in the classical tradition. Author of a 
highly influential didactic treatise in verse, L'Artpoetique (1674). 

Boissy-d'Auglas, comte Francois de (1756-1826). French statesman. Aided in the over- 
throw of Robespierre. He was a senator under Napoleon and a peer of France under 
Louis XVIII. 

Bonald, Louis (1754-1840), Philosopher and publicist; minister of instruction under 

Napoleon (1808). He was an extreme conservative in his policies. 
Bonaparte, Louis Napoleon. See Napoleon III. 

Bonvin, Francois (1817-1887). Genre and still-life painter. Tire vitality of his portraits is 
noted by Baudelaire. 

Bordeaux, Henry (1870-1963). Novelist and critic; known for his tales of French family 
life. 

Borel d'Hauterive, Joseph Petrus (1809-1859). French writer of extreme romantic 
tendencies. Published a collection of verse, Rhapsodies (1831), and two works of fiction. 

Bornstedt, Adalbert von (1808-1851). Former officer of the Prussian Guard who edited 
Die Deutsche-Briisseler £eitu»g. Active in the Communist League until expelled by 
Marx. 

Bossuet,Jacques (1627-1704). Catholic prelate and tutor to the dauphin. A theoretician 

of political absolutism and the divine right of kings. 
Boucher, Francois (1703-1770). French painter. Designer of stage sets for the Opera, and 

book illustrator noted for his ornate style. 
Boullee, Ertenne-Louis (1728-1799). Architect active in Paris in the restoration and 

construction of buildings during the eighteenth century. 
Bourget, Paul (1852-1935). Novelist and critic. Molder of opinion among conservative 

intellectuals in the pre- World War I period. 
Boyer, Philoxene (1827-1867). Poet and critic who, coming into a large inheritance in 

1850, for two years held dinners at the best restaurants in Paris for a circle of writers 

that included Baudelaire. 
Bracquemond, Felix (1833-1914). Painter and etcher. A friend of Baudelaire. 
Brandes, Georg (1842-1927). Danish literary critic, with a reputation for radicalism. 

Professor of aesthetics at the University of Copenhagen, and author of studies on 

Shakespeare, Voltaire, Goethe, Kierkegaard. 
Briseis. Concubine of Achilles, in the Iliad. 

Brummell, George. Called Beau Brummell (1778-1840), he was an English dandy and 
gambler, a friend of the Prince of Wales. He died in an insane asylum in France. 

Bruneseau. Character in Hugo's Les Miserables who supervises the cleaning and survey- 
ing of the Paris sewers under Napoleon I. 

Brunet, Charles-Louis-Fortune (1801-1862). French engineer and arciiitect; student of 
Vandoyer. 

Brunetiere, Vincent (1849-1906). Critic and professor of literature at the Ecole Nor- 
male. Editor of La Revue des deux mondes (1893), and author of Etudes critiques (8 vols.; 
1880-1907). 



Buchez, Philippe (1796-1865). French Saint-Simonian; politician and historian. He was 

a founder of Christian socialism and president of the Constitutional Assembly (May 

1848). Editor of L'Atelier (1840-1850). 
Biichner, Georg (1813-1837). German poet. Author of the dramatic poem Dantons loci 

(1835), the satire Leonce unci Lena (1836), and the fragmentary tragedy Woyieck (1836). 
Bugeaud de laPiconnerie, Thomas (1784-1849). French soldier. Was made marshal of 

France in 1843. 

Bulwer-Lytton, E. G. (1803-1873). English novelist and dramatist. Author of l)ie Last 

Days of Pompeii (1834). 
Buonarroti, Filippo (1761-1837). Italian-bom elder statesman of French radicalism in 

the 1820s and 1830s. He was a member, with Louis-Auguste Blanqui, of die Society of 

Friends of the People in 1832, and leader of the Babeuvistes (after Babeuf), who 

advocated the revolutionary political role of education. 
Buret, Antoine (1810-1842). French journalist who wrote on the poverty ofthe working 

classes. 

Cabet, EMenne (1788-1856). French political radical, involved in the revolution of 1830. 
Exiled 1834-1839 for radical writings. Influenced by Robert Owen, he founded a 
Utopian community called Icaria at Nauvoo, Dlinois, in 1849, but withdrew in 1856 
after dissension. Author of the socialist romance Voyage en Icarie (1839). 

Cacus. Fire-breathing monster, a son of Vulcan. He lives in a cave on the Aventine hill, 
where he is killed by Hercules (Aeneid, book 8). 

Cagliostro, Count Alessandro di. Real name Giuseppe Balsamo (1743-1795); Italian 
impostor. Born of poor parents, he traveled widely in Europe, posing as physician, 
alchemist, freemason. 

Caillois, Roger (1913-1978). French writer who founded the College de Sociologie in 
1937, together with Georges Bataille and Michel Leiris. Benjamin occasionally attended 
events there. 

Calonne, Charles (1734-1802). Minister of finance under Louis XVI; in exile 1787- 

1802. He was a builder of roads and canals in the years before the Revolution. 
Campanella, Tommaso (1568-1639). Italian philosopher. Author of Civitas Solis (City 

of the Sun; 1623), written during a long imprisonment and describing a Utopian state 

similar to the one in Plato's Republic. 
Candolle, Augustin (1778-1841). Swiss botanist; moved to Paris in 1796. Established a 

structural system of plant classification that replaced that of Linnaeus. Professor of 

natural science at Geneva (1816-1834). 
Canning, George (1770-1827). British statesman. Pursued vigorous war policy (1807- 

1810). 

Canova, Antonio (1757-1822). Italian neoclassical sculptor. 

Capua. Strategically important ancient Roman city on the Appian Way, near Naples. 

Capus, Alfred (1858-1922). French journalist and playwright; political editor of Le 
Figaro 1914-1922. His plays include La Veine (1901) and Les Deux Homines (1908). 

Carbonari. Italian revolutionary group organized around 1811 to establish a united 
republican Italy; named in honor of old conspirators who used to meet in huts of 
charcoal burners. French Carbonarism (Charbonnerie), directed against the Bourbon 
Restoration, was initiated in 1820 by several young republican militants, and spread 
with great secrecy through the schools of Paris into other towns. 

Carcel, Bertrand (1750-1812). French clockmaker who, around 1800, invented the 
Carcel lamp, in which oil is pumped by clockwork into the wick tube. 

Cardanus, Girolamo (1501-1576). Italian mathematician, physician, and astrologer. 

Carjat, Etienne (1828-1906). One of the greatest of the early photographers. Photo- 
graphed Baudelaire. 



Carnot, Lazare (1753-1823). Statesman and military engineer. Member of the Commit- 
tee of Public Safety (1793) and the Directory (1795-1797); afterward served Napoleon 
in various capacities. Author of works on mathematics and military strategy. See Ecole 
jF>lytechnique. 

Carpocratians. Followers of the second-century Alexandrian Gnostic Carpocrates, who 
preached the transmigration of the soul and the superlative humanity of Christ. 

Carrel, Nicolas Armand (1800-1836).Journalist and liberal political leader; co-founder, 
with Thiers and Mignet, and editor (1830-1836) of Le National. Killed by Emile de 
Girardin in a duel. 

Carus, Carl Gustav (1789-1869). German physician and philosopher; follower of 
Schelling. 

Casanova, Giovanni (1725-1798). Italian adventurer and writer; author of Memoires 

ecnts par hd-meme (12 vols., 1826-1838). 
Castellane, Victor Boniface (1788-1862). French politician who participated in military 

campaigns under Napoleon I. Was made a peer in 1837, and senator and marechal in 

1852. 

Castlereagh, Robert Stewart (1769-1822). English statesman. Fought a duel with bis 

rival George Canning in 1809. 
Castles. An English government spy. 

Catiline. Full name Lucius Sergius Catalina (108-62 B.C.), Roman aristocrat who con- 
spired unsuccessfully to overthrow Cicero's government in 63-62 B.C. He was sup- 
ported in Rome by debtors and discontented young patricians . Killed in battle. 

Caussidiere, Marc (1808-1861). Organizer of secret revolutionary societies under Louis 
Philippe. Prefect of Paris police after February Revolution (1848). He emigrated to 
England in June 1848. 

Cavaignac, Louis (1802-1857). French army commander. As minister of war, he sup- 
pressed the Paris uprising in 1848. Unsuccessful candidate for president of France in 
December 1848. 

Cazotte.Jacques (1719-1792). Author of Le Diable amoureux (1772) and of a continuation 
of the T/iousaiid and One Nights. Guillotined as a Royalist in 1792. 

Celine, Louis-Ferdinand. Pseudonym of Louis Dest ouches (1894-1961), French physi- 
cian and novelist; fanatical anti-Semite. Author of the highly influential Voyage au bout 
de la mat (1932) and Mort a credit (1936). 

Cham. Pseudonym of comte Amedee de Noe (1819-1879), French caricaturist. 

Champfleury. Pseudonym of Jules Husson (1821-1889), novelist, critic; friend of 
Baudelaire. Author of Le Realisme (1857) . 

Les Chants de Maldorm: Hallucinatory prose work by Lautreamont, written 1867-1870. 

Chaptal,Jean-Antoine, comte de (1756-1832). French physicist and chemist. Minister 
of the interior (1800-1804). Founder of the first ecole ties arts et ties metiers. 

Le Charivari. Daily journal founded by Charles Philipon (1831), to which Daumier was 
a constant contributor. The name signifies a jangling mock serenade meant to harass. 

Charlet, Nicolas (1792-1845). French painter who glorified the soldiers of Napoleon's 
army, and whose works were extremely popular during the first decades of the nine- 
teenth century. 

Charras,Jean (1810-1865). French soldier and historian; undersecretary of state for war 
(1848). He opposed the policies of Napoleon III, and was banished after the coup 
d'etat (1851). 

Chasles, Philarete (1798-1873). Scholar and writer. On the editorial staff of Le Journal 

des de'bats. Author of Etudes de litterature compare e (11 vols). 
Chatel, Ferdinand-Francois, abbe (1795-1857). Forbidden to preach because of his 

unorthodox views, he founded the Eglise Catholique Francaise in 1830, with services 



in French, no confessional, and married priests. In 1848, he was an advocate of 
women's rights and quick divorce. 
Chaux. See Ledoux, Claude-Nicolas. 

Chenier, Andre (1762-1794). French poet; guillotined in Parisjuly 25, 1794. Considered 
by some to be the foremost practitioner of classical poetry in France after Racine and 
Boileau. 

Chennevieres, Philippe de (1820-1899). Writer, and director of the Ecole des Beaux- 
Arts. Friend of Baudelaire, who reviewed his collection of short stories, Cwites nor- 
mands, in 1845. 

Cheret,Jules (1836-1932). French painter and lithographer, noted for his poster designs. 

Chevalier, Michel (1806-1879). Economist, advocate of free trade, and follower of Saint- 
Simon. Co-editor of Le Globe (1830-1832), he was imprisoned with Enfantin in 1832- 
1833. Professor at die College de France and councillor of state under Napoleon III. 

Chevet. Well-known marchand de comestibles in the Palais-Royal. Mentioned by Balzac. 

Chevreul, Michel Eugene (1786-1889). Chemist; director of the natural history mu- 
semnjardin des Plantes (1864-1879). Developed margarine and stearine. 

Chintreuil, Antoine (1816-1873). Landscape painter whose technical excellence is noted 
by Baudelaire. 

Chirico, Giorgio de (1888-1978). Italian painter. One of the founders of Surrealism. 
Chodruc-Duclos (d. 1842). Called by Dumas a "modem Diogenes," he shows up as an 

associate of Socrates in a fragmentary drama by Baudelaire (Ide'olus). 
Chrysostom, Saint John (345P-407). A Father of the Greek church, born in Antioch. He 

was appointed bishop of Constantinople (398), later deposed and exiled to Armenia. 

Author of influential homilies, commentaries, letters. 
Citroen, Andre (1878-1935). French automobile manufacturer; made munitions during 

World War I. After the war, he devoted liis plant to the production of low-priced 

automobiles. Went bankrupt in 1934. 
Cladel, Leon (1835-1892). French Symbolist writer, disciple of Baudelaire. Author of Les 

Martyrs ridicules (1862; collaboration with Baudelaire), Les Va-nu-pieds (1873), and 

other novels and tales. 
Claes, Balthazar. Hero of Balzac's La Recherche de I'absolu (1834). 

Clairville, Louis (1811-1879). Playwright. Wrote or co-authored more than 600 stage 
productions. 

Claretie,Jules (1840-1913). Journalist and author of novels, plays, and literary studies. 
Director of the Comedie Francaise (1885). 

Claudel, Paul (1868-1955). Poet, dramatist, and diplomat. Associated with the Symbol- 
ist movement. 

Claudin, Gustave (1823-?). Writer for several Parisian newspapers, beginning in the 
1840s. 

La Closerie des Genets. Play by Frederic Soulie, first perf ormed at the Theatre Ambigu in 
1846. 

Cobbett, William (1763-1835). English political journalist. Shifted from attacking to 
defending political radicalism. 

Cocteau,Jean (1889-1963). Author and filmmaker. Best known for his film La Belle et la 
bete (1946) arid his play La Machine infernale (1934). 

Collins, Wilkie (1824-1889). English novelist; friend of Dickens. Author of The Woman 
in White (1860), the Moonstone (1868), The Mew Magdalen (1873). 

colportage. System of distributing books by traveling peddlers in the eighteenth and 
nineteenth centuries in France. From col, "neck," and porter, "to carry," reflecting the 
fact that colporteurs carried their wares on trays suspended from straps around their 
necks. They disseminated religious and devotional literature, manuals, almanacs, col- 



lections of folklore and popular tales, chivalric romances, political and philosophical 
works in inexpensive formats, and, after 1840, serial novels. In decline by the mid-nine- 
teenth century, due to competition from the popular press. 
Commune of Paris. Revolutionary government established in Paris on March 18, 1871, 
in the aftermath of the Franco-Prussian War. It was suppressed by Adolphe Thiers's 
government in bloody street-fighting that ended May 28, 1871, leaving 20,000 Commu- 
nards dead. 

Comte de Saint-Leu. Title assumed by Louis Bonaparte (1778-1846), brother of Napo- 
leon Bonaparte and father of Napoleon III. 

Conde, Le Grand (1621-1686). Louis II, prince de Conde, a member of the Bourbon 
family who was a military leader under Louis XrV. 

Conde, Louis Henri Joseph (1756-1830). Last prince of the Conde family, a branch of 
the house of Bourbon. Wounded at Gibraltar (1782). It is thought that he committed 
suicide. 

Condorcet, marquis de (1743-1794). Philosopher, mathematician, and revolutionary. 

Advocate of economic freedom, religious toleration, legal and educational reform. 

Outlawed as a Girondist by Robespierre, he died in prison. Author of Esquisse d'nn 

tableau historique des progres de I' esprit humain (1795). 
Congress of Tours. Socialist party congress, at the end of 1920, marking a schism be- 
tween partisans of the Second International and those of the Third International. 
Considerant, Victor (1809-1893). Disciple of Fourier and a leader of the Fourierists after 

1837. Author of Destinee sociale (1834). He tried to establish a phalansterian community 

near Dallas, Texas (1855-1857). 
Constant, Benjamin (1767-1830). Franco-Swiss novelist and liberal politician; associate 

of the Schlegels and Madame de Stael. Author of Adolphe (1816). 
Le Comtihdionnel. Daily newspaper published in Paris 1815-1870. During the 1840s, it 

was the organ of moderate Orleanists. 
Coppee, Francois (1842-1908). Poet, playwiight, novelist. A leading member of the 

Parnassians. 

Le Corsaire-Satan. Satirical newspaper issued in Paris 1844-1849. Its editor, Lepoitevin 
Saint-Ahne, had been a friend of Balzac. It published the work of Baudelaire, Nadar, 
Banville, Murger, and others of their circle. 

Courbet, Gustave (1819-1877). Leading French realist painter. Presided over the Com- 
mittee of Fine Arts during the Commune (1871). He was imprisoned six months for 
destroying the column in the Place Vendome, and was condemned (1875) to pay for 
restoration of the column. 

Courier, Paul (1772-1825). French writer and political pamphleteer who was murdered. 
Opponent of the clergy and the Restoration. 

Cournot, Antoine (1801-1877). Economist and mathematician, who sought to apply the 
calculus of probabilities to the solution of economic problems. 

Court of Cassation. Established in 1790 as the highest court of appeals in the French 
legal system. During the Second Empire, it tended to serve the interests of the bour- 
geoisie, who had come to power under Louis Philippe, and thus represented a check on 
the power of Napoleon III and Baron Haussmann, 

Cousin Pons. Main character in Balzac's novel Le Cousin Pons (1847). 

Cousin, Victor (1792-1867). French philosopher and statesman; leader of the Eclectic 
school. Author of PluUsopliie de Kant (1842), ;md Histoire generate de la philosophie 
(1863). 

Crepet, Eugene (1827-1892). French man of letters. Edited Baudelaire's Oeuures post- 
kumes, pre'cedees d'une notice biographique (1887). 



Crepet, Jacques (1874-1952). Son of Eugene Crepet, he continued the latter's work in 
editing Baudelaire and revising the Etude biograpliique (1906). 

Crevel, Rene (1900-1935). Novelist, poet, essayist; among the first Surrealists. He com- 
mitted suicide in Paris. Author of Paul Klee (1930) and Dali, ou L'Anti-obscurantisme 
(1935). 

Curtius, Ernst Robert (1814-1896). German classical philologist and archaeologist. As 
director of antiquities in Berlin, he oversaw the German excavation of Olympia, Greece 
(1875-1881). 

Cuvier, Georges (1769-1832). Naturalist and statesman; founder of comparative anat- 
omy. He classified animals in terms of four distinct types. 
d!Aurevilly. See Barbey dAurevilly, Jules. 

d'Eichthals, Gustave (1804-1886). Saint-Simonian follower of Enfantin and collabora- 
tor on the newspaper Le Globe. 
Dacque, Edgar (1878-1945). French paleontologist. 

Daguerre, Louis Jacques (1787-1851). French painter and inventor. Helped develop the 
diorama in Paris (1822), and collaborated with J. N. Niepce (1829-1833) on work 
leading to the discovery of the daguerreotype process, connnunicated to the Academy 
of Sciences in 1839. 

Danae. In Greek mythology, the daughter of Eurydice and Acrisius, and mother of 
Perseus. She was imprisoned by her father in a chamber of bronze. 

Dartois. Three brothers — Francois- Victor-Armand (1788-1867), Louis-Armand-Theo- 
dore (1786-1845), and Achille (1791-1868) — all active and occasionally working to- 
gether in theater and vaudeville during the nineteenth century. 

Daubrun, Marie (1827-1901). Noted French actress, beloved of Baudelaire. Inspired a 
number of poems in Les Flews du mal. 

Daudet, Alphonse (1840-1897). Novelist who published a series of successful books 
from 1866 to 1898. Father of Leon Daudet. 

Daudet, Leon (1867-1942). Son of Alphonse Daudet; journalist and writer. Founded, 
with Charles Maurras, the royalist journal L'Actionfran^aise (1907). Author of novels, 
books on psychology and medicine, political works, literary criticism. 

David, Felicien-Cesar (1810-1876). French composer of popular and influential sym- 
phonic odes — e.g., Le Desert (1844), Herculaman (1859). Preached Saint-Simonian doc- 
trine in the Middle East. 

David, Jacques-Louis (1748-1825). French painter sympathetic to the Revolution of 
1789; an admirer of Robespierre and, later, Napoleon. His neoclassical portraits of 
revolutionary heroes influenced the development of academic painting in France. 

Deburau, Baptiste (1796-1846). Acrobat's son who transformed the character Gilles of 
commedia dell'arte into the wily chameleon Pierrot. His son Charles (1829-1873), a 
star during the Second Empire although without his father's genius, was photographed 
by Nadar. 

Decembrists. Participants in the unsuccessful plot to overthrow Czar Nicholas I, in 
December 1825. 

Delaroche, Paul (1797-1856). French portrait and liistorical painter. Founder of the 
Eclectic school, wliich united classical line with romantic color and subject matter. 

Delatouche, Hyacinthe (1785-1851), Author of a novel about a hermaphrodite, 
Fragdetta (1829). 

Delescluze, Louis Charles (1809-1871). Politician and journalist, active in the 1830 and 
1848 revolutions. A leader of the Paris Commune, he was killed on the barricades in 
May 1871. 

Delessert, Gabriel (1786-1858). Prefect of Paris police, 1836-1848. 



Delord, Taxile (1815-1877). French journalist. Editor of Le Charivari 1848-1858, and 

author of Physiologie de la Parisienne (1841). 
Delonne, Joseph. Main character in Vie, poesies et pensees de Joseph Delonne, by Sainte- 

Beuve(1829). 

Delvau, Alfred (1825-1867). Journalist and friend of Baudelaire. Author of Les Heures 
parisiennes (1866). 

de Maistre,Joseph (1753-1821). Diplomat and writer admired by Baudelaire. Author of 
Les Soirees de Saint-Peter sbourg (1821), which argued for the absolute rule of sovereign 
and pope. 

Demar, Claire (1800-1833). Endiusiastic follower of Saint-Simonianism who committed 

suicide. Author of the manifesto Ma Loi d'avenir (1834). 
La Democratic pacifiqiie. Fourierist daily edited by Victor Considerant; published in 

Paris 1843-1851. 

Democritus. Greek atomist philosopher of the late fifth century B.C. He thought that 
images (eidila) of a body are given off when this body is perceived, and diat diese 
images enter the pores of the viewer. 

Denner, Balthasar (1685-1749). German portrait painter. 

Dennery, Adolphe (1811-1899). French playwright and librettist. 

des Esseintes. Hypersensitive hero of Huysmans' novel, A Rebours (1884). 

Desnoyers, Fernand (1828-1869). Bohemian writer and friend of Baudelaire, Co-edited 
the Festschrift which published the two "Crepuscule" poems. 

Deubel, Leon (1879-1913). French poete maudit. 

Deveria, Eugene (1805-1865). French historical painter; brother of Achille Deveria 

(1800-1857). Both were praised by Baudelaire. 
Diogenes (412P-323 B.C.). Greek cynic philosopher who, in pursuit of an ascetic ideal, 

lived in a tub. Supposed to have wandered the streets once holding up a lantern, 

"looking f or an honest man." 
Diorama. See panoramas. 

Directory. In France, the period immediately following the Convention — that is, October 
27, 1795, to November 9, 1799. It was a period of profligacy, of nouveaux riches, of die 
return of nobles from exile, and it ended with France on the verge of bankruptcy. 

Disderi, Adolphe-Eugene (1818-1889). French entrepreneur. He intr oduced mass- 
manufacturing principles into portrait photography in 1859 and amassed a fortune 
before the collapse of the Second Empire. Inventor of the popular carte de virite (pocket 
portrait). 

Doblin, Alfred (1878-1957). German physician and writer; in exile from 1934. Author 

of Berlin Alexander plati (1929). 
Dore, Gustave (1833-1883). French artist best known for his illustrations of Balzac's 

Contes drolatiqiies (1856 edition) and Cervantes' Don Quixote (1863 edition). 
Doumergue, Gaston (1863-1937). Left-wing statesman. Twelfth president of France 

(1924-1931). 

Dozon, Auguste (1822-1891). French diplomat and scholar of the Balkans who trans- 
lated poetry from Bulgarian and Albanian. 

Drouet, Juliette (1806-1883). Actress with whom Hugo began a liaison in 1833. She 
renounced the stage to devote herself to him, discreetly, until her death. 

Drumont, Edouard (1844-1917). Anti-Semitic and anti-Drey fusard journalist who 
founded and edited La Libre Parole. Author of the influential La France juive (1886). 

Du Bartas, Guillaume (1544-1590). French poet. Author of an epic of creation, La 
Semaine (1578). 



Du Camp, Maxime (1822-1894). Writer; friend of Flaubert. Worked with Baudelaire 
on La Revue de Paris. Decorated by Cavaignac for service in the Garde Nationale 
during the June Days. Author of Les C/iants modernes (1855) and a six-volume account 
of nineteenth-century Paris (1869-1875). 

Ducange, Victor Henri (1783-1833). Author of novels and dramas during the Restora- 
tion. Imprisoned several times f or his liberalism. 

Ducasse, Isidor. S'eeLautreamont, comte de. 

Dulamon, Frederic (1825-1880). Literary bohemian, an associate of Baudelaire. 
Dulaure,Jacques (1755-1835). Deputy during the Convention and active defender of 

the revolutionary cause during the Restoration. Author of an influential Hutoire de 

Paris (1821-1827). 

Dumas, Alexandre (pere) (1802-1870). Enormously popular French novelist and 
dramatist who, thanks to his fine handwriting, became secretary to the future Louis 
Philippe and embarked on a successful literary career in the popular press. 

Dumas, Jean (1800-1884). Chemist who founded the Ecole Centrale des Arts et 
Manufactures in Paris (1829). Studied vapor density and the composition of the atmo- 
sphere. 

Dupont, Pierre (1821-1870). Popular lyric poet and songwriter. Author of Les Deux 
Anges (1842) and Le Chant des ouvriers (1846). Subject of two essays by Baudelaire. 

Duquesnay,Jean (1800-1849). Architect for the original building of the Ecole des Mines 
and f or the Gare de l'Est in Paris. 

Duval, Jeanne. French mulatto, a prostitute and actress, who was Baudelaire's mistress 
for many years and the inspiration for several of his poems. 

Duveyrier, Anne Honore (1787-1865). Playwright who collaborated with Eugene 
Scribe and others, including his own brother Charles Duveyrier. 

Duveyrier, Charles (1803-1866). French lawyer and writer; disciple of Saint-Simon. 
Founded the journal Le Credit. 

Ecole des Beaux- Arts. School of fine arts founded (as the Academie Royale dArcbitec- 
ture) in 1671 in Paris, under Louis XIV. Merged with the Academie Royale de Peinture 
et de Sculpture (founded 1648) in 1793. Particularly influential in the field of architec- 
tural design during the Second Empire. 

Ecole Normande. Group of young poets with a taste for technical virtuosity; flourished 
in the early 1840s at the Pension Bailly in the heart of bohemian Paris. It centered 
around Gustave Le Vavasseur, Ernest Prarond, and Philippe de Chemievieres, and 
included Baudelaire. Most members were devout monarchists who, in 1848, became 
fierce opponents of the new republic. 

Ecole Poly technique. Engineering school established in 1794 by the National Conven- 
tion as the Ecole Centrale des Travaux Publics, under the direction of Lazare Carnot 
and Gaspard Monge; took its present name in 1795. It was transformed into a military 
school by Napoleon in 1804. 

Edison, Thomas Alva (1847-1931). American inventor. Invented the Kinetograph, the 
first true motion picture camera, in 1889, as an accompaniment to his vastly successful 
phonogTaph. 

L'Education sentimentale. Novel by Flaubert of 1870, presenting a vast panorama of 

French daily life under the July Monarchy. 
Eiffel, Alexandre-Gustave (1832-1923). French engineer, a founder of aerodynamics. 

Built several arched bridges of iron and, for die Paris Exliibition of 1867, the arched 

Galerie des Machines. He was known as "the magician of iron" after liis construction 

of the Eiffel Tower (1887-1889). 



Enfantfn, Barthelemy-Prosper (1796-1864). Saint-Simonian leader, known as Pere En- 
fantin. The model community he established at Menilmontant in 1832 was charac- 
terized by fantastic sacerdotalism and freedom between the sexes. After serving on the 
Scientific Commission on Algeria, he became the first director of the Lyons Railroad 
Company (1845). 

Engelmann, Godefroi (1788-1839). French lithographer responsible for the introduc- 
tion of the Senef elder process in France. 

Ennius, Quintus (239-169 B.C.). Roman poet, a founder of Latin literature. Author of 
tragedies, comedies, and the epic poem Annates. Only fragments of his work remain. 

Epinal. Town in northeastern France famous for its production of sentimental religious 
paintings. 

Erler, Fritz (1868-1940). German graphic artist prominent injugendstil; set designer for 
the Munich Artists' Theater. He was criticized by Randinsky for his "willful original- 
it/' 

Esmenard,Joseph-Alphonse (1769-1811). French publicist and poet who wrote for La 
Quotidienne and other journals. Author of the long poem La Navigation (1805). 

Etzel, Karl von (1812-1865). Engineer responsible for the construction of many central 
train stations and railroad networks in Germany and Switzerland. 

Eugenie (1826-1920). Empress of France (1853-1871) as wife of Napoleon III. 

Euler, Leonhard (1707-1783). Swiss mathematician and physicist. 

Evadamism. See Ganeau. 

Faguet, Emile (1847-1916). Literary critic and professor at the Sorbonne. Author of 
books on Corneille, La Fontaine, Voltaire, and Ilaubert. 

Falloux, comte Frederic (1811-1886). French politician; minister of public instruction 
(1848-1849). He introduced the law known as die Loi Falloux, mandating freedom of 
instruction (passed 1850). 

Fantomas. Cycle of popular twentieth-century thrillers by Marcel Main (1885-1969). 

Favras, marquis de (1744-1790). Army officer who planned the escape of the royal 
family at the outbreak of the Revolution (1789). Captured and hanged. 

February Revolution. Refers to die overthrow of Louis Philippe's constitutional monar- 
chy in February 1848. 

Federal Diet (Bundestag). Central organ of the German Confederation from 1815 to 

1866. Consisting of representatives of the German states, it was used by German 

governments to carry through dieir policies. 
Ferragus. Main character in Balzac's novel of the same name (1833). 
Ferry, Gabriel. Pseudonym of Gabriel de Bellemare (1809-1852), French writer and 

contributor to La Revue des deux mondes. 
Feval, Paul (1817-1887). Novelist and playwright. Author of Les Mysteres de Londres 

(1844) and Le Bos.su (1858). 
Fidus. Pseudonym of Hugo Hoppener (1868-1948), German architect and painter of 
Jugendstil. 

Fieschi, Giuseppe (1790-1836). Corsican conspirator. Made an unsuccessful attempt on 
the life of Louis Philippe in 1835 with his "infernal machine," killing eighteen people. 

Le Figaro. Conservative paper published in Paris from 1854; a daily from 1866. Con- 
nected with the government of the Second Empire. 

Figuier, Guillaume Louis (1819-1894). Writer; popularizer of science. 

La Fin de Satan. Unfinished and posthumously published epic poem by Victor Hugo 
(1886; written 1854-1860). 

Flocon, Ferdinand (1800-1866). French politician and publicist; editor of the newspaper 
La Refomie. He was a member of the Provisional Govermnent of 1848. 



Flotte, Etienne-Gaston, baron de (1805-1882). Catholic royalist poet and writer from 

Marseilles who was the author of an essay on the literature of his city. 
Flourens, Pierce (1794-1867). French physiologist; professor at die College de France. 

Author of De I 'Instinct et de I 'intelligence des animaux (1841). 
Fontaine, Pierre (1762-1853). Chief architect for Napoleon. Retained the favor of Louis 

XVIII and Louis Philippe. 
Fontanares. Hero of Balzac's play Les Resources de Quinola (1842), set in the sixteenth 

century. 

Fontanes, Louis de (1757-1821). Writer and statesman. President of the Corps Legislatif 
(1804); senator (1810); member of the privy council under Louis XVIII. 

Ford, Henry (1863-1947). American automobile manufacturer. Introduced profit sharing 
in the Ford Motor Company (1914). 

Formige,Jean Camille (1845-1926). French architect. 

Fouque, Friedrich de La Motte (1777-1843). German romantic writer. Author of the 
popular fairy tale Undine (1811), which was set to music by E. T. A. Hoffmann. 

Fouquet,Jean (1416?— 1480). French painter at the court of Louis XI. Known especially 
for his illumination of Livres d'heures. 

Fourcroy, Antoine (1755-1809). Chemist. Co-author, with Aiitoine Lavoisier, of M etlwde 
de nomenclature chimique (1787). 

Fourier, Charles (1772-1837). French social theorist and reformer who advocated a 
cooperative organization of society into communities of producers known as phalan- 
steries. Author of Theorie des quatre mouvements (1808), Traite de I'association agricole 
domestique (1822), Le Nouveau Monde industriel (1829-1830), La Fausse Industrie morcelee 
(1835-1836). 

Fournier, Marc (1818-1879). Swiss journalist and author; in Paiis from 1838. Director of 
the Theatre de la Porte de Saint-Martin (1851), for which he wrote many popular 
dramas in the 1850s. 

Fraisse, Armand (1830-1877). Critic and journalist working out of Lyons. Admirer of 
Baudelaire's poems. 

France, Anatole. Pseudonym of Jacques Thibault (1844-1924), satirical novelist, critic, 
poet, and playwright. Author of Le Crime de Sylvestre Bonnard (1881); and of an Histoire 
content poraine, including the volumes Le Mannequin d 'Osier (1897) and Monsieur Bergeret 
a Paris (1901). 

Francois I (1494-1547). Kingof France (1515-1547). His reign was marked by a Renais- 
sance of the arts. 

Frederick III (1831-1888). Opponent of Bismarck; patron of literature and science. 
Succeeded his father, Wilhelm I, on March 9, 1888, but died of cancer after tlrree 
monrfis. 

Fregier, Honore- Antoine (1789-1860). Police officer. Author of Des Classes dangcreuses 
(1840). 

Der Freischiik, Opera by Carl Maria von Weber (1821). 

Fuller, Loie (1862-1928). American dancer who achieved international acclaim through 
her innovations in theatrical lighting arid her invention of the "serpentine" dance 
(1889), involving lengths of silk manipulated under colored lights. 

Fustel de Coulanges, Numa Denis (1830-1889). French historian; specialist in ancient 
and medieval history. 

Gambetta, Leon (1838-1882). Lawyer; leader of die opposition to Napoleon III. Es- 
caped Paris by balloon during the Franco-Prussian war. Premier of France (1881- 
1882). 

Ganeau (or Garmeau) (1805-1851). Sculptor and pamphleteer who, around 1835, 



founded the religion known as Evadamism (Eve + Adam), which called for the fusion 

of the sexes. Took the name le Mapah (mater + pater), and sent his androgynous 

sculptures to politicians. 
Gautier, Judith (1850-1917). Poet arid novelist; daughter of Theophile Gautier. Author 

of Richard Wagner (1882) and Fleurs d'Orient (1893). 
Gautier, Theophile (1811-1872). French man ofletters. A leader of the Parnassians. 
Gavarni, Paul. Pseudonym of Sulpice Chevalier (1804-1866), French illustrator and 

caricaturist, best known for his sketches of Parisian life. 
Gavroche. Character in Le s Miserable! (part IV, book 6). 
Gay,Jules (1807-1876). French Utopian communist. 
Gay-Lussac,Joseph (1778-1850). French chemist and physicist, 

Geffroy, Gustave (1855-1926). Parisian journalist and novelist; art critic for La Justice. 
Wrote biograpliies of Charles Meryon and Louis- Auguste Blanqui. 

Geoffroy Saint-Hilaire, Etienne (1772-1844). French naturalist who propounded a sin- 
gle type of structure throughout die animal kingdom. Violently opposed by Georges 
Cuvier. 

Gerard, Francois (1770-1837). French historical and portrait painter. 

Gerstacker, Friedrich (1816-1872). German traveler and author of adventure stories 

often set in North America. 
Gervex, Henri (1852-1929). French painter, identified with the Impressionist school. 
Gervinus, Georg (1805-1871). German historian. 

Giedion, Sigfried (1888-1968). Swiss art historian. First secretary of the Congres Inter- 
nationale dArchitecture Modeme (1928). Professor at Harvard from 1938. Author of 
Batten in Frankreich (1928). 

Girardin, Emile de (1806-1881). Inaugurated low-priced journalism with his editorship 
of La Presse (1836-1856, 1862-1866), at an annual subscription rate of forty francs. 
Member of the Chamber of Deputies (1834-1851; 1877-1881). 

Girardin, Mme. Delphine (1804-1855). Writing under the pseudonym Charles 
de Launay, she published novels, comedies, verse, and a series entitled Lettres Pari- 
siennes. 

Gisquet (1792-1866). Prefect of Paris police 1831-1836. 

Le Globe. Important Parisian newspaper founded and edited by Pierre Leroux in 1824; 

became the organ of Saint-Simonianism in 1830. 
Godin,Jean (1817-1888). French industrialist and social reformer, influenced by Fourier; 

established a familistere among his operatives. Author of Solutions sociales (1871). 
Gorgias (485P-380 B.C.). Greek Sophist and rhetorician. IrmnortaJized by Plato in his 

dialogue Gorgias. 

Gosse, Nicolas-Louis-Francois (1787-1878). French painter who specialized in works for 

churches, museums, and public buildings. 
Gotha. City of central Germany where, from 1763, the Almanack de Gotlia, a record of 

Europe's aristocratic and royal houses, was published. 
Gozlan, Leon (1803-1866). Journalist, novelist, and play wright. Author of Le Triomphe 

des omnibus: Poeme herdi-comiquc (1828), Balzac enpantoiifles (1865). 
Gozo. Island northwest of Malta. 

Grabbe, Christian Dietrich (1801-1836). German dramatic poet. Among his plays are 

Don Juan undFaust (1829) and Napoleon, oder Die Hundert lage (1831). 
Gracian, Baltasar (1601-1658). Spanish writer and philosopher. Rector of Jesuit College 

at Tarragona. Author of £7 Criticon (1651-1657). 
Grand-Carteret, John (1850-1927). French journalist. Author of Le Decollete et le 

retrousse: Un Siecle de gauloiserie (1910) and other illustrated books on customs of the 

day. 



Grand Chatelet. Ancient fortress in Paris that served as both courthouse and prison. 

Grandville. Pseudonym of Jean-Ignace-Isidore Gerard (1803-1847), caricaturist and il- 
lustrator whose work appeared in the periodicals Le Charivari and La Caricature. Un 
Autre Monde, with illustrations by Grandville and text by Taxile Delord, editor of Le 
Charivari, appeared in 1844. 

Granier de Cassagnac, Adolphe (1808-1880). Journalist and ardent Bonapartist after 
1850. Editor of Le Pays; author of Souvenirs du Second Empire (1879). 

Grillparzer, Franz (1791-1872). Austrian playwright and poet. 

grisette. Refers to a type of proletarian young woman in Paiis who was associated with 
such trades as seamstress, chambermaid, or milliner, and whose behavior was suppos- 
edly characterized by independence, loose morals, and a brash manner. The term 
derives from the gray color of the material used for working-class clothing. 

Gronow, Captain Rees Howell (1794-1865). English military officer. Fought at Water- 
loo, and went on to become a London dandy and gambler. Resided in Paris from the 
late 1830s. Published four volumes of reminiscences (1861-1866). 

Gropius, Karl Wilhelm (1783-1870). German architect who specialized in theater decor. 
Opened a diorama in Berlin in 1827, with views of Greece and Italy. 

Gros, Baron Antoine (1771-1835). French historical painter; studied under David, 
whose classical theory he adopted. 

Griin, Karl (1817-1887). German writer and publicist; follower of Feuerbach. Member 
of the Prussian National Diet. Representative of "true socialism" in the 1840s. 

Griinderjakren. Refers to reckless financial speculation; specifically, four years of such 
speculation following the Franco-Prussian war of 1870-1871. 

Guaita, Stanislas (1861-1897). Italian-born French poet and mystic, one-time associate 
of Maurice Barres. Author of Les Oiseaux de passage (1881), La Muse noire (1883). 

Gudin, Theodore (1802-1880). French painter of seascapes and landscapes. 

Guilbert, Yvette (1868-1944). French singer. 

Guillot, Adolphe (1836-1892). Member of die Academie des Sciences Morales, Pub- 
lished many works on sociology and on the city of Paris. 

Guizot, Francois (1787-1874). Historian and statesman. Premier of France, 1840-1848; 
forced out of office by the Revolution of 1848. 

Gutzkow, Karl (1811-1878). German journalist, novelist, playwright. A leader, from 
1830 to 1850, of Young Germany's revolt against Romanticism. Author of Die Patter 
vom Geiste (1850-1852), which initiated the modern German social novel. 

Guys, Constantin (1802-1892). Dutch-born illustrator; won fame for sketches of Pari- 
sian life during the Second Empire. His ink drawings and watercolors are the subject of 
Baudelaire's essay "Le Peintre de la vie moderne." 

Hacklander, Friedrich (1816-1877). German writer. Author of Daguerreoty pen (1842), 
Namenlose Geschiclden (1851), Verbotene Friicltte (1876). 

Halevy, Daniel (1872-1962). French writer. Author of Essai sur le mouvement ouvrier en 
France (1901), La Vie de Frederic Nietzsche (1909), Jules Michelet (1928). 

Halevy, Leon (1802-1883). French writer. Author of books on Jewish history, several 
volumes of verse, and a few plays. 

Halevy, Ludovic (1834-1908). Playwright and novelist, son of Leon Halevy. Among his 
many works are La Belle Helhw (1864), Froufrou (1869), and Manage d'amour (1881). 
He was Offenbach's most important collaborator. 

Hardekopf, Ferdinand (1876-1954). German expressionist poet and translator of 
French writers. Influenced by Jugendstil. Friend of Emmy Hennings in prewar Mu- 
nich. 

Hauser, Kaspar (1812P-1833). German foundling. Popularly believed to be of noble 
birth, he died of stab wounds, which he said he received from a stranger promising 



information about his parentage. Subject of the novel Caspar Hauser (1909), by Jakob 
Wassermann, and other works of literature and ilin. 

Haussmann, Baron Georges Eugene (1809-1891). Studied law and entered the French 
civil service in 1831. As prefect of the Seine (1853-1870), under Napoleon III, he 
inaugurated and carried through a large-scale renovation of Paris, which included the 
modernization of sanitation, public utilities, and transportation facilities, the construc- 
tion of the Paris Opera and the central marketplace Les Halles, the landscaping of the 
parks at Boulogne and Vincennes, and the creation of strategically organized grands 
boulevards that necessitated the demolition of many old Parisian neighborhoods and 
many arcades built in the first half of the century. 

Haussoullier, William (1818-1891). French painter lauded by Baudelaire in "Le Salon 
de 1845." 

Hebert, Jacques (1755-1794). Radical journalist and politician of the Revolution. Pub- 
lished the popular satiric newspaper Le Pire Ducliesne (whose title became his nick- 
name). Executed in a struggle with the Jacobins' right wing under Danton. 

Heim, Francois (1787-1865). French historical painter; praised by Baudelaire. 

Heine, Heinrich (1797-1856). German poet and critic. Jewish-born Cliristian convert; 
resident in Paris (from 1831). Among Ms works are Reuebilder (1826-1831), Buck der 
Lieder (1827), Romaraero (1851). 

Helena. Character in Goethe's Faust, Part 2. 

Heliogabalus (204-222). Roman emperor, devoted to debauchery, who put to death 

many senators. Killed by praetorians. 
Hello, Ernest (1828-1885). French philosopher and critic. Author of Le Style (1861), 

PMlosophie et atheisme (1888). 
Hennebique, Francois (1842-1921). French structural engineer who devised a kind of 

reinforced concrete using steel and iron (patented 1892). 
Hennings, Emmy (1885-1948). German poet and cabaret artist in prewar Munich and 

later in Zurich, where, with her husband Hugo Ball, she launched Dada in 1916, 

founding Cabaret Voltaire. Friend of Benjamin. 
Herault de Secbelles,Jean (1759-1794). Lawyer and politician. Member of the National 

Convention (1792); helped to draft the new constitution (1793). Guillotined in Paris. 
Heredia,Jose de (1842-1905). French poet of Spanish parentage; settled in Paris in 1859. 

A leader of the Parnassians and a disciple of Leconte de Lisle. Author of Les Trophees 

(1893). 

Hernani. Play by Victor Hugo. Its first performance (February 25, 1830) resulted in the 
triumph of the Romantics over the literary classicists. The title character, a noble 
outlaw, wore a red waistcoat. 

Herschell, Sir John (1792-1871). English astronomer and mathematician who followed 
in the path of his father William with the discovery and cataloguing of stellar phenom- 
ena. 

Herwegh, Georg (1817-1875). German poet and revolutionary. Author of Gedic/ite eines 
Lebendigen (1841-1844). 

Hess, Moses (1812-1875). Editor, with Friedrich Engels, of Der Gesellscliaftsspiegel (1845- 
1846). Broke with Marx and Engels after 1848, and supported the socialist leader 
Ferdinand Lassalle in Paris. 

Hessel, Franz (1880-1941). Writer and translator; an editor at Rowohlt Verlag in Berlin. 
Emigrated to Paris in 1938. He collaborated with Benjamin on translating Proust. His 
books Heifiilic/ies Berlin (1927) and Spaiieren in Berlin (1929) were reviewed by Ben- 
jamin. 

Heym, Georg (1887-1912). Leading German expressionist poet, influenced by Baude- 



laire and Rimbaud. Author of Umbra vitae (1912). Drowned while trying to save a 
friend. 

Hittorff, Jacques (1792-1867). Government architect in Paris from 1830. Built the Gare 
du Nord and other public and private buildings. 

Hoddis, Jakob van. Pseudonym of Hans Davidsohn (1887-1942), expressionist poet. 
Author of Weltende (1911). 

Holbach, Baron Paul-Henri Thiry (1723-1789). German-bom French materialist phi- 
losopher. Author of Le C/irutianisme devoile (1761), Le Systeme de la nature (1770), Le 
Politique naturelle (1773). 

Homais. Freethinking provincial pharmacist in Flaubert's Madame Bovary (1857). 

Honfleur. Port on the Nonnandy coast where Baudelaire's stepfather bought a house on 
a clifftop in 1855. 

Hotel de Ville. Paris city hall. 

Hotel-Dieu. Famous hospital in Paris, first established in the twelfth century near Notre- 

Dame. It burned down in 1772, was rebuilt, and then was torn down during the Second 

Empire. Anew H6tel-Dieu was built 1868-1878. 
Houssaye, Arsene (1814-1896). Man of letters; manager of the Comedie Frangaise 

1849-1856. Author of novels, verse, literary criticism, histories. 
Huygens, Christian (1629-1695). Dutch mathematician, physicist, and astronomer. 

Developed the wave theory of light. Worked in Paris 1666-1681, at the invitation of 

Louis XIV. 

Huysmans, Joris-Karl (1848-1907). French novelist and art critic, descended from a 
family of Dutch artists. Worked in the Ministry of the Interior. His writing's show the 
influence, successively, of Naturalism, aestheticism, occultism, and the Catholic revival. 
Author of A VauA'eau (1882), A Reborns (1884), La-bas (1891), En Route (1895). 

Icarians. See Cabet, Etieime. 

De Saint-Louis. Small island in the Seine, next to the He de la Cite. Residence of Baude- 
laire in 1842. 

Image d'Bpinal. Sentimental religious poster, named after the town in northeastern 

France where this art was produced. 
Institut de France. Name given in 1806 to the Institut National (established in 1795 by 

the Convention). After 1816, it was divided into academies devoted to literature, fine 

arts, and science. 

Institute of Social Research (Institut far Sozialforsclmng) , Established 1923 in affiliation 
with the University of Frankfurt by a group of left-wing political scientists, including 
Felix Weil, Friedrich Pollock, and Max Horkheimer. Published the ^eitscftrift/iir Soiial- 
forschung, devoted mainly to cultural analysis, 1932-1941. The administrative center of 
the institute moved in 1933 to Geneva, with branch offices in Paris and London, and in 
1934 to New Ifork, where it was affiliated with Columbia University. Under the direc- 
tion of Horkheimer and Theodor Adonio, the institute returned to Frankfurt in 1950. 

Janin,Jules (1804— 1874). Journalist, novelist, critic. Published an influential feuilleton in 
Journal des debats. Author of the six-volume Hutoire de la litteratitre dramatique en 
France. 

Janssen, Pierre (1824-1907). French astronomer. Established and directed the observa- 
tory on Mont Blanc (1893). 

Jaures, Jean (1859-1914). Author of Histoire socialiste de la Revolution francaise (1907), 
and leader of the democratic socialists in the Chamber of Deputies (1893-1914). 
Preached reconciliation with the state. His championing of Franco-German rapproche- 
ment led to his assassination at the outbreak of World War I. 



Jehuda (Judah) ben Halevy (ca. 1085-ca. 1140). Jewish poet and philosopher, bom in 

Toledo, Spain. Died on a pilgrimage to Jerusalem. 
Joel, Charlotte. Wife of Ernst Joel, an old friend of Benjamin's from the youth movement 

days and later a physician in Berlin, who supervised Benjamin's experiments with 

hashish. 

Joubert, Joseph (1754-1824). Thinker and moralist; associate of Diderot and 
Chateaubriand. He took part in the first period of the Revolution as a justice of the 
peace in his hometown, Montignac, but withdrew from politics in 1792. His Perisees, 
culled from his journals, were first published in 1838. 

Jouffroy d'Abbans, marquis Claude (1751-1832). Engineer. A pioneer in steam naviga- 
tion. 

Journal des debaU politique* et litteraires. Daily newspaper founded in Paris in 1789. 
Advocated views of the government during the July Monarchy. 

Journet,Jean (1799-1861). Kourierist missionary and poet who gave up his pharmacy to 
wander for over twenty years, with knapsack and simple garb, preaching a doctrine of 
passional individualism. Photographed by Nadar. 

Jugendstil. A style of architectural, figurative, and applied art that flourished in the last 
decade of the nineteenth century and the early years of the twentieth. Connected with 
Art Nouveau. In Germany, where it was known at fir st as the "modern style" and the 
"decorative movement," it was led by August Endell and Henry van de Velde. After 
1896, it was associated with the periodical Die Jugend (\buth). It played an important 
part in exhibitions of applied art at Wassily Kandinsky's Phalanx society, beginning in 
1901. It signified not only a crossing of the cultural barrier separating "higher" from 
"lower" arts, but an educational movement intent on restructuring the human environ- 
ment. 

Le Juif errant (The Wanderingjew). Novel by Eugene Sue, published 1844-1845. 
Julian (Flavius Claudius Julianus, known as 'Julian the Apostate"; 331-363). Roman 

emperor and author. 
Jullien, Louis (1812-1860). French composer and musical director. 
July Days. See]u\y Revolution. 

July Ordinances. Issued by Charles X and his ultra ministers on July 26, 1830, these 
ordinances dissolved the newly elected Chamber, restricted suffrage, and abolished 
liberty of the press. Annulled on July 30, one day before Louis Philippe and Lafayette, 
wrapped in a tricolor, embraced on the balcony of the Hotel de Ville, as the crowd 
cheered. 

July Revolution. Took place July 27-29, 1830, against Charles X. Led to the proclama- 
tion of Louis Philippe as "Citizen King" (July Monarchy). 

June Insurrection. The so-called June Days (June 23-26, 1848), when workers in Paris, 
after the dissolution of the National Workshops, were joined by students and artisans in 
spontaneous demonstrations against the newly elected conservative majority. Sup- 
pressed in bloody battles on the barricades. 

Karr, Alphonse (1808-1890). Journalist and novelist; editor of Le Figaro (1839), and 
founder of the satirical review Les Guepes. Author of Voyage aidour de mon jardin (1845). 

Kautsky, Karl (1854-1938). German socialist writer; secretary to Engels in London 
(1881). Editor of Die neite £eit (1883-1917). He opposed Bolshevism and the Russian 
Revolution. 

Keller, Gottfried (1819-1890). Swiss German-language poet and novelist, who published 
his first poems in 1846. Author of Der grime Hehrrxch (1854-1855), Martin Salander 
(1886), and other works. Subject of an important essay of 1927 by Benjamin. 

Kircher, Athanasius (1601-1680). German Jesuit scholar who taught mathematics and 



Hebrew at the College of Rome. In 1643 gave up teaching to study hieroglyphics. 

Credited with the invention of the magic lantern. 
Klages, Ludwig (1872-1956). German philosopher, associated with the George circle. 

Author of Vom Traumbewusstsein (1919), Vom kosmogonischen Eros (1922), and Der Geist 

als Widersacher der Seek (1929-1932). 
Kock, Paul de (1794-1871). French novelist and playwright, known for his depiction of 

bourgeois life. Author also of vaudevilles, pantomimes, light operas. 
Korsch,Karl (1886-1961). German political philosopher. Author of Marxumus and Plii- 

losophie (1923). Excluded from the German Communist party in 1926; came to the 

U.S. in 1938. Met Benjamin through the medium of Brecht, with whom he stayed in 

1934. His book on Marx was substantially drafted in Paris in 1936. 
Kranzler Cafe. Berlin cafe established in the nineteenth century at the corner of Unter 

den Linden and Friedrichstrasse, near the Kaiser Galerie and Potsdam Place. It was 

frequented by stock jobbers toward the end of the century. 
Kubin, Alfred (1877-1959). Austrian painter and writer. Illustrated books such as Paul 

Scheerbart's Lesabendio. 
Kugelmann, Ludwig (1830-1902). German physician, active in the revolution of 1848- 

1849 in Germany. Friend of Marx and Engels. 
Kiihne, Gustav (1806-1888). German novelist and critic; a leader of Young Germany. 

Editor of the weekly Eurojxi 1846-1859. 
Labrouste, Pierre Francois Henri (1801-1875). French arcliitect. 

Lacenaire, Pierre-Francois (1800-1836). French writer associated with the so-called 
"frenetic" literature. Composed his Memoires in prison while awaiting execution for the 
murder of bank messengers. 

La Chambaudie (1806-1872). Saiiit-Simonian writer of fables, poems, and essays. Asso- 
ciate of Louis- Auguste Blanqui. 

Laclos, Pierre Choderlos de (1741-1803). Soldier and writer; a general under Napoleon. 
Author of Les Liaisons dangereuses (1782). 

Lacordaire, Jean (1801-1870). Entomologist. Author of Histoire natarelle des insedes 
(1854-1868). 

Laf'argue, Marie (1816-1853). French woman convicted of poisoning her husband 
(1840). and condemned to life imprisonment at hard labor. She maintained her iimo- 
cence, and was pardoned in 1852. 

Laf argue, Paul (1842-1911). French radical socialist and writer; close associate of Marx 
and Engels. A founder of the French Workers' Party (1879), he edited, with Jules 
Guesde, Le Citoyen from 1881 to 1884. Rejected compromise with capitalistic govern- 
ment. 

Lafayette, Marie Joseph (1757-1834). Statesman and officer; served in the American 
Revolution. Member of the French National Assembly (1789) ; aided in organizing the 
Garde Nationale, and was instrumental in securing the adoption of the tricolor flag. 
Opposed to the policies of Napoleon I. Leader of the opposition 1825-1830. Com- 
mander of the Garde Nationale in the July Revolution. 

Laffitte, Jacques (1767-1844), Financier and statesman; partisan of Louis Philippe. Fi- 
nance minister 1830-1831. 

Laforgue, Jules (1860-1887). Poet and critic. One of the most distinguished of the 
Symbolists. 

Lagrange, Joseph (1736-1813). Geometer and astronomer. Professor in Paris at the 
Ecole Normale (1795) and the Ecole Polytechnique (1797). Was made a senator under 
Napoleon. 



La Hodde, Lucien de (1898-1865). Police spy and author of Hutoire des socie'te's secretes et 
du parti republican (1850). 

Lamartine, Alphonse Prat de (1790-1869). Popular poet and orator who helped shape 
the Romantic movement in French literature. Foreign minister in the Provisional Gov- 
ernment of 1848. Author of Meditations poetiques (1820), La Chute d'un ange (1838), 
Hutoire des Girondins (1846). 

Lamennais, Robert (1782-1854). French priest and philosopher. His advocacy of free- 
dom in religious matters led to his censure and condemnation. 

La Met*rie,Julien (1709-1751). Physician and materialist philosopher. Audior of Hutoire 
naturelle de I' ante (1745). 

Lami, Louis Eugene (1800-1890). French historical painter and illustrator. Praised by 
Baudelaire. 

Lampelie. Name given to a deity representing sunlight in Lemercier's homage to Da- 
guerre (1839). 

La Lantcrne. Popular journal founded and edited by Henri Rochefort (1868). 

Laplace, Pierre (1749-1827). Astronomer and mathematician. Author of Theorie des 

attractions des spheroides et de la Jigure des planetes (1785), Essai philosophique sur les 

probability (1814). 

Larchey, Etienne-Loredon (1831-1902). Librarian at die Bibliotheque de l'Arsenal in 
Paris. Historian, linguist, publicist, and founder of the journal La Mosdique. 

Lariviere, Philippe-Charles de (1798-1876). Painter who executed batde scenes for the 
museum established by Louis Philippe at Versailles. 

La Rochejacquelein, Henri Auguste (1805-1867). Leader of die Legitimist party in the 
Chamber of Deputies (1842-1848). Later a senator under the Second Empire. 

Lassailly, Charles (1806-1843). Bohemian poet and writer who was secretary, for a 
time, to Balzac. Died destitute. 

Lautreamont, comte de. Pseudonym of Isidore Ducasse (1846-1870), writer who antici- 
pated Surrealism. Born in Uruguay; settled in Paris in the 1860s. Author of Les Clmnts 
de Maldoror (1867-1870). 

Laverdant, Gabriel-Desire (1809-1884). Journalist and critic for die Fourierist news- 
paper La Democratic pacifique. 

Lavoisier, Antoine Laurent de (1743-1794). A founder of modern chemistry. Because 
his experiments were financed by die monarchy, he was condemned by the Revolution 
and executed. 

Lawrence,James (1773-1840). Writer; son of an English colonist in Jamaica. Published 

in 1793 a study of marriage and inheritance customs among the Nair caste in Malabar. 

Became known as a feminist advocate in France. Friend of Schiller and Percy Shelley. 
Leblond, Marius and Ary. Pseudonyms of French writers Georges Athenas (1877— 

1955) and Aime Merlo (1880-1958). Authors of Vies paralleles (1902), En France 

(1909), Le Paradis perdu (1939). 
Lebon, Philippe (1769-1804). Chemist and civil engineer. Pioneered the use of gas for 

illumination (1799). 

Le Breton, Andre (1808-1879). French critic. Author of Balzac: L Homme et I'oeuvre 
(1905). 

Leconte de Lisle, Charles (1818-1894). Poet of disillusionment and skepticism; leader of 
the Parnassian school. Author of Poemes antiques (1852), Po ernes bar bares (1862), and 
other works. 

Ledoux, Claude-Nicolas (1736-1806). French architect. Drew up plans for the "ideal 

city" of Chaux, conceived as an extension of the saltworks at Arc-et-Senans. 
Ledru-Rollin, Alexandre (1807-1874). Lawyer and politician, member of the Chain- 



ber of Deputies from 1841. A leader in the 1848 revolution, and minister of the 
interior in the Provisional Government. Instrumental in bringing universal suffrage i« 
France. 

Lefeuve, Charles (1818-1882). Writer and publicist, known for his archaeological and 

historical study Les Andantes Maisons des rues de Faris (1857-1864). 
Legitimists. Supporters of the Bourbon monarchy that was in power in France up to the 

Revolution of 1789 and during the Restoration (1815-1830). Also known as "ultras," 

they represented the interests of big landowners. 
Lemaitre, Jules (1853-1914). Writer and literary critic; enemy of critical dogmas. On the 

staff of Le Journal des debats and La Revue des deux mondes. 
Lemercier, Louis Jean Nepomucene (1771-1840). Playwright and poet. Upholder of 

classical tragedy against Romanticism, and originator of French liistorical comedy. 
Lemonnier, Camille (1844-1913). Belgian novelist and art critic. 

Lenin, Nikolai (1870-1924). Russian Communist leader. Became premier in 1918 and 
introduced far-reaching socialistic reforms, later modiSed by the New Economic Policy 
(1921). 

Leopardi, Giacomo (1798-1837). Renowned Italian poet and scholar. Author of pessi- 
mistic and satirical lyrics and several works of philology. 

Le Play, Frederic (1806-1882). Engineer and economist. As senator (1867-1870), he 
represented a paternalistic "social Catholicism." Author of Les Ouvriers europe'etts 
(1885). 

Leroux, Gaston (1868-1927). French journalist and author of detective and mystery 
stories. 

Leroux, Pierre (1797-1871). Saint-Simonian philosopher, economist, reformer; editor of 
Le Globe from 1824. In exile 1851-1859. Author of De I'Humanite (1840), De I'Egalite 
(1848). 

Les Fmtifais peinispar eux-memes. A celebrated and much imitated collection of essays 
and drawings that began publication in 1840. Grandville contributed several items. 

Lesage, Alain (1668-1747). French novelist and playwright. Author of the picaresque 
masterpiece LHistoire de Gil Bias de Santillane (1715-1735). 

Lesseps, Ferdinand (1805-1894). French diplomat; minister of France in Madrid (1848- 
1849). Helped form the company that constructed the Suez Canal (1859-1869), and 
served as president of the company that began construction of the Panama Canal 
(1881-1888). 

Le Vavasseur, Gustave (1819-1896). Writer, and good friend of Baudelaire. 

Levy, Michel (1821-1875). Founder of one of the largest publishing houses in nineteenth- 
century France. Published Baudelaire's translations of Poe and, after the poet's death, 
his Oeuvres completes. 

Le Liberateur. Newspaper founded by Louis- Auguste Blanqui in 1834 and dedicated to 

"exploited workers." Published one issue only. 
Lion, Margo (1889-1989). Popular Berlin cabaret artist of the 1920s. Played the part of 

Pirate Jenny in the French production of Brecht's Threepemiy Opera in 1931. 
Liselotte. Nickname of Charlotte Elisabeth of Bavaria (1652-1722), duchess of Orleans, 

and sister-in-law of Louis X.W. Her Letters provide much intimate information about 

liis court. 

Lissagaray, Prosper (1838-1901). Journalist and historian. After participating in the 

Paris Commune, he emigrated to England. 
Le Liwe des cent-et-un. Periodical published in Paris 1831-1834. Contained essays and 

poems, many focused on life in Paris, by some of the most famous writers of the day. 



Lobau, Georges (1770-1838). Highly decorated officer in Napoleon's army. Liberal 
deputy (1828-1830), and commander-in-chief of the Garde Nationale (1830). 

Lohenstein, Daniel (1635-1683). German writer of tragedies, a book of lyrics, and a 
novel. Treated in Benjamin's Ursjnung des deutschen Traaenpieh. 

Loi Falloux. See Falloux, comte Frederic. 

Longchamps, Charles de (1768-1832). Popular dramatist and author of vaudevilles and 

operas, including Le Sedacteur amoureux (1803). 
Loos, Adolf (1870-1933). Moravian architect; opposed to Art Nouveau. He was a leader 

in establishing modernist architecture in Europe after World War I. Lived in Vienna 

and Paris. Author of Ornament and Verbrechen (1908). 
Lotze, Hermann (1817-1881). German philosopher. Initiator of a teleological idealism 

that reinterpreted the Platonic ideas in terms of values. Helped found the science of 

physiological psychology. 
Louis Napoleon. See Napoleon III. 

Louis Philippe (1773-1850). Descendant of the Bourbon-Orleans royal line. Member of 
the Jacobin Club in 1790, and a colonel in the revolutionary army. Lived in Philadel- 
phia (1796-1800), and later in England; was in France 1817-1830, administering his 
estates and great wealth. Proclaimed "Citizen King" by Thiers in the July Revolution, 
and elected by the Chamber of Deputies as a constitutional monarch on August 7, 
1830. His reign, which sought to portray itself as middle-of-the-road and was therefore 
known as the 'Juste Miiieu," was marked by the rise of the bourgeoisie to power, 
especially through its domination of industry and finance. Overthrown by the February 
Revolution of 1848, on which he abdicated and escaped to England. 

Louis the Great. Louis XIV (1638-1715), the longest-reigning king in European history 
(1643-1715), his court the most magnificent in Europe. French arts were in their golden 
age during his reign. 

Louis XII (1462-1515). Known as Father of the People. Held the title due d'Orleans 
1465-1498. As king (1498-1515), he inaugurated widespread reforms. 

Louis XVIII (1755-1824). After living as an emigre, he became king of France on 
Napoleon's downfall and the restoration of the Bourbons. Reigned 1814-1815, 1815- 
1824 (abdicating briefly during Napoleon's Hundred Days). 

Louys, Pierre (1870-1925). French man of letters. Author oiAstarte (verse, 1891), Aphro- 
dite (novel, 1896), and other works. 

Lucan. Full name Marcus Aunaeus Lucanus (39-65 A.D.), Roman poet born in Cordova. 
Betrayed in a conspiracy against Nero. His sole extant work is the epic Pharsalia, about 
the war between Caesar and Pompey. 

Lutece. Ancient name for Paris. From Latin Lutetia ("city of mud"). 

Mabille, Pierre (1904-1952). Physician and writer, associated with the Symbolists. Edi- 
torial director of the famous art review Minotaare, His major works include La Con- 
struction de I'homme (1936), Egregores, ou La Vie des civilisations (1938), and Le Miroir du 
merveilleux (1940). 

MacOrlan, Pierre. Pseudonym of Pierre Dumarchais (1882-1970), writer associated 
with the group of Surrealists around Guillaume Apollinaire and Max Jacob. Among his 
novels, notable for their mixture of fantasy and realism, are Le Quai des brumes (1927) 
and Le Mgre Leonard et Mmtre Jean Midlin (1920). 

Maeterlinck, Maurice (1862-1949). Belgian poet, dramatist, and essayist. Settled in 
Paris in 1896 and was influenced by the Symbolists. Author of Pelleas et Melisande 
(1892), Le Tre'sor des humbles (1896), L'Oiseau bleu (1908). 

Maillard, Firmin (1833-?). French journalist. Historian of the press and of Paris. 

Maillard, L. Y. lifoung republican exile with whom Louis- Auguste Blanqui corresponded 
in 1852. 



Makart, Hans (1840-1884). Austrian painter of historical scenes, with an opulent style 

imitative of sixteenth- and seventeenth-century Baroque. 
Malassis. SeePoulet-Malassis, Auguste. 

Malebranche, Nicolas (1638-1715). Philosopher who sought to reconcile Cartesianism 
with the ideas of Augustine. His chief work, De la Recherche de la verite (1674-1678), 
argues that "we see all things in God," human nature being unknowable. 

Malibran, Maria (1808-1836). French opera singer. Debuted in Rossini's IlBarbiere di 
Siviglia in 1825. 

Mandeville, Bernard (1670P-1733). Dutch-bom philosopher and satirist; settled in Lon- 
don. Author of the political satire The Fable *f the Bees, or Private Vices, Public Benefits 
(1714), 

Mapah. See Ganeau. 

Marais. District of Paris ; site of a republican insurrection in April 1834, during which, in 
a house on the Rue Transnonain, all occupants were butchered by government troops. 
This incident is the subject of Daumier's lithograph La Rue Transnonain. 

Marat, Jean Paul (1743-1793). Swiss-born French Revolutionary politician; identified 
with the radical Jacobins. Assassinated by Charlotte Corday while in his bath. 

Marcelin, Louis (1825-1887). Caricaturist on the staff of Le Journal conusant; associate of 
Nadar. In 1862 founded the journal La Vie paruienne, which published work by Baude- 
laire. 

Marcionites. Believers in a Christian heresy of the second and third centuries that re- 
jected the Old Testament, It likely included women in leadership roles. 

Marengo. Village in northwest Italy where Napoleon gained a victory over the Austrians 
in 1800. 

Marey, Etienne (1830-1904). Physiologist who studied electrical phenomena in animals. 
Invented the "chronophotographic gun" in 1882 to take series pictures of birds in 
flight. 

Marie, Alexandre Thomas (b. 1795). French lawyer, associate of Ledru-Rollin; on the 
staff of L'Atelier. Member of the Provisional Govermnent. Entrusted with the organiza- 
tion of die national workshops in 1848. 

Marie-Louise (1791-1847). Daughter of Francis I of Austria; second wife (1810) of 
Napoleon I. 

Marivaux, Pierre (1688-1763). French playwright and novelist. 

Marlitt. Pseudonym of Eugenie John (1825-1887), popular German novelist, whose 
works appeared in the review Die Gartenlaube. 

Martin du Nord, M. (1790-1847). Liberal opponent of the July Monarchy in the Cham- 
ber of Deputies. His proposal for government-financed railways in 1838 was voted 
down. 

Martin, John (1789-1854). English painter known for works of wild imaginative power, 

like Belshauar's Feast (1821), The Fall o/Ninevah (1828), Hie Eve of the Deluge (1840). 
Martinist. See Saint-Martin, Louis. 

Maturin, Charles (1780-1824). Irish novelist and dramatist. Author of Melmoth the 

Wanderer (1820) and other Gothic romances, 
Mauclair, Camille (1872-1945). Author of works on literature, music, and painting, 

including studies of Maeterlinck (1900), Baudelaire (1927), Heine (1930), Poe (1932), 

Mallarme (1937). 

Mayeux. Hunchbacked character of popular farce, appropriated by Travies in some 160 
lithographs published in La Caricature and elsewhere. Described as a "priapic puppet," 
he personified the patriotic petty bourgeois. 

McAdam, John (1756-1836). British engineer who introduced the system of building 
roads of crushed stone, known as "macadamized" roads. 



Mehring, Franz (1846-1919). German Socialist historian and pamphleteer. Helped or- 
ganize the German Communist party. 

Meilhac, Henri (1831-1897). French playwright. Collaborated withLudovic Halevy on 
many light operas and comedies, including Fnufrou (1869) and Loulou (1876). 

Meissonier,Jean (1815-1891). Painter known for small genre paintings, often of military 
subjects, done with great delicacy. 

Melies, Georges (1861-1938). Professional magician and popular pioneer filmmaker. 
Director of Le Voyage dam la lune (1902) and other fantasies. 

Memtoires du diable. Serial novel by Frederic Soulie, published 1837-1838. 

Mendes, Catulle (1841-1909). Founder of La Revue fantaisiste (1859) and editor of La 
Parnasse content poraine (1866-1876). Friend of Baudelaire and Gautier. 

Menilmontant. See Enf antin, Barthelemy-Prosper. 

Mephis. Novel by Flora Tristan, published 1838. 

Merezhkovski, Dmitri (1865-1941). Russian writer, settled in Paris in 1917 Author of 
critical studies, historical novels, biographies, and plays. 

Meryon, Charles (1821-1868). French etcher and engraver. Friend of Baudelaire. 

Metternich, Prince Klemens von (1773-1859). Austrian statesman; created prince of the 
Austrian Empire in 1813. Largely responsible for the reactionary policy adopted by 
governments of Europe from 1815 to 1830. 

Meyerbeer. Pseudonym of Jakob Beer (1791-1864), opera composer. Born in Berlin, he 
settled 1826 in Paris, where he composed in the French style. 

Michel, Louise (1830-1905). French anarchist agitator. Participated in the Paris Com- 
mune (1871), and was deported to New Caledonia; returned after anmesty (1880) and 
resumed agitation. Sentenced to six years' imprisonment (1883); refused a pardon, out 
of solidarity with her comrades. Author of La Commune (1898). Photographed by 
Nadar. 

Michelet, Jules (1798-1874). Historian and professor at the College de France 1838- 
1851. Democratic, anticlerical, anti-Semitic. Author of Histoire de France (1833-1867), 
Histoire de la Revolution francaise (1847-1853), La Bible de I'humanite (1864), and other 
works. 

Mignet, Francis (1796-1884). Historian. Edited, with Adolphe Thiers, the anti-Bour- 
bon journal Le National (1830). Author of Histoire de la Re'volution francaise (1824). 

Mirabeau, Victor Riqueti, marquis de (1715-1789). Soldier and economist, associated 
with the physiocrats. Author of L'Ami des homines, ou Traite' sur la population (1756). 

Mirabeau, Honore, comte de (1749-1791). Orator who became the most important 
figure of the first two years of the French Revolution. Son of Victor de Mirabeau. 

Mirbeau, Octave (1850-1917). Radical journalist and novelist who attacked all forms of 
social organization. A founder of the satirical weekly Grimaces (1882). 

Mirecourt, Eugene (Jacquot) de (1812-1880). French journalist. Author of a series of 
biographical sketches which led to his forced departure from Paris. 

Mires, Jules-Isaac (1809-1871). French financier; backer of railroads and newspapers. 
Photographed by Nadar. Convicted of fraud in 1861, he eventually won acquittal on 
appeal, but his reputation was mined. 

Misopogon. Fourth-century satire by Emperor Flavius Claudius Julianus. 

Mistral, Frederic (1830-1914). Leader of the Provencal cultural renaissance known as 
the Felibrige. Author of an epic poem, Mircio (1859), written in Provencal and French 
and dealing with the lovelorn daughter of a wealthy farmer. Awarded the Nobel Prize 
f or literature in 1904. 

Moabit. District of Berlin, northwest of the Tiergarten. To the south of the park, Liitzow- 
strasse gives onto Flottwellstrasse. 



Mode, comte Louis (1781-1855). Premier of France 1836-1839. He was one of the 

deputies who opposed the coup d'etat of 1851. 
Mohammed AH (1769-1849). Albanian-born soldier; viceroy of Egypt 1805-1848. 

Wrested control of Egypt from the Ottoman Empire and established a modern state. 
Moilin,Tony (1832-1871). French Utopian writer. Author of Paris en Van 2000 (1869). 
Molenes, Paulde (1821-1862). French army officer and dandy. Friend of Baudelaire. 
Molinari, Gustave de (1819-1912). Belgian political economist, in Paris 1843-1851, and 

from 1857 on. Became editor of Le Journal des de'bats (1867), and Le Journal des 

economist es (1881). 

Moll,Joseph (1813-1849). German watchmaker. Member of the Central Committee of 

the Communist League. Killed in a revolt in Baden. 
Le Moniteur universel Daily newspaper published in Paris 1789-1901. From 1799 to 

1869, an official government organ. 
Monnier, Henri (1805-1877). Caricaturist and playwright. Creator (1830) of the popular 

character Joseph Prudhomme, the typical bourgeois. Discussed by Baudelaire in 

"Quelques Caricaturistes francais." 
Monselet, Charles (1825-1888). Critic and journalist. Founder of La Semaine tlieatrale 

(1851), in which Baudelaire published criticism and poetry. 
Montesquieu, Charles (1689-1755). Lawyer, man of letters, and political philosopher 

whose liberal theories inspired the Declaration of the Rights of Man and the Constitu- 
tion of die United States. 
Montesquiou, Robert de (1855-1921). Aristocratic poet and essayist. Supposed model 

for Huysmans' des Esseintes and Proust's Charlus. 
Moreas, Jean (1856-1910). Greek-bom poet who settled in Paris in 1882. Associated 

with the Symbolists and later with the Ecole Romane. Author of Les Syrtes (1884), 

Stances (1899-1901). 

Morgan, Lewis Henry (1818-1881). American ethnologist and archaeologist, student of 

American Indian culture. Author of Ancient Society (1877). 
The Mother (la Mere). Female messiah of the Saint-Simonians. She was supposed by 

some to come from the East, possibly from the ranks of the prostitutes. 
The Mothers. Mytholological figures in Goethe's Faust, Part 2 (Act 1). Faust visits the 

chthonic "Mothers" in search of the secret that will enable him to discover Helen of 

Troy. 

Moulin Rouge. Well known spectacular Paris nightclub. 

Munch, Edvard (1863-1944). Norwegian painter and designer; forerunner of Expres- 
sionism. 

Munchausen (Miinchhausen) , Baron Karl (1720-1797). German huntsman and soldier. 
His name is proverbially associated with absurdly exaggerated adventure stories. 

Murger, Henri (1822-1861). Writer who lived in poverty, supported by Nerval. Wrote 
pieces for the serial press that were collected in the 1848 book Scenes de la vie de Bolienie, 
source for Puccini's opera La Boheme. 

Murillo, Bartolome (1617-1682). Spanish painter of the Andalusian school. 

Musard, Philippe (1793-1859), Composer famous for his dance music; popular conduc- 
tor at balls at the Opera. 

Musset, Alfred de (1810-1857). Distinguished poet and playwright of French Romanti- 
cism. 

Mutualists. Secret society of weavers in Lyons who held that the factories should be 
taken over by associations of workers, operating through economic action rather than 
violent revolution. Name adapted by Proudhon for doctrines of credit banking and 
decentralized political organization. 



Les Mysteres deLondres. Novel by Paul Feval (11 vols.; 1844), 

Les Mysteres de Paris. Enormously popular novel by Eugene Sue (1842-1843). 

The Mysteries of Udolpho. Novel by Ann Radcliffe (1794). 

Nadar. Pseudonym of Felix Tournachon (1820-1910), French photographer, journalist, 

and caricaturist. Friend of Baudelaire, whom he photographed. 
Nanteuil, Celestin (1813-1873). Romantic painter and graphic artist celebrated by 

Nadar. 

Napoleon III. Full name Charles Louis Napoleon Bonaparte, known as Louis Napoleon 
(1808-1873). Nephew of Napoleon I, he lived in exile until assuming leadership of the 
Bonaparte family on the deadi of Napoleon II (1832). Elected to the National Assem- 
bly in 1848 and later to the presidency of the Republic (December 10, 1848). Made 
himself dictator by a coup d'etat (December 2, 1851), and a year later proclaimed 
himself emperor as Napleon III. Having precipitated France's involvement in the 
Franco-Prussian War (1870-1871), he was himself captured at the Batde of Sedan 
(September 2, 1870) and held prisoner until die end of the war. Deposed by the 
National Assembly on March 1, 1871, he retired to England, where he died. 

Nargeot, Clara (nee Thenon; 1829-?). French painter. Did a portrait of Baudelaire. 

Nashjoseph (1809-1878). English watercolor painter and lithographer. 

Le National. Daily newspaper published in Paris 1830-1851. During the 1840s, it was 
the organ of moderate republicans. 

national workshops (ateliers nationaux). An emergency relief agency, set up during the 
February Revolution of 1848, that attracted thousands of unemployed workers from all 
over France; it eventually satisfied neither radicals nor moderates and was abolished by 
the newly elected conservative majority in May, without any program of public works 
to replace it. 

Naville, Pierre (1904-1993). Surrealist co-editor of the first numbers of La Revolution 

sunealiste, and writer on urban sociology. 
Nazarenes. Group of young German painters active 1809-1830. Intent on restoring a 

religious spirit to art, they established themselves in Rome under the leadersliip of 

Johann Overbeck, Philipp Veit, and Franz Pforr. 
Nerval, Gerard de. Pseudonym of Gerard Labrunie (1808-1855), celebrated French 

writer and eccentric, who committed suicide. Translated Goethe's Faust. Author of 

Voyage en orient (1848-1850), Les Illumines (1852), Les Filles de feu (1854), Aurelia 

(1855). 

Nesselrode, Karl (1780-1862). Russian statesman; chancellor 1845-1856. Concluded 

die Treaty of Paris after the Crimean War (1854-1856). 
Nettelbeck, Joachim (1738-1824). Prussian officer whose memoirs, Eine Lebens- 

beschreibung, appeared in 1821. 
Neufchateau, Francois. Pseudonym of Nicolas Francois (1750-1828), French statesman 

and author. Minister of die interior 1797; member of the Directory 1797-1798; presi- 
dent of the Senate 1804-1806. 
Niboyet, Eugenie (1804-?). Feminist who founded women's organizations in Lyons and 

Paris. Editor of the periodical La Voix des femmes. 
Nicolaitans. Heretical sect in the early Christian church at Ephesus and Pergamum, 

possibly associated with the prophetess Jezebel, and condemned in Revelation (2.6,15) 

f or immorality. 

Niepce,Joseph (1765-1833). French physicist. In 1824 produced "heliotypes" by means 
of glass plates coated with bitumin. Associated with Daguerre (from 1829) in experi- 
ments leading to the invention of photography. 



Nisard, Desire (1806-1888). Journalist and literary critic. Director of the Ecole Normale 
Superieure. Author oEHutoire de la litteratitre franfaise (1844-1861). 

Nodier, Charles (1780-1844). Man of letters associated with the Romantic movement. 
Author of Les Vmnpires (1820). Collaborated with Amedee Pichot on Essai critique sur le 
gai hydrogene et les divers modes d'eclairage artificiel (1823). 

Noel, Jules (1815-1881). French landscape painter. 

Noir, Victor (1848-1870). Journalist killed in an altercation with a cousin of Napoleon 
III. His funeral was the scene of a mob demonstration against the Empire. 

Notre Dame de Lorette. Church in Paris. In its neighborhood, during Second Empire, 
many lorettes (ladies of easy virtue) lived in new housing. 

Moiweaute. Newness, novelty, innovation; fancy article. The shops in Paris known as 
fiiagasins de nonveautes offered a complete selection of goods in one or another special- 
ized line of business. They had many rooms and several stories, with large staffs of 
employees. The first such store, Pygmalion, opened in Paris in 1793. 

Obcrmann. Epistolary novel by Etierme Senancour (1804). 

Odoievsky, Vladimir (1804-1869). Russian writer influenced by E. T. A. Hoffmann. 

Offenbach,Jacques (1819-1880). Musician and composer. Bom in Cologne, he became 
a nationalized Frenchman. Produced many successful operettas and operas bouffes in 
Paris; managed the Gaite-Lyrique there, 1872-1876. His famous Contes d'Hqffmann was 
produced after his death. 

Ollivier, Emile (1825-1913). Politician. Headed the ministry (1870) that plunged France 
into the disasters of the Franco-Prussian war. 

Olympia. Character in E T. A. Hoffmann's story "Der Sandmann," a beautiful automa- 
ton. 

Orleanists. Supporters of the Orleans branch of the French royal family, which was 
descended from a younger brother of Louis X.W and which included Louis Philippe. 

Orleans, due Ferdinand Philippe Louis (1810-1842). Son of Louis Philippe. Acdve in 
the Revolution of 1830; was made due d'Orleans in 1830. In 1837, married Helene 
Elisabedr, daughter of Grand Duke Frederick Louis of Mecklenburg-Schwerin. 

Orphee etEttrydice [Orfeo edEuridice). Opera by Christoph Gluck (1762). 

Orsay, comte Alfred d' (1801-1852). French man of fashion, wit, painter in Paris and 
London. 

Orsini, Felice (1819-1858). Italian revolutionary, active in the revolutions of 1848-1849. 

Attempted the assassination of Napoleon III (January 14, 1858). Executed in Paris. 
Ourliac, Edouard (1813-1848). French writer; author of a physiology on the schoolboy. 

Early associate of Baudelaire. 
Owen, Robert (1771-1858). Welsh socialist and philanthropist. Spent his fortune on 

social schemes. Founded communities of "Owenites" on the cooperative principle, in 

Great Britain and the U.S. (including one at New Harmony, Indiana, 1825-1828), all 

unsuccessful. Edited the influential journal The Mew Moral World (1836-1844). Author 

of A New View of Society (1813) and Revohdion in Mind and Practice (1849). 
Palais-Royal. Refers to the streets and shopping areas surrounding the palace of the 

dukes of Orleans in Paris. It was a center of prostitution and gambling, especially 

during the second quarter of the nineteenth century. 
Panizza, Oskar (1853-1921). Controversial Bavarian playwright and poet. Argued in 

1896 that the spirit of vaudeville was infusing modern culture, 
panoramas. Large circular tableaux, usually displaying scenes of battles and cities, 

painted in trompe l'oeil and designed to be viewed from the center of a rotunda. 

Introduced in France in 1799 by the American engineer Robert Fulton. James Thayer 



acquired the patent, and developed two rotundas on the Boulevard Montmartre which 
were separated by the Passage des Panoramas. Subsequent forms included the Cos- 
morama at the Palais-Royal (later on the Rue Vivienne) ; the Neorama, showing inte- 
rior scenes; the Georama, presenting views of different parts of the world. In 1822, on 
the Rue Sanson, Louis Daguerre and Charles Bouton opened their Diorama (later 
moved to the Boulevard de Bonne-Nouvelle). The pictures were painted on cloth 
transparencies, wliich by 1831 were being used with various lighting effects. Their 
installation burned down in 1839. 
Parnassians. School of French poets, headed by Leconte de Lisle, stressing detaclxtnent, 
technical perfection, precise description. Anthologized in Le Parnasse contemporain 
(1866-1876). 

Parusilippe. Hill near Naples, named after a Roman equestrian's care-dispelling villa. 

Patin, Gui (1602-1672). Physician and dean of the Paris faculty of medicine. His witty 
letters, published posthumously, were widely read. 

Pausanias. Greek traveler and geographer of the second century A.D. Author of Periegeds 
of Greece, documenting Greek topography, history, religion, architecture, and sculpture. 

Paxton,Joseph (1801-1865). English architect and horticulturist. Designed the conserva- 
tory at Chatsworth (1836-1840), the model for his Crystal Palace, which was built of 
glass and iron for the London Exhibition of 1851, and reerected at Sydenham (1853— 
1854). 

Bechmeja, Ange. Rumanian poet influenced by Baudelaire. Published the first article on 

Baudelaire to appear beyond the Danube. 
Peguchet, M. Caricature figure by Henri Monnier; adapted by Flaubert for his novel 

Bouvard et Pecucliet (1881). 
Peladan,Joseph, called Josephin (1858-1918). French writer and occultist who took the 

title "Sar." Published a series of novels under the general title Decadence latine. 
Pelletan, Charles Camille (1846-1915). French journalist and politician. Son of Pierre 

Pelletan. 

Pelletan, Pierrez (1813-1884). French journalist and politician. Author of Les Droits de 

I'homme (1858), La Famille, la mere (1865). 
Perdiguier, Agricol (1805-1875). Worker-writer, political activist; model for characters in 

novels by George Sand and Eugene Sue. Trained as a joiner, he began wilting for La 

Ruche popidaire, and became an editor of L 'Atelier. Elected to the Constituent Assembly 

(1848) and the Legislative Assembly (1849). Author of Le Livre du compagnonnage 

(1840), Memoires d'un compagnon (1864). 
Pereire. The brothers Jacob Emile (1800-1875) and Isaac (1806-1880) were financiers 

and brokers in Paris; associated with the Saint-Simonians. In 1852 founded Credit 

Mobilier, which provided a model f or new commercial banks across Europe. 
Perier, Casimir (1777-1832). French banker and statesman, supporter of industry. A 

leader of the opposition to Charles X, who reigned 1824-1830. Prime minister under 

Louis Philippe 1831-1832. 
Perret, Auguste (1874-1954). Architect who developed the structural possibilities of 

reinforced concrete. With his brothers Gustav and Claude, he built in Paris the first 

apartment block designed for reinforced concrete construction. 
Pestalozzi,Johann Heinrich (1746-1827). Swiss educational reformer whose approach 

to instniction was influenced by Rousseau. Principal of a school at Yverdon 1805- 

1825. 

Phaedrus. Roman fabulist of the early first century A.D. Author of a versified Fabidae 
Aesopiae. 



La Phalange. Fourierist newspaper published in Paris 1832-1849. Subtitled Revue de la 
science social. 

Phalanx. Fourierist term for an agriculturally based, self-supporting Utopian community 

of 1,500-1,600 people. Its central edifice is known as the Phalanstery. 
Pherecydes of Syros. Greek philosopher of the sixth century B.C. Author of a genealogy 

of the gods, of which only fragments remain. 
Phidias. Fifth-century B.C. Athenian sculptor who executed the greatest of his city's 

monuments during the ascendancy of Pericles. 
Philip Augustus, or Philip II (1165-1223). French king who engaged in various wars, 

consolidated new possessions, and built on a large scale. 
Philipon, Charles (1800-1862). Oft-imprisoned French journalist and caricaturist. 

Founded and edited the weekly La Caricature and the daily Le Charivai, which at- 
tacked Louis Philippe. Became Daumier's editor in 1830. 
Picabia, Francis (1879-1953). French painter, poet, and dandy. Associated with Cubism, 

Dadaism, and Surrealism. Constructor of imaginary "machines." 
Pigal, Edme-Jean (1798-1872). Painter and illustrator. Discussed by Baudelaire in 

"Quelimes Caricaturistes francais." 
Pinard, Ernest (1822-1909). Prosecuting counsel in the trials of Madame Bovary and Les 

Fleiirs du mal. Became minister of the interior in 1867. 
Pinelli, Bartolomeo (1781-1835). Italian painter and bohemian. 
Piscator, Erwin (1893-1966). German expressionist theater director. 
Plateau, Joseph (1801-1883). Belgian physicist. Originated a stroboscopic method for 

the study of vibratory motion. Invented the Phenakistiscope (Greek for "deceitful 

view") in 1832. 

Plekhanov, Georgi (1857-1918). Russian political philosopher. After forty years in exile, 
he became the intellectual leader of the Russian Social Democratic movement, influenc- 
ing the thought of Lenin. 

Pokrovski, Mikhail (1868-1932). Russian Marxist historian and government official. 
Opposed Trotsky in the early 1920s. Author of Russian History (4 vols., 1924). 

Pompadour, Madame de (1721-1764). Mistress of Louis XV of France; established at 
Versailles from 1745. She completely controlled the king and his policies. 

Ponroy, Arthur. Writer whose father founded the conservative newspaper at Chateaur- 
oux, south of Palis, of which Baudelaire was briefly chief editor (1848), 

Ponson du 'Icrrail, Pierre-Alexis (1829-1871). Popular author of serial novels, such as 
Exploits de Rocambole, which were published in a twenty-two-volume collection in 1859. 

Pontmartin, Armand de (1811-1890). Conservative critic whom Baudelaire called a 
"drawing-room preacher." 

Posillipo. Promontory in the Bay of Naples. 

Pottier (Potier), Eugene (1816-1887). Revolutionary poet and composer. Member of the 
Paris Commune and the Communist International. His poems are collected in Cliants 
revoltdionnaires (1887). 

Poulet-Malassis, Auguste (1815-1878). French publisher and bibliophile. Close friend of 

Baudelaire in his later years. Published the first two editions of Les Fleurs du mal. 
Pradier, James (1792-1852). French neoclassical sculptor. 

Prarond, Ernest (1821-1909). French poet and historian of Picardy. Friend of Baude- 
laire. 

La Presse. Daily newspaper published in Paris from 1836. Organ of the opposition in the 
1840s. First paper to lower subscription rate to 40 francs, and to run advertisements 
and serial novels. 



Prevost, Pierre (1764-1823). French painter. 

Privat d'Anglemont, Alexandre (1815-1859). Bohemian man of letters who collabo- 
rated with Baudelaire on Mysteres galants de tliedtre de Paris, and wrote for Le Steele and 
other journals. Author of Paris inconnu (1861). 

Protot, Eugene (1839-1921). Lawyer and journalist. Blanquist, and member of the Paris 
Commune. Later attacked Engels and other Marxists. 

Proudhon, Pierre-Joseph (1809-1865). Political thinker, regarded as the father of anar- 
chism. Advocated a localized mutualist world federation to be achieved through eco- 
nomic action rather than violent revolution. Author of Qu 'est-ce que la propriete? (1840) 
and other works. 

Prudhomme, Rene. See Sully Prudhomme, Rene. 

Przybyszewski, Stanislaw (1868-1927). Polish writer influenced by Nietzsche. Audior 
of essays, novels, prose poems, and plays. 

Pyat, Felix (1810-1889). French playwright and politician. A leader of the Par is Com- 
mune and a Revolutionary Socialist member of the Chamber of Deputies in 1888. 

Quinet, Edgar (1803-1875). French writer and politician, associate of Jules Michelet. 
Hailed the 1848 revolution; in exile 1852-1870. Author of the epic poems Napoleon 
(1836) and Promethee (1838), and of the prose poem Aliasverns (1833), in which the 
figure of the Wandering Jew symbolizes the progress of humanity. 

Rachel. Stage name of Elisa Felix (1820-1858), Frendi actress famed for her roles as 
Phedre, Lucrece, Cleopatra. Died of tuberculosis. 

Raffet, Denis (1804-1860). French illustrator. Classmate ofDaumier. Best known for his 
lithographs of battle scenes. 

Ragaz. Spa in the Rliine Valley near Chur, Switzerland. 

Raphael, Max (1889-1952). French art historian; student of Georg Simmel and Hein- 
rich Wdlfflin. Lived in Paris 1932-1939. 

Rastignac, Eugene. Character in Pere Goriot (1834) and other novels by Balzac. 

Ratapoil ("Hairy Rat"). Character created by Daumier in 1850 as a personification of 
militarism; he resembled Louis Napoleon. 

Rattier, Paul Ernest de. Author of the Utopian prose work Paris n 'exute pas (1857). 

Red Belt. Name for the suburbs immediately surrounding Paris proper in the later 
nineteenth century. Populated by many of the working class who were dislocated by 
Haussmaim's urban renewal. 

Redern, Sigismond, comte de (1755-1835). Prussian Ambassador to England who 
formed a business partnership in 1790 with Saint-Simon, with whom he shared an 
enthusiasm for science and social reform. The partnership was dissolved in 1797, but 
Redern later helped support Saint-Simon (1807-181 1). 

Redon, Odilon (1840-1916). French painter and engraver, identified with the post-Im- 
pressionist school. Famous for paintings of flowers. 

La Reforme. Daily newspaper published in Paris (1843-1850) by republican democrats 
and socialists. 

Reinach, Salomon (1858-1932). French archaeologist, director of the Musee de Saint- 
Germain. Author of Orpheus: Histoire generate des religions (1909) and other works. 

Rellstab, Ludwig (1799-1860). Novelist, poet, and music critic for the Prussian Vossuclte 
Zeitimg. Author of Paris im Friilijahr 1843 (1844). 

Renan, Ernest (1823-1892). French philologist and historian. Author of De I'Origine du 
langage (1858), La Vie de "Jesus (1863). 

Rene. Novel by Chateaubriand (1802). 

Renouvier, Charles (1815-1903). Idealist philosopher. Author of Le Rrsonnalimie (1902) 
and other works. 



Restif de laBretonne. Pseudonym of Nicolas Restif (1734-1806), novelist whose subject 

matter earned him the nickname "Rousseau of the Gutter." 
Rethel, Alfred (1816-1859). German historical painter and grapliic artist. 
La Revue des deux mondes. Biweekly literary and political journal published in Paris since 

1829. 

Reynaud,Jean (1806-1863). Philosopher influenced by Saint-Simon. Author of Terre et 
del (1854), which was condenmed by a council of bishops at Perigueux. 

Reynold de Cressier, Baron Frederic Gonzague (1880-?). Swiss historian. Author of La 
Democratic et la Suisse (1929), L'Earope tragique (1934), and other works. 

Ricard, Louis-Gustave (1823-1873). Popular porn-ait painter praised byGautier, Baude- 
laire, and Nadar. 

Riquet, Pierre (1604-1680). Engineer who planned the Languedoc Canal, to connect 
the Mediterranean Sea with the Atlantic Ocean. He spent his personal fortune building 
the canal under Louis XrV; it was completed six months after his death. 

Riviere, Jacques (1886-1925). Novelist and critic. Championed Proust, Stravinsky, 
Nijinsky. Editor of Nouvelle Revue Jrancaue (1919-1925). 

Robespierre, Maximilien Francois de (1758-1794). Radical Jacobin and Montagnard 
leader in the Revolution of 1789; responsible for much of the Reign of Terror. Attacked 
Jacques Hebert and Georges Danton. Executed by order of the Revolutionary Tribu- 
nal. 

Rocambole. Popular multivohune serial novel by Pierre Ponson du Terrail (collected in 
1859). Concerns a mysterious defender of the weak against the strong. 

Rochefort, Henri (1830-1913). Journalist, playwright, and politician. In 1868 founded 
the satirical journal La Lanterne, opposed to Napoleon III. Involved in the Paris Com- 
mune (1871). Author of La Grande Boheme (1867), Les Naufrageurs (1876). 

Rodenbach, Georges (1855-1898). Belgian poet. Associated with the Symbolists and 
with the nineteenth-century Belgian literary revival. 

Rodrigues, Olinde (1794-1851). French intellectual and banker (of Jewish extraction) 
who became chief assistant to Saint-Simon in 1824, helped found Le Prodttcteur (1825), 
and edited the fir st collected edition of Saint-Simon's writings (1832). 

Roi Prudhomme. Play by Henri Monnier. 

Rolla. Byronesque poem published by Musset in La Revue des deux mondes (1833). 

Rollinat, Maurice (1846-1903). French poet known for his recitations at the Chat Noir 
cafe in Paris. His collection of poems, Neuroses (1883), shows the influence of Baude- 
laire. 

Romains,Jules (1885-1972). Novelist, poet, playwright. Author of Les Homines de bonne 
volonte (27 vols.; 1932-1946), and other works. Moved to the U.S. in 1940. 

Rops, Felicien (1833-1898). Belgian-French painter, engraver, and lithographer. Friend 
of Baudelaire. 

Roqueplan, Nestor (1804-1870). Critic, and director of the Paris Opera. 

Rossini, Gioacchino (1792-1868). Celebrated Italian opera composer. 

Rothschild, James (1792-1868). Founded the branch of his family's financial estab- 
lishment at Paris. Gave support to the Restoration govermnent and to the administra- 
tion of Louis Philippe. 

Rotrou, Jean de (1609-1650). French playwright. With Corneille, one of Cardinal 
Richelieu's "Five Poets." Author of Saint Genest (1646) and Jhweslas (1647). 

Rouget de Lisle, Claude (1760-1836). French army officer and songwriter; composer of 
"La Marseillaise" (1792). 

Ruckert, Friedrich (1788-1866). German poet, translator, professor of Oriental lan- 



guages at Erlangen and Berlin. Author of Deutsche Gedichte (1814), Die IVeisheit des 

Brahmanen (1836-1839). 
Ruge, Arnold (1803-1880). German writer on philosophy and politics and editor of 

various leftist journals. 
Rumford, Count. Title of Benjamin Thompson (1753-1814), American-born physicist 

and adventurer. From 1784 to 1795 he was in the service of the elector of Bavaria, who 

made him a count. Resident in Paris from 1802. 
RuyRlas. Play by Victor Hugo (1838). 

Sahatier, Aglae -Josephine (1822-1890). French beauty; sponsor of Sunday dinners for 
the artistic world in the 1850s. Intimate friend of Baudelaire. 

Sadler, Michael (1780-1835). English economist and politician. Leader of the philan- 
thropic Tories. 

Saint-Amant, Marc Antoine Girard (1594-1661). French burlesque poet and one of 
the first members of the Academie Franchise. 

Sainte-Beuve, Charles Augustin (1804-1869). Leading man of letters in mid-nine- 
teenth-century France. Author of Vie, poesies, et pensees de Joseph Delorme (1829), a 
novel, Volupte (1834), verse, and many volumes of literary criticism. 

Sainte-Pelagie. Prison in Paris where Louis- Auguste Blanqui was held 1861-1865; de- 
molished 1895. 

Saint-Germain, comte de (d. ca. 1784). Adventurer in Paris from 1750. Claimed to 
possess the philosopher's stone and the elixir of life. Confidential diplomat of Louis 
XV. 

Saint-Marc Girardin, Francois (1801-1873). Politician and man of letters. Member of 
the Chamber of Deputies (1835-1848). Professor of poetry at the Sorbonne. Author of 
Cours de litterature dramatique (1843-1863). 

Saint-Martin, Louis (1743-1803). French mystic philosopher; one of the Illuminati, 
inspired by Jakob Bolune. Saint-Martin's followers were known as Martinists. 

Saint-Simon, Henri (1760-1825). Philosopher and social reformer, considered the foun- 
der of French socialism. Fought in the American Revolution. Amassed a fortune by 
land speculation, but soon lost it and lived in relative poverty the last twenty years of 
his life. Author of De la Reorganisation de la societe europeenne (1814), Du Systeme indus- 
trial (1820-1823), Le Nouveau Christiamsme (1825). His ideas were developed by disci- 
ples into the system known as Saint-Simonianism. 

Salon. Annual public exhibitions of art in France, beginning in 1833, sponsored by tire 
Academie Royale and held in the galleries of the Tuileries, adjoining the Louvre. 

Salon des Etrangers. Luxurious Parisian gambling house frequented by the allies after 
Waterloo. 

Salut public. Short-lived newspaper, founded by Baudelaire, Champfleury, and Charles 
Toubin. Two issues appeared, in February and March 1848. llie name, recalling the 
infamous Committee of Public Safety formed under the Terror in 1793, came from 
Baudelaire. Its brief, unsigned articles were full of revolutionary enthusiasm for "the 
people," its republic, and a socialist Christ. 

Salvandy, Narcisse, comte de (1795-1856). Colonial minister who invited Alexandre 
Dumas pere to visit Tunis at the government's expense in order to publicize the colo- 
nies. 

Sand, George. Pseudonym of Aurore Dudevant (1804-1876), Romantic novelist who 
stood for free association in all social relations, and whose protagonists are generally 
virtuous peasants or workmen. Famous for her love affairs with Prosper Merimee, 
Alfred de Musset, and Frederic Chopin. 

Sandeau, Jules (1811-1883). Novelist and playwright. Curator of the Bibliotheque Maz- 
arin in Paris. 



Sarcey, Francisque (1827-1899). French journalist and drama critic. 

Sauvageot, Charles (1781-1860). French archaeologist and violinist at the Opera who 

assembled a vast collection, especially of Renaissance objects and art, during the 1830s. 

His collection was given to the Louvre in 1856. 
Schapper, Karl (1812-1870). A leader in the German and international working-class 

movement, and a member of the Central Committee of the Communist League. Active 

in the 1848-1849 revolution in Germany. 
SchefFer, Ary (1795-1858). Dutch-born French figure and portrait painter; criticized by 

Baudelaire. 

Schinkel, Karl Friedrich (1781-1841). German architect and painter. Adapted classical 

Greek foiTns to modem architecture, as in the Royal Theater in Berlin. 
Schlosser, Friedrich Christoph (1776-1861). German historian. Author of Weltgescluclite 

fur das Deutsche Yolk (19 vols.; 1843-1857). 
Scholl, Aurelien (1833-1902). French journalist, friend of Offenbach, defender of Zola. 

Wrote for the Le Figaro before founding the satirical journal Le Nain jaune (1863). 

Author of L'Esprit du boidevard. 
Schuls-Tarasp. Two neighboring towns in the Unter Engadin, in Switzerland. 
Schweitzer, Johann Baptist (1834-1875). German politician and writer. Editor of Der 

Soiial-Demokrat (1864-1867). Succeeded Ferdinand Lasalle as president of the General 

Association of German Workers (1867-1871). 
Scribe, Eugene (1791-1861). Popular playwright. Author or co-author of over 350 plays 

and librettos concerned with the predilections of the bourgeoisie. 
Sedan, Battle of. Decisive victory of the Prussian army over the French on September 2, 

1870, in which Napoleon III was taken prisoner. Led to the end of the Franco-Prussian 

War. 

Segantini, Giovanni (1858-1899). Italian painter, influenced by French Impressionists. 

His Punishment of the Unnatural Mothers, or The Infanticides hangs in Vienna. 
Senancour, Ettenne (1770-1846). French writer of a pessimistic bent. Author of the 

epistolary novel Obermann (1804). 
Senefelder, Aloys (1771-1834). Czech-born inventor of lithography (1796) and color 

lithography (1826). Inspector of maps at the royal Bavarian printing office in Munich. 
September Laws. Passed in September 1835, they forbade any attack on the government 

or person of Louis Philippe, and required official authorization, as well as the deposit of 

a bond, for all publications and theatrical displays. 
Serenus of Antissa. Greek geometer of Egypt who flourished circa the fourth century 

A.D. 

Servandoni, Giovanni (1695-1766). Italian architect, painter, and stage designer. Called 
to Paris in 1724 to be architect to the king. Among his works are the neoclassical facade 
of the Church of Saint-Sulpice in Palis and the altar of the Church of the Chartreux in 
Lyons. 

Sevigne, Madame de (1626-1696). French writer and lady of fashion, famed for her 
letters recording daily life in Paris and Brittany. 

Le Steele. Daily newspaper published in Paris 1836-1939. In the 1840s, it was opposi- 
tional; in the 1850s, moderate republican. 

Silvy, Camille (1834-1910). Pioneer photographer, admired by Nadar. 

Simonians. Syncretistic sect founded by a Samaritan magician of the first century A.D., 
Simon Magus, who converted to Christianity. He was accompanied in his ministry by 
a former prostitute named Helen. 

Simplidssimm. Illustrated periodical founded in Munich in 1896 by Albert Langen and 
Frank Wedekind. It aimed to unsettle bourgeois complacency. 

Sismondi, Jean Simonde de (1773-1842). Swiss historian and economist of Italian de- 



scent. Author of Nouveaax Principes d'economie politique (1819), Histoire des Francois 
(1821-1844). 

Solferino. Site of a major battle between Austrian and Franco-Piedmontese armies, June 

24, 1859, in Lombardy. Heavy casualties led Napoleon III to seek a truce with Austria. 
Sommerard, Alexandre du (1779-1842). French archaeologist who, during the 1830s, 

amassed a collection of French artifacts that was deposited in the Hotel Cluny in 1832. 
Soulie, Frederic (1800-1847). Early practitioner of the serial novel. Author of popular 

sensational novels like Memoires du diable (1837-1838). 
Soumet, Alexandre (1788-1845). Poet and playwright, concerned with historical 

themes. Published La Divine Epopee in 1840. 
Soupault, Philippe (1897-1990). Poet, novelist, and man of letters, associated with 

avant-garde movements of the early twentieth century. Published a biography of 

Baudelaire in 1 93 1 . 

Spartacus (?-71). Leader of a slave revolt against Rome in the first century A.D. 

Spielhagen, Friedrich (1829-1911). Popular German novelist and playwright, and parti- 
san of democratic movements. 

Spitzweg, Carl (1808-1885). German painter of landscape and genre scenes, associated 
with the Biedermeier style. 

Stein, Lorenz von (1815-1890). German lawyer and historian, author of works on the 
socialist movement. 

Steinlen, Theophile (1859-1923). French artist and illustrator, well-known for his post- 
ers and lithographs. 

Stern, Daniel. Pseudonym of Marie Havigny, comtesse dAgoult (1805-1876), historian, 
novelist, and playwright who wrote extensively on the Revolution of 1848. Led a salon 
in Palis, and was the mistress of Franz Liszt, with whom she had a daughter, Cosima, 
later the wife of Richard Wagner. 

Stevens, Alfred (1828-1906). Belgian painter, best known for his genre scenes of Pari- 
sian society, 

Stifter, Adalbert (1805-1868). Austrian writer who believed that small everyday phe- 
nomena manifest the principles of nature more sublimely than prodigious phenomena. 
Author of Die Mappe meines Urgrossvaters (1842), Bunte Steine (1853). Subject of a short 
essay of 1 9 1 8 by Benjamin. 

Strabo (63 B.C.-A.D. 24). Greek geographer and historian working in Rome during the 
age of Augustus. 

Suchet, Louis-Gabriel (1772-1826). Napoleonic general. 

Sue, Eugene (1804-1857). Popular novelist of urban life and leading exponent of the 

newspaper serial. A Parisian dandy, he lived in exile after the coup d'etat of 1851. 

Author of LesMystbes de Paris (1842-1843), Lejuif errant (1844-1845). 
Sully Prudhomme, Rene (1839-1907). French poet, a leader of the Parnassians in their 

attempt to bring positivist philosophy to poetry. 
Swedenborg, Emanuel (1688-1772). Swedish scientist, philosopher, and religious writer. 

Author of Arcana Coelestia (1749-1756). His followers organized the New Jerusalem 

church. 

Taine, Hippolyte Adolphe (1828-1893). French philosopher and historian; leading ex- 
ponent of positivism. Professor of aesthetics and the history of art at the Ecole des 
Beaux- Arts (1864-1883). Among his works are Essais de critique et d 'histoire (1855), 
Histoire de la litterature anglaise (1865), Origines de la France contemporaine (1871-1894). 

Talleyrand-Perigord, Charles (1754-1838). French clergyman and statesman. Grand 
chamberlain under Napoleon and later ambassador to Great Britain (1830-1834). 
Helped engineer the July Revolution. His Memoires were published in 1891. 

Talma, Francois (1763-1826). Outstanding French tragedian, a favorite with Napoleon. 



Taylor, Frederick Winslow (1856-1915). American efficiency engineer. Author of Tlie 

Principles of Scientific Management (1911). 
Terrasson,Jean, abbe (1670-1750). Freemason and member of the Academie Franchise 

who championed the "moderns" in their debate with the "ancients." His novel Sethos 

(1731) combined political instruction with Masonic initiation. 
Thierry, Augustin (1795-1856). French historian and assistant to Saint-Simon (1814— 

1817). Authorof Conquete de I'Angleterre par les Mormands (1825) and Lettres sur I'ldstoire 

de France (1827). 

Thierry, Edouard (1813-1894). French poet and critic, known for his essays on drama. 
Friend of Baudelaire. 

Thiers, Adolphe (1797-1877). Statesman and historian. Held cabinet posts under Louis 
Philippe, and was a leader of the Liberal opposition (1863-1870). In 1871, he helped 
crush the Paris Commune. Was elected fir st president of the Third Republic (1871- 
1873). Among his works are Histoire de la Revolution francaue (1823-1827) and Hutoire 
du Consulat et de I'Empire (1845-1862). 

Third Republic of France. 1875-1940. 

Thomas, Emile (1822-1880). Civil engineer who, at age twenty-five, became director 
and chief architect of the National Workshops (February-May 1848). 

Thomasius, Christian (1655-1728). German jurist and progressive philosopher. Taught 
at the University of Halle, where he departed from scholastic curriculum and lectured 
in vernacular German rather than Latin. 

Three Glorious Days. See July Revolution. 

Tiberius (42 B.C.-A.D. 37). Emperor of Rome (A.D. 14-37). Heir of Augustus. 
Tieck, Ludwig (1773-1853). German author of lyric poetry, novels, dramas, and literary 
criticism. 

Toubin, Charles (1820-1891). Professor who wrote for La Revue des deux mond.es. Friend 

of Baudelaire and Courbet. Author of works on folklore and etymology. 
Tournachon, Felix. See Nadar. 

Toussenel, Alphonse (1803-1885). French naturalist; follower of Fourier. Editor of 
the journal La Paix. Author of L'Eiprit des betes (1856), and other works in a droll 
mode. 

Travies de Villers, Charles (1804-1859). Painter and caricaturist; a founder of the 
periodicals Le Charivari (1831) and La Caricature (1838). Discussed by Baudelaire in 
"Quelques Caricatuiistes francais." 

Trelat, Ulysse (1795-1879). Doctor and politician. On the editorial board of Le National, 
and minister of public works from May to June 1848. 

Tridon, Gustav (1841-1871). French politician and publicist. Louis-Auguste Blanqui's 
favorite lieutenant. Active in the Paris Commune. Author of an anti-Semitic extrava- 
ganza, Du Molocltisme juif. 

Tristan, Flora (1803-1844). French radical writer who advocated a Utopian socialism. 
Author of Union ouvriere (1843), L Emancipation de la femme (1845). 

Trophonius. Mythical builder of the Delphic oracle. According to legend, he gave pro- 
phetic answers after his death to those who slept in his cave in Boeotia. 

Troyon, Constant (1813-1865). Landscape painter; a member of the Barbizon group. 
Renowned for paintings of animals. 

Tuileries. A royal residence in Paris, begun in 1564 by Catherine de Medicis and bumed 
in 1871. Now the site of the Tuileries Gardens, a park near the Louvre. 

Turgot, Aisne Robert (1727-1781). Statesman and economist; associated with the 
Physiocrats. His fiscal and political reforms met with opposition from high-ranking 
circles and led to his dismissal in 1776. Among his works are Lettres sur la tolerance 
(1753-1754) and Reflexions sur la formation et la distribution du richesses (1766). 



Unold, Max (1885-1964). German writer arid graphic artist. In France 1911-1913. 

Usener, Hermann (1834-1905). German classical scholar and liistorian of religion. 
Teacher of Aby Warburg. 

Vacquerie, Auguste (1819-1895). Journalist and playwright. Co-founded the radical 
journal Le Rappel (1869). 

Vaihinger, Hans (1852-1933). German philosopher who developed Kantianism in the 
direction of pragmatism by espousing a theory of "fictions" for negotiating the maze of 
life. Author of Die Philosophic desAh Ob (1911). 

Valjean,Jean. Leading character in Victor Hugo's Le s Muerables (1862). 

Valles, Jules (1832-1885). French socialist journalist and novelist; founded Le Cti du 
peitple (1871). Member of the Paris Commune. Author of Jacques Vingtrts (1879-1886). 

van de Velde, Henry (1863-1957). Belgian architect and craftsman; leader ofjugendstil 
in architecture and arts. His most important work is Vom neuen Stil (1907). 

Varlin, Louis-Eugene (1839-1871). Bookbinder and Proudhonist. He was a leader in the 
First International, as well as a member of the Central Committee of the Garde Nation- 
ale. Took part in the Paris Commune, and was killed by the forces of Tliiers's govern- 
ment. 

Varnhagen von Ense, Karl (1785-1858). German diplomat and writer. Author of Biog- 

raphische Denkmale (1824-1830). 
Vaucanson, Jacques de (1709-1782). Inventor. Constructed an automaton, "The Flute 

Player," in 1738, followed the next year by "The Duck," which imitated the motions of 

a live duck. Succeeded in automating the loom used for silk weaving. 
Vau !.rin. Name assumed by the villainous character Jacques Collin in Pere Goriot, Illusions 

perdues, and other of Balzac's novels. 
Vehme, or Vehmgericht. System of secret tribunals that spread across Germany in the 

Middle Ages and allowed much scope for private revenge and judicial murder. 
Vendee. A province in the west of France which gave its name to a royalist insurrection 

that took place there during the Revolution (1793). 
Verhaeren, Emile (1855-1916). Belgian poet who fused techniques of Symbolism and 

Naturalism. An editor of La Jeune Belgique. Published Les Villes tentaculaires in 1895. 
Verlaine, Paul (1844-1896). Leading Symbolist poet. Author of Poemes satitrniens (1866), 

Sagesse (1881), Les Poetes maudits (1884), Elegies (1893). 
Veron, Louis (1798-1867). French journalist known as Docteur Veron. Founded La 

Revae de Paris (1829) and revived Le Constitutionnel (1835). Bonapartist after 1848. 
\6suviennes. Club de la Legion des Vesuviennes on the Rue Sainte-Apolline, one of 

many feminist clubs founded in France in 1848. 
Veuillot, Louis (1813-1883). Journalist and editor oiL'Uniuers religieux (1843). Author of 

Le Pape et la diplomatic (1861), Les Odeurs de Paris (1866). 
Vicat, Louis (1786-1861). Engineer who specialized in building materials for bridges. 
Vidocq, Francois (1775-1857). French adventurer and detective; sei-ved under Napo- 
leon, Louis Philippe, and Larnartine. Published Memoires de Vidocq (4 vols.; 1828- 

1829). 

Vigny, Alfred de (1797-1863). Man of letters and army officer; leader of the Romantic 

school. His work is distinguished by an aristocratic pessimism. 
Villele, Jean Baptiste (1773-18 54). Leader of the ultra-Royalists after the Restoration; 

premier 1822-1828. A critic of the financial policies of the July Monarchy. 
Villemain, Abel (1790-1870). Writer and politician; secretary of the Academie Francaise. 

Author of Eloge de Montesquieu (1816), Essai sur le genie de Pindare (1859). 
Villemessantjjean (1812-1879). French journalist. Founder of Le Figaro, first (1854) as a 

weekly, and later (1866) as a daily newspaper. 



Villiers de l'Isle-Adam, Auguste (1838-1889). Poet, dramatist, and short-story writer; 

reputed originator of the Symbolist school. Author of Premieres Poesies (1856-1858), 

Contes cruels (1883), Axel (1890). 
Viollet-le-Duc, Eugene (1814-1879). Architect; a leader of die Gothic revival in France. 

Designed the restoration of medieval buildings, including the cathedral of Notre-Dame 

in Paris. 

Vireloque, Thomas. Character created by the illustrator Paul Gavarni. 
Virginie. Character in Jacques Bernardin de Saint-Pierre's romance Paul et Vwginie 
(1788). 

Vischer, Friedrich Theodor (1807-1887). German poet and aestherician of the Hegelian 
school. Author of Kritische Gauge (1844; 1860), Asthetik (1846-1857), and a parody of 
Goethe, Faust, Part III. 

Volney, Constantin-Francois (1757-1820). French scholar. Member of the States- 
General (1789). Author of Voyage en Egypt et en Syrie (1787), Raines, on Meditation stir les 
revolutions des empires (1791), La Loi naturelle (1793). 

Wallon,Jean (1821-1882). Philosopher and friend of Baudelaire. Translated Hegel's 
Logik. Appears as Colline, a principal character in Henri Murger's Scales de la vie de 
Boheme. 

Walpole, Hugh (1884-1941). Prolific English novelist. Born in New Zealand, he served 
with the Russian Red Cross during World War I. His book llie Fortress was published 
in 1932. 

Wa*ripon, Antonio (1822-1864). Journalist and critic. Friend of Baudelaire. 
Werther. Sickly young German student, hero of Goethe's novel Die Leiden des jimgen 
Werthers (1774). 

Wheatstone, Charles (1802-1875). English physicist and inventor. Conducted experi- 
ments in electricity, light, and sound. The stereoscope, his invention for observing 
pictures in three dimensions, is still used in viewing X-rays and aerial photographs. 

Wiertz, Antoine Joseph (1806-1865). Belgian painter of colossal historical scenes. Lam- 
pooned by Baudelaire. 

Wiesengrund. Theodor Wiesengnmd Adomo. 

Wolfskehl, Karl (1869-1948). Germanjewish philosopher and poet. A friend of Stefan 
George and Ludwig Klages, as well as of Benjamin, who wrote about him. Fled Ger- 
many in 1933. 

Worth, Charles (1825-1895). Anglo-French couturier, patronized by Empress Eugenie. 

Arbiter of Paris fashions for thirty years. 
Wronski, Jozef (1778-1853). Polish mathematician and philosopher. Author of Messian- 

ism: Final Union of Philosophy and Religion (1831-1839). 
Wuhlgarten. An institute for epileptics in Berlin. 

Young Germany. Literary movement arising after the death of Goethe (1832), and 
asserting the claims of the younger generation against the complacency of die elder. 

Young Hegelians. Liberal movement arising after the death of Hegel (1831), and contest- 
ing dualism in church and state. Attacked by Marx and Engels in Die deutsche Ideologic 

Yverdon. See Pestalozzi.Johann Heinrich. 

Yvon, Adolphe (1817-1893). French painter of historical scenes and portraits. 
Z Marcos. Novel of 1840, formingpart of Balzac's Scbies de la vie politique. 
Zelter, Karl Friedrich (1758-1832). German composer; set poems by Goethe and 
Schiller to music. His correspondence with Goedie ran to six volumes. 



Index 



AbdelKrim,531,878 
About, Edmond, 291 
Adler, Max, 576 

Adorno, Gretel, 885, 1013, 1014 

Adorno, Thcodor Wiesengrund, 208, 218, 219- 
220, 268, 379, 397, 420, 461, 466, 542, 547, 548, 
669, 868, 873, 893, 929, 937, 943, 946, 959, 
965-966, 984, 989, 1013, 1014-1015 

Aduocat,L',398 

Ailly, Pierre d; 359 

Aunable Faubourien, L', 710-71 1 

Alain (Emile-Auguste Chartier), 511, 773 

Albalat, Antoine, 765 

Albert, Prince, 190 

Alberti, Leon Kattista, 157, 167 

Albertus Magnus, 525 

Alexandre, Arsene, 548 

Allard, Roger, 247, 265 

Allcmagnc, Henry-Rene d', 159, 398, 593, 594 

Almanac h des reformateurs, 762 

Almanack Icarien, i^' 611 

Almcras, Henri d', 504 

Altschul, Frank, 957 

Ambigu theater, 408, 788 

Amiel, Henri, 255 

Ancellc, Narcisse-Desire, 264, 271, 279, 282, 283 

Andler, Charles, 709, 730 

Anglcinont, Edouard d', 45, 698 

Annenkov, Pavel, 626 

Anschiitz, Ottomar, 685 

Anski, P., 626 

Antiphilos of Byzantium, 697 
Apollinairc,GuilIaurae, 19, 67, 70, 82, 247, 265, 

353, 374, 837, 904 
Arago, Francois, 6, 141, 303, 673, 677, 821, 822- 

823, 902, 915 
Aragojacijues, 109, 715, 720, 807 
Aragon, Louis, 82, 87, 103, 374, 458, 464,492, 

494, 539, 790, 831, 841, 861, 862, 883, 901, 

908, 909, 933, 934 
Arcay, Joseph d', 591 
Arendt, Hannah, 954 
Argand, Airae, 567-568, 837 



Argonne, A., 296 

Ariste, Pauld', 50,51,76, 430 

Aristotle, 697, 800, 945 

Armand, Felix, 58, 78, 199, 640, 641-642, 643, 

645, 646, 648, 743, 784 
Art'tstarque, 770 
Artois, comte d', 573 

Asselineau, Charles, 234, 250, 269, 280, 281, 310, 
972 

Assemblee nalionale , L', 522, 591 
Asturaro, A., 465 
Atelier, L', 613, 712 
Auber, D. F. E, 960, 1011 
Aubert, Constance, 505 
Aubert, Gabriel, 836 
Audebrand. Philibert, 592 
Augsburg Gazette, 611 

Aupick,Jact(ues (Baudelaire's stepfather), 259, 

260, 266, 276, 279, 282, 283, 312, 967 
Aurifere, 715 
Auriac, Eugene d', 431 
Auto gr a plie, L\ 575 
Auvergne, Edmund B. d ! , 553 
Avenel, George d', 55, 60, 167 
Aza'is, Pierre-Hyacinthe, 637 

Babeuf, Francois, 619 

Babou, Hippolyte, 201, 276, 443, 542, 561 

Bachofenjohann, 361 

Bacon, Francis, 467, 485, 486, 599 

Bailly, Jean, 781 

Baldensperger, Feraand, 765 

Baltard, Louis, 162 

Balzac, Guez de, 486 

Balzac, Honore de, 52-53, 54, 62, 78, 225, 280, 
286, 298, 304,335, 376, 416, 436, 437, 439, 
440, 441, 443, 456, 612, 641, 674, 687-688, 
721, 741, 744, 760, 768-769, 774, 777, 811, 822, 
861, 902, 910, 915; characterizations by, 21-22, 
245, 288, 299, 442, 445, 447, 535, 536, 555, 
615, 619, 760, 761, 763, 784, 814, 850-851, 
980; collaboration on La Prase, 768; on Com- 
munism, 761-762; criticism of society and mass 



Balzac, Honore de (continued) 
culture by, 32, 58, 87, 224-225, 448, 487, 602, 
754, 758, 760, 898; gambling and, 495, 514- 
515; imagination and Romanticism in the 
works of, 110, 616; on journalism and publish- 
ing, 678, 748, 754, 756, 764; Paris and, 3, 15, 
83, 282, 454, 469, 773, 850-851, 1008; politics 
of, 614, 726, 759-760, 781; on Saint-Simonian- 
ism, 592-593; serializations of works by, 441, 
771-772 

Bandy, W.T., 234 

Banville, Theodore de, 235-236, 250, 269, 282, 

294,302,304 
Barbara, Charles, 306,5 85, 773 
Barbes, Annand, 98 

Barbey d'Aurevilly, Jules, 234, 270-271, 273, 275, 
276, 277, 289, 292, 295, 303, 363, 765 

Barbier, Auguste, 235, 237, 372, 378, 387, 452, 
506, 723, 725, 735, 739 

Barker, Robert, 993 

Barnum, Phineas, 184 

Banal, Georges, 242 

Barrault, Alexis, 166, 168 

Barrault, Emile, 168, 475, 578, 592, 597, 598, 599, 

601, 765 
Barre, Eugene, 124, 429, 543 
Barres, Maurice, 216, 250-251, 306, 966 
Barriere, Theodore, 48, 187, 502 
Barrot, Odilon, 900 

Barthelemy, Auguste-Marseille, 146, 293, 447, 

511,569, 718, 737,824 
Barthou, Louis, 755, 756 
Bassajet, Numa,214 
Bastiat, Frederic, 963 
Bataille, Georges, 958 
Bataille, Henry, 372 

Batault, Georges, 679, 698, 748, 749, 781 
Baudelaire, Charles, 26, 112, 116, 203, 229, 235, 
241-242, 280, 288, 311, 346, 359, 367, 421, 
436-437, 449, 554, 616, 761, 803, 901, 929, 
930; allegory in the works of, 10, 21, 22, 204, 
206, 236, 239, 257, 268, 271-272, 2 8 5,30 8, 
315, 316, 319-320, 323, 324-331, 333, 334, 
335, 336, 338, 345-349, 352, 356, 365, 367, 
368, 370, 377, 475, 841, 894, 896, 904; Ameri- 
canisms of, 243-244, 335; art theory and art 
criticism by, 22-23, 230, 236, 238, 269, 272, 
286-287, 289-290, 293, 294, 298-301, 317, 
322-323, 324, 329-331, 335, 342, 364, 375, 
383, 895; on Banville, 235-236; candidacy for 
the Academie Francaise, 274, 278, 296, 338, 
969, 972; Catholicism and Christian asceticism, 
233, 236, 243, 248, 251-253, 255, 259, 263, 
303, 311, 312, 316, 324-325, 327, 330, 334, 
335, 337, 340, 353, 366; on children, 342, 355; 
collaboration on Le Salut public, 745; compared 
with Dante, 234, 247, 305, 363, 364; compared 
with Proust, 404; correspondances, 241, 248, 



250, 272, 292, 298, 329, 364, 377, 378; criticism 
by, 298-300, 334, 376, 452, 555,618, 735, 755; 
criticism of, 238-239, 274-275, 278, 279, 287- 
288, 303-304, 305-307, 310-312, 334, 350, 
363, 364, 372, 377, 380, 386; on dandyism, 110- 
111, 319, 375, 376, 378, 801, 806; on Daumier, 
323, 326, 743; death as theme in the works of, 
10-11, 22, 99,341, 345, 351, 895, 896; deca- 
dence in the works and life of, 230, 234, 239, 
240, 246, 249, 251, 255, 256, 257, 363; on Du- 
pont, 230, 334, 347, 755, 766; family, 254, 258- 
260, 262-264, 266, 277, 282, 291, 300, 312, 
338, 355-356, 361; on fashion, 78-79, 217, 271, 
354; Gautier and, 241, 261, 278, 334; on Guys, 
110-111, 238-240, 314, 369, 696; health and 
death, 250, 258, 260, 263, 266-267, 281, 289; 
heroism and antiquity in the works of, 117, 322, 
324, 336, 337, 350, 364, 370, 371, 806, 816; on 
Hugo, 228, 235, 236, 250, 264, 269, 270, 313; 
Hugo and, 261, 278, 283, 755, 756, 1004; im- 
ages of sky and clouds, 233, 331-332, 343, 
349, 351, 352, 353, 355, 356, 357, 830; on in- 
toxication of great cities, 61, 199;Jugendstil 
and, 475, 553, 556, 557, 560; on lesbians, 309- 
310, 318, 371; literary competition/publicity, 
333, 335-337, 340; love for Paris, 282, 284, 
302, 313, 347, 385; on Meryon, 96-97, 231, 
238, 452; on modernity and commodities, 10, 
22, 26, 78-79, 117, 236, 238-239, 318, 322, 
331, 335, 336-340, 345-347, 350, 360, 364, 
366, 368, 371-372, 376, 555, 804, 806, 896; 
myth in the works of, 110, 236, 268, 322, 329, 
335; Paris in the works of, 10-11, 21, 231, 246, 
252, 256, 282, 311, 313, 319, 323,332, 336, 
346, 347, 351, 353, 356, 363, 469, 877, 894, 
895, 896; physical appearance and personality, 
230, 240-241, 243, 244, 245, 248-249, 250, 
253-254, 256, 257, 258-259, 260-262, 264, 
267, 273-274, 279, 281-282, 288, 291, 293, 
305, 306, 313,314, 316,318, 319, 322, 333, 
340-341, 365, 895, 896; Poe and, 96, 227, 240, 
243, 247, 261, 264, 265, 267, 272, 283, 286, 
293, 295, 319, 325, 334, 452; on politics and so- 
ciety, 271, 276, 277, 279, 306, 311-312, 338- 
339, 346, 351, 359, 363, 385, 446, 896; on 
prostitutes, 335, 336, 339, 347, 348; Proust on, 
307, 309-310; pseudonyms used by, 296-297; 
on relation of the crowd to the individual, 268, 
269, 290, 333, 334, 446, 454, 895; Romanti- 
cism and, 110, 243, 251, 252, 304; sadism and 
fetisliism, 342, 354, 382-383; satanism of, 376, 
379, 383, 414, 805; sexual life and themes, 10, 
22, 258-259, 262, 267, 283, 290-291, 309-310, 
331, 332, 334, 337, 342, 345, 347, 348, 357, 361- 
362; on solitude, 268, 269, 337, 338; style and 
theory of writing, 235-236, 244, 245, 246, 247, 
248, 249, 251, 254, 255-257, 260, 263, 264, 
270-271, 274, 283-284, 304-305, 309, 317, 355, 



377; Tbussenel and, 241-242; translations of 
Poe, 280, 281, 282, 285, 385, 445; Valery and, 
335; Wagner and, 230, 236, 237, 895, 897; im- 
ages of and views on women, 309-310, 312, 
313,318, 331, 342, 373, 896. WORKS: "A 
Aisene Houssaye," 437; "Abel et Cain," 327; 
"UAlbatros," 278; "Allegorie," 296; "L'Ame du 
vin," 281, 350; "L'Amour du mensonge," 314; 
"L'Amonr et le crane," 276; "L'Amour et le 
crane: Vieux Cul-dc-lampe," 328; Argument du 
livre sur la Belgique, 244, 245, 441, 555; L'Art 
p/iiloso plaque, 238; L'Art romantique, 58, 110- 
111, 235-240, 442, 443, 555, 618, 689, 697, 
735, 743, 745, 772, 816, 968; "L'Avertisseur," 
314, 326, 352; "Les Aveugles," 272, 776; "Le 
Balcon," 268, 309, 969; "La Beatrice," 326- 
327, 332; "Le Beau Navire," 80, 330, 426; "La 
Beaute," 327; "Benediction," 278, 349, 353, 
365, 557; "Bohemiens en voyage," 336; "Les 
Bonnes Soeurs," 228-229; "Les Bons Chiens," 
774; "Aux Bourgeois," 317; "Brumes ct pluies," 
356; "Chacun sa chimere," 296; "La Chambre 
double," 317; "Chant d'automne," 338; "Une 
Charogne," 240, 253, 278, 283; "La Cheve- 
lure," 327, 924; "Choix de maximes consolan- 
tes sur Tamour," 247-248, 316; "Comment on 
paie ses dettes ^uand on a du genie," 294; 
"Confession," 330; "Les Correspondances," 
264, 288,336, 558; "Le Coucher du soleil ro- 
mantii|ue," 239, 324; "Le Couvercle," 353; "Le 
Crepuscule du matin," 234, 257, 267, 268, 272, 
296, 332, 355, 358,381, 445; "Le Crepuscule 
du soir," 234, 257, 267, 272, 313, 343, 370, 378, 
434-, 445; "Le Cygne," 10, 21, 276, 333, 356, 
896; "De l'Ideal artificiel," 278; "De Profundis 
clamavi," 355; Demieres Lettres inedites a sa 
mere, 291-292; LesDessins de Daumer, 233, 
741; "La Destruction," 256, 319, 34 9; "Les 
Deux Bonnes Soeurs," 334; "L'Ecole pa'ienne," 
235, 313, 316, 743; "L'Ennemi," 327; Les 
Epaves, 257, 275, 316; "L'Esprit de M. Ville- 
main," 365; "De ('Essence du rire," 285, 325, 
329; "LExamen de minuit," 326; "Exposition 
Universellc, 1855," 298, 315; "La Fanfarlo," 
261, 297; "Femmes damnees," 274, 305, 371; 
"Femmes damnees: Delphine et Hippolyte," 
267, 283, 371, 557; "Les Femmes et les filles," 
696; "Les Fenetres," 437; "La Fin de la 
jouniee," 352; Les Flairs du mal, 200, 205, 224, 
228, 234, 235, 240, 243, 244, 246, 254, 256, 
257, 258, 262, 263, 264, 268, 270, 271, 272, 274, 
275-276, 280,281, 283, 286, 288, 292, 295, 
296, 303, 305, 308, 312-313, 317, 325, 329- 
330, 335, 336, 337, 33 9,351, 353, 355, 383, 
386, 471, 556, 557, 560, 917; "Les Foules," 437; 
"Fusees," 293, 295, 300, 314-315, 352, 356, 
376, 443, 445; "La Geante," 264; "Le Gouffre," 
353, 354, "Une Gravure fantastii[ue," 328, 



"Harmonie du soir," 317, 319; "L'Heautonti- 
moroumenos," 314, 327; "De l'Heroisme de la 
vie modenie," 368; Histotres grotesques et 
serieuses par Edgar Poe, 570; "L'Homme-dieu," 
365; "L'Horloge," 326, 351, 384, 507; "Hor- 
reur sympatliii|ue," 351, 352; "L'Imprevu," 
327, 354; "L'Irremediable," 328, 353; "L'lr- 
reparable," 351; "Je n'ai pas oublie," 296; "Jt te 
doime ces vers," 330; "Lejeu," 334, 380, 514; 
"Unjour de pluie," 353, 446; "Au Lectcur," 
377, 384; "Les Lesbicnnes," 280, 556; Les Lesbi- 
ennes, 263; Xesbos," 265, 266, 274, 351; Let- 
tres, 322; Lettres a sa mere, 58, 312-313, 379; 
Les Limbes, 233, 235, 263, 297, 301, 311; "Les 
Litanies de Satan," 111,327, 557; "A Une 
Madone," 264-265; "Marceline Desbordes-Val- 
more,"371, 442; "Une Martyre," 8, 19, 309, 
349; "Le Mauvais Vitrier," 266; "Le Men- 
songe," 696-697; "MonCoeur mis a nu," 291, 
295, 300, 315,319, 332, 376, 445, 967; "La 
Mort," 309, 351; "La Mort des amants," 349; 
"Le Mort joyeux," 267, 3 55; "Musee classi^ue 
du Bazar Bonne-Nouvelle," 318; "La Muse 
malade," 330; "La Muse venal," 330; "Notes et 
documents pour mon avocat," 280; Nouvelles 
Histoires e.xtmordinaires, 319, 454; "Notes Nou- 
velles sur Edgar Poe," 319; "Obsession," 267, 
336; "LOeuvre at la vie d'Eugene Delacroix," 
239-240; Oeuvres, 60, 111, 199,200, 245, 248, 
269, 285, 286-287, 290, 293, 296, 298-301, 
330, 342, 360,365, 555; Oeuvres completes, 227, 
263, 314, 376, 385, 454; Oeuvres poetiques, 247; 
Us Paradis wtificiels, 206, 276, 278, 279, 365, 
375, 841; "A Une Passante," 262, 267, 268, 276, 
380, 384; "Le Paysage," 356, 382, 387, 536; 
"Le Peintre de la vie moderne," 239, 442, 443; 
"Perte d'aureole," 375, 557; "Les Petites 
Vieillcs," 243, 252, 319, 354, 355, 382, 755, 
1004; Pettts Poemes en prose {Le Spleen de Paris), 
225, 233, 235, 244, 262, 263, 278, 279, 294, 
312, 318, 322, 330, 346, 414, 434, 437, 507, 
553, 774, 896; "Petrus Borel," 772; "Les 
Pliares," 278, 330; "Physiognomic de la rue," 
441; Pieces condamnees, 309; "Pierre Dupont," 
237; Poemes divers, 446; "Le Possede," 291; 
"Les Promesses d'un visage," 267, 328, 370; 
"Que diras-tu ce soir," 306; "Quelqucs carica- 
turistes eU angers," 322-323; "Quel^ues carica- 
turistes francais," 323, 650, 691; "La Rancpn," 
326; "Recueillement," 354, 375; "ReEexions 
sur ^ueli|ues-uns des mes contemporains," 261; 
"Remords posthume," 355; "Le Reniement de 
Saint Pierre," 274; "Le Reve d'un curieux," 
296; "Reve parisien," 264, 267, 276, 326, 355, 
383, 427; "Reversibilite," 317; "Revolte" cycle, 
325, 327, 329; "Salon de 1845," 301, 315, 317, 
318, 375, 560; "Salon de 1846," 248, 261, 269, 
285, 294, 296, 299, 322, 360,375, 560; "Salon 



Baudelaire, Charles (continued) 
de 1859," 231, 287, 290, 299, 342, 384, 536, 
560; "Salon de 1846: De I'Hcroi'sme de la vie 
raoderne," 298, 299, 360; "Salon de 1846: De 
M. Horace Vemet," 301; "Salon de 1859: Le 
Public moderne et la photographie," 691-692; 
"Semper eadem," 266, 327; "Les Sept Vieil- 
lards," 21, 22, 328, 362, 364, 374-375, 386, 
755, 1004; "Sepulture," 267; "Le Serpent qui 
danse," 969; "La Sei-vante au grand coeur," 
296, 336, 354; "Le Soleil," 239, 266, 333, 356; 
"Sonnet d'automne," 288, 326,328, 357; 
"Spleen et ideal," 10, 239, 325, 34 6, 351; 
"Spleen I," 336, 351; "Spleen II," 341, 354 , 
806; "Spleen IV," 317, 352; "Le Sauelettela- 
boureur," 326, 352; "Sur Le Tassc en prison 
d'Eugene Delacroix," 326, 328; "Tableaux 
parisiens," 275, 316, 332-333, 356, 381, 452; 
"Til mettrais l'univers," 354; Vers latins, 261, 
262, 263; "Vers pourle portrait de M. Honore 
Daumier," 352; Vers retrouves, 297; "La Vie an- 
terieure," 309; "Le Vin de I'assassin," 240, 350, 
354; "Le Viii des amants," 350; "Le Vm des 
chiffonniers," 333, 349, 350, 359-360, 371; 
"Du Vm et du haschisch," 349-350; Vmgt-Sept 
Poemcs des Flews du ma!., 296; "Les Vocations," 
262, 294; "La Voix," 270, 289, 352, 806; "Le 
Voyage," 22, 267, 270, 307, 319, 327, 331, 587, 
896; "Un Voyage a Cythere," 319, 328, 377- 
378; "Les Yeux de Berthe," 267 

Bazar, Der, 863 

Bazard, Saint- Amand, 592, 593, 597 

Beardsley, Aubrey, 556 

Beaumont, Charles, 808 

Beaurepaire, Edmond, 32, 109, 433 

Beethoven, Ludwig van, 236, 454 

Begitin, Albert, 264, 265, 292, 775-776 

Behne, Adolf, 172, 212, 215, 407 

Bclgrand, Eugene, 674 

Bellamy, Edward, 342 

Bellange (Francoisjoseph Belanger), 154 

Bellanger, Abbe, 230 

Bellersjohn,508 

Bendajulien, 472, 544, 846 

Benn, Gottfried, 402, 472 

Benoist, Charles, 54, 196, 595, 611-612, 633, 

721, 722, 723, 760, 762, 807 
Benoit-Levy, Edmond, 757 
Benzenbergjohami Friedrich, 90, 108, 497, 532, 

694 

Berauger, Pierre, 161, 178, 329, 723, 754, 766, 814 

Beraoud, Henri, 804 

Berardi, Leon, 232 

Beraud, F. F. A., 43, 499-502 

Berg, Alban, 268,961 

Bergler, Edmund, 510-511 

Bergson, Henri, 205-206, 841 

Berl, Emmanuel, 395, 493, 698, 862 



Berliner Courier, 527 

Berlioz, Hector, 170, 804 

Bernard, Claude, 287-288 

Beniardin de Saint-Pierre,Jac«,ues, 637 

Bemheim, Ernst, 479-480 

Bemouard, Francois, 901 

Bernstein, Eduard, 705, 793 

Berry, Charles Ferdinand, 531, 878 

Berryer, Pierre-Antoine, 727, 899 

Bertautjules, 761, 808 

Berthet, Elie, 55 

Bertrand, Louis, 399 

Besancourt, Albert de, 766, 767 

Besson, George, 687 

Bianchon, Horace, 83 

Bierce, Ambrose, 393, 859, 983 

Billy, Andre, 267 

Birotteau, Cesar, 83, 555 

Bisson, Louis-Auguste, 678, 687 

Blanc, Charles, 74, 209 

Blanc, Francois, 591 

Blanc, Louis, 600, 637, 705, 723, 728, 729, 789 
Blanche, Jaci(ues-Emile, 216 
Blanaui, Adolphe, 539 

Blamiui, Louis-Auguste, 79, 98, 118, 255, 293, 
295, 296, 317, 332, 353, 368, 385, 557, 616, 

734, 770; cosmic speculation, 15, 25-26, 112- 
115, 199, 201, 329, 331, 341, 352, 939; natural 
science and, 116, 271, 362, 472; on Paris, 144, 
145, 380; revolutionary activities and followers, 
21, 58, 142,339, 357-358, 470, 616, 617, 618, 
649,667, 71 1 , 722, 792, 793, 794,823, 996-997, 
1003; social criticism, 735-736, 738-739; trial 
and imprisonment, 1 1 1 , 1 12, 381-382, 387, 

735, 814, 939, 997 

Bloch, Ernst, 393, 409, 463, 861, 863, 883, 936 

Blochjean-Richard, 374, 389, 480, 907 

Blondcl, Jacques-Franc, ois, 823-824 

Bludier, Gebhard, 490, 852 

Boehn, Max vou, 103, 120, 151, 206, 849 

Boetticher, Karl Heinrich von, 4, 15 

Bokemc, Le (newspaper), 583-584, 777 

Bohle, Franz, 11, 24, 120 

Bohme, Margarete, 559 

Boileau, Nicolas, 258, 267, 305 

Boissel, Francois, 136 

Boissiere, Charles, 111 

Boissy-dAnglas, Fraucois de, 589 

Bonald, Louis, 668, 748 

Banjean, Louis Bernard, 736 

Bonnard, Abel, 729, 731, 743, 769, 774 

Bomiier, Charles, 624 

Bannieres, Robert de, 294 

Bon-Sens, Le, 761 

Banvin, Francois, 764 

Borchardt, Rudolf, 458, 857 

Bordeaux, Henry, 397 

Borel, Petrus, 260, 276, 772, 1005 



Borme, Daniel, 617-618 

B»rae, Ludwig, 60, 61, 81, 514, 525, 709 

Borastedt, Adalbert von, 614-615 

Bosch, Hieronymus, 354 

Bossuet,Jact)ues, 748 

Boucher, Francois, 163 

Bouchot, Henri, 56, 57, 141, 196, 786, 787, 810- 
811 

Bougie, Celestin, 525, 600 
Boulenger,Jaci|ues, 768 
Boullee, Etienne-Louis, 823 
Bounoure, Gabriel, 268, 269, 445 
Bourdin, Gustave, 274, 278, 279, 575 
Bourget, Paul, 90, 254-255, 256, 363, 746, 760, 
777 

Bourlier, Louis, 502-503 
Boyer, Adolphe, 721, 724 
Boyer, Philoxcne, 283 
Bracnuemond, Felix, 257, 275, 285 
Bradacz, Michel, 583 
Brame, M.J., 400 
Brandenburg, F. von, 175 
Brandes, Georg, 794 
Brazier, Nicolas, 489 

Brecht, Bertolt, 72, 347, 354, 362, 375,446, 511, 
687 

Breton, Andre, 69, 82, 125, 408, 459, 468, 529, 

549, 745-746, 883, 933 
Bretonjules, 222 
Bridau, Philippe, 758 
Brieger-Wasservogel, Lotliar, 1010 
Brod, Max, 124,527, 528 
Brun, Charles, 595, 757, 758 
Brunetjean, 154, 518, 840 
Brunei, R, 778 

Brunctiere, Ferdinand, 249-250, 252, 253, 278, 

279, 306,363 
Brunot, Ferdinand, 110, 199-200, 536 
Bucher, Lothar, 184 
Buchez, Philippe, 575, 613 
Biichner, Georg, 591, 628, 633 
Budzislawski, Hermann, 145 
Bugeaud de la Piconnerie, Th»iiias, 718, 1002 
Bulwer-Lytton, E. G, 440 
Buonarroti, Filippo, 619 
Buret, Eugene, 578, 627, 673, 705-706, 707, 709, 

730,818 
Burgyjulcs, 738, 739 
Bume-Jones, Edward, 261 
Byron, George Gordon, Lord, 236 

Cabanes, Augustin, 260 

Cabet, Etienne, 54, 71, 380, 604, 623, 715, 716, 

728, 730, 734, 738, 904, 906, 996, 1012 
Cagliostro, Count Allesandro di, 814 
Caillois, Roger, 79, 97-98, 110,142, 199, 399, 

415, 439, 469, 5 5 5,615, 696, 774, 798 
Californie, La, 715 



Calippe, Charles, 760, 762, 784 

Calonne, Alphonse dc, 308, 383 

Calonne, Charles, 573 

Calvin.John, 468-469, 803 

Campanella, Timmaso, 342 

Candolle, A. P, 712 

Capus, Alfred, 312, 513, 556, 994 

Carbonari (Charbonnerie) movement, 603, 609, 

614,615,616 
Carcel, B.-G, 568, 837 
Cardanus, Girolamo, 695 
Cardoville, Madame de, 633 
Caricature, La, 740, 741 
Caricaturiste , Lc, 508 
Carjat, Etienne, 99, 747 
Came, L. de, 139 
Carnot, Lazare, 820 
Carrel, Nicolas Armand, 609, 761 
Cams, Carl Gustav, 103, 830, 1009 
Cassagnac,Granierde, 327 
Cassoujean, 119, 147, 381-382, 553, 738, 777, 

787, 791, 793 
Castan/Castan's panopticon, 409-410, 541 
Castcllane, Victor Boniface, 751 
Castille, Hippolyte, 280, 440 
Castinelli, R., 233 
Caubert, Louis- Antoinejustin, 260 
Cauchy, Augustin-Louis, 632 
Caume, Pierre, 373 
Caussidiere, Marc, 566, 617 
Cavaignac, Louis, 279, 613, 730, 748, 749, 899, 

1003 

Cazottejacnues, 247, 265, 291 

Celine, Louis-Ferdinand, 300, 402, 472 

Cerclet, A., 575 

Ccrfberr, Anatole, 448, 777 

Chabrillat (director of the Ambigu theater), 408 

Cham (Amedee de Noe), 109 

Champfleury (Jules Husson), 253, 258, 273, 280, 

281, 283, 285, 585, 764, 768, 773 
Champgrand, Sophie de, 996 
Champion, Edme, 713, 721 
Chaptaljean-Antoine-Claude, 7, 17-18, 51, 180, 

181, 614, 728, 768 
Chapuis, Alfred, 420 
Charavay, Etienne, 296 
Chardin, Jean-Bapfiste-Simeon ,688 
Charles X, 45, 48, 581, 582, 593,603,610,614, 

747, 774, 807, 851, 997 
Charlet, Nicolas, 141, 787 
Charpentier, Johu ,308 
Charras.Jean, 711 
Chartier, Emile-Auguste. See Alain 
Chaslcs, Philarete, 763 
Chassin, Charles-Louis, 713-714, 721 
Chateaubriand, Francois Rene, 103, 404, 533, 

745, 806, 807 
Chatel, Ferdinand-Francois, abbe, 591-592 



Chatelain, U.-V, 250 

Chaudes-Aiguesjacques-Geraiain, 768-769 
Chaux. SeeLedoux, Claude-Nicolas 
Chenier, Andre, 321, 358, 374, 590 
Chenier, Mariejoseph, 1006 
Chennevieres, Philippe de, 276 
Chenoujoseph-Charles, 188 
Cheretjules, 62, 838, 882 
Cheronnet, Louis, 97, 169 
Chesterton, G. K„ 57, 233-234, 437-438, 535, 
770, 774 

Chevalier, Michel, 7, 18, 163, 181, 186, 191, 196, 
198, 581, 582, 583, 587, 588, 592, 593, 594, 
596,598,763,791 

Chevreul, Michel Eugene, 686 

Chezelles, Perrot de, 767 

Chintreuil, Antoine, 764 

Chirico, Giorgio de, 103, 830, 843, 898 

Chodruc-Duclos, Emile, 45, 48, 109, 434, 498 

Chretien, Gilles Louis, 676 

Christophejules, 448, 777 

Chromque de Paris, 754 

Chrysostomjohn, 293, 402 

Cladeljudith, 261-262, 280, 283 

Cladel, Leon, 618 

Claes, Balthazar, 210 

Clairville, Louis F., 192, 671, 673, 679, 680, 844 
Claretie, Jules, 121, 204, 295, 408, 422, 442, 528, 
831 

Claretie, Leo, 92, 109, 412 
Claudel, Paul, 288, 324 
Claudin, Gustave, 422 
Claudiojanet, M., 189 
Clavaud, Armand, 850 

Clouzot, H., 41, 52, 53, 54, 109, 433, 535, 563, 
760 

Cochut, Andre, 135 
Cocteaujean, 692, 843 
Coleridge, Samuel Taylor, 968, 973 
Collins, Wilkie, 172, 876 
Colmance, Charles, 715 
Colusont, Achillede, 191 

Come'dic humaine, La, 52. See also Balzac, Honore 
de 

Commission of Artists, 107 

Commune of Paris, 12-13, 15, 24, 25, 98, 116, 
143, 548, 618, 745, 766, 788, 789, 790-791, 
792, 793, 794-795, 819, 897, 937, 1006, 1007 

Comminute, Le, 623 

Comte, Auguste, 479, 590, 654 

Comte de Saint-Leu, 878 

Conde, Louis Henri Joseph, 531, 878 

Condorcet, marquis de, 312, 590, 814 

Congress of Tours, 698 

Conrad.Joseph, 227 

Considcrant, Victor, 635-636, 732, 736, 738, 775 
Constant, Benjamin, 255 
Constiiutiomiel, Le, 574, 579, 584, 585, 590, 609, 
689, 757, 759, 760, 761, 770 



Cooperjames Fenimore, 438, 439, 441, 442, 447, 
762 

Copernicus, 388-389, 838, 883, 884, 941, 942 

Coppee, Francois, 178 

Corbon, Anthime, 192, 712, 723 

Cordier, Henri, 242 

Cordierjules, 192, 679 

Corneille, Pierre, 103, 599, 616, 617 

Corti, Egon Caesar Conte, 503, 504, 591 

Courbet, Gustave, 13, 25, 239-240, 333, 413, 

585, 764, 790, 791, 792, 795, 817, 1006 
Courier, Paul, 741 
Cournot, Antoine, 654 
Courrier de Paris, Le, 770 
Courrier francais, Le, 577, 579 
Cousin, Victor, 634, 770 
Coustou, Nicolas, 527 
Couturier de Vienne, F. A., 401 
Cramer, C. F.,517 
Crane, Walter, 675 

Crepet, Eugene, 234, 254, 265, 272, 276, 280, 

283, 284, 286, 289, 293, 310, 353, 377, 383, 384 
Crepetjactjues, 230, 263, 280, 286, 289, 308, 982 
Crevel, Rene, 837 
Crozat, Emile, 714 
Crozej.-L., 52, 535 
Cuisin, P., 535 

Curiosites revolutionnaires: Joumaitx rouges, Les, 
587, 711 

Curtius, Ernst Robert, 224-225, 436, 519, 527, 

535, 599, 614, 637, 764, 768, 814 
Cuvier, Georges, 758 
Cuvillier, Annand, 58, 733-734 
Czyllak, Anna, 204, 877, 924 

Dacque, Edgar, 861 

Daguerre, Louis Jacques, 6,221, 527, 530, 531, 
532, 533, 534, 535, 674, 675, 680, 687-688, 
690, 691, 773-774, 848, 849, 914, 993 

Dalt, Salvador, 547 

D'Almeras, H., 419 

Dancel, Jean-Francois, 428 

Dante Alighieri, 233, 234, 247, 267, 271, 275, 289, 
295,305, 324, 363, 382, 662, 972 

Dantrague, Gabriel, 240 

Dartois brothers, 673, 845 

Datz, P., 689 

Daubrun, Marie, 245, 273, 280, 288 
Daudet, Alphonse, 740, 856 
Daudet,Leon,91, 100, 245, 265, 266, 269-270, 

755, 775, 862 
Daumier, Honore, 67, 136, 161-162, 223, 322, 

323, 382, 433, 682, 687, 717, 740-743, 809, 810, 

846,978, 1004 
David, Felicien-Cesar, 204, 399, 592, 600, 787, 835 
Davidjacques-Louis, 5, 530, 838 
De Berry, duchesse, 48 
Deburau, Baptiste, 108, 111 
Decamps, Alexandre Gabriel, 301 



Degas, Edgar, 688 

D'Eichthal, Gustave, 397-398 

Delacroix, Eugene, 239, 277, 279, 299, 301, 318, 

554, 678, 759 
Delaroche, Paul, 678 
Dclatouche, Hyacinthe, 288 
Delatour, A.-G, 680 
Delescluze, Louis Charles, 790, 792 
Dclord, Taxile, 92, 753, 782-783 
Dclvau, Alfred, 45, 84, 177, 179, 191, 240, 429, 

431-432, 435, 496, 509, 521, 523, 543, 551, 

585, 632, 635, 678, 681, 711, 713-714, 761, 

764, 765-766, 991, 1004 
Dc Maistrejoseph, 242, 277, 287, 303, 343-345, 

353,363,368,377,668 
Demar, Claire, 595-596, 809-810, 811, 814 
Dc Maupassant, Guy, 570 
Demeny, Georges, 686 

Democratic pacifique, La, 280, 624, 633, 637, 763 
Democrilus, 674 

Demy, Adolphe, 187, 189-190, 780 

Derurer, Balthasar, 553 

Dennery, Adolphe, 673, 844 

Dc Quincy, Thomas, 436 

Desbordes-Wmore, Marcelme, 442 

Descartes, Rene, 368, 599, 642 

Descaux, Georges, 297, 303 

Deschancl, Emile, 275 

Desessarts, Perm, 595-596 

Desjardins, Paul, 305 

Desnoyers, Fernand, 272, 284, 445 

DcStael, Madame, 321, 601 

Destree,Jules, 363 

Deubel, Leon, 9, 19, 203 

Deveria, Eugene, 811 

Devigne, Roger, 618, 787 

Devrient, Eduard, 42, 424-425, 531, 566 

Dickens, Charles, 57, 208, 233-234, 426, 436, 

437-438, 532, 535, 770, 774 
Diderot, Denis, 247, 265, 305, 431 
Diederich, Franz, 161, 576, 628 
Dilthey, Wilhelm, 803 
Dingelstedt, Franz, 693 
Disderi, Adolphe-Eugene, 677, 678, 680-681 
Disney, Walt, 72 

Dommanget, Maurice, 385, 387, 739 

Doncourt, A. S. See Drohojowska, Antoinette 

Dore, Gustave, 674, 787 

Dostoevsky, Fyodor, 258, 287, 878 

Dovifat, Emil, 803 

Dra pcau blanc, Lc, 579, 770 

Drohojowska, Antoinette, 162, 187, 188, 189, 568 

Drouet,Juliette, 775 

Dramont, Edonard, 195, 434, 595, 740, 759, 760 

Du Bartas, Guillaume, 563 

Dubech, Lucien, 41, 42, 89, 107, 129, 131-133, 
158,161, 179, 180,410, 424, 494, 520, 548, 
565, 572-573, 574, 603, 604, 673, 699, 700, 
796. 799 



Du Camp, Maxime, 12, 14,23,66,86, 90, 122- 
123, 141, 143, 153, 213, 260, 430, 469, 511- 
512, 517, 543, 563-564, 594, 601, 602, 679, 
748, 753, 757,815 

Ducaiige, Victor, 1006 

Ducos de Gondrin, M.J., 52, 503, 506 

Dufourjoseph, 536 

Dujardin, Edouard, 553 

Dulamon, Frederic, 234 

Dulaurejactjues A., 32, 33, 151, 469, 562, 798 

Dumas, Alexandre (Dumas fi ls), 759 

Dumas, Alexandre (Dumas perc), 38, 95, 98, 138, 
327, 439-440, 510, 523,585,616, 744, 749, 
750-753, 757, 759, 760, 770-771, 789, 811 

Dumesnil, Alexis, 432 

Dupassage, Adrien, 401 

Dupont, Pierre, 24, 120, 230, 237, 267 271, 276, 
281,316, 334, 347, 397, 710, 732, 745, 746, 755, 
761, 766, 967 

Duf|uesnay,Jean, 152 

Durer, Albrecht, 238, 466 

Dumeu, Xavier, 577 

Durry, Mariejeanne, 743 

Dusolier, Alcidc, 267, 304-305 

Duvaljeanne, 245, 252, 259, 263, 282, 292, 295 

Duveyrier, Charles, 397, 401, 597, 673, 845 

Ebeling, Adolf, 175 

Echo du Sacramento, 715 

Ecole des Beaux-Arts, 4, 16, 155, 915 

Ecole Nonnale, 820 

Ecole Polytechnique, 4, 16, 502, 577, 581, 588, 
589, 609-610, 701, 711-712, 780, 818-824, 
863, 915, 937, 963, 996, 1002 

Edison, Thomas, 686 

Eiffel, Alexandre-Gustave, 886, 887 

Enault, Louis, 95, 166 

EnJantin, Barthelemy-Prosper, 7, 18, 181, 398, 
572, 573, 582, 589, 591, 592, 593, 595, 596, 
597, 600,601, 602, 780, 783, 784, 905, 996 

Engelinami, Gabriel, 196 

Engels, Friedrich, 12, 15, 23, 44, 106, 108, 116, 
123, 141, 145, 220, 343, 349, 351, 352, 353, 
355, 356, 357, 432, 465, 466, 468-469, 472, 
475, 484, 507, 576, 600, 607, 615, 625, 632, 664, 
667, 705, 727, 729, 731, 895; on class society, 
792; on Commune of Paris, 793; Communist 
creed, 728; economic theory, 902; on Fourier, 
637, 638, 646, 906, 915; on June Insurrection, 
730; on labor, 106; on Napoleon, 779; on Paris, 
728, 797; physiognomies of the crowd, 10, 428; 
social criticism, 816 

Englander, Sigmund, 71, 89, 135, 177, 180,521, 
566, 573, 574, 604-605, 621, 622, 623, 701, 
702, 703 

Ennery, Adolphe d r , 43, 4 28 

Epoquc, L', 763 

Erdan, Alexandre, 816, 817 

Erler, Fritz, 375 



Escholier, Raymond, 225, 429, 442, 773, 775 

Esmenard,Joseph-Alphonse, 758 

Espezel, Pierre d', 41, 42, 89, 107, 129, 131-133, 
158,161, 179, 180,410,424,494,520,548, 
565, 572-573, 574, 603, 604, 673, 699, 700, 
796, 799 

Eloile, L', 770 

Etzel, Karl von, 853 

Eugenie, Empress of France, 284, 408 

Euler, Leonhard, 821 

Evaicmcnt, L\ 770, 775 

Fabienjacques, 66, 136, 410, 567, 836 

Faguet,Emile, 274, 278, 306, 307, 364 

Falkejacob, 151-152, 216 

Fanfemotjulie, 597 

Fargue, Leon-Paul, 57 

Favras, marquis de, 564, 836 

February Revolution, 12, 23, 55, 123, 177, 230, 

566, 574, 592, 604, 605, 608, 699, 701, 703, 

708, 711, 712, 713, 724-725, 728, 729, 731, 

736, 744, 767, 781, 817, 967, 995 
Faix, Elisa (Rachel), 837 
Ferrarijoseph, 629, 630, 631 
Ferry, Gabriel, 771 
Ferryjules, 125, 130-131, 133,863 
Feuerbach, Ludwig, 485, 576, 667, 903 
Feuilleton dcs joumaux politique*, Le, 754, 756 
Feval, Paul, 441, 771 
Fichtejohann Gottlieb, 469, 725, 779 
Hdus (Hugo Hoppener), 353, 557 
Keschi, Giuseppe, 192,964 
Figaro, Le, 141, 274, 278, 279, 280, 288, 297, 310, 

591, 766, 972, 1004 
Figuier, Guillaume Louis, 677, 684-685 
Fineliere, A. de la, 297, 303 
Fischer, Hugo, 210, 468, 653-655 
Fittko, Lisa, 946 
Flachat, Eugene, 153, 154 
Flambart, Paul, 305 
Flaneur, Le, 448 

Flaubert, Gustave, 237, 251, 274, 287, 354, 394-, 
448, 449, 481, 713, 741-743, 768, 806, 904, 908 

Fleury, Elise, 716 

Flocon, Ferdinand, 728, 729 

Flotte, Etienne-Gaston, baron de, 277, 293, 586 

Flourens, Pierre, 790 

Focillon, Henri, 80, 487-488, 945 

Fontaine, P. F. L., 91 

Fontanes, Louis de, 821 

Ford, Henry, 904 

Formigejean Camille, 180 

Foucaud, Edouard, 46, 75, 163, 222, 350, 411, 
711,819 

Fougere, Henry, 186, 187; 710, 818 

Fouquet, Friedrich deLaMotte, 352 

Fourcroy, Antoine, 412, 674, 821 

Fourier, Charles, 8, 20, 57, 78, 141, 142, 182, 198- 



199,241, 277, 298, 343, 350, 380, 511, 576, 
582, 591, 631, 633, 649, 695, 732-734, 736, 
743, 770, 777, 784-785, 903, 905, 916, 937; as- 
trological speculation (theory of planets), 621- 
622, 623-624,628, 630-632, 634, 636-637, 
638-639, 639-640, 643, 904; on bourgeoisie 
and class struggle, 626, 627, 667; economic 
analysis, 620, 625, 627-628; futurist philoso- 
phy, 621-622; conception of Harmony, 16, 44, 
78, 634, 638-643, 645-648, 649; hierarchy of 
children, 45, 640-641, 643-644; industrial- 
passion theory, 624, 629; number mysticism, 
16, 629-630, 638; Saint-Simonianism and, 635, 
650; socialist ideal, 624, 626; on street galleries 
and arcades, 5, 16-17, 42, 44, 629, 647, 910, 
914, 915; Utopian community (Phalanx, phalan- 
stery), 5, 16-17, 44-45, 58, 342, 361, 572, 620, 
622, 624, 625, 626, 629-631, 630, 633, 637, 
638, 639, 642, 643, 645, 648, 650, 894, 901, 
906, 912; on women and feminism, 620-621, 
632,814 

Fournel, Victor, 51, 108, 146, 147,223,400-401, 

402, 429, 431, 523, 680-681 
Fournier, Edouard, 56, 140, 414, 434, 525, 568- 

569, 685, 741, 798 
Fournier, Marc, 32 
Fraenkel, Fritz, 947 
Fraisse, Armand, 275, 322 
France, Anatole, 259, 499, 512, 543,545, 741, 

841, 846, 866,983 
Francesco, Grete de, 655 
Frank, Philipp, 484 
Frankfurter ^pitting, 557 
Franklin, Benjamin, 582, 995 
Franz, Rodolf, 625 

Fregier, Honore-Antoine, 382, 468, 703-704, 713, 
738 

Freud, Sigmund, 402-403, 510, 511, 540, 908 
Freund, Cajetan, 297 

Freund, Gisela/Gisele, 46, 131, 222, 552, 553, 
585, 673, 675, 676-678, 687, 774, 780, 888,889 

Friedell, Egon, 70-71, 75, 163, 428,565, 585, 587, 
682, 756 

Friedmann, Georges, 110, 436, 654 

Friedrich Wilhelm III, 206 

Fuchs, Eduard, 76, 77-78, 81, 50?; 613, 723, 740, 

741, 784, 787, 809 
Fuller, Francis, 162 
Fuller, Loie, 551 

Fulton, Robert, 535,536, 631, 992 
Fumet, Stanislas, 303 

Fustel de Coulanges, Numa Benis, 472, 475 

Gaillard, Napoleon, 143 

Galerie de l'Horloge, 48 

Galeriedes Machines, 160, 161, 180, 198 

Galerie d'Orleans, 39, 42 

Galerie du Baronietre, 48 



Galeries de Bois, 39 

Galigmni, Le, 591 

Galimard, Auguste, 685 

Gall, Ferdinand von, 41, 106-107, 419, 493 

Gallimard,Paul, 295 

Gambetta, Leon, 899 

Ganeau (Ganneau), 725-726, 807-808, 996 

Gamier, Charles, 410, 787 

Gastineau, Benjamin, 107, 587-588, 766 

Gaubert, Ernest, 265 

Gaudi, Antonio, 993 

Gautier, Feli, 295 

Gautierjudith, 269, 294 

Gautier, Iheophile, 91, 93, 95, 138, 189, 224, 
241, 242, 244, 250, 253, 254, 273, 278, 288, 
294, 303, 340, 434-435, 524, 585,614, 674, 
689-690, 748, 763-764, 773, 886; Baudelaire 
and, 234, 248, 249, 260, 274, 279, 281-282, 
304, 308, 334; on Hugo, 774-775, 778 

Gavami, Paul, 323, 372, 416, 509, 723, 740, 741, 
978 

Gayjules, 623 

Gay, Sophie, 217 

Gay-Lussac,Joseph, 571 

Gazette de France, La, 275, 579, 770 

GelTroy, Gustave, 58, 96, 97, 98, 112-113, 142, 

231, 232, 238, 289,414, 434, 470, 616,617, 

734, 735, 774, 787, 795, 814 
Geismar, Eduard, 421 
Gelis, Edouard, 420 
Genty, Alcide, 715 

Geoffroy Saint-Hilaire, Etienne, 310, 758, 762 

George, Stefan, 268, 300, 346, 556 

Gerard, Gregoire, 822 

German Alliance for Workers, 141 

Gerstacker, Friedrich, 221, 412, 540 

Gervex, Henri, 536 

Gervinus, Georg G., 469 

Gide, Andre, 106, 253-254, 258, 306-307, 307 

Gide, Charles, 636-637 

Giedion, Siglried, 40, 153-156, 175-176, 214, 

390, 391, 406, 407; 423-424, 455, 458, 459, 

858 

Giotto di Bondone, 383 

Girardin, Emile de, 6, 182, 188, 572, 573, 593, 

595, 768, 903, 1004 
Girardin, Madame de (Delphine Gay), 190, 419, 

715-716, 773-774 
Gis^uet, prefect of Paris police, 718, 721 
Globe, Le, 7, 18, 181, 319-320, 323, 573, 576, 579, 

580, 594, 602, 763, 770 
Godinjean, 625, 904 

Gocthcjohann Wolfgang von, 102, 216, 269, 
270, 357, 413, 440, 459, 462, 472, 474, 806, 856- 
857, 864, 932, 940, 960,961, 1008 

Gogol, Nikolai, 198, 450 

Goltzius, Henri, 276 

Goncourt, Edmond dc, 206, 291, 545 



Goncourtjules dc, 206, 291, 545 
Gordon, A., 156,860 
Gottschall, Rudolf von, 178, 672 
Goudall, Louis, 272, 280, 310 
Gouin, Edouard, 109, 807 
Goujon,Julien, 612 
Gourdon, Edouard, 495, 496, 512 
Gourdon de Genouillac, H, 43, 350, 425, 426, 
704, 705 

Gourmont, Remy de, 206, 243, 258, 269, 442- 
443, 447, 543, 545 

Gozlan, Leon, 137, 275, 428,525, 798 

Grabbe, Christian Dietrich, 806 

Gracian, Baltasar, 514 

Grand-Carteretjolm, 38, 64, 103, 213 

Grand ville (Jean-Ignace-Isidore Gerard), 7, 18- 
19, 64,68, 151, 153, 182, 367, 396, 422, 627, 
650, 846, 914; antlu'opomorphisms of, 193, 
195, 198; on fashion, 71, 200-201, 853; surreal- 
ism, symbolism, and fantasy in the works of, 
72, 193-194, 853, 885, 894; on works as adver- 
tisement, 172, 175, 186,853, 906, 916 

Granierde Cassagnac, Adolphe, 353, 711 

Granveau, Antoine, 137, 587 

Grappin, Henri, 376, 449 

Greenaway, Kate, 82, 838, 839, 960 

Grillct, Claudius, 226, 291, 292 

Grillet, P., 108, 186, 579, 608, 609, 675,702, 708, 
744, 745, 780, 790 

Grillparzcr, Franz, 470, 475 

Grober, Karl, 693, 842 

Gronow, Captain Rees Howell, 490, 991 

Grossmann, Heniyk, 651 

Griin, Karl, 5, 17, 507, 576, 626, 728 

Gmnd, Helen, 72-73, 80, 960 

Guaita, Stanislas, 292 

Gudin, Theodore, 758 

Guerin, Alexandre, 584 

Guluauer, G. E., 451 

Guilbert, Tfoettc, 173 

Guillemain, Leon, 711 

Guillemot, Gabiiel, 430, 585, 753 

Guillot, Adolphe, 516 

Guizot, Francois, 8, 141, 524, 599, 699, 728, 732, 

738, 770, 7*79-780, 816, 900 
Gurland, Hermy, 946, 947, 94 9 
Gurlandjose, 949, 950 
Guterman, Norbert, 210, 765 
Gutzkow, Karl, 13, 64, 66, 103, 121, 151, 214, 

215, 217, 388, 422,537, 562,571, 633, 694,837, 

913 

Guys, Constantm, 110-111, 238-240, 276, 314, 
368, 509, 511, 559, 688, 761, 972, 1001 

Hacklander, Friedrich Wilhehn, 693, 853, 881 
Haievy, Daniel, 444, 509, 525, 556, 575, 603, 736 
Haievy, Leon, 575, 594 
Haievy, Ludovic, 675, 964 



Hallays-Dabot, Victor, 695, 706, 789 
Hamp, Pierre, 437, 732, 769 
Hardekopf, Ferdinand, 104, 830 
Harmel, Maurice, 624 
Hase, Carl Benedict, 490 
Hauranne, Duvergier dc, 323 
Hauser, Kaspar, 844, 878 
Hauser, Henri, 181 

Haussmann, Georges Eugene, Baron, 11-15, 23- 
25, 89, 91, 120-122, 125-127, 130, 132, 133, 
138, 141, 142, 143. 144-149, 161, 245, 400, 
524, 699, 790, 793, 796, 798, 877, 897, 901, 903- 
905, 913, 914, 937 

Haussmann, Madame, 132 

Haussoullier, William, 300 

Hawthorne, Nathaniel, 234 , 281 

Hcbeljohann Peter, 101, 118 

Hebertjacques, 618 

Hegel, G. W. E. 13, 17,347, 451-452, 469, 483, 
485, 546, 576, 624, 638, 653, 667, 668, 725, 
733, 779, 815, 839, 867, 898, 912, 917, 935, 937, 
945 

Heidegger, Martin, 462, 472, 545, 857, 983, 990 
Heine, Heinrich, 51, 235, 243, 288, 298, 331, 
451, 597, 600, 602, 611, 616, 626, 724-725 
Heine, Thomas, 551 
Hello, Ernest, 292, 383-384 
Helmersen, Joachim von, 219 
Hennebique, Francois, 559 
Hennings, Emmy, 104, 830 
Henri IV, 970 
Henriot, G, 41, 433, 563 
Herault de Sechelles, Marie Jean, 674 
Heritier, Louis, 578 
Herschel, Sir John, 630, 632, 998 
Hersent, Guerinon, 121 
Herwegh, Georg, 724 
Hess, Moses, 615 

Hessel, Franz, 87, 213, 492, 871, 919, 922, 930, 

960, 1011, 1013 
Heym, Georg, 316, 317, 356-357 
Hiep, Nguyen Trong, 3 
Hirsch, Charles-Henry, 293 
Hirschmann, Albert, 952 
Hitler, Adolf, 944 
Hittorfl'Jacques, 154,527 
Hobbes, Thomas, 250 
Hoddisjakob van, 101 

Hoffmann, E. T. A., 272, 277, 425-426, 451, 866, 
970 

Hofmannslhal, Hugo v«u, 83, 416, 417, 547, 777, 

860, 880, 882 
Hogarth, William, 71, 238, 853 
Holbach, Paul-Henri Thiry, Baron. 573 
Holbein, Hans, 376 
Hdlderlin, Friedrich, 479 
Holitscher, Arthur, 257 
Honeggcr, T.J., 122 
Horace, 286. 762 



Horkheimer, Max, 386, 471, 803, 873, 930, 937, 
957, 1014 

Houssaye, Arsene, 95, 138, 196, 279, 399, 764, 
773 

Hugo, C, 136 

Hugo, Victor, 23, 101, 119, 225, 228, 234, 244, 
260, 261, 273, 293, 297, 303, 304, 306, 309, 
321, 338, 340, 370, 371, 536, 556, 695, 723, 

756, 773, 808, 894; allegory in the works of, 
272, 292, 302, 319-320; Baudelaire and, 261, 
278,283, 755, 756; Baudelaire on, 228, 235, 
236, 250, 264, 269, 270, 313, 333; charac- 
terizations, 679-770, 739, 767, 771; criticism of, 
712, 753-754, 756, 759, 774-776; on the crowd 
and the individual, 268, 269, 285-286, 292, 
333, 334, 754-755; drawings and poetry by, 

524, 753, 771; exile, 334; on monuments of 
Paris, 523; obituaries, 522, 746; Paris and, 91, 
411-412, 434, 442, 469,522; personality, 778; 
politics of, 370, 748, 749, 756, 765, 769-770, 
775, 899; on the press, 679; publishing income, 

757, 771; social criticism, 444-445, 745, 902. 
W«RKS: L'Annee terrible, 469, 482; L'Annee terri- 
ble: Les Pre'airseurs , 620; "Anniversaire de la 
revolution de 1848," 746; "Apotheoses," 372; 
"A lArc de Triomphc," 92, 93-95, 147; "La 
Caravaue," 292; "Ce ^u'on entend sur la mon- 
tague," 270; "Ce qui se passait aux Feuillanti- 
nes," 796; "Cerigo," 378; Ijs Chdtiments, 292, 
372; "Les Chutes: Fleuves et poetes," 302; Les 
Contemplations, 226, 378, 555, 775; "Desiii- 
teressement," 302; "L'Epopee du vet" 253; 
"Les Fantomes," 243, 270; La Fin de Satan, 99- 
100,472; Hemani, 775; "Un Homme aux yeux 
prof onds passait," 301; "Llntestiii de 
Leviathan," 412; La Legende des siecles, 301- 
302; Les Miserables, 90, 92,195,313, 411-412, 
415,416, 424,434, 444-445, 522, 525, 610, 
679, 718-719, 754, 757, 759, 763, 766-767, 769, 
797, 978; Mitre-Dame de Paris, 165, 776, 836; 
Oeuvres cliouies: Pocsie, 301; Oeuvres clioisies: 
Poesies et drames en vers, 294; Oeuvres completes, 
92, 93, 95, 165, 195, 286, 292,411-412,415, 

525, 719; Les Orientales, 243; Paris, 698; "La 
Pcnte de la reverie," 285-286; Rocambole, 754; 
LeRoi s amuse, 775; 'To the Peoples of Europe" 
manifesto, 8, 181; Les Travailleurs de la met; 
775; William Shakespeare, 749, 776 

Huizingajohan, 210, 376, 402, 481-482, 966 
Humboldt, Alexander von, 175 
Humboldt, Wilhelm von, 472 
Hunt, H.J., 650, 777, 778 
Huxley, Aldous, 402 
Huygens, Christian, 821 
Huysmansjoris-Karl, 292,426, 497, 695, 905 

Ibsen, Henrik. 9, 360, 551, 556, 794, 865, 961 
Illustration, L, 790 
Independant, L\ (Brussels), 504 



Ingres,Jean Auguste Dominique, 556, 677 
Intermediate des cherclieurs et curieux, L', 384 
International Association of Workers, 186-187 
International Workingmen's Association, 8, 182, 
196 

Isoard, Eric, 584 
Jacquin, Robert, 572 

Jaloux, Edraond, 287-288, 436, 470, 756, 764 

Janinjules, 86, 243, 275, 286, 904, 916 

Jansenius (Jansen), Cornelius, 306 

Janssen, Pierre, 686 

Jauresjean, 667, 780 

Jean Paul. See Richterjean Paul 

Jhering, Rudolph von, 75, 77 

Joclunann, Carl Gustav, 399, 469, 473, 477, 478, 

509, 600, 615, 689 
Joel, Charlotte, 216 
Johannet, Rene, 279 
Joubcrtjoseph, 482-483, 514, 800 
Jouffroy, marquis de, 573 
Jouhandeau, Marcel, 66, 426, 855 
Jourdain, Frantz, 548 
Journal amitsant, Le, 741, 766 
Journal de Park, Le, 770 

Journal des debats, Le, 13, 24, 254, 275, 579, 708- 
709, 746, 759, 760, 761, 763, 770, 784 

Journal des economises, Le, 577, 731 

Journal des enfant s, Le, 602 

Journal des Goncourt, 303 

Journal illustre, Le, 787 

Journal pour nre, Le, 741 

Journal pour tous, Le, 787 

Joumetjean, 293, 508-509, 634, 763, 812, 813 

Jousse, Marcel, 572 

Jouy, Victorjoseph, 1009 

Jugendstil, 9, 20, 172-173, 176, 186,221, 240, 
245, 345, 348, 360, 365,371, 374, 375, 392, 
475, 547-548, 549-551, 552-553, 556, 557- 
558, 559-560, 842, 843, 862, 865, 884, 887, 
903, 908,916 

Jullien, Louis, 536 

July Monarchy, 55, 179, 520, 572, 612, 709, 717, 
761 

July Ordinances, 807 

July Revolution, 7, 103, 138,475, 506, 534, 576, 

583, 596, 608, 609, 613, 616, 709, 713, 718, 

735, 737, 774, 797, 977, 1003, 1004 
June Insurrection, 135, 141, 177, 276, 337, 566, 

604, 607, 608, 702, 705, 729, 731, 734-735, 

744, 748, 749, 882, 903 
Jung, Carl Gustav, 393, 399-400, 440, 472, 476, 

906,916 
Juvenal, 251, 286, 432 

Kafka, Franz, 218, 306, 544,548, 842, 850,866 
Kalm, Gustave, 295 
KatnpfDer, 576 

Kant, Immanuel, 207, 343, 469, 646, 779, 857, 941 



Karr, Alphonse, 63, 223, 406, 538, 568, 763, 764, 

772, 847, 904 
Karski, Czeslaw, 681 
KarskiJ.,551 
Karyade, Edouard, 855 
Kautfman, Angelika, 838, 961 
Kaufmarm, Emil, 143, 600, 601, 650, 823, 824 
Kautsky, Karl, 580, 637 
Keller, Gottfried, 319, 342, 463, 633 
Kempner, Friedericke, 82, 838, 839, 960 
Kennel, Amedee, 406, 422 
Kierkegaard, Soren, 218, 219-220, 335, 340, 341, 

342, 421,461, 542, 548, 1014, 1015 
Kircher, Athanasius, 836 
Kistemaecker, Hans, 867 
Klages, Ludwig, 390, 941 
Klassen, Peter, 300, 301 
Koch, Richard, 413-414 
Kock,Paulde, 187,835 

Korsch, Karl, 483-485, 659, 661, 662, 663-666, 
667-668 

Kracauer, Siegfried: Jacques Offenbach und das 
Park seiner Zat, 110, 142, 438-439, 508, 510, 
536,600,732,743,770,965 

Kraus, Karl, 540-541, 645 

Kreisler.Johaiines, 970 

Krenek, Ernst, 268 

Kreyssig, Fiiedrich, 672 

Kroloff, Eduard, 32, 172, 178, 563 

Krull, Germaine, 22 

Kubin, Alfred, 419 

Kugelmann, Ludwig, 637 

Kurella, Alfred, 1012 

Labedolliere, Emilede, 89, 121, 122, 126,520, 
532, 533 

Labrouste, Pierre Francois Henri, 152, 168, 169 
La Bruyerejean de, 379, 495, 696 
Lacenaire, Pierre-Francois, 52, 703, 713 
Lachambeaudie, Pierre, 594 
Lacis, Asja, 1014 

Laclos, Pierre Choderlos de, 247, 265 
Lacordairejean, 274, 278, 769 
Lacostejean, 962 

Lacretellejacques de, 405, 453, 832, 849 
Lafargue, Paul, 12, 108, 497, 576, 577, 607, 625, 

667, 712, 781, 905 
Lafayette, Marie Joseph, marquis de, 131, 769, 

900, 997 
Lafittejacques, 731, 900 
Laforguejules, 243-244, 246, 247, 335, 378, 773 
Laforgue, Rene, 258-259 
LaGorce, Pierre de, 581, 582, 709, 781 
Lagrangejoseph, 820, 821 
LaHodde, Lucien de, 606-607, 611, 735 
Labrs, S. F, 408, 539 

Lamartine, Alphonse de, 108, 110, 117-118, 123, 
147, 228, 234, 273, 276, 278, 321, 340, 358-359, 
363,378,523, 578, 617, 723, 727, 735-736, 745, 



754, 757, 758, 764, 765, 767, 768, 769, 774, 776, 
777, 780, 820, 822, 899, 902, 904, 963 

Lamartine, Mrae. dc, 617 

Lamennais, Robert, 305, 711, 769 

La Mcttriejulien, 368 

Lami, Eugene, 786 

Lanf ranchi, Louis Rainier, 394 

Langle, Ferdinand, 6, 17, 171 

Langlois, Hyacinthc, 256, 275 

Laplace, Pierre, 637, 820, 821 

Lapointe, Savinien, 228-229, 716, 757 

Lapparent, Albert de, 167-168, 819 

Larbaud, Valery, 418 

Larchey, Etienne Loredan, 250 

La Rochejai(uelein, Henri Auguste, 736 

Laronze, Georges, 99, 128-129, 618, 795, 815 

Larousse, Pien-e, 53,109,451,453-454,766 

Lassave, Nina, 192 

Lasteyrie, Philippe de, 676 

Launay, vicomte de. Sec Girardin, Madame de 

Laurencejames de, 810, 811, 812-814 

Lautreamont, corate dc, 37, 71, 549, 847, 853 

Lavasseur, E., 122 

Lavedan, Henri, 176 

Laverdant, Gabriel-Desire, 140, 635, 778 

Lavisse, Ernest, 585 

Lavoisier, Antoine dc, 590 

Lawrence, D.H., 291 

Leautaud, Paul, 40, 124, 860 

Lebeau, Narcissc, 56, 57 

Leblond, Aiy, 847 

Leblond, Marius, 847 

Lebon, Philippe, 564, 573-574 

Le Breton, Andre, 441, 442, 447 

Lecomtejules, 223, 505 

Leconte de Lisle, Charles, 228, 236, 244, 263, 
288, 295,311,340, 624 

Le Corbusier, 125, 133, 215, 407, 419, 423, 459 

LeDantec, 280 

Ledoux, Claude-Nicolas (Chaux), 143, 600, 601, 

649-650, 823 
Ledru-Rollin, Alexandre, 613, 724, 729, 765, 899 
Lefebvre, Henri, 210, 765 
Lefeuve, Charles, 33, 84, 417 880, 904, 916 
Leger, Fernand, 136 
Leraaitre, Frederick, 1004 
Lemaitrejules, 254., 255-256, 328, 335 
Lemerjulien, 567 

Lemercier, Louis Jean Nepomucene, 221-222, 

532, 533, 534, 675, 678 
Leraonnier, Caraille, 249, 261, 273, 294 
Lemonnier, Leon, 303 
Lenin, Nikolai, 484 

Leonardo da Vinci, 254, 486, 553, 681, 822 
Leopardi, Giacomo, 8, 18, 62, 287, 486, 846, 894 
Lepage, Auguste, 140, 613, 724 
Lc Play, Frederic, 13, 24, 135, 184, 189, 198, 699, 
700, 726, 760 



Lerminier, Eugene, 621, 723, 724 

Leroux, Gaston, 1009 

Leroux, Pierre, 576, 593, 600, 626, 996 

Leroy, Maxime, 589-590, 651, 755 

Lesseps, Ferdinand dc, 572, 585 

Lessingjulius, 183, 184, 187-188, 552 

Levalloisjulcs, 241, 773 

Levasseur, Emile, 37, 123, 152, 212, 538 

Le Vavasseur, Gustave, 244, 276, 296 

Levy, Michel, 275, 280 

Lewald, August, 530 

Lexis, W., 581 

Ley-Deutsch, Maria, 771 

Leyris, Pierre, 354 

Liberateur, Le, 734 

Liebert, A., 138 

Liefde, Carl Lodewijk de, 228, 230, 506, 594, 

595, 715, 757, 783 
Lignieres.Jean de, 768 
Limayrac, Paulin, 221, 744-745 
Limousin, Charles-Mathieu, 621, 628-629 
Lindau, Paul, 694, 861 
Linfert, Carl, 167 
Linguet, Simon-Nicolas-Henri, 527 
Lion, Ferdinand, 435 
Lion, Margo, 173 
Lipps, Theodor, 80 
Lisbonnc, Maxime, 749 
Lissagaray, Prosper, 712 
Livrc da cent-et-un, Zf, 398 
Lobau, Georges, 711 

Lohenstein, Daniel Caspcrs von, 361-362 
Loizejcan, 675 
Longchamps, Charles dc, 694 
Loos, Adolf, 557 

Lotze, Hermann, 81,201, 373, 374, 478-479, 480- 
481 

Louandre, Charles, 431, 596, 610, 632, 722, 754, 
762, 791, 795, 808 

Louis, Paul, 726, 784 

Louis Napoleon. Sec Napoleon III 

Louis Philippe, 37, 38, 45, 102, 121, 161, 225, 
291, 494, 506, 508, 516, 572,580, 605, 708, 
712, 714-, 732, 740, 771, 774, 786, 835, 836, 837, 
839, 964, 1004; alteration of Paris under, 12, 
23, 122, 603, 604, 823, 910, 913; private indi- 
viduals under, 8, 19, 20, 131, 220, 780, 879; se- 
cret societies and, 607, 609, 613 

Louis XI, 878 

Louis XIV (Louis the Great), 107, 149, 788, 872 
Louis XVI, 85, 525, 573 
Louis XVIII, 34,835, 851 
Louys, Pierre, 263, 549 
Lovenjoul, Charles dc, 241 
Lowith, Karl, 116, 117, 118,364,368-369, 558, 
725 

Lucan, 286, 324, 373 
Lucas, Hippolytc, 98, 543 



Lucas-DubrctonJ., 47, 523, 744, 751, 753 
Ludovica, Maria, 413 
Lukacs, Gy»rgy, 472, 938 
Lumet, Louis, 754, 756 

Lurine, Louis, 96, 430, 503, 525, 535, 568, 591, 
753 

Luther, Martin, 179,468, 599 
Luxjoseph August, 161 

Mabille, Pierre, 388, 397 

Machiavelli, Niccolo, 312, 617, 801 

MacOrlan, Pierre, 72, 396, 627 

Maeterlinck, Maurice, 550, 557, 558, 559 

Magnin, Charles, 3 19-320, 365 

Maillard, Firmiii, 230, 525, 597-598, 724, 738, 

764, 798, 809,812,815 
Maire, Gilbert, 263, 264 
Malassis. See Poulet-Malassis, Auguste 
Malebranche, Nicolas, 875-876 
Malet, Albert, 108, 186, 579, 608, 609, 675, 702, 

708, 744, 745, 780, 790 
Malibran, Maria, 530 

Mallarmc, Stcphane, 73, 251, 288, 311, 379, 416, 

444, 538, 556, 773, 806, 1008 
Malthus, Thomas Robert, 632, 739 
Mandeville, Bernard, 595 
Manet, Edouard, 107 
Mann, Heiurich, 135, 856 
Marat Jean Paul, 516, 798 
Marcelin, Louis, 770 
Marchant, Guyot, 376 
Marcuse, Edgar, 516 
Marey, Etienne, 686 
Marie, Alexandre-Thomas, 573 
Marie-Louise, Empress, 105, 124 
Marivaux, Pierre, 469, 482 
Marquiset, Alfred, 496 
Marrast, Armand, 609 
Marsan, Eugene, 248 
Martin, Aimc, 758 
Martin, Alexis, 421 
Martinjohn, 684 
Martini, Simone, 264 
Martino, Pierre, 764 

Marx, Karl, 8, 16, 337, 362, 382, 393, 456, 460, 
461, 463-468, 472, 476, 477, 508, 546, 554, 578, 
599-600, 607-608, 615, 618-619, 697, 698, 

709, 727 731, 776,779, 787, 911, 937, 942, 945; 
•ii capitalist economy, 651, 652, 654, 655, 663, 
666-667, 668, 785, 938; class concept, 653, 
658, 659, 663, 667, 730, 863; «ii commodities 
and private property, 7, 18, 181-182, 196-197, 
209, 210, 223, 395, 446, 652, 653, 655-658, 
662, 663, 665, 666, 667, 669, 938, 939, 940, 
943, 1005; Commune of Paris arid, 793, 897; 
•ii cooperatives/collectives, 392, 394, 723, 863; 
critique of rights-of-maii concept, 668-669; ex- 
ile from France, 728; on Fourier, 17, 342, 343, 



626, 632, 633, 635, 637-638, 649, 667, 906, 
915; on Gotha Program, 658, 659; on industry, 

651, 652, 663, 668, 695-696, 800-801; on June 
Insurrection, 823; on labor and production, 4, 
195, 365-366, 432, 652, 653, 654, 655, 656, 
657, 658-660, 663, 664, 665, 666, 667, 668, 
729, 734 , 893, 941, 944; on revolution, 123, 

652, 767; social theory, 483-485; on technol- 
ogy, 654, 655, 668. W«RKS: Commun ist Mani- 
festo, 10, 659, 895, 897, 905; Dm Kapital, 106, 

155, 196-197, 366,383, 394, 446, 660, 804, 

866,937, 938, 1005, 1014 
Mathilde, Princess, 38 
Maturin, Charles, 236 

Maublanc, Rene, 58, 78, 199, 640, 641-642, 643, 

645, 646, 648, 743, 784 
Mauclair, Camille, 295-296, 627 
Maupassant, Guy dc, 420 
Mayakovsky. Vladimir, 745-746 
Mayer, Gustav, 141, 468, 469, 507, 615, 637, 728, 

729, 730, 792, 793, 815 
Maynard,F.,399,720 
Mehring, Franz, 197, 426, 709, 788 
Meilhac, Henri, 964 
Meissoimier, Jean, 685 
Meister, K., 415 
Mellcrio, Andre, 850, 851 
Menard, Louis, 310 
Mendes, Catulle, 273 

Mcnilmontant. See Enf antin, Barthclemy-Prosper 
Mcrcierjules, 595, 720 

Merrier, Louis Sebastien, 517, 519, 523, 525, 798 

Mercure dc Ranee, 265 

Mcrimce, Prosper, 23, 303, 765, 1006 

Mcrode, Clco de, 82, 837, 839, 960 

Mcry, Victor, 103, 737, 824 

Mei-yon, Charles, 23, 96, 141, 231, 232-233, 268, 

289, 291, 309, 322, 333, 346, 351, 362, 378, 

384-386, 414, 434, 447, 452 
Messac, Regis, 98, 143, 225, 234, 441, 771, 772 
Mcssagcr dc I'Asscmblcc, Lc, 282 
Metternich, Prince Klemens von, 867 
Mcurice, Paul, 187 

Meyer, Alfred Gotthold, 156-161, 539, 541, 672, 
862 

Meyer, Fricdrichjohann Lorenz, 405, 496, 527 

Meyer.Julius, 125, 391, 394-, 408,546 

Meyerbeer (Jakob Beer), 163 

Michel, Louise, 736, 791 

Michelangelo, 264, 298, 299 

Micheietjules, 4, 51, 78, 109-110, 150, 168, 238, 

444. 466, 468, 600, 619, 631, 713, 727, 740, 757, 

768, 774, 775, 782, 820-821, 893 
Michelet, Victor-Emile, 245 
Michels, Robert, 627 
Michiels, Alfred, 678, 746. 748, 820 
Migiiet, Francois. 816 
Mi nerve, Le, 579 



Minotmtrc, 549 

Mirabeau, Honore, comte de, 288, 765 

Mirbeau, Octave, 214, 288, 758 

Mirecourt, Eugene de, 765 

Mirecourtjacquot de, 749 

Miresjules-Isaac, 38, 86, 674, 732, 770, 862 

Mistral, Frederic, 253 

Moilin, Tony, 16, 53, 55, 93, 342 

Molenes, Paul de, 283 

MoliereJ. B., 301, 448, 599, 754, 764, 788 

Molinari, Gustave de, 577 

Molljoseph, 607, 728 

Monde, Le, 1012 

Monde illustre, Le, 275 

Monglond, Andre, 377, 482, 619 

Momtew; Le, 271, 274, 275, 281, 616, 734, 770 

Monitcur mdvcrsel, Le, 435, 689-690 

Monnier, Adrienne, 601, 977 

Monnier, Henri, 691, 740, 741, 743, 786 

Monselet, Charles, 273, 281 

Montaigu, J., 448 

Montesquieu, Charles de Secondat, baron de, 

469, 754, 1004 
Montesquiou, Robert de, 486-487, 688 
Montgolfier, Mile, de, 734, 1003 
Montorgueil, Georges, 562 
Montrue, Eugene, 71 
Morand, Paul, 180, 307, 462, 549 
More, Thomas, 342 
Moreas.Jean, 288 
Moreau, Hegesippe, 288, 710, 718 
Morgan, Lewis Henry, 637 
Morienval,Jean, 575 
Mornand, Felix, 198, 414 
Motte, Charles, 138 
Mouquetjules, 263, 296, 297, 353 
Munch, Edvard, 559 
Muret, Theodore, 39, 105, 124 
Murger, Henri, 286, 585, 761, 764, 773 
Murillo, Bartolome, 482 
Musard, Philippe, 169 

Musset, Alfred de, 286, 293, 340,427,438, 716 
Musset, Paul de, 41, 95, 228, 234, 252, 260, 273 

Nachmeron, Elie, 835 

Nadar (Felix Toumachon), 6, 44, 90, 91, 177, 229, 
230, 242, 293, 308-309, 413, 427, 567, 577, 585, 
673-674, 680, 681, 682, 686, 688, 773, 789, 797, 
902, 1001 

Nadaud, Martin, 54 

Main jaune, Le, 770 

Nanteuil, Celestin, 585 

Napoleon I, 55, 105, 404, 602, 790, 821, 847, 901, 
996 

Napoleon III, 33, 55, 83, 136, 139, 293,313, 315, 
338, 358, 375, 564, 575, 592, 600, 612, 617, 
641, 678, 687, 707, 710, 719, 725, 733, 758, 761, 
766, 786, 885, 967, 980; alterations to Paris un- 



der, 12, 102, 121, 122, 123, 125, 127, 128, 152, 
304,355, 793, 847, 848, 913; bourgeois society 
and, 4, 13, 15-16, 24, 131, 276, 779, 780; elec- 
tion of, 277, 613, 899, 997; finance and trade un- 
der, 75, 135, 578, 625, 818, 906; military 
regime and imperialism, 12, 23, 780, 823 

Nargeot, Clara, 279 

Nashjoseph, 176 

Motion, La, 671 

Midional, Le, 579, 591, 609, 610, 613, 761 
Mational Republicans de I'Ardiclie, Le, 746 
Naville, Francois Marc Louis, 722 
Naville, Pierre, 4-68 

Nerval, Gerard de, 88, 291, 404, 585, 674, 764 
NescioJ.-J., 713, 1002 
Nettelbeckjoachim, 866 
Nettement, Alfr ed, 92, 224, 440, 633-634, 684, 

741, 757, 759, 760, 761, 763, 772 
Neufchateau, Francois dc, 179, 180, 190 
Newton, Isaac, 222, 647, 650, 821 
Ney, Michel, 844 
Niboyet, Eugenic, 714 
Niepcejoseph Nicephore, 676-677, 993 
Niepce dc Saint-Victor, 674 
Niepovie, Gaetan, 140-141 
Nietzsche, Friedrich, 20, 25, 112, 115-116, 117, 

118, 119, 315, 337, 340,360, 364, 368-369, 

559, 969 
Nisard, Charles, 707 
Nisard, Desire, 372-373 
Noack, Ferdinand, 96, 97, 415 
Nodier, Charles, 567, 614, 837 
Nocljules, 296 
Noir, Victor, 617 
Nordau.Max, 91 

Mouvcllc Revue francaisc , La 306, 309, 310, 377, 
399, 469. See also Caillois, Roger 

O'Connell, Frederique, 973 
Odoievsky, Vladimir, 570 
Offenbach, Andre d; 787 
Offenbachjacques, 8, 110, 176, 600, 906, 916, 

962, 964. WORKS: Les Conies d'Hqfmaim, 965; 

La Vie paruienm, 153, 886, 962. See atsoKra- 

caucr, Siegfried 
Ollivier, Emile, 899 
Orgamsatcur, L', 583 
Orsini, Felice, 608, 913 
Ossian, 331 
Ourliac, Edouard, 773 
Ovid, 262, 550 
Owen, Robert, 637, 667 
Ozenfant, Amedee, 168, 555 

Pachter, Henry, 952 
Pailleron, Edouar d, 109 
Panizza, Oskar, 867 
Panorama, Le, 98 



Paris, Gaston, 549 
Paris Chronicle, 591 
Pascal, Blaise, 306, 431, 851 
Passage Brady, 42,48 

Passage Choiseul, 42, 43, 52, 831, 927, 1009 
Passage Colbert, 33, 42, 203, 422, 531, 835 
Passage Commerce, 835 
Passage Cnissol, 42 
Passage Dauphine, 42 
Passage de la Reunion, 33, 835 
Passage de la Trinite, 33 
Passage de l'lndustrie, 42 

Passage de 1'Opera, 33, 38, 39, 43, 48-50, 51, 82, 
103, 151, 406, 408, 830-831, 836, 871, 883, 904 

Passage de Lonne, 43,121 

Passage des Coloraies, 961 

Passage des Deux Pavilions, 4 1 

Passage des Gravilliers, 42 

Passage des Panoramas, 6, 33, 34, 36, 37, 41, 43, 
50, 51, 58, 530, 533, 535, 563, 564, 568, 830, 
833, 834, 836, 837, 852, 874, 878, 914, 959, 
992, 1009 

Passage des Princes, 38, 253 

Passage du Bois-de-Boulogne, 33, 835, 1009 

Passage du Caire, 33, 35, 40, 46, 55, 56, 89, 124, 
835, 836, 854 

Passage du Cheval-Blanc, 33 

Passage du Cheval Rouge, 52 

Passage du Commerce-Saint-Andre, 53 

Passage du Desir, 33, 48, 837 

Passage du Grand-Cerf, 43 

Passage du Pont-Neuf, 33, 422, 835, 965, 1009 

Passage du Prado, 1009 

Passage du Saumon, 40, 43, 46, 47, 798 

Passage Grosse-lete, 33, 835 

Passage Henri IV, 835, 1009 

Passage Mires (later Passage des Panoramas), 33, 
38,253,852 

Passage Pressiere (Bessieres?), 33 

Passage Raoul, 186, 723 

Passage Saucede, 42 

Passage Vero-Dodat, 32, 33, 34, 43, 48, 54, 55, 
837 

Passage Viollet, 4 1 

Passage Vivienne, 33, 37, 82, 203, 835, 836 

Passy, Hippolyte, 707 

Passy, Frederic, 189 

Patin,Gui,207 

Paine, La, 591 

Patric en danger, La, 794 

Pausanias, 82, 83,851, 861 

Pavlov, Ivan Petrovich, 210 

Paxtonjoseph, 158, 167, 177, 182, 183, 915 

Pays, Le, 295 

Pecard, Maurice, 185, 189 
Pechmeja, Ange, 264, 283-284 
Pecqueur, Constantin, 602 
Peguy, Charles, 92, 98, 523, 756 



Pdadanjosephin, 145, 261, 292, 843, 862 
Pelin, Gabriel, 411, 508, 756-757 
Pellarin, Charles, 620, 642 
Pellco«|,J., 507 

Pelletan, Charles Camille, 104,294 

Pene, Henri de, 109, 223, 432, 568 

People's Paper, The, 554, 730 

Perdiguier, Agricol, 611, 613, 723, 760 

Pereire, Isaac, 572, 585, 732, 770 

Pereirejacob Emile, 572, 581, 585, 674, 732, 770 

Perier, Casimir, 209, 708, 709, 900 

Perret, Auguste, 170, 559 

Ferret, Claude, 559 

Perret, Gustav, 559 

Pestalozzijohaim Heinrich, 648, 901, 915 

Petit Journal, Le, 592 

PetoJ. Morton, 182 

Petronius, 286 

Peuple, Le, 522, 574 

Phalange, La, 582, 624, 633, 636, 757 

Phare des Charades, Le, 746 

Pherecydes of Syros, 697 

Philipon, Charles, 740-741, 1004 

Picabia, Francis, 837 

Picasso, Pablo, 395, 843, 898 

Pichot, Amedee, 567 

Pierre, Alexandre, 185-186 

Pierre-Quint, Leon, 167 

Pigal, Edmejean, 786 

Pilotc, Le, 770 

Pinard, Ernest, 310 

Pinelli, Bartolomeo, 322 

Pinet, G, 137, 534, 588-589, 610, 711-712, 780, 

819-820, 863 
Pinloche, A., 574, 620 
Plant, M, 139 
Plateau,Joseph,686 
Platiere, Roland de la, 181 
Plato, 800, 852 

Plekhanov, Georgi, 141, 180, 485, 599, 608, 624, 
903,914 

Poe, Edgar Allan, 236, 240, 258, 264, 272, 289, 
303, 351-352, 353, 355, 804, 286, 287; Baude- 
laire and, 243, 247, 265, 283, 293, 295,325, 
334, 452; description of the crowd, 10, 96, 285, 
331-332, 336, 337-338, 358, 380, 418, 440, 
442, 445, 446, 895; literary forms and themes, 
9, 224, 234, 267, 440, 902; philosophy of furni- 
ture and of interiors, 9, 20, 212, 227, 570, 901; 
translated by Baudelaire, 280, 281, 282, 285, 
385, 445 

Poete, Marcel, 37, 41, 109, 121, 433, 530, 563 
Poisson, E., 44, 45, 182, 509, 628 
Pokrowski, Mikhail N., 613-614, 767-768 
Polles, Henri, 78, 225 
Pompadour, Mme. de, 855 
Ponroy, Arthur, 265, 279 
Ponsard, Francois, 978, 1006 



Ponson du Terrail, Pierre-Alexis, 234, 388, 447 
Pontmartin, Armand dc, 278, 279, 303, 363, 454 
Ptpulmre, Le, 623 

Porche, Francois, 99, 101, 102, 272, 273, 278, 279, 

280, 282 
Pottier (Potier), Eugene, 790 
Poulet-Malassis, Auguste, 96, 231, 240, 259, 275, 

276, 280, 286, 755, 761, 973 
Poulot, Denis, 710 
Pradier, Charles, 583, 584 
Prarond, Ernest, 273, 280, 289 
Presse, La, 572, 585, 591, 593, 689, 759, 760, 761 
Prevostjeau, 377 

Prevost, Pierre, 6, 527, 532, 835-836 

Privat dAnglemont, Alexandre, 302, 522, 574 

Produdeur, Le, 575 

Proles, Charles, 618 

Protot, Eugene, 795 

Proudhon, Pierre-Joseph, 58, 279, 297, 380, 413, 
574, 598, 624-625, 637, 647, 667, 668, 711, 724, 
728, 730, 731, 735, 791, 793, 794; on Hegel and 
Marx, 733; on production, 734 

Proust, Marcel, 106, 158, 211, 216, 217, 279, 307, 
309-310, 355, 382-383, 384, 388-389, 393, 
395, 402, 403-404, 420, 454, 464, 486-487, 
519,531, 547, 556, 560-561, 839, 841, 844, 
853, 859, 860, 883, 904, 907, 912, 916, 917, 
939,983 

Prudhomme. See Sully Prudhomme, Rene 
Przybyszewsld, Stanislaw, 559 
Ptolemy, 685 

Pujoulxjean-Baptiste, 519-520, 521, 522, 528 
Pyat, Felix, 380-381 

Quinet, Edgar, 600, 683, 684, 757, 775, 779 
Quotidienne, La, 280, 579, 770 

Rabelais, Le, 766 

Racinejean, 103, 247, 258, 307,377, 599, 969 
Raffet, Denis, 141,787 
Rageot, Gaston, 513 

Raphael (Raffaello Sanzio), 263, 298, 299, 635, 
685 

Raphael, Max, 393, 464-465, 791, 916, 917 
Rattier, Paul Ernest de, 137, 138, 378, 422, 432, 

523, 524, 821 
Raumer, Friedrich von, 138, 397, 508, 797 
Raymond, Marcel, 98 
Raynaud, Ernest, 303-304, 305 
Redern, Sigisraond, comte de, 589, 651 
Redon, Odilon, 20, 204, 429, 539, 542, 556, 847, 

850, 851, 877, 878, 924 
Refirme, La, 522 
Regnier, Henri de, 246 
Reich, Willi, 268 

Reichardtjohann Friedrich, 172, 177 
Reik, Theodor, 402-403 
Reinach, Salomon, 161 



Reja, Marcel, 11, 416 

Rellstab, Ludwig, 432, 756, 797 

Rembrandt, 482 

Remy, Antoine, 707 

Renan, Ernest, 197, 554, 654 

Renard, Georges, 758 

Renardjules, 348,380 

Renard, Maurice, 828 

Renaudot, Theophraste, 591 

Rency, Georges, 248, 249 

Renouvicr, Charles, 755 

Reprcsentant de I'Indre, Le, 279, 281 

Reprcsentant du peujAe, Le, 279 

Rcpublique du peuple, La, 281 

Restif de la Bretonne (Nicolas Restif), 469, 635 

Rethel, Alfred, 238 

Revolution, La, 574 

Revue, La, 274 

Revue britanmque, La, 280, 705 

Revue contemporaine, La, 278 

Revue de Pans, La, 7, 282, 583, 762 

Revue des deux mondes, La, 272, 279, 280, 310, 

575, 600, 723, 762 
Revue europe'enne, La, 275 
Revue fantaisiste, La, 279 
Revue Jrancaise, La, 383 
Revue germamque, La, 313 
Revue liberate, La, 29 4 
Revue parisienne, La, 754 
Revue philosophique et rehgieuse, La, 310 
Revue politique, La, 282 
Revue socialist e, La, 624 
Revues parisiames, 586 
ReyJ., 46, 505, 506 
Reynaudjean, 118, 119,382 
Reynold de Cressier, Frederic Gonzague, 305, 311 
Rlieal, Sebastien, 187 
Ricard, Louis-Gustave, 287, 758 
Ricardo, David, 664, 665, 667 
Richelieu, Armand Emmanuel, 801 
Richterjean Paul, 5, 620, 633, 642, 906, 914, 915 
Rigault, Raoul, 618 

Rilke, Rainer Maria, 63, 551, 558, 842, 843 
Rimbaud, Arthur, 13, 25, 31, 37, 340, 371, 469, 

745, 789, 902 
Riquet, Pierre, 575 
Rire,Le,55\,M5 
Rivierejacques, 256-257 
Rjazanov, D., 182, 708, 709 
Robespierre, Maximilien, 942, 1008 
Robiquetjacques, 223 
Rochefort, Henri, 770, 789, 899 
Rodenbach, Georges, 292, 294 
Rodenbergjulius, 38, 39-40, 86, 105, 423 
Rodin, Auguste, 288, 295-296 
Rodrigues, Olinde, 230, 597, 716, 723, 996 
Rogier, Camille, 773 
Rollinat, Mauiice, 251, 289, 329 



Romainsjules, 99, 266,373, 443-444 
Ronsard, Pierre, 228, 247, 274 
Rops, Felicien, 257, 275, 288 
Roqueplan, Nestor, 774, 978 
Rosetti, Constantin, 261 
Rossini, Gioacchino, 495 
Rothschildjames, 735, 770 
Rothschild, Nathan, 571 
Rotrou,Jean de, 321 
Rouget de Lisle, Claude, 399, 718 
Rouland, Gustave, 275 

Rousseaujean-Jacques, 227, 238, 253, 343, 385, 

453, 466, 469,482, 640-641, 669,805 
Ruche poptdcdre, La, 702, 703, 712 
Ruckert, Friedrich, 842 
Ruff, Marcel A., 378 
Ruge, Arnold, 600, 725 
Riihle, Otto, 182 

Rumford, Count (Benjamin Thompson), 721 
Ruskinjohn, 249, 862 

Sabatier, Aglae-Josephine, 245, 247, 273 

Sade, marquis de, 277, 306, 318, 368, 638-639 

Sadler, Michael, 733 

Saint-Amant, Marc Antoine Girard, 252 

Sainte-Beuve, Charles Augustin, 196, 245, 265, 
273, 274, 275, 278, 286, 307, 320-321, 322, 323, 
349, 356, 358-359, 365, 387, 486, 575, 586, 
619, 746, 765, 776, 800, 974-975 

Saint-Germain, comte de, 814 

Saint-Leger, Didot, 573 

Saint-Marc Girardin, Francois, 804 

Saint-Martin, Louis, 377 

Saint-Saens, Camille, 204 

Saint-Simon, Henri/Saint-Simonianism, 131, 282, 
380, 399, 420, 448, 475, 573, 577, 588,591, 
592-593, 594, 595, 598, 600, 601, 610, 625, 
626, 701, 715, 733, 812, 903, 905, 937; on in- 
dustrial and economic systems, 7, 18, 367, 572, 
574, 576, 578-579, 581, 590, 602, 627, 635-636, 
732, 749, 768, 782, 784; Marx and, 667, 863; 
mysticism and, 575-576, 650; Paris and, 398, 
401; poetry and theater of, 228, 579, 716, 725, 
757, 902; theory of art, 580, 598-599; universal- 
ism theory, 637, 816-817 

Salut public, Le, 273, 280-281, 293 

Salut public de Lyons, Le, 275 

Salvandy, Narcisse, comte de, 750 

Samsonjosef W., 69, 856 

Sand, George, 277, 280, 318, 523, 595, 744, 758, 
760, 761, 763 

Sandeaujules, 250 

Sanvoisin, Gactan, 141 

Saphir, M. G, 527 

Sarcey, Francisque, 291 

Saulnier, Paul, 584 

Sauvageot, Charles, 210 

Schade, Wblfgang, 685-686 



Schapper, Karl, 728 

Scheerbart, Paul, 4, 5, 560, 906 

Scheffer, Ary, 677 

Schelling, Friedrich, 779 

Scherer, Edmond, 249 

Schiller, Friedrich von, 659, 756, 855, 860 

Schinkel, Karl Friedrich, 167 

Schinzel, Elisabeth, 251 

Schlabrendorf, Graf Gustav von, 399, 600, 615 
Schlegel, Friedrich, 379, 944 
Schlosser, Friedrich Christoph, 469 
Schmidt, Adolf, 417 
Schmidt-Weissenfels, Eduard, 779 
Sclmeider, Louis, 867 
Scholem, Gershom, 937, 953 
Scholl, Aurelien, 770 

Schopenhauer, Arthur, 13, 207, 545, 857, 941, 957 
Schuhl, Pierre-Maxime, 486, 602, 697, 800 
Schulte, Fritz Th., 136, 162 
Schweitzerjohann, 730, 731 
Scott, Walter, 303, 441, 762, 769 
Scribe, Eugene, 39, 274, 278, 391, 671-672, 757, 
902 

Seche, Alphonse, 271, 272, 273, 274, 275, 276, 445 
Second, Alberic, 434 
See, Hemi, 867 

Segantini, Giovanni, 553, 556, 559 
Seignobos, Charles, 76,467, 593, 714 
Seilliere, Ernest, 261, 262, 266, 276, 277 
Semaine, La, 280, 440 
Semaine theatrale, La, 281 
Semper, Gottfried, 569-570 
Senancour, Etienne Pivert de, 278, 307 
Seneca, 293 

Senef elder, Aloys, 285, 586, 676, 787 

September Laws, 809 

Servandoni, Giovanni, 902, 916 

Sevigne, Madame de, 706 

Seyffarth, W)ldemar, 423, 497-498 

Shelley, Percy Bysshe, 351, 370, 449-450 

Sikle, Le, 585, 591, 592, 766 

Silberling, E., 42, 350, 623, 625, 639, 644, 645 

Silvy, Camille, 684 

Simmel, Enrst, 510-511 

Simmel, Georg, 76-77, 227, 433, 447, 448, 462, 

480, 660-662, 664, 866 
Simon, Gustave, 766-767 
Simon.Jules, 127 
Simond, Charles, 179 
Simplicusivmx, 291, 392 
Siraudin, Paul, 178 
Sismondijean Simonde de, 667, 709 
Skerlitchjean, 524, 717-718, 758-759 
Smith, Adam, 469, 577, 665, 666 
Sommerard, Alexandre du, 209, 210 
Sonolet, Louis, 70, 218, 219 
Sorel, Georges, 484 
Souday, Paul, 305, 306, 365, 757 



Soumct, Alexandre, 575 

Soupault, Philippe, 255, 257 

Spcctatcur, Le, 454 

Spectator, The, 311 

Spengler, Oswald, 100, 386, 806 

Spielhagen, Friedrich, 554 

Spinoza, Bamch, 485 

Spitzer, Leo, 519 

Spitzweg, Carl, 342 

Spiihler, Willy, 420, 571 

Spuller, Eugene, 761 

Stahl, Fritz, 147-149, 170, 202, 384-385, 404, 

415,526, 778, 798, 799 
Stahr, Adolf, 12, 121, 421, 497, 698, 847, 851 
Stalinjoseph, 944 
Starke, C. N., 576 
Stein, Lorenz von, 578, 705 
Steiner, Rudolf, 550 
Steinlen, Theophile, 482 
Stendhal (Mane Henri Beyle), 555, 713 
Stenger, Erich, 405, 527 
Sternberger, Dolf, 170, 374, 4-78, 550,554, 559, 

570, 690 
Stevens, Alfred, 536 
Stifter, Adalbert, 481 
Stowe, Harriet Beecher, 763 
Strabo, 796 
Stravinsky, Igor, 843 
Strindberg, Frida, 558 

Strindbergjohan August, 87, 205, 473, 558-559 
Suares, Andre, 200, 247, 286-287, 293 
Suchet, Louis-Gabriel, 419 
Sue, Eugene, 214, 221, 358, 431, 441,590, 702, 

721, 744, 756, 757, 759, 761, 763, 777, 851, 897, 

902, 1004-1005. WORKS: Lcs Mystercs dc Paris, 

754, 763, 771, 772 
Sully Prudhoiume, Rene, 267, 278 
Swedenborg, Emanuel, 250, 293, 377, 591, 621, 

625 

Swiftjonathan, 586 

Swinburne, Algernon Charles, 303, 311 

Sylphc, Le, 38, 853 

Szabo, Erwin, 465 

Szai-vady, Friedrich, 136, 745 

Taine, Hippolyte, 7, 17, 654 
Talbot, William Hemy Fox, 158 
Talleyrand-Perigord, Charles dc, 495 
Talma, Francois, 495 

Talmeyr, Maurice, 65, 151, 173, 176, 612, 915 

Tardieu, Emile, 102, 105, 248-249, 849 

Tarle, E., 580, 709 

Taylor, Frederick Winslow, 436 

Temps, Le, 470, 505, 513, 560, 579, 707, 863 

Tenot, Eugene, 731 

Tertullian, 285 

lexier, E., 525 

Thayer, James, 992 



Thei-ive, Aiidre, 264-265, 397, 553, 560 
Thibaudet, Albert, 233, 251-253, 572 
Tliiboust, Lambert, 502 
Thierry, Augustin, 599, 601, 608, 816 
Tliierry, Edouard, 234, 271, 274, 275, 288 
Thiers, Adolphe, 158, 208-209, 590, 592, 617, 

618, 731, 744, 791, 795, 797, 822, 899, 900, 

1007, 1008 
Thomas, Emile, 701 
Thomas, Louis, 243, 246 
Thomasius, Christian, 866 
"Three Glorious Days," 139 
Thurow, H., 575-576, 624 
Tiberius, 796 
Heck, Ludwig, 10 1 1 
Tiedemann, Rolf, 885 
Tintamarrc, Le, 174 
Tissot, Aniedee de, 147, 201, 451 
TissotJ., 737-738 
licqueville, Alexis de, 722 
Tocsin dcs travailleurs, Le, 578 
T.Iain, M, 186 
T.lstoijakov, 613 
Tombeau, Le,295 
Toubin, Charles, 280, 289 
Tour de mondc, Le, 787 
Toureil, L B.J., 816, 817 
liurquet-Milues, G., 294 
T«usseuel, Alphonse, 8, 18, 73, 192-195, 196, 

241-242, 596, 622-623, 632-633, 634, 635, 

641, 649, 723, 763, 784, 808-809, 894, 906, 

916,969 

Travies de Villers, Charles, 350, 741, 978 

Trelat, Ulysse, 729 

Trial, Raymond, 260, 263 

Tribune, La, 609, 610, 820 

Tricotel, C. F., 506, 713 

Tristan, Flora, 615, 738 

Troubat,Julcs,286 

lioyon, Constant, 290 

Turgot, Anne Robert, 373, 476-478, 765 

Ulbach, Louis, 225, 773 
Ungar, Hermann, 866 
l/«;o«,I;522,712 
Univers, L, 250 
Unold, Max, 861 
Usener, Hermann, 324 

Vacqueric, Auguste, 755 

Vaihinger, Hans, 559 

Valcnsi, R.-I-I., 52, 53, 54, 535, 760 

Valery, Paul, 74, 78, 224, 228, 234, 273, 335, 404, 

440,453, 467, 471, 554, 560, 771, 801, 804 
Villesjules, 266-267, 365, 378-379, 790 
Vanderburch, Emile, 7, 17, 171 
Vim de Velde, Henty, 9, 20, 550, 551 
Var, Robert du, 722 



Varlin, Louis-Eugene, 795 
Varnhagen von Ense, Karl, 451 
Vasari, Giorgio, 210 
Vaucanson,Jacques de, 695 
Vandal, Jean, 111 
Veltheiin, Hans von, 867 
Vergiiiol, Camille, 278 
Verhaeren, Emile, 295, 732 
Verlaine, Paul, 101, 247, 251, 288, 340 
Vernier, Charles, 64 
Veron, Louis, 771 

Veron, Theodore, 311, 590, 591, 762 

Veuillot, Louis, 104, 105, 123, 250, 335, 390, 492, 

564, 764-765, 860 
Victoria, Queen, 190 
Vidocq, Francois, 98, 771 
Viel, Charles-Francois, 92, 93, 95, 158, 166-167, 

168, 797-798,821 
Viel-Castel, Horace de, 491 
Vic Parisictme, La, 76, 770 
Vigny, Alfred de, 253, 266, 278, 284, 287, 296, 

309-310, 321, 440, 469, 716, 732, 790 
Vildrac, Charles (Charles Messager), 517 
Villclejean Baptiste, 609, 782 
Vfllemaiii, Abel, 292, 391, 770 
Villemcssai-itjean, 278, 574-575, 591, 770 
Villiers, Roland, 685, 686 
Villicrs dc l'lslc-Adam, Auguste, comte de 349 
Villon, Francois, 311 
Viollet-le-Duc, Eugene, 168, 778 
Virgil, 10, 82, 252, 896 

Vischer, Friedrich Hicodor, 66, 67, 68, 70, 75, 76, 
77, 78, 103, 105, 279, 493, 846, 847, 897, 904 

Voix des femmes, La, 714 

Volgin, V, 579-581, 627 

Volney, Constantin-Francois, 581, 712 

Voltaire, Francois, 234, 291, 581, 599, 719, 74 6, 
754, 802 



Wagner, Richard, 11, 230, 236, 237, 249-250, 

543, 669-670, 755, 895, 897 
Walloiijean, 773 
Wilpole, Hugh, 190-191 
Watripon, Antonio, 240 
Watteaujean-Antoine, 263 
Watzold, Wilhelm, 677 
Wedekind, Frank, 492, 961 
Weidle, Wladiinir, 198, 225, 688, 689 
Weiss, Hilde, 727 
Weiss, J.J., 278,616 
Weiss, Louise, 226 
Wcndel, Hermaim, 379 
Westheim, Paul, 145 
Wey, Francis, 687 
Whistlerjamcs, 238 

Wiertz, Antomejoseph, 6, 157, 176, 216, 218, 393, 
529-530, 555-556, 671, 683, 687, 845, 846, 
858-859, 886,901,902,915 

Wiesengrund-Adorno, Hicodor. See Adorno 

Wilde, Oscar, 556, 843 

Winter, Amalie, 693 

Wolfskchl, Karl, 207; 860 

Wordsworth, William, 968 

Workers Commission, 188 

Workers International. See International Working- 
men's Association 
WorkingMan, The, 182 
Worth, Charles. 770 
Wronskijosef Hoene de, 293, 635, 636 

Young Germany movement, 815 
Yverdon. See Pestalozzijohanu Heinrich 
Yvon. Adolphe, 678 

Zahar, Marcel, 559 

Z«la, Emile, 5, 203-204, 624, 627-628. 770, 835, 
875, 906, 915 



This book is set in the Adobe fonts Berthold Baskerville Book and Bodoni, contem- 
porary adaptations of fonts created byjobn Baskerville in the mid-eighteenth century, 
and by Giambattista Bodoni in the early nineteenth century. The headings are set in 
Bodoni Poster, Bodoni Poster Compressed, and Bodoni Bold Condensed. The type 
was composed at Wellington Graphics in Boston, Massachusetts, in Corel Ventura 
Publisher on an IBM PC. 

The book was printed web offset on 45-pound Sebago paper at Hamilton 
Printing Company in Castleton, New York. The cover was printed at Henry N. 
Sawyer Company, Charlestown, Massachusetts. 

The book was designed by Gwen Nefsky Frankfeldt. The production was super- 
vised by David Foss. 



ARCADES PROJEf is Walter Benjamin's effort to represent and to critique 
the bourgeois experience of nineteenth-century history and, in so doing, to liberate the 
suppressed "true history" that underlay the ideological mask. Conceived in Paris in 1927 and 
still in progress when Ben|amin fled the Occupation in 1 940, The Arcades Project (in German, 
Das Passagen-Werk) was constructed over the course of thirteen years— "the theater," as 
Benjamin called it, "of all my struggles and all my ideas." 



"The Arcades Project is, even in its truncated 
form, a miracle of scholarship ... To say that 
I was floored while reading it isn't strong 
enough. I was pulled in and overwhelmed. 
I know it's a work of cultural history, and it 
might profitably be read as literary criticism 
or philosophy, but I can't help thinking of it 
as the greatest epic poem written in the 
twentieth century: fragmented, contradictory 
and profoundly suggestive." 

— Andre' Alexis, Globe and Mail 

'This posthumous volume suggests that, in 
[their] incomplete and fissiparous state, 
[Benjamin's] reflections are themselves an 
unflawed mirror for the world which he was 
attempting to explore. He seems to have 
retrieved everything, and anticipated every- 
thing. His friend Gershom Scholem once 
declared that Benjamin's suicide also repre- 
sented 'the death of the European mind.' The 
Arcades Project suggests that this was not too 
great a hyperbole." 

— Peter Ackroyd, The Times 

"Quite simply, The Arcades Project is one of the twentieth 
century's greatest efforts of historical comprehension — 
some would say the greatest ... By and large, the edition 
is a heroic achievement." 

— T. J. Clark, author of Farewell to an Idea 

"We will be feasting on Walter Benjamin's Arcades Project 
for years to come... By any standard, the appearance of 
this long-awaited work is a towering literary event . . . 
The Arcades Project surpasses its legend. It captures the 
relationship between a writer and a city in a form as richly 
developed as those presented in the great cosmopolitan 
novels of Proust, Joyce, Musil, and Isherwood." 

— Herbert Muschamp, New York Times 



"The Arcades book, whatever our verdict on it — ruin, failure, 
impossible project- -suggests a new way of writing about a 
civilization, using its rubbish as materials rather than its artworks: 
history from below rather than from above. And [Benjamin's] call 
[in the Theses') for a history centered on the sufferings of the 
vanquished, rather than on the achievements of the victors, is 
prophetic of the way in which history-writing has begun to think 
of itself in our lifetime." 

— J. M. Coetzee, New York Review of Books 

"If Benjamin is here staking his claim to a certain afterlife of 
philosophizing, his Arcades Project may be taken as establishing 
the conditions . . . under which philosophy is still possible." 

— Stanley Cavell, Artforum 

"The major literary success of the Project is its ability precisely 
to induce in the reader a peculiar oneiric attention, a sort of 
watchful dreaminess — even a sort of illuminating boredom. 
Details wash past in waves; quotations loop in and out of the 
elliptical, jagged arguments; polished sentences pitch up from 
the morass like foil-wrapped sweets discovered on the beach." 

— Mark Kingwell, Harper's Magazine 



Howard eiland is Lecturer in 
Literature at MIT and the author of essays 
on Nietzsche and Heidegger. 

is Assistant 
Professor of English at Brown University and 
the author of Writing in Parts: Imitation and 
Exchange in Nineteenth-Century Literature. 



THE BELKNAP PRESS OF 
HARVARD UNIVERSITY PRESS 

Cambridge, Massachusetts 
London, England 



www.hup.harvard.edu 



Cover photograph: Galerie Vivienne. nineteenth-century 
Paris an shopping arcade Copyright Robert Holmes/Cotbis. 
Inset: Saiah Bernhardt, 1864 (detail), photo by Nadar. 
Cover design by Jill Broitbarth. 



